What is its reward?
“Disenchantment has dispassion as its purpose, dispassion as its reward.
“And what is the purpose of dispassion?
What is its reward?
“Dispassion has knowledge & vision of release as its purpose, knowledge & vision of release as its reward.
“Thus in this way, Ananda, skillful virtues have freedom from remorse as their purpose, freedom from remorse as their reward.
Freedom from remorse has joy as its purpose, joy as its reward.
Joy has rapture as its purpose, rapture as its reward.
Rapture has serenity as its purpose, serenity as its reward.
Serenity has pleasure as its purpose, pleasure as its reward.
Pleasure has concentration as its purpose, concentration as its reward.
Concentration has knowledge & vision of things as they actually are as its purpose, knowledge & vision of things as they actually are as its reward.
Knowledge & vision of things as they actually are has disenchantment as its purpose, disenchantment as its reward.
Disenchantment has dispassion as its purpose, dispassion as its reward.
Dispassion has knowledge & vision of release as its purpose, knowledge & vision of release as its reward.
“In this way, Ananda, skillful virtues lead step-by-step to the consummation of arahantship.”
Then Janussonin the brahman went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One, “Master Gotama, you know that we brahmans give gifts, make offerings, 'May this gift accrue to our dead relatives.
May our dead relatives partake of this gift.' Now, Master Gotama, does that gift accrue to our dead relatives?
Do our dead relatives partake of that gift?
“In possible places, brahman, it accrues to them, but not in impossible places.
“And which, Master Gotama, are the possible places?
Which are the impossible places?
“There is the case, brahman, where a certain person takes life, takes what is not given, engages in sensual misconduct, engages in false speech, engages in divisive speech, engages in abusive speech, engages in idle chatter, is covetous, bears ill will, and has wrong views.
With the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in hell.
He lives there, he remains there, by means of whatever is the food of hell-beings.
This is an impossible place for that gift to accrue to one staying there.
“Then there is the case where a certain person takes life, takes what is not given, engages in sensual misconduct, engages in false speech, engages in divisive speech, engages in abusive speech, engages in idle chatter, is covetous, bears ill will, and has wrong views.
With the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the animal womb.
He lives there, he remains there, by means of whatever is the food of common animals.
This, too, is an impossible place for that gift to accrue to one staying there.
“Then there is the case where a certain person refrains from taking life, refrains from taking what is not given, refrains from sensual misconduct, refrains from false speech, refrains from divisive speech, refrains from abusive speech, refrains from idle chatter, is not covetous, bears no ill will, and has right views.
With the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of human beings.
He lives there, he remains there, by means of whatever is the food of human beings.
This, too, is an impossible place for that gift to accrue to one staying there.
“Then there is the case where a certain person refrains from taking life, refrains from taking what is not given, refrains from sensual misconduct, refrains from false speech, refrains from divisive speech, refrains from abusive speech, refrains from idle chatter, is not covetous, bears no ill will, and has right views.
With the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the devas.
He lives there, he remains there, by means of whatever is the food of devas.
This, too, is an impossible place for that gift to accrue to one staying there.
“Then there is the case where a certain person takes life, takes what is not given, engages in sensual misconduct, engages in false speech, engages in divisive speech, engages in abusive speech, engages in idle chatter, is covetous, bears ill will, and has wrong views.
With the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the realms of the hungry shades.
He lives there, he remains there, by means of whatever is the food of hungry shades.
He lives there, he remains that, by means of whatever his friends or relatives give in dedication to him.
This is the possible place for that gift to accrue to one staying there.
“But, Master Gotama, if that dead relative does not reappear in that possible place, who partakes of that gift?
“Other dead relatives, brahman, who have reappeared in that possible place.
“But, Master Gotama, if that dead relative does not reappear in that possible place, and other dead relatives have not reappeared in that possible place, then who partakes of that gift?
“It's impossible, brahman, it cannot be, that over this long time that possible place is devoid of one's dead relatives.
But at any rate, the donor does not go without reward.
“Does Master Gotama describe any preparation for the impossible places?
“Brahman, I do describe a preparation for the impossible places.
There is the case where a certain person takes life, takes what is not given, engages in sensual misconduct, engages in false speech, engages in divisive speech, engages in abusive speech, engages in idle chatter, is covetous, bears ill will, and has wrong views.
But he gives food, drink, cloth, vehicles, garlands, scents, creams, bed, lodging, & lamps to brahmans & contemplatives.
With the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of elephants.
There he receives food, drink, flowers, & various ornaments.
It's because he took life, took what is not given, engaged in sensual misconduct, engaged in false speech, engaged in divisive speech, engaged in abusive speech, engaged in idle chatter, was covetous, bore ill will, and had wrong views that he reappears in the company of elephants.
But it's because he gave food, drink, cloth, vehicles, garlands, scents, creams, bed, lodging, & lamps to brahmans & contemplatives that he receives food, drink, flowers, & various ornaments.
“Then there is the case where a certain person takes life… has wrong views.
But he gives food… lamps to brahmans & contemplatives.
With the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of horses… in the company of cattle… in the company of poultry.
There he receives food, drink, flowers, & various ornaments.
It's because he took life… and had wrong views that he reappears in the company of poultry.
But it's because he gave food, drink… & lamps to brahmans & contemplatives that he receives food, drink, flowers, & various ornaments.
“Then there is the case where a certain person refrains from taking life, refrains from taking what is not given, refrains from sensual misconduct, refrains from false speech, refrains from divisive speech, refrains from abusive speech, refrains from idle chatter, is not covetous, bears no ill will, and has right views.
And he gives food, drink, cloth, vehicles, garlands, scents, creams, bed, lodging, & lamps to brahmans & contemplatives.
With the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of human beings.
There he experiences the five strings of human sensuality.
It's because he refrained from taking what is not given, refrained from sensual misconduct, refrained from false speech, refrained from divisive speech, refrained from abusive speech, refrained from idle chatter, was not covetous, bore no ill will, and had right views that he reappears in the company of human beings.
And it's because he gave food, drink, cloth, vehicles, garlands, scents, creams, bed, lodging, & lamps to brahmans & contemplatives that he experiences the five strings of human sensuality.

“Then there is the case where a certain person refrains from taking life… and has right views.
And he gives food, drink, cloth, vehicles, garlands, scents, creams, bed, lodging, & lamps to brahmans & contemplatives.
With the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of devas.
There he experiences the five strings of divine sensuality.
It's because he refrained from taking what is not given… and had right views that he reappears in the company of devas.
And it's because he gave food, drink, cloth, vehicles, garlands, scents, creams, bed, lodging, & lamps to brahmans & contemplatives that he experiences the five strings of divine sensuality.
But at any rate, brahman, the donor does not go without reward.
“It's amazing, Master Gotama, it's astounding, how it's enough to make one want to give a gift, enough to make one want to make an offering, where the donor does not go without reward.
“That's the way it is, brahman.
That's the way it is.
The donor does not go without reward.
“Magnificent, Master Gotama!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has Master Gotama — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to Master Gotama for refuge, to the Dhamma, & to the community of monks.
May Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge, from this day forward, for life.”
Translator's note: According to the Maha-parinibbana Sutta, Cunda the silversmith at a later date presented the Buddha with the final meal before his total liberation.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Pava in Cunda the silversmith's mango grove.
Then Cunda the silversmith went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him: “Cunda, of whose rites of purification do you approve?
“The brahmans of the Western lands, lord — those who carry water pots, wear garlands of water plants, worship fire, & purify with water: they have declared purification rites of which I approve.
“And what kind of purification rites have they declared, those brahmans of the Western lands who carry water pots, wear garlands of water plants, worship fire, & purify with water?
“There is the case where the brahmans of the Western lands… get their disciples to undertake their practice thus: 'Come, now, my good man: Get up at the proper time from your bed and touch the earth.
If you don't touch the earth, touch wet cow dung.
If you don't touch wet cow dung, touch green grass.
If you don't touch green grass, worship a fire.
If you don't worship a fire, pay homage to the sun with clasped hands.
If you don't pay homage to the sun with clasped hands, go down into the water three times by nightfall.' These are the purification rites declared by the brahmans of the Western lands… of which I approve.
“Cunda, the purification rites declared by the brahmans of the Western lands… are one thing; the purification in the discipline of the noble ones is something else entirely.
“But how is there purification in the discipline of the noble ones, lord?
It would be good if the Blessed One would teach me how there is purification in the discipline of the noble ones.
“Then in that case, Cunda, listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” Cunda the silversmith responded.
The Blessed One said: “There are three ways in which one is made impure by bodily action, four ways in which one is made impure by verbal action, and three ways in which one is made impure by mental action.
“And how is one made impure in three ways by bodily action?
There is the case where a certain person takes life, is a hunter, bloody-handed, devoted to killing & slaying, showing no mercy to living beings.
He takes what is not given.
He takes, in the manner of a thief, things in a village or a wilderness that belong to others and have not been given by them.
He engages in sensual misconduct.
He gets sexually involved with those who are protected by their mothers, their fathers, their brothers, their sisters, their relatives, or their Dhamma; those with husbands, those who entail punishments, or even those crowned with flowers by another man.
This is how one is made impure in three ways by bodily action.
“And how is one made impure in four ways by verbal action?
There is the case where a certain person engages in false speech.
When he has been called to a town meeting, a group meeting, a gathering of his relatives, his guild, or of the royalty, if he is asked as a witness, 'Come & tell, good man, what you know': If he doesn't know, he says, 'I know.' If he does know, he says, 'I don't know.' If he hasn't seen, he says, 'I have seen.' If he has seen, he says, 'I haven't seen.' Thus he consciously tells lies for his own sake, for the sake of another, or for the sake of a certain reward.
He engages in divisive speech.
What he has heard here he tells there to break those people apart from these people here.
What he has heard there he tells here to break these people apart from those people there.
Thus breaking apart those who are united and stirring up strife between those who have broken apart, he loves factionalism, delights in factionalism, enjoys factionalism, speaks things that create factionalism.
He engages in abusive speech.
He speaks words that are harsh, cutting, bitter to others, abusive of others, provoking anger and destroying concentration.
He engages in idle chatter.
He speaks out of season, speaks what isn't factual, what isn't in accordance with the goal, the Dhamma, & the Vinaya, words that are not worth treasuring.
This is how one is made impure in four ways by verbal action.
“And how is one made impure in three ways by mental action?
There is the case where a certain person is covetous.
He covets the belongings of others, thinking, 'O, that what belongs to others would be mine!' He bears ill will, corrupt in the resolves of his heart: 'May these beings be killed or cut apart or crushed or destroyed, or may they not exist at all!' He has wrong view, is warped in the way he sees things: 'There is nothing given, nothing offered, nothing sacrificed.
There is no fruit or result of good or bad actions.
There is no this world, no next world, no mother, no father, no spontaneously reborn beings; no brahmans or contemplatives who, faring rightly & practicing rightly, proclaim this world & the next after having directly known & realized it for themselves.' This is how one is made impure in three ways by mental action.
“These, Cunda, are the ten courses of unskillful action.
When a person is endowed with these ten courses of unskillful action, then even if he gets up at the proper time from his bed and touches the earth, he is still impure.
If he doesn't touch the earth, he is still impure.
If he touches wet cow dung, he is still impure.
If he doesn't touch wet cow dung, he is still impure.
If he touches green grass… If he doesn't touch green grass… If he worships a fire… If he doesn't worship a fire… If he pays homage to the sun with clasped hands… If he doesn't pay homage to the sun with clasped hands… If he goes down into the water three times by nightfall… If he doesn't go down into the water three times by nightfall, he is still impure.
Why is that?
Because these ten courses of unskillful action are impure and cause impurity.
Furthermore, as a result of being endowed with these ten courses of unskillful action, hell is declared, an animal womb is declared, the realm of hungry shades is declared — that or any other bad destination.
“Now, Cunda, there are three ways in which one is made pure by bodily action, four ways in which one is made pure by verbal action, and three ways in which one is made pure by mental action.
“And how is one made pure in three ways by bodily action?
There is the case where a certain person, abandoning the taking of life, abstains from the taking of life.
He dwells with his rod laid down, his knife laid down, scrupulous, merciful, compassionate for the welfare of all living beings.
Abandoning the taking of what is not given, he abstains from taking what is not given.
He does not take, in the manner of a thief, things in a village or a wilderness that belong to others and have not been given by them.
Abandoning sensual misconduct, he abstains from sensual misconduct.
He does not get sexually involved with those who are protected by their mothers, their fathers, their brothers, their sisters, their relatives, or their Dhamma; those with husbands, those who entail punishments, or even those crowned with flowers by another man.
This is how one is made pure in three ways by bodily action.
“And how is one made pure in four ways by verbal action?
There is the case where a certain person, abandoning false speech, abstains from false speech.
When he has been called to a town meeting, a group meeting, a gathering of his relatives, his guild, or of the royalty, if he is asked as a witness, 'Come & tell, good man, what you know': If he doesn't know, he says, 'I don't know.' If he does know, he says, 'I know.' If he hasn't seen, he says, 'I haven't seen.' If he has seen, he says, 'I have seen.' Thus he doesn't consciously tell a lie for his own sake, for the sake of another, or for the sake of any reward.
Abandoning false speech, he abstains from false speech.
He speaks the truth, holds to the truth, is firm, reliable, no deceiver of the world.
Abandoning divisive speech he abstains from divisive speech.
What he has heard here he does not tell there to break those people apart from these people here.
What he has heard there he does not tell here to break these people apart from those people there.
Thus reconciling those who have broken apart or cementing those who are united, he loves concord, delights in concord, enjoys concord, speaks things that create concord.
Abandoning abusive speech, he abstains from abusive speech.
He speaks words that are soothing to the ear, that are affectionate, that go to the heart, that are polite, appealing & pleasing to people at large.
Abandoning idle chatter, he abstains from idle chatter.
He speaks in season, speaks what is factual, what is in accordance with the goal, the Dhamma, & the Vinaya.
He speaks words worth treasuring, seasonable, reasonable, circumscribed, connected with the goal.
This is how one is made pure in four ways by verbal action.
“And how is one made pure in three ways by mental action?
There is the case where a certain person is not covetous.
He does not covet the belongings of others, thinking, 'O, that what belongs to others would be mine!' He bears no ill will and is not corrupt in the resolves of his heart.
'May these beings be free from animosity, free from oppression, free from trouble, and may they look after themselves with ease!' He has right view and is not warped in the way he sees things: 'There is what is given, what is offered, what is sacrificed.
There are fruits & results of good & bad actions.
There is this world & the next world.
There is mother & father.
There are spontaneously reborn beings; there are brahmans & contemplatives who, faring rightly & practicing rightly, proclaim this world & the next after having directly known & realized it for themselves.' This is how one is made pure in three ways by mental action.
“These, Cunda, are the ten courses of skillful action.
When a person is endowed with these ten courses of skillful action, then even if he gets up at the proper time from his bed and touches the earth, he is still pure.
If he doesn't touch the earth, he is still pure.
If he touches wet cow dung, he is still pure.
If he doesn't touch wet cow dung, he is still pure.
If he touches green grass… If he doesn't touch green grass… If he worships a fire… If he doesn't worship a fire… If he pays homage to the sun with clasped hands… If he doesn't pay homage to the sun with clasped hands… If he goes down into the water three times by nightfall… If he doesn't go down into the water three times by nightfall, he is still pure.
Why is that?
Because these ten courses of skillful action are pure and cause purity.
Furthermore, as a result of being endowed with these ten courses of skillful action, the devas is declared, human beings is declared — that or any other good destination.
When this was said, Cunda the silversmith said to the Blessed One: “Magnificent, lord!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has the Blessed One — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the community of monks.
May the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge, from this day forward, for life.”
“Monks, I shall point out the nearest shore and the farthest shore.
Hear this, and thoroughly attend to it in mind.
I shall speak.
“Just so, Venerable One,” the monks assented to the Blessed One.
“What, monks, is the nearest shore; what is the farthest shore?
“Wrong view is the nearest shore; right view is the farthest shore;
“This, monks, is the nearest shore; this is the farthest shore.
These verses also occur at Dhp VI, §§-; and in AN., AN., AN., SN., and SN..
“Monks, I don't speak of the wiping out of intentional acts that have been done & accumulated without having been experienced, either in the here & now or in a further state hereafter.
Nor do I speak of the act of putting an end to suffering and stress without having experienced intentional acts that have been done & accumulated.
“That disciple of the noble ones — thus devoid of covetousness, devoid of ill will, unbewildered, alert, mindful — keeps pervading the first direction with an awareness imbued with good will, likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth.
Thus above, below, & all around, everywhere, in its entirety, he keeps pervading the all-encompassing cosmos with an awareness imbued with good will — abundant, expansive, immeasurable, without hostility, without ill will.
He discerns, 'Before, this mind of mine was limited & undeveloped.
But now this mind of mine is immeasurable & well developed.
And whatever action that was done in a measurable way does not remain there, does not linger there.'
“What do you think, monks: If that youth, from childhood, were to develop the awareness-release through good will, would he do any evil action?
“No, lord.
“Not doing any evil action, would he touch suffering?
“No, lord, for when one does no evil action, from where would he touch suffering?
“This awareness-release through good will should be developed whether one is a woman or a man.
Neither a woman nor a man can go taking this body along.
Death, monks, is but a gap of a thought away.
One discerns, 'Whatever evil action has been done by this body born of action, that will all be experienced here.
It will not come to be hereafter.' Thus developed, the awareness-release through good will leads to non-returning for the monk who has gained gnosis here and has penetrated to no higher release.
“That disciple of the noble ones — thus devoid of covetousness, devoid of ill will, unbewildered, alert, mindful — keeps pervading the first direction with an awareness imbued with compassion…
“That disciple of the noble ones — thus devoid of covetousness, devoid of ill will, unbewildered, alert, mindful — keeps pervading the first direction with an awareness imbued with appreciation…
“That disciple of the noble ones — thus devoid of covetousness, devoid of ill will, unbewildered, alert, mindful — keeps pervading the first direction with an awareness imbued with equanimity, likewise the second, likewise the third, likewise the fourth.
Thus above, below, & all around, everywhere, in its entirety, he keeps pervading the all-encompassing cosmos with an awareness imbued with equanimity — abundant, expansive, immeasurable, without hostility, without ill will.
He discerns, 'Before, this mind of mine was limited & undeveloped.
But now this mind of mine is immeasurable & well developed.
And whatever action that was done in a measurable way does not remain there, does not linger there.'
“What do you think, monks: If that youth, from childhood, were to develop the awareness-release through equanimity, would he do any evil action?
“No, lord.
“Not doing any evil action, would he touch suffering?
“No, lord, for when one does no evil action, from where would he touch suffering?
“This awareness-release through equanimity should be developed whether one is a woman or a man.
Neither a woman nor a man can go taking this body along.
Death, monks, is but a gap of a thought away.
One discerns, 'Whatever evil action has been done by this body born of action, that will all be experienced here.
It will not come to be hereafter.' Thus developed, the awareness-release through equanimity leads to non-returning for the monk who has gained gnosis here and has penetrated to no higher release.”
“Monks, doctors give a purgative for warding off diseases caused by bile, diseases caused by phlegm, diseases caused by the internal wind property.
There is a purging there; I don't say that there's not, but it sometimes succeeds and sometimes fails.
So I will teach you the noble purgative that always succeeds and never fails, a purgative whereby beings subject to birth are freed from birth; beings subject to aging are freed from aging; beings subject to death are freed from death; beings subject to sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress & despair are freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress & despair.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said: “Now, what is the noble purgative that always succeeds and never fails, a purgative whereby beings subject to birth are freed from birth; beings subject to aging are freed from aging; beings subject to death are freed from death; beings subject to sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress & despair are freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress & despair?
“In one who has right view, wrong view is purged away, and the many evil, unskillful mental qualities that come into play in dependence on wrong view are purged away as well, while the many skillful mental qualities that depend on right view go to the culmination of their development.
“In one who has right resolve, wrong resolve is purged away…
“In one who has right speech, wrong speech is purged away…
“In one who has right action, wrong action is purged away…
“In one who has right livelihood, wrong livelihood is purged away…
“In one who has right effort, wrong effort is purged away…
“In one who has right mindfulness, wrong mindfulness is purged away…
“In one who has right concentration, wrong concentration is purged away…
“In one who has right knowledge, wrong knowledge is purged away…
“In one who has right release, wrong release is purged away, and the many evil, unskillful mental qualities that come into play in dependence on wrong release are purged away as well, while the many skillful mental qualities that depend on right release go to the culmination of their development.
“This, monks, is the noble purgative that always succeeds and never fails, a purgative whereby beings subject to birth are freed from birth; beings subject to aging are freed from aging; beings subject to death are freed from death; beings subject to sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress & despair are freed from sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress & despair.”
“When a person has wrong view, wrong resolve, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, wrong concentration, wrong knowledge, & wrong release, whatever bodily deeds he undertakes in line with that view, whatever verbal deeds… whatever mental deeds he undertakes in line with that view, whatever intentions, whatever determinations, whatever vows, whatever fabrications, all lead to what is disagreeable, unpleasing, unappealing, unprofitable, & stressful.
Why is that?
Because the view is evil.
“Just as when a nimb-tree seed, a bitter creeper seed, or a bitter melon seed is placed in moist soil, whatever nutriment it takes from the soil & the water, all conduces to its bitterness, acridity, & distastefulness.
Why is that?
Because the seed is evil.
In the same way, when a person has wrong view… wrong release, whatever bodily deeds he undertakes in line with that view, whatever verbal deeds… whatever mental deeds he undertakes in line with that view, whatever intentions, whatever determinations, whatever vows, whatever fabrications, all lead to what is disagreeable, unpleasing, unappealing, unprofitable, & stressful.
Why is that?
Because the view is evil.
“When a person has right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration, right knowledge, & right release, whatever bodily deeds he undertakes in line with that view, whatever verbal deeds… whatever mental deeds he undertakes in line with that view, whatever intentions, whatever vows, whatever determinations, whatever fabrications, all lead to what is agreeable, pleasing, charming, profitable, & easeful.
Why is that?
Because the view is auspicious.
“Just as when a sugar cane seed, a rice grain, or a grape seed is placed in moist soil, whatever nutriment it takes from the soil & the water, all conduces to its sweetness, tastiness, & unalloyed delectability.
Why is that?
Because the seed is auspicious.
In the same way, when a person has right view… right release, whatever bodily deeds he undertakes in line with that view, whatever verbal deeds… whatever mental deeds he undertakes in line with that view, whatever intentions, whatever vows, whatever determinations, whatever fabrications, all lead to what is agreeable, pleasing, charming, profitable, & easeful.
Why is that?
Because the view is auspicious.
See also: AN..
“From wrongness comes failure, not success.
And how is it, monks, that from wrongness comes failure, not success?
“In a person of wrong view, wrong resolve comes into being.
In a person of wrong resolve, wrong speech.
In a person of wrong speech, wrong action.
In a person of wrong action, wrong livelihood.
In a person of wrong livelihood, wrong effort.
In a person of wrong effort, wrong mindfulness.
In a person of wrong mindfulness, wrong concentration.
In a person of wrong concentration, wrong knowledge.
In a person of wrong knowledge, wrong release.
“This is how from wrongness comes failure, not success.
“From rightness comes success, not failure.
And how is it, monks, that from rightness comes success, not failure?
“In a person of right view, right resolve comes into being.
In a person of right resolve, right speech.
In a person of right speech, right action.
In a person of right action, right livelihood.
In a person of right livelihood, right effort.
In a person of right effort, right mindfulness.
In a person of right mindfulness, right concentration.
In a person of right concentration, right knowledge.
In a person of right knowledge, right release.

“This is how from rightness comes success, not failure.
See also: AN..
On one occasion Ven.
Ananda was staying near Rajagaha, at Tapoda monastery.
Then, as night was ending, he got up & went to the Tapoda Hot Springs to bathe his limbs.
Having bathed his limbs and having gotten out of the springs, he stood wearing only his lower robe, drying his limbs.
Kokanuda the wanderer, as night was ending, also got up & went to the Tapoda Hot Springs to bathe his limbs.
He saw Ven.
Ananda from afar, and on seeing him said to him, “Who are you, my friend?
“I am a monk, my friend.
“Which kind of monk?
“A son-of-the-Sakyan contemplative.
“I would like to ask you about a certain point, if you would give me leave to pose a question.
“Go ahead and ask.
Having heard, I'll inform you.
“How is it, my friend: 'The cosmos is eternal.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.' Is this the sort of view you have?
“No, my friend, I don't have that sort of view.
“Very well, then: 'The cosmos is not eternal.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.' Is this the sort of view you have?
“No, my friend, I don't have that sort of view.
“Very well, then: 'The cosmos is finite… The cosmos is infinite… The soul & the body are the same… The soul is one thing and the body another… After death a Tathagata exists… After death a Tathagata does not exist… After death a Tathagata both does & does not exist… After death a Tathagata neither does nor does not exist.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.' Is this the sort of view you have?
“No, my friend, I don't have that sort of view.
“Then in that case, do you not know or see?
“No, my friend.
It's not the case that I don't know, I don't see.
I do know.
I do see.
“But on being asked, 'How is it, my friend: “The cosmos is eternal.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.” Is this the sort of view you have?' you inform me, 'No, my friend, I don't have that sort of view.' On being asked, 'Very well then: “The cosmos is not eternal… The cosmos is finite… The cosmos is infinite… The soul & the body are the same… The soul is one thing and the body another… After death a Tathagata exists… After death a Tathagata does not exist… After death a Tathagata both does & does not exist… After death a Tathagata neither does nor does not exist.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.” Is this the sort of view you have?' you inform me, 'No, my friend, I don't have that sort of view.' But on being asked, 'Then in that case, do you not know or see?' you inform me, 'No, my friend.
It's not the case that I don't know or see.
I do know.
I do see.' Now, how is the meaning of this statement to be understood?
“'The cosmos is eternal.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless,' is a viewpoint.
'The cosmos is not eternal… The cosmos is finite… The cosmos is infinite… The soul & the body are the same… The soul is one thing and the body another… After death a Tathagata exists… After death a Tathagata does not exist… After death a Tathagata both does & does not exist… After death a Tathagata neither does nor does not exist.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless,' is a viewpoint.
The extent to which there are viewpoints, view-stances, the taking up of views, obsessions of views, the cause of views, & the uprooting of views: that's what I know.
That's what I see.
Knowing that, I say 'I know.' Seeing that, I say 'I see.' Why should I say 'I don't know, I don't see'?
I do know.
I do see.
“What is your name, my friend?
What do your fellows in the chaste life call you?
“My name is Ananda, my friend, and that's what my fellows in the chaste life call me.
“What?
Have I been talking with the great teacher without realizing that it was Ven.
Ananda?
Had I recognized that it was Ven.
Ananda, I would not have cross-examined him so much.
May Ven.
Ananda please forgive me.”
Then Uttiya the wanderer went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One,
“Master Gotama, is it the case that 'The cosmos is eternal: Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless'?
“Uttiya, I haven't declared that 'The cosmos is eternal: Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.' “Very well, then, Master Gotama, is it the case that: 'The cosmos is not eternal: Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless'?
“Uttiya, I haven't declared that 'The cosmos is not eternal: Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.' “Very well, then, Master Gotama, is it the case that 'The cosmos is finite… The cosmos is infinite… The soul & the body are the same… The soul is one thing and the body another… After death a Tathagata exists… After death a Tathagata does not exist… After death a Tathagata both does & does not exist… After death a Tathagata neither does nor does not exist.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless'?
“Uttiya, I haven't declared that 'After death a Tathagata neither does nor does not exist: Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.' “But, Master Gotama, on being asked, 'Is it the case that “The cosmos is eternal: Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless”?' you inform me, 'Uttiya, I haven't declared that “The cosmos is eternal: Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.”' On being asked, 'Is it the case that “The cosmos is not eternal… The cosmos is finite… The cosmos is infinite… The soul & the body are the same… The soul is one thing and the body another… After death a Tathagata exists… After death a Tathagata does not exist… After death a Tathagata both does & does not exist… After death a Tathagata neither does nor does not exist.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless”?' you inform me, 'Uttiya, I haven't declared that “After death a Tathagata neither does nor does not exist.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.”' Now is there anything you have declared?
“Uttiya, having directly known it, I teach the Dhamma to my disciples for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow & lamentation, for the disappearance of pain & distress, for the attainment of the right method, & for the realization of Unbinding.
“And, Master Gotama, when having directly known it, you teach the Dhamma to your disciples for the purification of beings, for the overcoming of sorrow & lamentation, for the disappearance of pain & distress, for the attainment of the right method, & for the realization of Unbinding, will all the cosmos be led, or a half of it, or a third?
When this was said, the Blessed One was silent.
Then the thought occurred to Ven.
Ananda: “Don't let Uttiya the wanderer acquire the evil viewpoint that, 'When I asked him an all-encompassing question, Gotama the contemplative faltered and didn't reply.
Perhaps he was unable to.' That would be for his long-term harm & suffering.” So he said to Uttiya, “In that case, my friend, I will give you an analogy, for there are cases where it is through the use of analogy that intelligent people can understand the meaning of what is being said.
“Uttiya, suppose that there were a royal frontier fortress with strong ramparts, strong walls & arches, and a single gate.
In it would be a wise, competent, & knowledgeable gatekeeper to keep out those he didn't know and to let in those he did.
Patrolling the path around the city, he wouldn't see a crack or an opening in the walls big enough for even a cat to slip through.
Although he wouldn't know that 'So-and-so many creatures enter or leave the city,' he would know this: 'Whatever large creatures enter or leave the city all enter or leave it through this gate.'
“In the same way, the Tathagata isn't concerned with whether all the cosmos or half of it or a third of it will be led to release by means of that.
But he does know this: 'All those who have been led, are being led, or will be led from the cosmos have done so, are doing so, or will do so after having abandoned the five hindrances — those defilements of awareness that weaken discernment — having well-established their minds in the four frames of reference, and having developed, as they have come to be, the seven factors for Awakening.
When you asked the Blessed One this question, you had already asked it in another way.
That's why he didn't respond.
See also: AN..
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Campa, on the shore of Gaggara Lake.
Then Vajjiya Mahita the householder left Campa in the middle of the day to see the Blessed One, but the thought then occurred to him, “Now is not the right time to see the Blessed One, for he is in seclusion.
And it is not the right time to see the monks who develop the mind, for they are in seclusion.
What if I were to visit the park of the wanderers of other persuasions?” So he headed to the park of the wanderers of other persuasions.
Now on that occasion the wanderers of other persuasions had come together in a gathering and were sitting, discussing many kinds of bestial topics, making a great noise & racket.
They saw Vajjiya Mahita the householder coming from afar, and on seeing him, hushed one another: “Be quiet, good sirs.
Don't make any noise.
Here comes Vajjiya Mahita the householder, a disciple of Gotama the contemplative.
He is one of those disciples of Gotama the contemplative, clad in white, who lives in Savatthi.
These people are fond of quietude and speak in praise of quietude.
Maybe, if he perceives our group as quiet, he will consider it worth his while to come our way.” So the wanderers fell silent.
Then Vajjiya Mahita the householder went to where the wanderers of other persuasions were staying.
On arrival he greeted them courteously.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the wanderers said to him, “Is it true, householder, that Gotama the contemplative criticizes all asceticism, that he categorically denounces & disparages all ascetics who live the rough life?
“No, venerable sirs, the Blessed One does not criticize all asceticism, nor does he categorically denounce or disparage all ascetics who live the rough life.
The Blessed One criticizes what should be criticized, and praises what should be praised.
Criticizing what should be criticized, praising what should be praised, the Blessed One is one who speaks making distinctions, not one who speaks categorically on this matter.
When this was said, one of the wanderers said to Vajjiya Mahita the householder, “Now wait a minute, householder.
This contemplative Gotama whom you praise is a nihilist, one who doesn't declare anything.
“I tell you, venerable sirs, that the Blessed One righteously declares that 'This is skillful.' He declares that 'This is unskillful.' Declaring that 'This is skillful' and 'This is unskillful,' he is one who has declared.
He is not a nihilist, one who doesn't declare anything.
When this was said, the wanderers fell silent, abashed, sitting with their shoulders drooping, their heads down, brooding, at a loss for words.
Vajjiya Mahita the householder, perceiving that the wanderers were silent, abashed… at a loss for words, got up & went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he told the Blessed One the entirety of his conversation with the wanderers.
“Well done, householder.
Well done.
That is how you should periodically & righteously refute those foolish men.
I don't say that all asceticism is to be pursued, nor do I say that all asceticism is not to be pursued.
I don't say that all observances should be observed, nor do I day that all observances should not be observed.
I don't say that all exertions are to be pursued, nor do I say that all exertions are not to be pursued.
I don't say that all forfeiture should be forfeited, nor do I say that all forfeiture should not be forfeited.
I don't say that all release is to be used for release, nor do I say that all release is not to be used for release.
“If, when an asceticism is pursued, unskillful qualities grow and skillful qualities wane, then I tell you that that sort of asceticism is not to be pursued.
But if, when an asceticism is pursued, unskillful qualities wane and skillful qualities grow, then I tell you that that sort of asceticism is to be pursued.
“If, when an observance is observed, unskillful qualities grow and skillful qualities wane, then I tell you that that sort of observance is not to be observed.
But if, when an observance is observed, unskillful qualities wane and skillful qualities grow, then I tell you that that sort of observance is to be observed.
“If, when an exertion is pursued… a forfeiture is forfeited…
“If, when a release is used for release, unskillful qualities grow and skillful qualities wane, then I tell you that that sort of release is not to be used for release.
But if, when a release is used for release, unskillful qualities wane and skillful qualities grow, then I tell you that that sort of release is to be used for release.
When Vajjiya Mahita the householder had been instructed, urged, roused & encouraged by the Blessed One with a talk on Dhamma, he got up from his seat and, having bowed down to the Blessed One, left, keeping the Blessed One on his right side.
Not long afterward, the Blessed One addressed the monks: “Monks, even a monk who has long penetrated the Dhamma in this Doctrine & Discipline would do well periodically & righteously to refute the wanderers of other persuasions in just the way Vajjiya Mahita the householder has done.
See also: AN..
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then Anathapindika the householder left Savatthi in the middle of the day to see the Blessed One, but the thought then occurred to him, “Now is not the right time to see the Blessed One, for he is in seclusion.
And it is not the right time to see the monks who are developing their minds, for they are in seclusion.
What if I were to visit the park of the wanderers of other persuasions?” So he headed to the park of the wanderers of other persuasions.
Now on that occasion the wanderers of other persuasions had come together in a gathering and were sitting, discussing many kinds of bestial topics, making a great noise and racket.
They saw Anathapindika the householder coming from afar, and on seeing him, hushed one another: “Be quiet, good sirs.
Don't make any noise.
Here comes Anathapindika the householder, a disciple of Gotama the contemplative.
He is one of those disciples of Gotama the contemplative, clad in white, who lives in Savatthi.
These people are fond of quietude and speak in praise of quietude.
Maybe, if he perceives our group as quiet, he will consider it worth his while to come our way.” So the wanderers fell silent.
Then Anathapindika the householder went to where the wanderers of other persuasions were staying.
On arrival he greeted them courteously.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the wanderers said to him, “Tell us, householder, what views Gotama the contemplative has.
“Venerable sirs, I don't know entirely what views the Blessed One has.
“Well, well.
So you don't know entirely what views Gotama the contemplative has.
Then tell us what views the monks have.
“I don't even know entirely what views the monks have.
“So you don't know entirely what views Gotama the contemplative has or even that the monks have.
Then tell us what views you have.
“It wouldn't be difficult for me to expound to you what views I have.
But please let the venerable ones expound each in line with his position, and then it won't be difficult for me to expound to you what views I have.
When this had been said, one of the wanderers said to Anathapindika the householder, “The cosmos is eternal.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.
This is the sort of view I have.
Another wanderer said to Anathapindika, “The cosmos is not eternal.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.
This is the sort of view I have.
Another wanderer said, “The cosmos is finite… The cosmos is infinite… The soul & the body are the same… The soul is one thing and the body another… After death a Tathagata exists… After death a Tathagata does not exist… After death a Tathagata both does & does not exist… After death a Tathagata neither does nor does not exist.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.
This is the sort of view I have.
When this had been said, Anathapindika the householder said to the wanderers, “As for the venerable one who says, 'The cosmos is eternal.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.
This is the sort of view I have,' his view arises from his own inappropriate attention or in dependence on the words of another.
Now this view has been brought into being, is fabricated, willed, dependently originated.
Whatever has been brought into being, is fabricated, willed, dependently originated, that is inconstant.
Whatever is inconstant is stress.
This venerable one thus adheres to that very stress, submits himself to that very stress.” 
When this had been said, the wanderers said to Anathapindika the householder, “We have each & every one expounded to you in line with our own positions.
Now tell us what views you have.
“Whatever has been brought into being, is fabricated, willed, dependently originated, that is inconstant.
Whatever is inconstant is stress.
Whatever is stress is not me, is not what I am, is not my self.
This is the sort of view I have.
“So, householder, whatever has been brought into being, is fabricated, willed, dependently originated, that is inconstant.
Whatever is inconstant is stress.
You thus adhere to that very stress, submit yourself to that very stress.
“Venerable sirs, whatever has been brought into being, is fabricated, willed, dependently originated, that is inconstant.
Whatever is inconstant is stress.
Whatever is stress is not me, is not what I am, is not my self.
Having seen this well with right discernment as it actually is present, I also discern the higher escape from it as it actually is present.
When this had been said, the wanderers fell silent, abashed, sitting with their shoulders drooping, their heads down, brooding, at a loss for words.
Anathapindika the householder, perceiving that the wanderers were silent, abashed… at a loss for words, got up & went to where the Blessed One was staying.
On arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, he sat to one side.
As he was seated there, he told the Blessed One the entirety of his conversation with the wanderers.
“Well done, householder.
Well done.
That is how you should periodically refute those foolish men with the Dhamma.” Then he instructed, urged, roused, and encouraged Anathapindika the householder with a talk on Dhamma.
When Anathapindika the householder had been instructed, urged, roused and encouraged by the Blessed One with a talk on Dhamma, he got up from his seat and, having bowed down to the Blessed One, left, keeping the Blessed One on his right side.
Not long afterward, the Blessed One addressed the monks: “Monks, even a monk who has long penetrated the Dhamma in this Doctrine and Discipline would do well to refute the wanderers of other persuasions with the Dhamma periodically in just the way Anathapindika the householder has done.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying in Campa, on the shore of Gaggara Lake.
Then Ven.
Bahuna went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “Lord, freed, dissociated, & released from how many things does the Tathagata dwell with unrestricted awareness?
“Freed, dissociated, & released from ten things, Bahuna, the Tathagata dwells with unrestricted awareness.
Which ten?
Freed, dissociated, & released from form, the Tathagata dwells with unrestricted awareness.
Freed, dissociated, & released from feeling… Freed, dissociated, & released from perception… Freed, dissociated, & released from fabrications… Freed, dissociated, & released from consciousness… Freed, dissociated, & released from birth… Freed, dissociated, & released from aging… Freed, dissociated, & released from death… Freed, dissociated, & released from stress… Freed, dissociated, & released from defilement, the Tathagata dwells with unrestricted awareness.
“Just as a red, blue, or white lotus born in the water and growing in the water, rises up above the water and stands with no water adhering to it, in the same way the Tathagata — freed, dissociated, & released from these ten things — dwells with unrestricted awareness.”
“There are these ten ways of subduing hatred.
Which ten?
“Thinking, 'He has done me harm.
But what should I expect?' one subdues hatred.
“Thinking, 'He is doing me harm.
But what should I expect?' one subdues hatred.
“Thinking, 'He is going to do me harm.
But what should I expect?' one subdues hatred.
“Thinking, 'He has done harm to people who are dear & pleasing to me.
But what should I expect?' one subdues hatred.
“Thinking, 'He is doing harm to people who are dear & pleasing to me.
But what should I expect?' one subdues hatred.
“Thinking, 'He is going to do harm to people who are dear & pleasing to me.
But what should I expect?' one subdues hatred.
“Thinking, 'He has aided people who are not dear or pleasing to me.
But what should I expect?' one subdues hatred.
“Thinking, 'He is aiding people who are not dear or pleasing to me.
But what should I expect?' one subdues hatred.
“Thinking, 'He is going to aid people who are not dear or pleasing to me.
But what should I expect?' one subdues hatred.
“One does not get worked up over impossibilities.
“These are ten ways of subduing hatred.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks, “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said: “Monks, dwell consummate in virtue, consummate in terms of the Patimokkha.
Dwell restrained in accordance with the Patimokkha, consummate in your behavior & sphere of activity.
Train yourselves, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
“If a monk would wish, 'May I be dear & pleasing to my fellows in the holy life, respected by & inspiring to them,' then he should be one who brings the precepts to perfection, who is committed to inner tranquillity of awareness, who does not neglect jhana, who is endowed with insight, and who frequents empty dwellings.
“If a monk would wish, 'May I be someone who receives robes, almsfood, lodgings, & medical requisites for curing the sick,' then he should be one who brings the precepts to perfection, who is committed to inner tranquillity of awareness, who does not neglect jhana, who is endowed with insight, and who frequents empty dwellings.
“If a monk would wish, 'Whatever I use or consume in terms of robes, almsfood, lodgings, & medical requisites for curing the sick, may that be of great fruit, of great benefit to those who provided them,' then he should be one who brings the precepts to perfection, who is committed to inner tranquillity of awareness, who does not neglect jhana, who is endowed with insight, and who frequents empty dwellings.
“If a monk would wish, 'When my kinsmen & relatives who have died & passed away recollect me with brightened minds, may it be of great fruit, of great benefit,' then he should be one who brings the precepts to perfection, who is committed to inner tranquility of awareness, who does not neglect jhana, who is endowed with insight, and who frequents empty dwellings.
“If a monk would wish, 'May I be content with whatever robes, almsfood, lodgings, & medical requisites for curing the sick are available,' then he should be one who brings the precepts to perfection, who is committed to inner tranquillity of awareness, who does not neglect jhana, who is endowed with insight, and who frequents empty dwellings.
“If a monk would wish, 'May I be resistant to cold, heat, hunger, & thirst; to the touch of gadflies & mosquitoes, wind & sun & creeping things; to abusive, hurtful language; to bodily feelings that, when they arise, are painful, sharp, stabbing, fierce, distasteful, deadly,' then he should be one who brings the precepts to perfection, who is committed to inner tranquillity of awareness, who does not neglect jhana, who is endowed with insight, and who frequents empty dwellings.
“If a monk would wish, 'May I overcome displeasure, and not be overcome by displeasure.
May I dwell conquering again & again any displeasure that has arisen,' then he should be one who brings the precepts to perfection, who is committed to inner tranquillity of awareness, who does not neglect jhana, who is endowed with insight, and who frequents empty dwellings.
“If a monk would wish, 'May I overcome fear & dread, and not be overcome by fear & dread.
May I dwell conquering again & again any fear & dread that have arisen,' then he should be one who brings the precepts to perfection, who is committed to inner tranquillity of awareness, who does not neglect jhana, who is endowed with insight, and who frequents empty dwellings.
“If a monk would wish, 'May I attain — whenever I want, without strain, without difficulty — the four jhanas that are heightened mental states, pleasant abidings in the here-&-now,' then he should be one who brings the precepts to perfection, who is committed to inner tranquillity of awareness, who does not neglect jhana, who is endowed with insight, and who frequents empty dwellings.
“If a monk would wish, 'May I — with the ending of mental fermentations — remain in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having directly known & realized them for myself in the here-&-now,' then he should be one who brings the precepts to perfection, who is committed to inner tranquillity of awareness, who does not neglect jhana, who is endowed with insight, and who frequents empty dwellings.
“'Monks, dwell consummate in virtue, consummate in terms of the Patimokkha.
Dwell restrained in accordance with the Patimokkha, consummate in your behavior & sphere of activity.
Train yourselves, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying in Savatthi at Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Now at that time a large number of monks, after the meal, on returning from their alms round, had gathered at the meeting hall and were engaged in many kinds of bestial topics of conversation: conversation about kings, robbers, & ministers of state; armies, alarms, & battles; food & drink; clothing, furniture, garlands, & scents; relatives; vehicles; villages, towns, cities, the countryside; women & heroes; the gossip of the street & the well; tales of the dead; tales of diversity, the creation of the world & of the sea; talk of whether things exist or not.
Then the Blessed One, emerging from his seclusion in the late afternoon, went to the meeting hall and, on arrival, sat down on a seat made ready.
As he was sitting there, he addressed the monks: “For what topic of conversation are you gathered together here?
In the midst of what topic of conversation have you been interrupted?
“Just now, lord, after the meal, on returning from our alms round, we gathered at the meeting hall and got engaged in many kinds of bestial topics of conversation: conversation about kings, robbers, & ministers of state; armies, alarms, & battles; food & drink; clothing, furniture, garlands, & scents; relatives; vehicles; villages, towns, cities, the countryside; women & heroes; the gossip of the street & the well; tales of the dead; tales of diversity, the creation of the world & of the sea; talk of whether things exist or not.
“It isn't right, monks, that sons of good families, on having gone forth out of faith from home to the homeless life, should get engaged in such topics of conversation, i.e., conversation about kings, robbers, & ministers of state… talk of whether things exist or not.
“Monks, there are these ten grounds for praise.
Which ten?
“There is the case where a monk himself is modest and instigates talk on modesty among the monks.
The fact that he is modest and instigates talk on modesty among the monks is grounds for praise.
“He himself is contented and instigates talk on contentment among the monks…
“He himself is secluded and instigates talk on seclusion among the monks…
“He himself is non-entangled and instigates talk on non-entanglement among the monks…
“He himself has his persistence aroused and instigates talk on arousing persistence among the monks…
“He himself is consummate in virtue and instigates talk on being consummate in virtue among the monks…
“He himself is consummate in concentration and instigates talk on being consummate in concentration among the monks…
“He himself is consummate in discernment and instigates talk on being consummate in discernment among the monks…
“He himself is consummate in release and instigates talk on being consummate in release among the monks…
“He himself is consummate in knowledge & vision of release and instigates talk on being consummate in knowledge & vision of release among the monks.
The fact that he is consummate in knowledge & vision of release and instigates talk on being consummate in knowledge & vision of release among the monks is grounds for praise.
“These are the ten grounds for praise.”
Then Anathapindika the householder went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “When, for a disciple of the noble ones, five forms of fear & animosity are stilled; when he is endowed with the four factors of stream-entry; and when, through discernment, he has rightly seen & rightly ferreted out the noble method, then if he wants he may state about himself: 'Hell is ended; animal wombs are ended; the state of the hungry shades is ended; states of deprivation, destitution, the bad bourns are ended!
I am a stream-winner, steadfast, never again destined for states of woe, headed for self-awakening!'
“Now, which five forms of fear & animosity are stilled?
“When a person takes life, then with the taking of life as a requisite condition, he produces fear & animosity in the here & now, produces fear & animosity in future lives, experiences mental concomitants of pain & despair; but when he refrains from taking life, he neither produces fear & animosity in the here & now nor does he produce fear & animosity in future lives, nor does he experience mental concomitants of pain & despair: for one who refrains from taking life, that fear & animosity is thus stilled.
“When a person steals… engages in illicit sex… tells lies…
“When a person drinks distilled & fermented drinks that cause heedlessness, then with the drinking of distilled & fermented drinks that cause heedlessness as a requisite condition, he produces fear & animosity in the here & now, produces fear & animosity in future lives, experiences mental concomitants of pain & despair; but when he refrains from drinking distilled & fermented drinks that cause heedlessness, he neither produces fear & animosity in the here & now nor does he produce fear & animosity in future lives, nor does he experience mental concomitants of pain & despair: for one who refrains from drinking distilled & fermented drinks that cause heedlessness, that fear & animosity is thus stilled.
“These are the five forms of fear & animosity that are stilled.
“And which are the four factors of stream-entry with which he is endowed?
“There is the case where the disciple of the noble ones is endowed with verified confidence in the Awakened One: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy & rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.'
“He is endowed with verified confidence in the Dhamma: 'The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One, to be seen here & now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.'
“He is endowed with verified confidence in the Sangha: 'The Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced well… who have practiced straight-forwardly… who have practiced methodically… who have practiced masterfully — in other words, the four pairs, the eight individuals — they are the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples: worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, the incomparable field of merit for the world.'
“He is endowed with virtues that are appealing to the noble ones: untorn, unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered, liberating, praised by the wise, untarnished, leading to concentration.
“These are the four factors of stream-entry with which he is endowed.
“And which is the noble method that he has rightly seen & rightly ferreted out through discernment?
“There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones notices: When this is, that is.
From the arising of this comes the arising of that.
When this isn't, that isn't.
From the cessation of this comes the cessation of that.
“In other words: From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications.
From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness.
From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media.
From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance comes the cessation of fabrications.
From the cessation of fabrications comes the cessation of consciousness.
From the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.
From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of the six sense media.
From the cessation of the six sense media comes the cessation of contact.
From the cessation of contact comes the cessation of feeling.
From the cessation of feeling comes the cessation of craving.
From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“This is the noble method that he has rightly seen & rightly ferreted out through discernment.
“When, for a disciple of the noble ones, these five forms of fear & animosity are stilled; when he is endowed with these four factors of stream-entry; and when, through discernment, he has rightly seen & rightly ferreted out this noble method, then if he wants he may state about himself: 'Hell is ended; animal wombs are ended; the state of the hungry shades is ended; states of deprivation, destitution, the bad bourns are ended!
I am a stream-winner, steadfast, never again destined for states of woe, headed for self-awakening!' See also: AN.; “Into the Stream”.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying in Savatthi at Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Now at that time a large number of monks, after the meal, on returning from their alms round, had gathered at the meeting hall and were engaged in many kinds of bestial topics of conversation: conversation about kings, robbers, & ministers of state; armies, alarms, & battles; food & drink; clothing, furniture, garlands, & scents; relatives; vehicles; villages, towns, cities, the countryside; women & heroes; the gossip of the street & the well; tales of the dead; tales of diversity, the creation of the world & of the sea; talk of whether things exist or not.
Then the Blessed One, emerging from his seclusion in the late afternoon, went to the meeting hall and, on arrival, sat down on a seat made ready.
As he was sitting there, he addressed the monks: “For what topic of conversation are you gathered together here?
In the midst of what topic of conversation have you been interrupted?
“Just now, lord, after the meal, on returning from our alms round, we gathered at the meeting hall and got engaged in many kinds of bestial topics of conversation: conversation about kings, robbers, & ministers of state; armies, alarms, & battles; food & drink; clothing, furniture, garlands, & scents; relatives; vehicles; villages, towns, cities, the countryside; women & heroes; the gossip of the street & the well; tales of the dead; tales of diversity, the creation of the world & of the sea; talk of whether things exist or not.
“It isn't right, monks, that sons of good families, on having gone forth out of faith from home to the homeless life, should get engaged in such topics of conversation, i.e., conversation about kings, robbers, & ministers of state… talk of whether things exist or not.
“There are these ten topics of conversation.
Which ten?
Talk on modesty, on contentment, on seclusion, on non-entanglement, on arousing persistence, on virtue, on concentration, on discernment, on release, and on the knowledge & vision of release.
These are the ten topics of conversation.
If you were to engage repeatedly in these ten topics of conversation, you would outshine even the sun & moon, so mighty, so powerful — to say nothing of the wanderers of other sects.”
At one time, the Venerable Sāriputta was dwelling near the small village of Nālaka in Magadha.
And then, there where Venerable Sāriputta was, there Sāmaṇḍakāni, the wanderer, approached.
Having approached, he exchanged greetings with the Venerable Sāriputta.
Having exchanged greetings, and courteous talk having passed between them, he sat to one side.
Having sat to one side, Sāmaṇḍakāni, the wanderer, said this to Venerable Sāriputta:
“Now, what, friend Sāriputta, is the pleasant, and what is the painful?
“Rebirth, friend, is painful; non-rebirth is pleasant.
When, friend, there is rebirth, this pain is to be expected: cold and heat, hunger and thirst, excrement and urine, contact with fire, contact with punishment, contact with weapons, and anger caused by meeting and associating with relatives and friends.
When, friend, there is rebirth, this pain is to be expected.
“When, friend, there is no rebirth, this pleasantness is to be expected: neither cold nor heat, neither hunger nor thirst, neither excrement nor urine, neither contact with fire, nor contact with punishment, nor contact with weapons, and no anger caused by meeting and associating with relatives and friends.
When, friend, there is no rebirth, this pleasantness is to be expected.
See also: AN..
At one time, the Venerable Sāriputta was dwelling near the small village of Nālaka in Magadha.
And then, there where Venerable Sāriputta was, there Sāmaṇḍakāni, the wanderer, approached.
Having approached, he exchanged greetings with the Venerable Sāriputta.
Having exchanged greetings, and courteous talk having passed between them, he sat to one side.
Having sat to one side, Sāmaṇḍakāni, the wanderer, said this to Venerable Sāriputta:
“Now, what, friend Sāriputta, is the pleasant in this Teaching and Discipline, and what is the painful?
“Not delighting, friend, in this Teaching and Discipline is painful, delighting in it is pleasant.
When, friend, there is no delighting, this pain is to be expected: whether going, standing, sitting, or lying down, the pleasant and the easeful are not attained; whether one has gone to a village, a forest, the root of a tree, an empty hut, an open space, or in the midst of monks, the pleasant and the easeful are not attained.
When, friend, there is no delighting, this pain is to be expected.
“When, friend, there is delighting, this pleasantness is to be expected: whether going, standing, sitting, or lying down, the pleasant and the easeful are attained; whether one has gone to a village, a forest, the root of a tree, an empty hut, an open space, or in the midst of monks, the pleasant and the easeful are attained.
When, friend, there is delighting, this pleasantness is to be expected.
See also: AN..
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi, in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Girimananda was diseased, in pain, severely ill.
Then Ven.
Ananda went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “Lord, Ven.
Girimananda is diseased, in pain, severely ill.
It would be good if the Blessed One would visit Ven.
Girimananda, out of sympathy for him.
“Ananda, if you go to the monk Girimananda and tell him ten perceptions, it's possible that when he hears the ten perceptions his disease may be allayed.
Which ten?
The perception of inconstancy, the perception of not-self, the perception of unattractiveness, the perception of drawbacks, the perception of abandoning, the perception of dispassion, the perception of cessation, the perception of distaste for every world, the perception of the undesirability of all fabrications, mindfulness of in-&-out breathing.
“And what is the perception of inconstancy?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building — reflects thus: 'Form is inconstant, feeling is inconstant, perception is inconstant, fabrications are inconstant, consciousness is inconstant.' Thus he remains focused on inconstancy with regard to the five clinging-aggregates.
This, Ananda, is called the perception of inconstancy.
“And what is the perception of not-self?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building — reflects thus: 'The eye is not-self, forms are not-self; the ear is not-self, sounds are not-self; the nose is not-self, aromas are not-self; the tongue is not-self, flavors are not-self; the body is not-self, tactile sensations are not-self; the intellect is not-self, ideas are not-self.' Thus he remains focused on not-selfness with regard to the six inner & outer sense media.
This is called the perception of not-self.
“And what is the perception of unattractiveness?
There is the case where a monk ponders this very body — from the soles of the feet on up, from the crown of the head on down, surrounded by skin, filled with all sorts of unclean things: 'There is in this body: hair of the head, hair of the body, nails, teeth, skin, muscle, tendons, bones, bone marrow, spleen, heart, liver, membranes, kidneys, lungs, large intestines, small intestines, gorge, feces, gall, phlegm, lymph, blood, sweat, fat, tears, oil, saliva, mucus, oil in the joints, urine.' Thus he remains focused on unattractiveness with regard to this very body.
This is called the perception of unattractiveness.
“And what is the perception of drawbacks?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty dwelling — reflects thus: 'This body has many pains, many drawbacks.
In this body many kinds of disease arise, such as: seeing-diseases, hearing-diseases, nose-diseases, tongue-diseases, body-diseases, head-diseases, ear-diseases, mouth-diseases, teeth-diseases, cough, asthma, catarrh, fever, aging, stomach-ache, fainting, dysentery, grippe, cholera, leprosy, boils, ringworm, tuberculosis, epilepsy, skin-disease, itch, scab, psoriasis, scabies, jaundice, diabetes, hemorrhoids, fistulas, ulcers; diseases arising from bile, from phlegm, from the wind-property, from combinations of bodily humors, from changes in the weather, from uneven care of the body, from attacks, from the result of kamma; cold, heat, hunger, thirst, defecation, urination.' Thus he remains focused on drawbacks with regard to this body.
This is called the perception of drawbacks.
“And what is the perception of abandoning?
There is the case where a monk doesn't acquiesce to an arisen thought of sensuality.
He abandons it, dispels it, & wipes it out of existence.
He doesn't acquiesce to an arisen thought of ill-will.
He abandons it, dispels it, & wipes it out of existence.
He doesn't acquiesce to an arisen thought of harmfulness.
He abandons it, dispels it, & wipes it out of existence.
He doesn't acquiesce to arisen evil, unskillful mental qualities.
He abandons them, dispels them, & wipes them out of existence.
This is called the perception of abandoning.
“And what is the perception of dispassion?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building — reflects thus: 'This is peace, this is exquisite — the stilling of all fabrications, the relinquishment of all acquisitions, the ending of craving, dispassion, Unbinding.' This is called the perception of dispassion.
“And what is the perception of cessation?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building — reflects thus: 'This is peace, this is exquisite — the stilling of all fabrications, the relinquishment of all acquisitions, the ending of craving, cessation, Unbinding.' This is called the perception of cessation.
“And what is the perception of distaste for every world?
There is the case where a monk abandoning any attachments, clingings, fixations of awareness, biases, or obsessions with regard to any world, refrains from them and does not get involved.
This is called the perception of distaste for every world.
“And what is the perception of the undesirability of all fabrications?
There is the case where a monk feels horrified, humiliated, & disgusted with all fabrications.
This is called the perception of the undesirability of all fabrications.
“And what is mindfulness of in-&-out breathing?
There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building — sits down folding his legs crosswise, holding his body erect, and setting mindfulness to the fore.
Always mindful, he breathes in; mindful he breathes out.
” Breathing in long, he discerns, 'I am breathing in long'; or breathing out long, he discerns, 'I am breathing out long.' Or breathing in short, he discerns, 'I am breathing in short'; or breathing out short, he discerns, 'I am breathing out short.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in calming bodily fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out calming bodily fabrication.'
” He trains himself to breathe in sensitive to rapture, and to breathe out sensitive to rapture.
He trains himself to breathe in sensitive to pleasure, and to breathe out sensitive to pleasure.
He trains himself to breathe in sensitive to mental processes, and to breathe out sensitive to mental processes.
He trains himself to breathe in calming mental processes, and to breathe out calming mental processes.
” He trains himself to breathe in sensitive to the mind, and to breathe out sensitive to the mind.
He trains himself to breathe in satisfying the mind, and to breathe out satisfying the mind.
He trains himself to breathe in steadying the mind, and to breathe out steadying the mind.
He trains himself to breathe in releasing the mind, and to breathe out releasing the mind.
” He trains himself to breathe in focusing on inconstancy, and to breathe out focusing on inconstancy.
He trains himself to breathe in focusing on dispassion, and to breathe out focusing on dispassion.
He trains himself to breathe in focusing on cessation, and to breathe out focusing on cessation.
He trains himself to breathe in focusing on relinquishment, and to breathe out focusing on relinquishment.
“This, Ananda, is called mindfulness of in-&-out breathing.
“Now, Ananda, if you go to the monk Girimananda and tell him these ten perceptions, it's possible that when he hears these ten perceptions his disease may be allayed.
Then Ven.
Ananda, having learned these ten perceptions in the Blessed One's presence, went to Ven.
Girimananda and told them to him.
As Ven.
Girimananda heard these ten perceptions, his disease was allayed.
And Ven.
Girimananda recovered from his disease.
That was how Ven.
Girimananda's disease was abandoned.
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Blessed One was living near Savatthi at Jetavana at the monastery of Anathapindika.
Now at that time, the Venerable Girimananda was afflicted with a disease, was suffering therefrom, and was gravely ill.
Thereupon the Venerable Ananda approached the Buddha and having saluted him sat beside him.
So seated the Venerable Ananda said this to the Blessed One:
“Bhante the Venerable Girimananda is afflicted with disease, is suffering therefrom, and is gravely ill.
It were well, bhante, if the Blessed One would visit the Venerable Girimananda out of compassion for him.”:
“Should you, Ananda, visit the monk Girimananda and recite to him the ten contemplations, then that monk Girimananda having heard them, will be immediately cured of his disease.
“What are the ten?
i.
“And what, Ananda, is contemplation of impermanence?
Herein, Ananda, a monk having gone to the forest or to the foot of a tree or to an empty house contemplates thus: 'Matter is impermanent; feeling or sensation is impermanent; perception is impermanent; formations are impermanent; consciousness is impermanent.
Thus he dwells contemplating impermanence in these five aggregates.' This, Ananda, is called contemplation of impermanence.
ii.
“And what Ananda is contemplation of anatta?
Herein, Ananda, a monk having gone to the forest or to the foot of a tree or to a lonely place contemplates thus: 'The eye is not the self; visible objects are not the self; the ear is not the self; sounds are not the self; the nose is not the self; smells are not the self; the tongue is not the self; tastes are not the self; the body is not the self; bodily contacts are not the self; the mind is not the self; mental objects are not the self.' Thus he dwells contemplating not self in these internal and external bases.
This, Ananda, is called contemplation of anatta.
iii.
“And what, Ananda, is contemplation of foulness?
Herein, Ananda, a monk contemplates this body upward from the soles of the feet, downward from the top of the hair, enclosed in skin, as being full of many impurities.
In this body there are head-hairs, body-hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, sinews, bones, marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs, intestines, intestinal tract, stomach, feces, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, grease, saliva, nasal mucous, synovium, and urine.
Thus he dwells contemplating foulness in this body.
This, Ananda, is called contemplation of foulness.
iv.
“What, Ananda, is contemplation of disadvantage?
Herein, Ananda, a monk having gone to the forest, or to the foot of a tree, or to a lonely place, contemplates thus: 'Many are the sufferings, many are the disadvantages of this body since diverse diseases are engendered in this body, such as the following: Eye-disease, ear-disease, nose-disease, tongue-disease, body-disease, headache, mumps, mouth-disease, tooth-ache, cough, asthma, catarrh, heart-burn, fever, stomach ailment, fainting, dysentry, swelling, gripes, leprosy, boils, scrofula, consumption, epilepsy, ringworm, itch, eruption, tetter, pustule, plethora, diabetes, piles, cancer, fistula, and diseases originating from bile, from phlegm, from wind, from conflict of the humors, from changes of weather, from adverse condition, from devices, from kamma-vipaka; and cold, heat, hunger, thirst, excrement, and urine.' Thus he dwells contemplating disadvantage in this body.
This Ananda, is called contemplation of disadvantage.
v.
“And what, Ananda, is contemplation of abandonment?
Herein, Ananda, a monk does not tolerate a thought of sensual desire that has arisen in him, dispels it, makes an end of it, and annihilates it.
He does not tolerate a thought of ill-will that has arisen in him, but abandons, dispels it, makes an end of it, and annihilates it.
He does not tolerate a thought of cruelty that has arisen in him but abandons it, dispels it, makes an end of it, and annihilates it.
He does not tolerate evil, unprofitable states that arise in him from time to time, but abandons them, dispels them, makes an end of them, and annihilates them.
This, Ananda, is called contemplation of abandonment.
vi.
“And what, Ananda, is contemplation of detachment?
Herein, Ananda, a monk having gone to the forest, or to the foot of a tree, or to a lonely place, contemplates thus: 'This is peaceful, this is sublime, namely, the stilling of all conditioned things, the giving up of all substratum of becoming, the extinction of craving, detachment, Nibbana.' This, Ananda, is called contemplation of detachment.
vii.
“And what, Ananda, is contemplation of cessation?
Herein, Ananda, a monk having gone to the forest, or to the foot of a tree, or to a lonely place, contemplates thus: 'This is peaceful, this is sublime, namely, the stilling of all component things, the extinction of craving, cessation, Nibbana.' This, Ananda, is called contemplation of cessation.
viii.
“And what, Ananda, is contemplation of distaste for the whole world?
Herein, Ananda, by abandoning any concern and clinging to this world, by abandoning mental prejudices, wrong beliefs, and latent tendencies concerning this world, by not grasping them, but by giving them up, becomes detached.
This, Ananda, Is called contemplation of distaste for the whole world.
ix.
“And what, Ananda, is contemplation of impermanence of all component things?
Herein, Ananda, a monk is wearied, humiliated, and disgusted with all conditioned things.
This, Ananda, is called contemplation of impermanence of all component things.
x.
“And what, Ananda, is mindfulness of in-breathing and out-breathing?
Herein, Ananda, a monk having gone to the forest, or to the foot of a tree, or to a lonely place, sits down, having folded his legs crosswise, keeping the body erect, and his mindfulness alive, mindful he breathes in, mindful he breathes out.
“When he is breathing in a long breath, he knows: 'I am breathing in a long breath,' when he is breathing out a long breath, he knows: 'I am breathing out a long breath'; when he is breathing in a short breath, he knows: 'I am breathing in a short breath,' when he is breathing out a short breath, he knows: 'I am breathing out a short breath.' 'Conscious of the entire process I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself.
'Conscious of the entire process I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself.
“'Calming the entire process, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself; 'calming the entire process I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself.
“'Experiencing rapture, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself; 'experiencing rapture, I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself.
“'Experiencing bliss, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself; 'experiencing bliss, I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself.
“'Experiencing the mental formations, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself; 'experiencing the mental formations, I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself.
“'Calming the mental formations, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself; 'calming the mental formations, I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself.
“'Experiencing the mind, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself; 'experiencing the mind, I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself.
“'Exceedingly gladdening the mind, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself; 'exceedingly gladdening the mind, I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself.
“'Concentrating the mind, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself; concentrating the mind I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself.
“'Liberating the mind, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself, 'liberating the mind I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself; 'contemplating impermanence, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself; 'contemplating impermanence, I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself; 'contemplating detachment, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself; 'contemplating detachment, I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself; 'contemplating cessation, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself, 'contemplating cessation, I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself; 'contemplating abandonment, I shall breathe in,' thus he trains himself; 'contemplating abandonment, I shall breathe out,' thus he trains himself.
“This, Ananda, is called mindfulness of in-breathing and out-breathing.
If, Ananda, you visit the monk Girimananda and recite to him these ten contemplations, then that monk, Girimananda, having heard them, will be immediately cured of his affliction.
Thereupon the Venerable Ananda, having learned these ten contemplations from the Blessed One, visited the Venerable Girimananda, and recited to him the ten contemplations.
When the Venerable Girimananda had heard them, his affliction was immediately cured.
He recovered from that affliction, and thus disappeared the affliction of the Venerable Girimananda.
“Monks, if those who have gone forth in other sects ask you, 'In what are all phenomena rooted?
What is their coming into play?
What is their origination?
What is their meeting place?
What is their presiding state?
What is their governing principle?
What is their surpassing state?
What is their heartwood?
Where do they gain a footing?
What is their final end?': On being asked this by those who have gone forth in other sects, how would you answer?
“For us, lord, the teachings have the Blessed One as their root, their guide, & their arbitrator.
It would be good if the Blessed One himself would explicate the meaning of this statement.
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the monks will remember it.
“In that case, monks, listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said, “Monks, if those who have gone forth in other sects ask you, 'In what are all phenomena rooted?
What is their coming into play?
What is their origination?
What is their meeting place?
What is their presiding state?
What is their governing principle?
What is their surpassing state?
What is their heartwood?
Where do they gain a footing?
What is their final end?': On being asked this by those who have gone forth in other sects, this is how you should answer them:
“'All phenomena are rooted in desire.
“'All phenomena come into play through attention.
“'All phenomena have contact as their origination.
“'All phenomena have feeling as their meeting place.
“'All phenomena have concentration as their presiding state.
“'All phenomena have mindfulness as their governing principle.
“'All phenomena have discernment as their surpassing state.
“'All phenomena have release as their heartwood.
“'All phenomena gain their footing in the deathless.
“'All phenomena have Unbinding as their final end.'
“On being asked this by those who have gone forth in other sects, this is how you should answer.
The Commentary goes on to say that the statement, “All phenomena are rooted in desire,” deals exclusively with worldly phenomena, whereas the remaining statements about all phenomena cover both worldly and transcendent phenomena.
There seems less reason to follow the Commentary's first assertion here, in that the noble eightfold path, when brought to maturity, counts as transcendent, and it is obviously rooted in a skillful form of desire.
As for the transcendent in its ultimate form, the phrase “all phenomena” as used in this sutta does not cover Unbinding, as Unbinding is not rooted in anything and, as the final statement indicates, it constitutes the final end of all phenomena.
Thus this sutta would seem to belong to the group of suttas that would not classify Unbinding as a phenomenon.

“Even if a monk is not skilled in the ways of the minds of others, he should train himself: 'I will be skilled in reading my own mind.'
“And how is a monk skilled in reading his own mind?
Imagine a young woman — or man — fond of adornment, examining the image of her own face in a bright, clean mirror or bowl of clear water: If she saw any dirt or blemish there, she would try to remove it.
If she saw no dirt or blemish there, she would be pleased, her resolves fulfilled: 'How fortunate I am!
How clean I am!' In the same way, a monk's self-examination is very productive in terms of skillful qualities: 'Am I one who achieves internal tranquility of awareness, or am I one who does not achieve internal tranquility of awareness?
Am I one who achieves insight into phenomena through heightened discernment, or am I one who does not achieve insight into phenomena through heightened discernment?
“If, on examination, he knows, 'I am one who achieves internal tranquility of awareness but not insight into phenomena through heightened discernment,' then his duty is to make an effort for the maintenance of internal tranquility of awareness and for insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
At a later time he will then be one who achieves both internal tranquility of awareness and insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
“But if, on examination, the monk knows, 'I am one who achieves insight into phenomena through heightened discernment but not internal tranquility of awareness,' then his duty is to make an effort for the maintenance of insight into phenomena through heightened discernment and for internal tranquility of awareness.
At a later time he will then be one who achieves both insight into phenomena through heightened discernment and internal tranquility of awareness.
“But if, on examination, the monk knows, 'I am one who achieves neither internal tranquility of awareness nor insight into phenomena through heightened discernment,' then he should put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, relentlessness, mindfulness, & alertness for gaining those very same skillful qualities.
Just as when a person whose turban or head was on fire would put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, relentlessness, mindfulness, & alertness to put out the fire on his turban or head; in the same way, the monk should put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, relentlessness, mindfulness, & alertness for gaining those very same skillful qualities.
“But if, on examination, the monk knows, 'I am one who achieves both internal tranquility of awareness and insight into phenomena through heightened discernment,' then his duty is to make an effort in maintaining those very same skillful qualities to a higher degree for the ending of the effluents.
“Monks, I speak of robes in two ways: to be partaken of and not to be partaken of.
I also speak of alms food… lodgings… villages & towns… countrysides… individuals in two ways: to be partaken of and not to be partaken of.
“'Monks, I speak of robes in two ways: to be partaken of and not to be partaken of': Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
Any robe of which one has come to know, 'When I partake of this robe, unskillful qualities increase and skillful qualities decrease,' that sort of robe is not to be partaken of.
Any robe of which one has come to know, 'When I partake of this robe, unskillful qualities decrease and skillful qualities increase,' that sort of robe is to be partaken of.
'Monks, I speak of robes in two ways: to be partaken of and not to be partaken of': Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'Monks, I also speak of alms food in two ways…'…
“'Monks, I also speak of lodgings in two ways…'…
“'Monks, I also speak of villages & towns in two ways…'…
“'Monks, I also speak of countrysides in two ways…'…
“'Monks, I also speak of individuals in two ways: to be partaken of and not to be partaken of': Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
Any individual of whom one has come to know, 'When I partake of this individual, unskillful qualities increase and skillful qualities decrease,' that sort of individual is not to be partaken of.
Any individual of whom one has come to know, 'When I partake of this individual, unskillful qualities decrease and skillful qualities increase,' that sort of individual is to be partaken of.
'Monks, I also speak of individuals in two ways: to be partaken of and not to be partaken of': Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi, in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks: “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said: “Even if a monk is not skilled in the ways of the minds of others.
he should train himself: 'I will be skilled in reading my own mind.'
“And how is a monk skilled in reading his own mind?
Imagine a young woman — or man — fond of adornment, examining the image of her own face in a bright, clean mirror or bowl of clear water: If she saw any dirt or blemish there, she would try to remove it.
If she saw no dirt or blemish there, she would be pleased, her resolves fulfilled: 'How fortunate I am!
How clean I am!' In the same way, a monk's self-examination is very productive in terms of skillful qualities: 'Do I usually remain covetous or not?
With thoughts of ill will or not?
Overcome by sloth & drowsiness or not?
Restless or not?
Uncertain or gone beyond uncertainty?
Angry or not?
With soiled thoughts or unsoiled thoughts?
With my body aroused or unaroused?
Lazy or with persistence aroused?
Unconcentrated or concentrated?'
“If, on examination, a monk knows, 'I usually remain covetous, with thoughts of ill will, overcome by sloth & drowsiness, restless, uncertain, angry, with soiled thoughts, with my body aroused, lazy, or unconcentrated,' then he should put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, relentlessness, mindfulness, & alertness for the abandoning of those very same evil, unskillful qualities.
Just as when a person whose turban or head was on fire would put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, relentlessness, mindfulness, & alertness to put out the fire on his turban or head; in the same way, the monk should put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, relentlessness, mindfulness, & alertness for the abandoning of those very same evil, unskillful qualities.
“But if, on examination, a monk knows, 'I usually remain uncovetous, without thoughts of ill will, free of sloth & drowsiness, not restless, gone beyond uncertainty, not angry, with unsoiled thoughts, with my body unaroused, with persistence aroused, & concentrated,' then his duty is to make an effort in maintaining those very same skillful qualities to a higher degree for the ending of the effluents.”
“There are these ten things that a person gone-forth should reflect on often.
Which ten?
“'I have become casteless': a person gone forth should often reflect on this.
“'My life is dependent on others'…
“'My behavior should be different '…
“'Can I fault myself with regard to my virtue?'…
“'Can my knowledgeable fellows in the holy life, on close examination, fault me with regard to my virtue?'…
“'I will grow different, separate from all that is dear & appealing to me'…
“'I am the owner of my actions, heir to my actions, born of my actions, related through my actions, and have my actions as my arbitrator.
Whatever I do, for good or for evil, to that will I fall heir'…
“'What am I becoming as the days & nights fly past?'…
“'Do I delight in an empty dwelling?'…
“'Have I attained a superior human attainment, a truly noble distinction of knowledge & vision, such that — when my fellows in the holy life question me in the last days of my life — I won't feel abashed?': a person gone forth should often reflect on this.
“These are the ten things that a person gone-forth should reflect on often.”
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Blessed One was living near Savatthi at Jetavana at the monastery of Anathapindika.
Then the Blessed One addressed the monks, saying: “Monks.” — “Venerable Sir,” they said by way of reply.
The Blessed One then spoke as follows:
“These ten essentials must be reflected upon again and again by one who has gone forth.
What are these ten?
“'I am now changed into a different mode of life.' This must be reflected upon again and again by one who has gone forth.
“'My life depends on others.' This must be reflected upon again and again by one who has gone forth.
“'I must now behave in a different manner.' This must be reflected upon again and again by one who has gone forth.
“'Does my mind upbraid me regarding the state of my virtue?' This must be reflected upon again and again by one who has gone forth.
“'Do my discerning fellow-monks having tested me, reproach me regarding the state of my virtue?' This must be reflected upon again and again by one who has gone forth.
“'There will be a parting from all those who are dear and loving to me.
Death brings this separation to me.' This must be reflected upon again and again by one who has gone forth.
“'Of kamma I am constituted.
Kamma is my inheritance; kamma is the matrix; kamma is my kinsman; kamma is my refuge.
Whatever kamma I perform, be it good or bad, to that I shall be heir.' This must be reflected upon again and again by one who has gone forth.
“'How do I spend my nights and days?' This must be reflected upon again and again by one who has gone forth.
“'Do I take delight in solitude?' This must be reflected upon again and again by one who has gone forth.
“'Have I gained superhuman faculties?
Have I gained that higher wisdom so that when I am questioned by fellow-monks at the last moment I will have no occasion to be depressed and downcast?' This must be reflected upon again and again by one who has gone forth.
“These, monks, are the essentials that should be reflected again and again by one who has gone forth.
So spoke the Blessed One.
Those monks rejoiced at the words of the Blessed One.
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Kapilavatthu at the Banyan Park.
Then many Sakyan lay followers, it being the Uposatha day, went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to him, they sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, the Blessed One said to them, “Sakyans, do you observe the eight-factored uposatha?
“Sometimes we do, lord, and sometimes we don't.
“It's no gain for you, Sakyans.
It's ill-gotten, that in this life so endangered by grief, in this life so endangered by death, you sometimes observe the eight-factored uposatha and sometimes don't.
“What do you think, Sakyans.
Suppose a man, by some profession or other, without encountering an unskillful day, were to earn a half-kahapana.
Would he deserve to be called a capable man, full of initiative?
“Yes, lord.
“Suppose a man, by some profession or other, without encountering an unskillful day, were to earn a kahapana… two kahapanas… three… four… five… six… seven… eight… nine… ten… twenty… thirty… forty… fifty… one hundred kahapanas.
Would he deserve to be called a capable man, full of initiative?
“Yes, lord.
“Now what do you think: earning one hundred, one thousand kahapanas a day; saving up his gains, living for one hundred years, would a man arrive at a great mass of wealth?
“Yes, lord.
“Now what do you think: would that man, because of that wealth, on account of that wealth, with that wealth as the cause, live sensitive to unalloyed bliss for a day, a night, half a day, or half a night?
“No, lord.
And why is that?
Sensual pleasures are inconstant, hollow, false, deceptive by nature.
“Now, Sakyans, there is the case where a disciple of mine, spending ten years practicing as I have instructed, would live sensitive to unalloyed bliss for a hundred years, a hundred centuries, a hundred millennia.
And he would be a once-returner, a non-returner, or at the very least a stream-winner.
“Let alone ten years, there is the case where a disciple of mine, spending nine years… eight years… seven… six… five… four… three… two years… one year practicing as I have instructed, would live sensitive to unalloyed bliss for a hundred years, a hundred centuries, a hundred millennia.
And he would be a once-returner, a non-returner, or at the very least a stream-winner.
“Let alone one year, there is the case where a disciple of mine, spending ten months… nine months… eight months… seven… six… five… four… three… two months… one month… half a month practicing as I have instructed, would live sensitive to unalloyed bliss for a hundred years, a hundred centuries, a hundred millennia.
And he would be a once-returner, a non-returner, or at the very least a stream-winner.
“Let alone half a month, there is the case where a disciple of mine, spending ten days & nights… nine days & nights… eight… seven… six… five… four… three… two days & nights… one day & night practicing as I have instructed, would live sensitive to unalloyed bliss for a hundred years, a hundred centuries, a hundred millennia.
And he would be a once-returner, a non-returner, or at the very least a stream-winner.
“It's no gain for you, Sakyans.
It's ill-gotten, that in this life so endangered by grief, in this life so endangered by death, you sometimes observe the eight-factored uposatha and sometimes don't.
“Then from this day forward, lord, we will observe the eight-factored uposatha.”
“Monks, as far as Kasi & Kosala extend, as far as the rule of King Pasenadi the Kosalan extends, King Pasenadi the Kosalan is reckoned supreme.
Yet even in King Pasenadi the Kosalan there is still aberration, there is change.
Seeing this, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with that.
Being disenchanted with that, he becomes dispassionate toward what is supreme, and even more so toward what is inferior.
“As far as the sun & moon revolve, illumining the directions with their light, there extends the thousand-fold cosmos.
In that thousand-fold cosmos there are a thousand moons, a thousand suns, a thousand Sunerus — kings of mountains; a thousand Rose-apple continents, a thousand Deathless Ox-cart, a thousand northern Kuru, a thousand eastern Videha; four thousand great oceans, four thousand Great Kings, a thousand Four Great Kings, a thousand Thirty-three, a thousand Yamas, a thousand Tusitas, a thousand heavens of the Nimmanaratis, a thousand heavens of the Paranimmitavasavattis, and a thousand Brahma worlds.
And in that thousand-fold cosmos, the Great Brahma is reckoned supreme.
Yet even in the Great Brahma there is still aberration, there is change.
Seeing this, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with that.
Being disenchanted with that, he becomes dispassionate toward what is supreme, and even more so toward what is inferior.
“There comes a time when this cosmos devolves.
When the cosmos is devolving, most beings head to the the Radiant.
There they remain for a long, long time — mind-made, feeding on rapture, self-radiant, faring through the sky, abiding in splendor.
When the cosmos is devolving, the Radiant Devas are reckoned supreme.
Yet even in the Radiant Devas, there is still aberration, there is change.
Seeing this, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with that.
Being disenchanted with that, he becomes dispassionate toward what is supreme, and even more so toward what is inferior.
“There are these ten totality-dimensions.
Which ten?
One perceives the earth-totality above, below, all-around: non-dual, unlimited.
One perceives the water-totality… the fire-totality… the wind-totality… the blue-totality… the yellow-totality… the red-totality… the white-totality… the space-totality… the consciousness-totality above, below, all-around: non-dual, unlimited.
These are the ten totalities.
Now, of these ten totalities, this is supreme: when one perceives the consciousness-totality above, below, all-around: non-dual, unlimited.
And there are beings who are percipient in this way.
Yet even in the beings who are percipient in this way there is still aberration, there is change.
Seeing this, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with that.
Being disenchanted with that, he becomes dispassionate toward what is supreme, and even more so toward what is inferior.
“There are these There are these eight dimensions of mastery.
Which eight?
“Having a single perception of form internally, one sees forms externally as limited, beautiful & ugly.
Mastering them, one has the perception, 'I know; I see.' This is the first dimension of mastery.
“Having a single perception of form internally, one sees forms externally as immeasurable, beautiful & ugly.
Mastering them, one has the perception, 'I know; I see.' This is the second dimension of mastery.
“Having a single formless perception internally, one sees forms externally as limited, beautiful & ugly.
Mastering them, one has the perception, 'I know; I see.' This is the third dimension of mastery.
“Having a single formless perception internally, one sees forms externally as immeasurable, beautiful & ugly.
Mastering them, one has the perception, 'I know; I see.' This is the fourth dimension of mastery.
“Having a single formless perception internally, one sees forms externally as blue, blue in their color, blue in their features, blue in their glow.
Just as a flax-flower is blue, blue in its color, blue in its features, blue in its glow, or just as Benares muslin, smooth on both sides, is blue, blue in its color, blue in its features, blue in its glow; in the same way, having a single formless perception internally, one sees forms externally as blue, blue in their color, blue in their features, blue in their glow.
Mastering them, one has the perception, 'I know; I see.' This is the fifth dimension of mastery.
“Having a single formless perception internally, one sees forms externally as yellow, yellow in their color, yellow in their features, yellow in their glow.
Just as a kannikara-flower is yellow, yellow in its color, yellow in its features, yellow in its glow, or just as Benares muslin, smooth on both sides, is yellow, yellow in its color, yellow in its features, yellow in its glow; in the same way, having a single formless perception internally, one sees forms externally as yellow, yellow in their color, yellow in their features, yellow in their glow.
Mastering them, one has the perception, 'I know; I see.' This is the sixth dimension of mastery.
“Having a single formless perception internally, one sees forms externally as red, red in their color, red in their features, red in their glow.
Just as a bandha-jivaka-flower is red, red in its color, red in its features, red in its glow, or just as Benares muslin, smooth on both sides, is red, red in its color, red in its features, red in its glow; in the same way, having a single formless perception internally, one sees forms externally as red, red in their color, red in their features, red in their glow.
Mastering them, one has the perception, 'I know; I see.' This is the seventh dimension of mastery.
“Having a single formless perception internally, one sees forms externally as white, white in their color, white in their features, white in their glow.
Just as the morning star is white, white in its color, white in its features, white in its glow, or just as Benares muslin, smooth on both sides, is white, white in its color, white in its features, white in its glow; in the same way, having a single formless perception internally, one sees forms externally as white, white in their color, white in their features, white in their glow.
Mastering them, one has the perception, 'I know; I see.' This is the eighth dimension of mastery.
“These are the eight dimensions of mental mastery.
Now, of these eight dimensions of mastery, this is supreme: when, having a single formless perception internally, one sees forms externally as white, white in their color, white in their features, white in their glow.
And there are beings who are percipient in this way.
Yet even in the beings who are percipient in this way there is still aberration, there is change.
Seeing this, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with that.
Being disenchanted with that, he becomes dispassionate toward what is supreme, and even more so toward what is inferior.
“There are these four modes of practice.
Which four?
Painful practice with slow intuition, painful practice with quick intuition, pleasant practice with slow intuition, and pleasant practice with quick intuition.
These are the four modes of practice.
Now, of these four modes of practice, this is supreme: pleasant practice with quick intuition.
And there are beings whose practice is like this.
Yet even in the beings whose practice is like this there is still aberration, there is change.
Seeing this, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with that.
Being disenchanted with that, he becomes dispassionate toward what is supreme, and even more so toward what is inferior.
“There are these four perceptions.
Which four?
One perceives the limited.
One perceives the enlarged.
One perceives the immeasurable.
One perceives the dimension of nothingness: 'There is nothing.' These are the four perceptions.
Now, of these four perceptions, this is supreme: when one perceives the dimension of nothingness: 'There is nothing.' And there are beings who are percipient in this way.
Yet even in the beings who are percipient in this way there is still aberration, there is change.
Seeing this, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with that.
Being disenchanted with that, he becomes dispassionate toward what is supreme, and even more so toward what is inferior.
“The supreme view-point external is this: 'I should not be; it should not occur to me; I will not be; it will not occur to me.' Of one with this view it may be expected that ' unloathsomeness of becoming will not occur to him, and loathsomeness of the cessation of becoming will not occur to him.' And there are beings who have this view.
Yet even in the beings who have this view there is still aberration, there is change.
Seeing this, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with that.
Being disenchanted with that, he becomes dispassionate toward what is supreme, and even more so toward what is inferior.
“There are some brahmans & contemplatives who declare the foremost purity of the spirit.
Now, of those who proclaim the foremost purity of the spirit, these are supreme: those who, with the complete transcending of the dimension of nothingness, enter & remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception and who, having directly known & realized this, teach their Dhamma.
And there are beings who teach in this way.
Yet even in the beings who teach in this way there is still aberration, there is change.
Seeing this, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with that.
Being disenchanted with that, he becomes dispassionate toward what is supreme, and even more so toward what is inferior.
“There are some brahmans & contemplatives who proclaim the foremost Unbinding in the here-&-now.
Now, of those who proclaim the foremost Unbinding in the here-&-now, this is supreme: liberation through non-clinging, having known, as they actually are present, the arising, the passing away, the allure, the drawbacks of, & the escape from the six sense-contact media.
And when I teach that, when I point that out, some brahmans & contemplatives accuse me of being false, unfactual, hollow, vain, 'Gotama the contemplative does not declare the full comprehension of sensuality, does not declare the full comprehension of forms, does not declare the full comprehension of feelings.' But I do declare the full comprehension of sensuality, I do declare the full comprehension of forms, I do declare the full comprehension of feelings.
Unhungering, unbound, cooled in the here-&-now, I declare total Unbinding from lack of clinging.”
Monks, when a monk becomes entirely dispassionate towards one thing, when his lust for it entirely fades away, when he is entirely liberated from it, when he sees the complete ending of it, then he is one who, after fully comprehending the Goal, makes an end of suffering here and now.
What one thing?
“All beings subsist by nutriment.” When a monk becomes entirely dispassionate towards this one thing, when his lust for it entirely fades away, when he is entirely liberated from it, and when he sees the complete ending of it, then, O monks, he is one who, after fully comprehending the Goal, makes an end of suffering here and now.
On one occasion Ven.
MahaCunda was staying among the Cetis at Sahajati.
There he addressed the monks, “Monks, my friends.
“Yes, friend,” the monks responded.
Ven.
MahaCunda said this: “When a monk utters words about knowing, saying, 'I know this Dhamma; I see this Dhamma,' but he remains with his mind conquered by greed, his mind conquered by aversion, delusion, anger, hostility, hypocrisy, spite, selfishness, evil envy, or evil longing, then it should be known of him that, 'This venerable one does not discern how it is that, when one discerns, greed does not come into being, which is why he remains with his mind conquered by greed.
This venerable one does not discern how it is that, when one discerns, aversion… delusion… anger… hostility… hypocrisy… spite… selfishness… evil envy… evil longing does not come into being, which is why he remains with his mind conquered by evil longing.'
“When a monk utters words about developing, saying, 'I am developed in bodily action, developed in virtue, developed in mind, developed in discernment,' but he remains with his mind conquered by greed, his mind conquered by aversion, delusion, anger, hostility, hypocrisy, spite, selfishness, evil envy, or evil longing, then it should be known of him that, 'This venerable one does not discern how it is that, when one discerns, greed does not come into being, which is why he remains with his mind conquered by greed.
This venerable one does not discern how it is that, when one discerns, aversion… delusion… anger… hostility… hypocrisy… spite… selfishness… evil envy… evil longing does not come into being, which is why he remains with his mind conquered by evil longing.'
“When a monk utters words about knowing & developing, saying, 'I know this Dhamma; I see this Dhamma; I am developed in bodily action, developed in virtue, developed in mind, developed in discernment,' but he remains with his mind conquered by greed, his mind conquered by aversion, delusion, anger, hostility, hypocrisy, spite, selfishness, evil envy, or evil longing, then it should be known of him that, 'This venerable one does not discern how it is that, when one discerns, greed does not come into being, which is why he remains with his mind conquered by greed.
This venerable one does not discern how it is that, when one discerns, aversion… delusion… anger… hostility… hypocrisy… spite… selfishness… evil envy… evil longing does not come into being, which is why he remains with his mind conquered by evil longing.'
“It's just as if a person, though poor, were to talk about riches, or a person without wealth were to talk about wealth, or a person without property were to talk about property, and then when there arose one situation or another calling for wealth and he would not be able to come forth with wealth or commodities or silver or gold, then they would know about him that, 'This venerable one, though poor, talks about riches; without wealth, he talks about wealth; without property, he talks about property.
How do we know that?
Because when there arises a situation calling for wealth, he can't come forth with wealth or commodities or silver or gold.'
“In the same way, when a monk utters words about knowing… about developing… about knowing & developing, saying, 'I know this Dhamma; I see this Dhamma; I am developed in bodily action, developed in virtue, developed in mind, developed in discernment,' but he remains with his mind conquered by greed, his mind conquered by aversion, delusion, anger, hostility, hypocrisy, spite, selfishness, evil envy, or evil longing, then it should be known of him that, 'This venerable one does not discern how it is that, when one discerns, greed does not come into being, which is why he remains with his mind conquered by greed.
This venerable one does not discern how it is that, when one discerns, aversion… delusion… anger… hostility… hypocrisy… spite… selfishness… evil envy… evil longing does not come into being, which is why he remains with his mind conquered by evil longing.'
“But when a monk utters words about knowing… about developing… about knowing & developing, saying, 'I know this Dhamma; I see this Dhamma; I am developed in bodily action, developed in virtue, developed in mind, developed in discernment,' and he remains with his mind not conquered by greed, his mind not conquered by aversion, delusion, anger, hostility, hypocrisy, spite, selfishness, evil envy, or evil longing, then it should be known of him that, 'This venerable one discerns how it is that, when one discerns, greed does not come into being, which is why he remains with his mind not conquered by greed.
This venerable one discerns how it is that, when one discerns, aversion… delusion… anger… hostility… hypocrisy… spite… selfishness… evil envy… evil longing does not come into being, which is why he remains with his mind not conquered by evil longing.'
“It's just as if a rich person were to talk about riches, or a wealthy person were to talk about wealth, or a propertied person were to talk about property, and then when there arose one situation or another calling for wealth and he would be able to come forth with wealth or commodities or silver or gold, then they would know about him that, 'This venerable one, being rich, talks about riches; being wealthy, he talks about wealth; being propertied, he talks about property.
How do we know that?
Because when there arises a situation calling for wealth, he can come forth with wealth or commodities or silver or gold.'
“In the same way, when a monk utters words about knowing… about developing… about knowing & developing, saying, 'I know this Dhamma; I see this Dhamma; I am developed in bodily action, developed in virtue, developed in mind, developed in discernment,' and he remains with his mind not conquered by greed, his mind not conquered by aversion, delusion, anger, hostility, hypocrisy, spite, selfishness, evil envy, or evil longing, then it should be known of him that, 'This venerable one discerns how it is that, when one discerns, greed does not come into being, which is why he remains with his mind not conquered by greed.
This venerable one discerns how it is that, when one discerns, aversion… delusion… anger… hostility… hypocrisy… spite… selfishness… evil envy… evil longing does not come into being, which is why he remains with his mind not conquered by evil longing.'”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying in the Kuru country.
Now there is a town of the Kurus called Kammasadhamma.
There the Blessed One addressed the monks: “Monks.
“Yes, lord,” the monks replied.
The Blessed One said: “Monks, there are these ten noble dwellings in which noble ones have dwelled, dwell, and will dwell.
Which ten?
There is the case where a monk has abandoned five factors, is endowed with six, guards one, is supported in four, has shaken off factional truths, has thoroughly given up searching, is undisturbed in his resolves, is calmed in his bodily-fabrication, is well-released in mind, is well-released in discernment.
These are the ten noble dwellings in which noble ones have dwelled, dwell, and will dwell.
“And how has a monk abandoned five factors?
There is the case where a monk's sensual desire is abandoned.
His ill-will… His sloth & torpor… His restlessness & anxiety… His uncertainty is abandoned.
This is how a monk has abandoned five factors.
“And how is a monk endowed with six?
There is the case where a monk, on seeing a form via the eye, is not gladdened, not saddened, but remains equanimous, mindful, & alert.
On hearing a sound via the ear… On smelling an aroma via the nose… On tasting a flavor via the tongue… On touching a tactile sensation via the body… On cognizing an idea via the intellect, he is not gladdened, not saddened, but remains equanimous, mindful, & alert.
This is how a monk is endowed with six.
“And how does a monk guard one?
There is the case where a monk is endowed with an awareness guarded by mindfulness.
This is how a monk guards one.
“And how is a monk supported in four?
There is the case where a monk, carefully reflecting, follows one thing, tolerates another, avoids another, and destroys another.
This is how a monk is supported in four.

“And how has a monk shaken off factional truths?
There is the case where a monk has shaken off the run-of-the-mill factional truths of run-of-the-mill brahmans & contemplatives — in other words, 'The cosmos is eternal,' 'The cosmos is not eternal,' 'The cosmos is finite,' 'The cosmos is infinite,' 'The soul & the body are the same,' 'The soul is one thing and the body another,' 'After death a Tathagata exists,' 'After death a Tathagata does not exist,' 'After death a Tathagata both does & does not exist,' 'After death a Tathagata neither does nor does not exist.' All of these he has thrown off, shaken off, renounced, vomited up, let go, abandoned, relinquished.
This is how a monk has shaken off factional truths.
“And how has a monk thoroughly given up searching?
There is the case where a monk has abandoned his search for sensuality… his search for becoming… his search for a holy life.
This is how a monk has thoroughly given up searching.
“And how is a monk undisturbed in his resolves?
There is the case where a monk has abandoned his resolve for sensuality… his resolve for ill-will… his resolve for harmfulness.
This is how a monk is undisturbed in his resolves.
“And how is a monk calmed in his bodily fabrication?
There is the case where a monk, with the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
This is how a monk is calmed in his bodily fabrication.
“And how is a monk well-released in mind?
There is the case where a monk's mind is released from passion, released from aversion, released from delusion.
This is how a monk is well-released in mind.
“And how is a monk well-released in discernment?
There is the case where a monk discerns, 'Passion is abandoned in me, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.' He discerns, 'Aversion is abandoned in me, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.' He discerns, 'Delusion is abandoned in me, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.' This is how a monk is well-released in discernment.
“Monks, all those in the past who have dwelled in noble dwellings have dwelled in these same ten noble dwellings.
All those in the future who will dwell in noble dwellings will dwell in these same ten noble dwellings.
All those in the present who dwell in noble dwellings dwell in these same ten noble dwellings.
“These are the ten noble dwellings in which noble ones have dwelled, dwell, and will dwell.
See also: AN.
“Live with a protector, monks, and not without a protector.
He suffers, one who lives without a protector.
And these ten are qualities creating a protector.
Which ten?
“There is the case where a monk is virtuous.
He dwells restrained in accordance with the Patimokkha, consummate in his behavior & sphere of activity.
He trains himself, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
And the fact that he is virtuous… seeing danger in the slightest faults, is a quality creating a protector.
“Then again, the monk has heard much, has retained what he has heard, has stored what he has heard.
Whatever teachings are admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, admirable in the end, that — in their meaning & expression — proclaim the holy life that is entirely complete & pure: those he has listened to often, retained, discussed, accumulated, examined with his mind, & well-penetrated in terms of his views.
And the fact that he has heard much… well-penetrated in terms of his views, is a quality creating a protector.
“Then again, the monk has admirable friends, admirable companions, admirable comrades.
And the fact that he has admirable friends, admirable companions, admirable comrades is a quality creating a protector.
“Then again, the monk is easy to speak to, endowed with qualities that make him easy to speak to, patient, respectful to instruction.
And the fact that he is easy to speak to… respectful to instruction, is a quality creating a protector.
“Then again, the monk is adept at the various affairs involving his fellows in the holy life; is vigorous, quick-witted in the techniques involved in them, is up to doing them or arranging to get them done.
And the fact that he is adept at… doing them or arranging to get them done is a quality creating a protector.
“Then again, the monk is one who desires the Dhamma, endearing in his conversation, greatly rejoicing in the higher Dhamma & higher Discipline.
And the fact that he is one who desires the Dhamma, endearing in his conversation, greatly rejoicing in the higher Dhamma & higher Discipline, is a quality creating a protector.
“Then again, the monk keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful qualities and for taking on skillful qualities.
He is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful qualities.
And the fact that he keeps his persistence aroused… not shirking his duties with regard to skillful qualities, is a quality creating a protector.
“Then again, the monk is content with any old robe cloth at all, any old alms food, any old lodging, any old medicinal requisites for curing sickness at all.
And the fact that he is content with any old robe cloth at all, any old alms food, any old lodging, any old medicinal requisites for curing sickness at all, is a quality creating a protector.
“Then again, the monk is mindful, highly meticulous, remembering & able to call to mind even things that were done & said long ago.
And the fact that he is mindful, highly meticulous, remembering & able to call to mind even things that were done & said long ago, is a quality creating a protector.
“Then again, the monk is discerning, endowed with discernment of arising & passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
And the fact that the monk is discerning, endowed with discernment of arising & passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress, is a quality creating a protector.
“Live with a protector, monks, and not without a protector.
He suffers, one who lives without a protector.
These are the ten qualities creating a protector.”
“To the extent that there are animals — footless, two-footed, four-footed, many footed; with form or formless; percipient, non-percipient, or neither percipient nor non-percipient — the Tathagata, worthy & rightly self-awakened, is reckoned the foremost among them.
In the same way, all skillful qualities are rooted in heedfulness, converge in heedfulness, and heedfulness is reckoned the foremost among them.
“Just as the footprints of all legged animals are encompassed by the footprint of the elephant, and the elephant's footprint is reckoned the foremost among them in terms of size; in the same way, all skillful qualities are rooted in heedfulness, converge in heedfulness, and heedfulness is reckoned the foremost among them.
“Just as the rafters in a peak-roofed house all go to the roof-peak, incline to the roof-peak, converge at the roof-peak, and the roof-peak is reckoned the foremost among them; in the same way, all skillful qualities are rooted in heedfulness, converge in heedfulness, and heedfulness is reckoned the foremost among them.
“Just as, of all root fragrances, black aloes-root is reckoned the foremost; in the same way, all skillful qualities are rooted in heedfulness, converge in heedfulness, and heedfulness is reckoned the foremost among them.
“Just as, of all wood fragrances, red sandalwood is reckoned the foremost; in the same way, all skillful qualities are rooted in heedfulness, converge in heedfulness, and heedfulness is reckoned the foremost among them.
“Just as, of all flower fragrances, jasmine is reckoned the foremost; in the same way, all skillful qualities are rooted in heedfulness, converge in heedfulness, and heedfulness is reckoned the foremost among them.
“Just as all wattle-and-daub-town princes fall subject to a wheel-turning emperor, and the wheel-turning emperor is reckoned the foremost among them; in the same way, all skillful qualities are rooted in heedfulness, converge in heedfulness, and heedfulness is reckoned the foremost among them.
“Just as all the light of the constellations does not equal one sixteenth of the light of the moon, and the light of the moon is reckoned the foremost among them; in the same way, all skillful qualities are rooted in heedfulness, converge in heedfulness, and heedfulness is reckoned the foremost among them.
“Just as in the last month of the rains, in autumn, when the sky is clear & cloudless, the sun, on ascending the sky, overpowers the space immersed in darkness, shines, blazes, & dazzles; in the same way, all skillful qualities are rooted in heedfulness, converge in heedfulness, and heedfulness is reckoned the foremost among them.
“Just as the great rivers — such as the Ganges, the Yamuna, the Aciravati, the Sarabhu, & the Mahi — all go to the ocean, incline to the ocean, slope to the ocean, tend toward the ocean, and the ocean is reckoned the foremost among them; in the same way, all skillful qualities are rooted in heedfulness, converge in heedfulness, and heedfulness is reckoned the foremost among them.”
“There are these ten fetters.
Which ten?
Five lower fetters & five higher fetters.
And which are the five lower fetters?
Self-identity views, uncertainty, grasping at precepts & practices, sensual desire, & ill will.
These are the five lower fetters.
And which are the five higher fetters?
Passion for form, passion for what is formless, conceit, restlessness, & ignorance.
These are the five higher fetters.
And these are the ten fetters.”
Then Ven.
Ananda went to Ven.
Sariputta and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Sariputta, “Friend Sariputta, could a monk have an attainment of concentration such that he would neither be percipient of earth with regard to earth, nor of water with regard to water, nor of fire… wind… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception… this world… nor of the next world with regard to the next world, and yet he would still be percipient?
“Yes, friend Ananda, he could… “But how, friend Sariputta, could a monk have an attainment of concentration such he would neither be percipient of earth with regard to earth… nor of the next world with regard to the next world, and yet he would still be percipient?
“Once, friend Ananda, when I was staying right here in Savatthi in the Blind Man's Grove, I reached concentration in such a way that I was neither percipient of earth with regard to earth… nor of the next world with regard to the next world, and yet I was still percipient.
“But what, friend Sariputta, were you percipient of at that time?
“'The cessation of becoming — Unbinding — the cessation of becoming — Unbinding': One perception arose in me, friend Ananda, as another perception ceased.
Just as in a blazing woodchip fire, one flame arises as another flame ceases, even so, 'The cessation of becoming — Unbinding — the cessation of becoming — Unbinding': One perception arose in me as another one ceased.
I was percipient at that time of 'The cessation of becoming — Unbinding.'”
Then Ven.
Ananda went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One, “Lord, could a monk have an attainment of concentration such that he would neither be percipient of earth with regard to earth, nor of water with regard to water, nor of fire… wind… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception… this world… nor of the next world with regard to the next world, and yet he would still be percipient?
“Yes, Ananda, he could… “But how, lord, could a monk have an attainment of concentration such that he would neither be percipient of earth with regard to earth… nor of the next world with regard to the next world, and yet he would still be percipient?
“There is the case, Ananda, where the monk would be percipient in this way: 'This is peace, this is exquisite — the resolution of all fabrications; the relinquishment of all acquisitions; the ending of craving; dispassion; cessation; Unbinding.' It's in this way that a monk could have an attainment of concentration such that he would neither be percipient of earth with regard to earth, nor of water with regard to water, nor of fire… wind… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception… this world… nor of the next world with regard to the next world, and yet he would still be percipient.”
“Monks, there are these five hindrances.
Which five?
Sensual desire as a hindrance, ill will as a hindrance, sloth & drowsiness as a hindrance, restlessness & anxiety as a hindrance, and uncertainty as a hindrance.
These are the five hindrances.
“To abandon these five hindrances, one should develop the four frames of reference.
Which four?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings in & of themselves… mind in & of itself… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
To abandon the five hindrances, one should develop these four frames of reference.”
“Monks, these five are things that weaken the training.
Which five?
The taking of life, stealing, sexual misconduct, the telling of lies, and distilled & fermented beverages that are a cause for heedlessness.
These five are things that weaken the training.
“To abandon these five things that weaken the training, one should develop the four frames of reference.
Which four?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings in & of themselves… mind in & of itself… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
To abandon the five things that weaken the training, one should develop these four frames of reference.”
“Monks, one who hasn't abandoned nine things is incapable of realizing arahantship.
Which nine?
Passion, aversion, delusion, anger, resentment, arrogance, insolence, envy, & stinginess.
One who hasn't abandoned these nine things is incapable of realizing arahantship.
“One who has abandoned nine things is capable of realizing arahantship.
Which nine?
Passion, aversion, delusion, anger, resentment, arrogance, insolence, envy, & stinginess.
One who has abandoned these nine things is capable of realizing arahantship.”
“'Released through discernment, released through discernment,' it is said.
To what extent is one described by the Blessed One as released through discernment?
“There is the case, my friend, where a monk, withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
And he knows it through discernment.
It is to this extent that one is described by the Blessed One as released through discernment, though with a sequel.
“Furthermore, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana… the third jhana… the fourth jhana… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
And he knows it through discernment.
It is to this extent that one is described by the Blessed One as released through discernment, though with a sequel.
“Furthermore, with the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, he enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
And as he sees with discernment, the mental fermentations go to their total end.
And he knows it through discernment.
It is to this extent that one is described by the Blessed One as released through discernment without a sequel.”
“'Released both ways, released both ways,' it is said.
To what extent is one described by the Blessed One as released both ways?
“There is the case, my friend, where a monk, withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
He remains touching with his body in whatever way there is an opening there, and he knows it through discernment.
It is to this extent that one is described by the Blessed One as released both ways, though with a sequel.
“Furthermore, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana… the third jhana… the fourth jhana… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
He remains touching with his body in whatever way there is an opening there, and he knows it through discernment.
It is to this extent that one is described by the Blessed One as released both ways, though with a sequel.
“Furthermore, with the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, he enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
And as he sees with discernment, the mental fermentations go to their total end.
He remains touching with his body in whatever way there is an opening there, and he knows it through discernment.
It is to this extent that one is described by the Blessed One as released both ways without a sequel.”
“'Bodily witness, bodily witness,' it is said.
To what extent is one described by the Blessed One as a bodily witness?
“There is the case, my friend, where a monk, withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
He remains touching with his body in whatever way there is an opening there.
It is to this extent that one is described by the Blessed One as a bodily witness, though with a sequel.
“Furthermore, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana… the third jhana… the fourth jhana… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
He remains touching with his body in whatever way there is an opening there.
It is to this extent that one is described by the Blessed One as a bodily witness, though with a sequel.
“Furthermore, with the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, he enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
And as he sees with discernment, the mental fermentations go to their total end.
He remains touching with his body in whatever way there is an opening there.
It is to this extent that one is described by the Blessed One as a bodily witness without a sequel.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Mallans near a Mallan town named Uruvelakappa.
Then early in the morning the Blessed One, having put on his robes and carrying his bowl and outer robe, went into Uruvelakappa for alms.
Having gone into Uruvelakappa for alms, after his meal, on his return from his alms round, he said to Ven.
Ananda, “Stay right here, Ananda, while I go into the Great Wood for the day's abiding.
“As you say, lord,” Ven.
Ananda responded.
Then the Blessed One went into the Great Wood and sat down at the root of a certain tree for the day's abiding.
Then Tapussa the householder went to Ven.
Ananda and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to Ven.
Ananda: “Venerable Ananda, sir, we are householders who indulge in sensuality, delight in sensuality, enjoy sensuality, rejoice in sensuality.
For us — indulging in sensuality, delighting in sensuality, enjoying sensuality, rejoicing in sensuality — renunciation seems like a sheer drop-off.
Yet I've heard that in this doctrine & discipline the hearts of the very young monks leap up at renunciation, grow confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.
So right here is where this doctrine & discipline is contrary to the great mass of people: i.e., renunciation.
“This calls for a talk, householder.
Let's go see the Blessed One.
Let's approach him and, on arrival, tell him this matter.
However he explains it to us, we will bear it in mind.
“As you say, sir,” Tapussa the householder responded to Ven.
Ananda.
Then Ven.
Ananda, together with Tapussa the householder, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “Tapussa the householder, here, has said to me, 'Venerable Ananda, sir, we are householders who indulge in sensuality, delight in sensuality, enjoy sensuality, rejoice in sensuality.
For us — indulging in sensuality, delighting in sensuality, enjoying sensuality, rejoicing in sensuality — renunciation seems like a sheer drop-off.
Yet I've heard that in this doctrine & discipline the hearts of the very young monks leap up at renunciation, grow confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.
So right here is where this doctrine & discipline is contrary to the great mass of people: i.e., renunciation.' “So it is, Ananda.
So it is.
Even I myself, before my Awakening, when I was still an unawakened Bodhisatta, thought: 'Renunciation is good.
Seclusion is good.' But my heart didn't leap up at renunciation, didn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace.
The thought occurred to me: 'What is the cause, what is the reason, why my heart doesn't leap up at renunciation, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace?' Then the thought occurred to me: 'I haven't seen the drawback of sensual pleasures; I haven't pursued.
I haven't understood the reward of renunciation; I haven't familiarized myself with it.
That's why my heart doesn't leap up at renunciation, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace.'
“Then the thought occurred to me: 'If, having seen the drawback of sensual pleasures, I were to pursue that theme; and if, having understood the reward of renunciation, I were to familiarize myself with it, there's the possibility that my heart would leap up at renunciation, grow confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.'
“So at a later time, having seen the drawback of sensual pleasures, I pursued that theme; having understood the reward of renunciation, I familiarized myself with it.
My heart leaped up at renunciation, grew confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.
Then, quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, I entered & remained in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
“As I remained there, I was beset with attention to perceptions dealing with sensuality.
That was an affliction for me.
Just as pain arises as an affliction for a healthy person, even so the attention to perceptions dealing with sensuality that beset me was an affliction for me.
“The thought occurred to me: 'What if, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, I were to enter & remain in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.' But my heart didn't leap up at being without directed thought, didn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace.
The thought occurred to me: 'What is the cause, what is the reason, why my heart doesn't leap up at being without directed thought, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace?' Then the thought occurred to me: 'I haven't seen the drawback of directed thought; I haven't pursued that theme.
I haven't understood the reward of being without directed thought; I haven't familiarized myself with it.
That's why my heart doesn't leap up at being without directed thought, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace.'
“Then the thought occurred to me: 'If, having seen the drawback of directed thought, I were to pursue that theme; and if, having understood the reward of being without directed thought, I were to familiarize myself with it, there's the possibility that my heart would leap up at being without directed thought, grow confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.'
“So at a later time, having seen the drawback of directed thought, I pursued that theme; having understood the reward of being without directed thought, I familiarized myself with it.
My heart leaped up at being without directed thought, grew confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.
With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, I entered & remained in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
“As I remained there, I was beset with attention to perceptions dealing with directed thought.
That was an affliction for me.
Just as pain arises as an affliction for a healthy person, even so the attention to perceptions dealing with directed thought that beset me was an affliction for me.
“The thought occurred to me: 'What if, with the fading of rapture, I were to remain in equanimity, mindful & alert, to be physically sensitive to pleasure, and to enter & remain in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, “Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding”?' But my heart didn't leap up at being without rapture, didn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace… So at a later time, having seen the drawback of rapture, I pursued that theme; having understood the reward of being without rapture, I familiarized myself with it.
My heart leaped up at being without rapture, grew confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.
With the fading of rapture, I remained in equanimity, mindful & alert, physically sensitive to pleasure, and entered & remained in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.'
“As I remained there, I was beset with attention to perceptions dealing with rapture.
That was an affliction for me.
Just as pain arises as an affliction for a healthy person, even so the attention to perceptions dealing with rapture that beset me was an affliction for me.
“The thought occurred to me: 'What if, with the abandoning of pleasure & stress — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — I were to enter & remain in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain?' But my heart didn't leap up at being without the pleasure of equanimity, didn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace… So at a later time, having seen the drawback of the pleasure of equanimity, I pursued that theme; having understood the reward of neither-pleasure-nor-pain, I familiarized myself with it.
My heart leaped up at neither-pleasure-nor-pain, grew confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.
With the abandoning of pleasure & stress — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — I entered & remained in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
“As I remained there, I was beset with attention to perceptions dealing with equanimity.
That was an affliction for me.
Just as pain arises as an affliction for a healthy person, even so the attention to perceptions dealing with equanimity that beset me was an affliction for me.
“The thought occurred to me: 'What if, with the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, thinking, “Infinite space,” I were to enter & remain in the dimension of the infinitude of space?' But my heart didn't leap up at the dimension of the infinitude of space, didn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace… So at a later time, having seen the drawback of forms, I pursued that theme; having understood the reward of the dimension of the infinitude of space, I familiarized myself with it.
My heart leaped up at the dimension of the infinitude of space, grew confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.
With the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, 'Infinite space,' I entered & remained in the dimension of the infinitude of space.
“As I remained there, I was beset with attention to perceptions dealing with forms.
That was an affliction for me.
Just as pain arises as an affliction for a healthy person, even so the attention to perceptions dealing with forms that beset me was an affliction for me.
“The thought occurred to me: 'What if, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, thinking, “Infinite consciousness,” I were to enter & remain in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness?' But my heart didn't leap up at the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, didn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace… So at a later time, having seen the drawback of the dimension of the infinitude of space, I pursued that theme; having understood the reward of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, I familiarized myself with it.
My heart leaped up at the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, grew confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.
With the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, 'Infinite consciousness,' I entered & remained in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
“As I remained there, I was beset with attention to perceptions dealing with the dimension of the infinitude of space.
That was an affliction for me.
Just as pain arises as an affliction for a healthy person, even so the attention to perceptions dealing with the dimension of the infinitude of space that beset me was an affliction for me.
“The thought occurred to me: 'What if, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, thinking, “There is nothing,” I were to enter & remain in the dimension of nothingness?' But my heart didn't leap up at the dimension of nothingness, didn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace… So at a later time, having seen the drawback of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, I pursued that theme; having understood the reward of the dimension of nothingness, I familiarized myself with it.
My heart leaped up at the dimension of nothingness, grew confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.
With the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, 'There is nothing,' I entered & remained in the dimension of nothingness.
“As I remained there, I was beset with attention to perceptions dealing with the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
That was an affliction for me.
Just as pain arises as an affliction for a healthy person, even so the attention to perceptions dealing with the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness that beset me was an affliction for me.
“The thought occurred to me: 'What if I, with the complete transcending of the dimension of nothingness, were to enter & remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception?' But my heart didn't leap up at the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, didn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace… So at a later time, having seen the drawback of the dimension of nothingness, I pursued that theme; having understood the reward of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, I familiarized myself with it.
My heart leaped up at the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, grew confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.
With the complete transcending of the dimension of nothingness, I entered & remained in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
“As I remained there, I was beset with attention to perceptions dealing with the dimension of nothingness.
That was an affliction for me.
Just as pain arises as an affliction for a healthy person, even so the attention to perceptions dealing with the dimension of nothingness that beset me was an affliction for me.
“The thought occurred to me: 'What if I, with the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, were to enter & remain in the cessation of perception & feeling?' But my heart didn't leap up at the cessation of perception & feeling, didn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace.
The thought occurred to me: 'What is the cause, what is the reason, why my heart doesn't leap up at the cessation of perception & feeling, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace?' Then the thought occurred to me: 'I haven't seen the drawback of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception; I haven't pursued that theme.
I haven't understood the reward of the cessation of perception & feeling; I haven't familiarized myself with it.
That's why my heart doesn't leap up at the cessation of perception & feeling, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or firm, seeing it as peace.'
“Then the thought occurred to me: 'If, having seen the drawback of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, I were to pursue that theme; and if, having understood the reward of the cessation of perception & feeling, I were to familiarize myself with it, there's the possibility that my heart would leap up at the cessation of perception & feeling, grow confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.'
“So at a later time, having seen the drawback of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, I pursued that theme; having understood the reward of the cessation of perception & feeling, I familiarized myself with it.
My heart leaped up at the cessation of perception & feeling, grew confident, steadfast, & firm, seeing it as peace.
With the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, I entered & remained in the cessation of perception & feeling.
And as I saw with discernment, the mental fermentations went to their total end.
“Ananda, as long as I had not attained & emerged from these nine step-by-step dwelling-attainments in forward & backward order in this way, I did not claim to have directly awakened to the right self-awakening unexcelled in the cosmos with its devas, Maras, & Brahmas, with its contemplatives & brahmans, its royalty & common people.
But as soon as I had attained & emerged from these nine step-by-step dwelling-attainments in forward & backward order in this way, then I did claim to have directly awakened to the right self-awakening unexcelled in the cosmos with its devas, Maras, & Brahmas, with its contemplatives & brahmans, its royalty & common people.
Knowledge & vision arose in me: 'My release is unshakable.
This is the last birth.
There is now no further becoming.'”
“When elephants & cow-elephants & calf-elephants & baby elephants go ahead of a wilderness tusker foraging for food and cut off the tips of the grasses, the wilderness tusker feels irritated, upset, & disgusted.
When elephants & cow-elephants & calf-elephants & baby elephants chew up the wilderness tusker's stash of broken-off branches, he feels irritated, upset, & disgusted.
When elephants & cow-elephants & calf-elephants & baby elephants go ahead of the wilderness tusker on his way down to his bath and stir up the mud in the water with their trunks, he feels irritated, upset, & disgusted.
When cow-elephants go along as the wilderness tusker is bathing and bang up against his body, he feels irritated, upset, & disgusted.
“Then the thought occurs to the wilderness tusker, 'I now live hemmed in by elephants & cow-elephants & calf-elephants & baby elephants.
I feed off grass with cut-off tips.
They chew up my stash of broken-off branches.
I drink muddied water.
Even when I bathe, cow-elephants go along and bang up against my body.
What if I were to live alone, apart from the crowd?'
“So at a later time he lives alone, apart from the crowd.
He feeds off grass with uncut tips.
They don't chew up his stash of broken-off branches.
He drinks unmuddied water.
When he bathes, cow-elephants don't go along and bang up against his body.
The thought occurs to him, 'Before, I lived hemmed in by elephants & cow-elephants & calf-elephants & baby elephants.
I fed off grass with cut-off tips.
They chewed up my stash of broken-off branches.
I drank muddied water.
Even when I bathed, cow-elephants would go along and bang up against my body.
But now I live alone, apart from the crowd.
I feed off grass with uncut tips.
They don't chew up my stash of broken-off branches.
I drink unmuddied water.
When I bathe, cow-elephants don't go along and bang up against my body.' Breaking off a branch with his trunk and scratching his body with it, gratified, he allays his itch.
In the same way, when a monk lives hemmed in with monks, nuns, male & female lay followers, kings, royal ministers, sectarians, & their disciples, the thought occurs to him, 'I now live hemmed in by monks, nuns, male & female lay followers, kings, royal ministers, sectarians, & their disciples.
What if I were to live alone, apart from the crowd?'
“So he seeks out a secluded dwelling: a wilderness, the shade of a tree, a mountain, a glen, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a forest grove, the open air, a heap of straw.
After his meal, returning from his alms round, he sits down, crosses his legs, holds his body erect, and brings mindfulness to the fore.
“Abandoning covetousness with regard to the world, he dwells with an awareness devoid of covetousness.
He cleanses his mind of covetousness.
Abandoning ill will and anger, he dwells with an awareness devoid of ill will, sympathetic with the welfare of all living beings.
He cleanses his mind of ill will and anger.
Abandoning sloth and drowsiness, he dwells with an awareness devoid of sloth and drowsiness, mindful, alert, percipient of light.
He cleanses his mind of sloth and drowsiness.
Abandoning restlessness and anxiety, he dwells undisturbed, his mind inwardly stilled.
He cleanses his mind of restlessness and anxiety.
Abandoning uncertainty, he dwells having crossed over uncertainty, with no perplexity with regard to skillful mental qualities.
He cleanses his mind of uncertainty.
“Having abandoned these five hindrances — corruptions of awareness that weaken discernment — then quite withdrawn from sensual pleasures, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, he enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
Gratified, he allays his itch.
“With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
Gratified, he allays his itch.
“With the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' Gratified, he allays his itch.
“With the abandoning of pleasure & stress — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
Gratified, he allays his itch.
“With the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, 'Infinite space,' he enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of space.
Gratified, he allays his itch.
“With the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, 'Infinite consciousness,' he enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
Gratified, he allays his itch.
“With the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, 'There is nothing,' he enters & remains in the dimension of nothingness.
Gratified, he allays his itch.
“With the complete transcending of the dimension of nothingness, he enters & remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
Gratified, he allays his itch.
“With the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, he enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
And, having seen with discernment, his mental fermentations are completely ended.
Gratified, he allays his itch.”
“Once, monks, a battle between the devas & asuras was in full swing.
And in that battle, the asuras won and the devas lost.
Having lost, the devas simply fled while the asuras, heading north, attacked them.
Then the thought occurred to the devas, 'The asuras are still attacking.
Why don't we do battle a second time?'
“So the devas did battle with the asuras a second time.
And a second time, the asuras won and the devas lost.
Having lost, the devas simply fled while the asuras, heading north, attacked them.
Then the thought occurred to the devas, 'The asuras are still attacking.
Why don't we do battle a third time?'
“So the devas did battle with the asuras a third time.
And a third time, the asuras won and the devas lost.
Having lost, the devas, afraid, entered the deva capital.
Having gone to their capital, the devas thought, 'Having come to this shelter for the fearful, we will now keep here to ourselves, having nothing to do with the asuras.' And the asuras also thought, 'Having gone to this shelter for the fearful, the devas will now keep here to themselves, having nothing to do with us.'
“Once, monks, a battle between the devas & asuras was in full swing.
And in that battle, the devas won and the asuras lost.
Having lost, the asuras simply fled while the devas, heading south, attacked them.
Then the thought occurred to the asura, 'The devas are still attacking.
Why don't we do battle a second time?'
“So the asuras did battle with the devas a second time.
And a second time, the devas won and the asuras lost.
Having lost, the asuras simply fled while the devas, heading south, attacked them.
Then the thought occurred to the asuras, 'The devas are still attacking.
Why don't we do battle a third time?'
“So the asuras did battle with the devas a third time.
And a third time, the devas won and the asuras lost.
Having lost, the asuras, afraid, entered the asura capital.
Having gone to their capital, the asuras thought, 'Having come to this shelter for the fearful, we will now keep here to ourselves, having nothing to do with the devas.' And the devas also thought, 'Having gone to this shelter for the fearful, the asuras will now keep here to themselves, having nothing to do with us.'
“In the same way, monks, on whatever occasion a monk — secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities — enters the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation, on that occasion the thought occurs to him, 'Having come to this shelter for the fearful, I will now keep here to myself, having nothing to do with Māra.' And the thought occurs to Māra, the Evil One, 'Having gone to this shelter for the fearful, the monk will now keep here to himself, having nothing to do with me.'
“On whatever occasion a monk, with the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, 'Infinite space,' enters the dimension of the infinitude of space: He is said to be a monk who has put Māra in the dark.
Having bound Māra's eyes and leaving no opening, he has become invisible to the Evil One.
“On whatever occasion, with the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, he enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling; and, having seen with discernment, his effluents are completely ended: He is said to be a monk who has put Māra in the dark.
Having bound Māra's eyes and leaving no opening, he has become invisible to the Evil One, having crossed over attachment in the cosmos.”
Then two brahman cosmologists went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, they sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to the Blessed One, “Master Gotama, Purana Kassapa — all-knowing, all-seeing — claims exhaustive knowledge & vision: 'Whether I am standing or walking, awake or asleep, continual, unflagging knowledge & vision is established within me.' He says, 'I dwell with infinite knowledge, knowing & seeing the finite cosmos.' Yet Nigantha Nataputta — all-knowing, all-seeing — also claims exhaustive knowledge & vision: 'Whether I am standing or walking, awake or asleep, continual, unflagging knowledge & vision is established within me.' He says, 'I dwell with infinite knowledge, knowing & seeing the infinite cosmos.' Of these two speakers of knowledge, these two who contradict each other, which is telling the truth, and which is lying?
“Enough, brahmans.
Put this question aside.
I will teach you the Dhamma.
Listen and pay close attention.
I will speak.
“Yes, sir,” the brahmans responded to the Blessed One, and the Blessed One said, “Suppose that there were four men standing at the four directions, endowed with supreme speed & stride.
Like that of a strong archer — well-trained, a practiced hand, a practiced sharp-shooter — shooting a light arrow across the shadow of a palm tree: Such would be the speed with which they were endowed.
As far as the east sea is from the west: Such would be the stride with which they were endowed.
Then the man standing at the eastern direction would say, 'I, by walking, will reach the end of the cosmos.' He — with a one-hundred year life, a one-hundred year span — would spend one hundred years traveling — apart from the time spent on eating, drinking, chewing & tasting, urinating & defecating, and sleeping to fight off weariness — but without reaching the end of the cosmos he would die along the way.
Why is that?
I tell you, it isn't through that sort of traveling that the end of the cosmos is known, seen, or reached.
But at the same time, I tell you that there is no making an end of suffering & stress without reaching the end of the cosmos.
“These five strings of sensuality are, in the discipline of the noble ones, called the cosmos.
Which five?
Forms cognizable via the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing; sounds cognizable via the ear… aromas cognizable via the nose… flavors cognizable via the tongue… tactile sensations cognizable via the body — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
These are the five strings of sensuality that, in the discipline of the noble ones, are called the cosmos.
“There is the case where a monk — quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities — enters & remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
This is called a monk who, coming to the end of the cosmos, remains at the end of the cosmos.
Others say of him, 'He is encompassed in the cosmos; he has not escaped from the cosmos.' And I too say of him, 'He is encompassed in the cosmos; he has not escaped from the cosmos.'
“Furthermore, with the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, he enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
And, having seen with discernment, his fermentations are completely ended.
This is called a monk who, coming to the end of the cosmos, remains at the end of the cosmos, having crossed over attachment in the cosmos.
See also: AN.
“Suppose there was a mountain cow — foolish, inexperienced, unfamiliar with her pasture, unskilled in roaming on rugged mountains — and she were to think, 'What if I were to go in a direction I have never gone before, to eat grass I have never eaten before, to drink water I have never drunk before!' She would lift her hind hoof without having placed her front hoof firmly and would not get to go in a direction she had never gone before, to eat grass she had never eaten before, or to drink water she had never drunk before.
And as for the place where she was standing when the thought occurred to her, 'What if I were to go where I have never been before… to drink water I have never drunk before,' she would not return there safely.
Why is that?
Because she is a foolish, inexperienced mountain cow, unfamiliar with her pasture, unskilled in roaming on rugged mountains.
“In the same way, there are cases where a monk — foolish, inexperienced, unfamiliar with his pasture, unskilled in being quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, and entering & remaining in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation — doesn't stick with that theme, doesn't develop it, pursue it, or establish himself firmly in it.
The thought occurs to him, 'What if I, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, were to enter & remain in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.' He is not able… to enter & remain in the second jhana… The thought occurs to him, 'What if I… were to enter & remain in the first jhana… He is not able… to enter & remain in the first jhana.
This is called a monk who has slipped & fallen from both sides, like the mountain cow, foolish, inexperienced, unfamiliar with her pasture, unskilled in roaming on rugged mountains.
“But suppose there was a mountain cow — wise, experienced, familiar with her pasture, skilled in roaming on rugged mountains — and she were to think, 'What if I were to go in a direction I have never gone before, to eat grass I have never eaten before, to drink water I have never drunk before!' She would lift her hind hoof only after having placed her front hoof firmly and would get to go in a direction she had never gone before… to drink water she had never drunk before.
And as for the place where she was standing when the thought occurred to her, 'What if I were to go in a direction I have never gone before… to drink water I have never drunk before,' she would return there safely.
Why is that?
Because she is a wise, experienced mountain cow, familiar with her pasture, skilled in roaming on rugged mountains.
“In the same way, there are some cases where a monk — wise, experienced, familiar with his pasture, skilled in being quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, and entering & remaining in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation — sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
“The thought occurs to him, 'What if, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, I were to enter & remain in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.' Without jumping at the second jhana, he — with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations — enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
“The thought occurs to him, 'What if, with the fading of rapture, I… were to enter & remain in the third jhana…' Without jumping at the third jhana, with the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
“The thought occurs to him, 'What if I… were to enter & remain in the fourth jhana…' Without jumping at the fourth jhana, with the abandoning of pleasure & stress — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
“The thought occurs to him, 'What if I… were to enter & remain in the dimension of the infinitude of space.' Without jumping at the dimension of the infinitude of space, he, with the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, 'Infinite space,' enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of space.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
“The thought occurs to him, 'What if I… were to enter & remain in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.' Without jumping at the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, he, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, 'Infinite consciousness,' enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
“The thought occurs to him, 'What if I… were to enter & remain in the dimension of nothingness.' Without jumping at the dimension of nothingness, he, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, 'There is nothing,' enters & remains in the dimension of nothingness.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues, it & establishes himself firmly in it.
“The thought occurs to him, 'What if I… were to enter & remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.' Without jumping at the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, he, with the complete transcending of the dimension of nothingness, enters & remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
He sticks with that theme, develops it, pursues it, & establishes himself firmly in it.
“The thought occurs to him, 'What if I, with the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, were to enter & remain in the cessation of perception & feeling.' Without jumping at the cessation of perception & feeling, he, with the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
“When a monk enters & emerges from that very attainment, his mind is pliant & malleable.
With his pliant, malleable mind, limitless concentration is well developed.
With his concentration well developed & limitless, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know & realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.
“If he wants, he wields manifold supranormal powers.
Having been one he becomes many; having been many he becomes one.
He appears.
He vanishes.
He goes unimpeded through walls, ramparts, and mountains as if through space.
He dives in and out of the earth as if it were water.
He walks on water without sinking as if it were dry land.
Sitting crosslegged he flies through the air like a winged bird.
With his hand he touches and strokes even the sun and moon, so mighty and powerful.
He exercises influence with his body even as far as the Brahma worlds.
He can witness this for himself whenever there is an opening.
“If he wants, he hears — by means of the divine ear-element, purified and surpassing the human — both kinds of sounds: divine and human, whether near or far.
He can witness this for himself whenever there is an opening.
“If he wants, he knows the awareness of other beings, other individuals, having encompassed it with his own awareness.
He discerns a mind with passion as a mind with passion, and a mind without passion as a mind without passion.
He discerns a mind with aversion as a mind with aversion, and a mind without aversion as a mind without aversion.
He discerns a mind with delusion as a mind with delusion, and a mind without delusion as a mind without delusion.
He discerns a restricted mind as a restricted mind, and a scattered mind as a scattered mind.
He discerns an enlarged mind as an enlarged mind, and an unenlarged mind as an unenlarged mind.
He discerns an excelled mind as an excelled mind, and an unexcelled mind as an unexcelled mind.
He discerns a concentrated mind as a concentrated mind, and an unconcentrated mind as an unconcentrated mind.
He discerns a released mind as a released mind, and an unreleased mind as an unreleased mind.
He can witness this for himself whenever there is an opening.
“If he wants, he recollects his manifold past lives, i.e., one birth, two births, three births, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, one hundred, one thousand, one hundred thousand, many aeons of cosmic contraction, many aeons of cosmic expansion, many aeons of cosmic contraction and expansion,, 'There I had such a name, belonged to such a clan, had such an appearance.
Such was my food, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such the end of my life.
Passing away from that state, I re-arose there.
There too I had such a name, belonged to such a clan, had such an appearance.
Such was my food, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such the end of my life.
Passing away from that state, I re-arose here.' Thus he remembers his manifold past lives in their modes and details.
He can witness this for himself whenever there is an opening.
“If he wants, he sees — by means of the divine eye, purified and surpassing the human — beings passing away and re-appearing, and he discerns how they are inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate in accordance with their kamma: 'These beings — who were endowed with bad conduct of body, speech, and mind, who reviled the noble ones, held wrong views and undertook actions under the influence of wrong views — with the break-up of the body, after death, have re-appeared in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell.
But these beings — who were endowed with good conduct of body, speech, and mind, who did not revile the noble ones, who held right views and undertook actions under the influence of right views — with the break-up of the body, after death, have re-appeared in the good destinations, in the heavenly world.' Thus — by means of the divine eye, purified and surpassing the human — he sees beings passing away and re-appearing, and he discerns how they are inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate in accordance with their kamma.
He can witness this for himself whenever there is an opening.
“If he wants, then through the ending of the mental fermentations, he remains in the fermentation-free awareness-release and discernment-release, having known and made them manifest for himself right in the here and now.
He can witness this for himself whenever there is an opening.”
I have heard that on one occasion Ven.
Sariputta was staying near Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Feeding Sanctuary.
There he said to the monks, “This Unbinding is pleasant, friends.
This Unbinding is pleasant.
When this was said, Ven.
Udayin said to Ven.
Sariputta, “But what is the pleasure here, my friend, where there is nothing felt?
“Just that is the pleasure here, my friend: where there is nothing felt.
There are these five strings of sensuality.
Which five?
Forms cognizable via the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing; sounds cognizable via the ear… smells cognizable via the nose… tastes cognizable via the tongue… tactile sensations cognizable via the body — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
Whatever pleasure or joy arises in dependence on these five strings of sensuality, that is sensual pleasure.
“Now there is the case where a monk — quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities — enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with sensuality, that is an affliction for him.
Just as pain arises as an affliction in a healthy person for his affliction, even so the attention to perceptions dealing with sensuality that beset the monk is an affliction for him.
Now, the Blessed One has said that whatever is an affliction is stress.
So by this line of reasoning it may be known how Unbinding is pleasant.
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with directed thought, that is an affliction for him…
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk, with the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with rapture, that is an affliction for him…
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk, with the abandoning of pleasure & stress — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with equanimity, that is an affliction for him…
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk, with the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, 'Infinite space,' enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of space.
If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with form, that is an affliction for him…
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, 'Infinite consciousness,' enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with the dimension of the infinitude of space, that is an affliction for him…
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, 'There is nothing,' enters & remains in the dimension of nothingness.
If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, that is an affliction for him…
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk, with the complete transcending of the dimension of nothingness, enters & remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
If, as he remains there, he is beset with attention to perceptions dealing with the dimension of nothingness, that is an affliction for him.
Now, the Blessed One has said that whatever is an affliction is stress.
So by this line of reasoning it may be known how pleasant Unbinding is.
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk, with the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
And, having seen with discernment, his mental fermentations are completely ended.
So by this line of reasoning it may be known how Unbinding is pleasant.
See also: AN.
On one occasion Ven.
Ananda was staying in Kosambi at Ghosita's Park.
Then Ven.
Udayin went to him and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Ananda, “This has been said by Pañcalacanda the deva's son:
“Now which, my friend, is the confining place?
And which opening in the confining place is the Blessed One said to have attained?
“The five strings of sensuality, my friend, are described by the Blessed One as a confining place.
Which five?
Forms cognizable via the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing; sounds cognizable via the ear… smells cognizable via the nose… tastes cognizable via the tongue… tactile sensations cognizable via the body — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
These five strings of sensuality are described by the Blessed One as a confining place.
“Now there is the case where a monk — quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities — enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
Even this much is described by the Blessed One as the attaining of an opening in a confining place, though followed by a sequel.
For even there there's a confining place.
What is the confining place there?
Just that directed thought & evaluation have not ceased.
This is the confining place there.
“Then there is the case where a monk, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
Even this much is described by the Blessed One as the attaining of an opening in a confining place, though followed by a sequel.
For even there there's a confining place.
What is the confining place there?
Just that rapture has not ceased.
This is the confining place there.
“Then there is the case where a monk, with the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' Even this much is described by the Blessed One as the attaining of an opening in a confining place, though followed by a sequel.
For even there there's a confining place.
What is the confining place there?
Just that the pleasure of equanimity has not ceased.
This is the confining place there.
“Then there is the case where a monk, with the abandoning of pleasure & stress — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
Even this much is described by the Blessed One as the attaining of an opening in a confining place, though followed by a sequel.
For even there there's a confining place.
What is the confining place there?
Just that the perception of form has not ceased.
This is the confining place there.
“Then there is the case where a monk, with the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, 'Infinite space,' enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of space.
Even this much is described by the Blessed One as the attaining of an opening in a confining place, though followed by a sequel.
For even there there's a confining place.
What is the confining place there?
Just that the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space has not ceased.
This is the confining place there.
“Then there is the case where a monk, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, 'Infinite consciousness,' enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
Even this much is described by the Blessed One as the attaining of an opening in a confining place, though followed by a sequel.
For even there there's a confining place.
What is the confining place there?
Just that the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness has not ceased.
This is the confining place there.
“Then there is the case where a monk, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, 'There is nothing,' enters & remains in the dimension of nothingness.
Even this much is described by the Blessed One as the attaining of an opening in a confining place, though followed by a sequel.
For even there there's a confining place.
What is the confining place there?
Just that the perception of the dimension of nothingness has not ceased.
This is the confining place there.
“Then there is the case where a monk, with the complete transcending of the dimension of nothingness, enters & remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
Even this much is described by the Blessed One as the attaining of an opening in a confining place, though followed by a sequel.
For even there there's a confining place.
What is the confining place there?
Just that the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception has not ceased.
This is the confining place there.
“Then there is the case where a monk, with the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
And, having seen with discernment, his mental fermentations are completely ended.
Even this much is described by the Blessed One as the attaining of an opening in a confining place, without a sequel.
“There are these five strings of sensuality.
Which five?
Forms cognizable via the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing; sounds cognizable via the ear… aromas cognizable via the nose… flavors cognizable via the tongue… tactile sensations cognizable via the body — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
But these are not sensuality.
They are called strings of sensuality in the discipline of the noble ones.
“Monks, I will teach you the nine step-by-step dwelling-attainments.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said, “And what, monks, are the nine step-by-step dwelling-attainments?
“Wherever sensual resolves cease and those who repeatedly are stopping sensual resolves dwell: Surely, I tell you, by that factor those venerable ones are free from hunger, unbound, having crossed over & gone to the far shore.
“Now if someone should say, 'Where do sensual resolves cease?
And where do those who repeatedly are stopping sensual resolves dwell?
I don't know that; I don't see that,' he should be told, 'There is the case, friend, where a monk, quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful mental qualities, enters & remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
That is where sensual resolves cease, and where those who repeatedly are stopping sensual resolves dwell.' Surely, a person without guile or deceit, 'Very good,' would delight in & approve of that statement.
Delighting in & approving of that statement, paying homage & raising his hands palm-to-palm over his heart, he would honor it.
“Wherever directed thoughts & evaluations cease and those who repeatedly are stopping directed thoughts & evaluations dwell: Surely, I tell you, by that factor those venerable ones are free from hunger, unbound, having crossed over & gone to the far shore.
“Now if someone should say, 'Where do directed thoughts & evaluations cease?
And where do those who repeatedly are stopping directed thoughts & evaluations dwell?
I don't know that; I don't see that,' he should be told, 'There is the case, friend, where a monk, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, enters & remains in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
That is where directed thoughts & evaluations cease, and where those who repeatedly are stopping directed thoughts & evaluations dwell.' Surely, a person without guile or deceit, 'Very good,' would delight in & approve of that statement.
Delighting in & approving of that statement, paying homage & raising his hands palm-to-palm over his heart, he would honor it.
“Wherever rapture ceases and those who repeatedly are stopping rapture dwell: Surely, I tell you, by that factor those venerable ones are free from hunger, unbound, having crossed over & gone to the far shore.
“Now if someone should say, 'Where does rapture cease?
And where do those who repeatedly are stopping rapture dwell?
I don't know that; I don't see that,' he should be told, 'There is the case, friend, where a monk, with the fading of rapture, remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhāna, of which the noble ones declare, “Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.” That is where rapture ceases, and where those who repeatedly are stopping rapture dwell.' Surely, a person without guile or deceit, 'Very good,' would delight in & approve of that statement.
Delighting in & approving of that statement, paying homage & raising his hands palm-to-palm over his heart, he would honor it.
“Wherever the pleasure of equanimity ceases and those who repeatedly are stopping the pleasure of equanimity dwell: Surely, I tell you, by that factor those venerable ones are free from hunger, unbound, having crossed over & gone to the far shore.
“Now if someone should say, 'Where does the pleasure of equanimity cease?
And where do those who repeatedly are stopping the pleasure of equanimity dwell?
I don't know that; I don't see that,' he should be told, 'There is the case, friend, where a monk, with the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of joy & distress — enters & remains in the fourth jhāna: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
That is where the pleasure of equanimity ceases, and where those who repeatedly are stopping the pleasure of equanimity dwell.' Surely, a person without guile or deceit, 'Very good,' would delight in & approve of that statement.
Delighting in & approving of that statement, paying homage & raising his hands palm-to-palm over his heart, he would honor it.
“Wherever the perception of form ceases and those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of form dwell: Surely, I tell you, by that factor those venerable ones are free from hunger, unbound, having crossed over & gone to the far shore.
“Now if someone should say, 'Where does the perception of form cease?
And where do those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of form dwell?
I don't know that; I don't see that,' he should be told, 'There is the case, friend, where a monk, with the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, “Infinite space,” enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of space.
That is where the perception of form ceases, and where those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of form dwell.' Surely, a person without guile or deceit, 'Very good,' would delight in & approve of that statement.
Delighting in & approving of that statement, paying homage & raising his hands palm-to-palm over his heart, he would honor it.
“Wherever the perception of the infinitude of space ceases and those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of the infinitude of space dwell: Surely, I tell you, by that factor those venerable ones are free from hunger, unbound, having crossed over & gone to the far shore.
“Now if someone should say, 'Where does the perception of the infinitude of space cease?
And where do those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of the infinitude of space dwell?
I don't know that; I don't see that,' he should be told, 'There is the case, friend, where a monk, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, “Infinite consciousness,” enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
That is where the perception of the infinitude of space ceases, and where those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of the infinitude of space dwell.' Surely, a person without guile or deceit, 'Very good,' would delight in & approve of that statement.
Delighting in & approving of that statement, paying homage & raising his hands palm-to-palm over his heart, he would honor it.
“Wherever the perception of the infinitude of consciousness ceases and those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of the infinitude of consciousness dwell: Surely, I tell you, by that factor those venerable ones are free from hunger, unbound, having crossed over & gone to the far shore.
“Now if someone should say, 'Where does the perception of the infinitude of consciousness cease?
And where do those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of the infinitude of consciousness dwell?
I don't know that; I don't see that,' he should be told, 'There is the case, friend, where a monk, with the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, “There is nothing,” enters & remains in the dimension of nothingness.
That is where the perception of the infinitude of consciousness ceases, and where those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of the infinitude of consciousness dwell.' Surely, a person without guile or deceit, 'Very good,' would delight in & approve of that statement.
Delighting in & approving of that statement, paying homage & raising his hands palm-to-palm over his heart, he would honor it.
“Wherever the perception of nothingness ceases and those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of nothingness dwell: Surely, I tell you, by that factor those venerable ones are free from hunger, unbound, having crossed over & gone to the far shore.
“Now if someone should say, 'Where does the perception of nothingness cease?
And where do those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of nothingness dwell?
I don't know that; I don't see that,' he should be told, 'There is the case, friend, where a monk, with the complete transcending of the dimension of nothingness, enters & remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
That is where the perception of nothingness ceases, and where those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of nothingness dwell.' Surely, a person without guile or deceit, 'Very good,' would delight in & approve of that statement.
Delighting in & approving of that statement, paying homage & raising his hands palm-to-palm over his heart, he would honor it.
“Wherever the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception ceases and those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception dwell: Surely, I tell you, by that factor those venerable ones are free from hunger, unbound, having crossed over & gone to the far shore.
“Now if someone should say, 'Where does the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception cease?
And where do those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception dwell?
I don't know that; I don't see that,' he should be told, 'There is the case, friend, where a monk, with the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
That is where the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception ceases, and where those who repeatedly are stopping the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception dwell.' Surely, a person without guile or deceit, 'Very good,' would delight in & approve of that statement.
Delighting in & approving of that statement, paying homage & raising his hands palm-to-palm over his heart, he would honor it.
“These, monks, are the nine step-by-step dwelling-attainments.
See also: AN.
This translation follows the Thai edition of the Pali Canon, which is identical with the Burmese edition here.
The PTS edition, following the Sri Lankan edition, includes the standard formulae for the nine dwellings, as follows:
“Monks, there are these nine step-by-step dwellings.
Which nine?
“There is the case where a monk, quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful mental qualities, enters & remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
“With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
“With the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhāna, of which the noble ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.'
“With the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of joy & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhāna: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
“With the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, 'Infinite space,' he enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of space.
“With the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, 'Infinite consciousness,' he enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
“With the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, 'There is nothing,' he enters & remains in the dimension of nothingness.
“With the complete transcending of the dimension of nothingness, he enters & remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
“With the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, he enters & remains in the cessation of perception & feeling.
“These are the nine step-by-step dwellings.
This longer version has the advantage of being more informative than the shorter version, but the shorter version fits better into the pattern of questions that frame this discourse and the following one, AN..
The question there is, “And what, monks, are the nine step-by-step dwelling-attainments?” whereas the question here can be paraphrased as, “Which are the nine step-by-step dwellings?” In line with the fact that AN.
focuses on the attainment of these dwellings — including the formulae for how they are attained — it makes sense that this discourse would simply list the dwellings without describing how they are attained.
“Monks, there are these nine step-by-step stoppings.
Which nine?
“When one has attained the first jhāna, the perception of sensuality has been stopped.
When one has attained the second jhāna, directed thoughts & evaluations have been stopped.
When one has attained the third jhāna, rapture has been stopped.
When one has attained the fourth jhāna, in-and-out breaths have been stopped.
When one has attained the dimension of the infinitude of space, the perception of forms has been stopped.
When one has attained the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space has been stopped.
When one has attained the dimension of nothingness, the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness has been stopped.
When one has attained the dimension of neither-perception nor non-perception, the perception of the dimension of nothingness has been stopped.
When one has attained the cessation of perception & feeling, perceptions & feelings have been stopped.
“These are the nine step-by-step stoppings.
See also: SN.
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
Then Anāthapiṇḍika the householder went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, bowed down to him and sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “Householder, are gifts still given in your family?
“Gifts are still given in my family, lord, but they are coarse: broken rice cooked with bran, accompanied by pickle brine.
“Householder, regardless of whether a gift is coarse or refined, if it is given inattentively, disrespectfully, not with one's own hand, as if throwing it away, with the view that nothing will come of it: Wherever the result of that gift comes to fruition, one's mind will not incline to the enjoyment of splendid food, will not incline to the enjoyment of splendid clothing, will not incline to the enjoyment of splendid vehicles, will not incline to the enjoyment of the splendid five strings of sensuality.
And one's sons & daughters, slaves, servants, & workers will not listen to one, will not lend ear, will not make their minds attend for the sake of knowledge.
Why is that?
Because that is the result of inattentive actions.
“Householder, regardless of whether a gift is coarse or refined, if it is given attentively, respectfully, with one's own hand, not as if throwing it away, with the view that something will come of it: Wherever the result of that gift comes to fruition, one's mind will incline to the enjoyment of splendid food, will incline to the enjoyment of splendid clothing, will incline to the enjoyment of splendid vehicles, will incline to the enjoyment of the splendid five strings of sensuality.
And one's sons & daughters, slaves, servants, & workers will listen to one, will lend ear, will make their minds attend for the sake of knowledge.
Why is that?
Because that is the result of attentive actions.
“Once, householder, there was a brahman named Velāma.
And this was the nature of the gift, the great gift, he gave: He gave, gold trays filled with silver,, silver trays filled with gold,, copper trays filled with gems.
He gave, elephants with gold ornaments, gold banners, covered with nets of gold thread.
He gave, chariots spread with lion skins, tiger skins, leopard skins, saffron-colored blankets, with gold ornaments, gold banners, covered with nets of gold thread.
He gave, milk cows with tethers of fine jute and copper milk pails.
He gave, maidens adorned with jeweled earrings.
He gave, couches spread with long-fleeced coverlets, white wool coverlets, embroidered coverlets, rugs of kadali-deer hide, each with a canopy above & red cushions on either side.
He gave, lengths of cloth — of finest linen, of finest cotton, of finest silk.
To say nothing of the food & drink, staple & non-staple food, lotions & beddings: They flowed, as it were, like rivers.
“Now, householder, if the thought should occur to you, 'Perhaps it was someone else who at that time was Velāma the brahman, who gave that gift, that great gift,' that's not how it should be seen.
I was Velāma the brahman at that time.
I gave that gift, that great gift.
But in that gift there was no one worthy of offerings; no one purified that gift.
“If one were to feed one person consummate in view, that would be more fruitful than the gift, the great gift, that Velāma the brahman gave.
“If one were to feed one once-returner, that would be more fruitful than the gift, the great gift, that Velāma the brahman gave, and if one were to feed one person consummate in view, and to feed people consummate in view.
“If one were to feed one non-returner, that would be more fruitful than… if one were to feed once-returners.
“If one were to feed one arahant, that would be more fruitful than… if one were to feed non-returners.
“If one were to feed one Private Buddha, that would be more fruitful than… if one were to feed arahants.
“If one were to feed one Tathagata — a worthy one, rightly self-awakened — that would be more fruitful than… if one were to feed Private Buddhas.
“If one were to feed a community of monks headed by the Buddha, that would be more fruitful than… if one were to feed a Tathagata — a worthy one, rightly self-awakened.
“If one were to have a dwelling built and dedicated to the Community of the four directions, that would be more fruitful than… if one were to feed a community of monks headed by the Buddha.
“If one with a confident mind were to go to the Buddha, Dhamma, & Sangha for refuge, that would be more fruitful than… if one were to have a dwelling built and dedicated to the Community of the four directions.
“If one with a confident mind were to undertake the training rules — refraining from taking life, refraining from taking what is not given, refraining from illicit sex, refraining from lying, refraining from distilled & fermented drinks that cause heedlessness — that would be more fruitful than… if one with a confident mind were to go to the Buddha, Dhamma, & Sangha for refuge.
“If one were to develop even just one whiff of a heart of good will, that would be more fruitful than… if one with a confident mind were to undertake the training rules…
“If one were to develop even for just a finger-snap the perception of inconstancy, that would be more fruitful than the gift, the great gift, that Velāma the brahman gave, and if one were to feed one person… people consummate in view, and were to feed one once-returner… once-returners, and were to feed one non-returner… non-returners, and were to feed one arahant… arahants, and were to feed one Private Buddha… Private Buddhas, and were to feed a Tathagata — a worthy one, rightly self-awakened — and were to feed a community of monks headed by the Buddha, and were to have a dwelling built and dedicated to the Community of the four directions, and with a confident mind were to go to the Buddha, Dhamma, & Sangha for refuge, and with a confident mind were to undertake the training rules — refraining from taking life, refraining from taking what is not given, refraining from illicit sex, refraining from lying, refraining from distilled & fermented drinks that cause heedlessness — and were to develop even just one whiff of a heart of good will.”
“Monks, these nine perceptions, when developed & pursued, are of great fruit, of great benefit.
They gain a footing in the deathless and have the deathless as their final end.
Which nine?
“The perception of unattractiveness, the perception of death, the perception of the foulness in food, the perception of no-delight in any world, the perception of inconstancy, the perception of stress in inconstancy, the perception of not-self in stress, the perception of abandoning, the perception of dispassion.
“These nine perceptions, when developed & pursued, are of great fruit, of great benefit.
They gain a footing in the deathless and have the deathless as their final end.”
“Monks, it's just as if there were a boil that had been building for many years with nine openings, nine un-lanced heads.
Whatever would ooze out from it would be an uncleanliness oozing out, a stench oozing out, a disgust oozing out.
Whatever would be discharged from it would be an uncleanliness discharging, a stench discharging, a disgust discharging.
“'A boil,' monks, is another word for this body composed of the four properties, born of mother & father, fed on rice & porridge, subject to inconstancy, rubbing & massaging, breaking-up & disintegrating.
It has nine openings, nine un-lanced heads.
Whatever would ooze out from it would be an uncleanliness oozing out, a stench oozing out, a disgust oozing out.
Whatever would be discharged from it would be an uncleanliness discharging, a stench discharging, a disgust discharging.
For that reason, you should become disenchanted with this body.”
Then Ven.
Samiddhi went to Ven.
Sariputta and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, Ven.
Sariputta said to him, “Based on what, Samiddhi, do thoughts & resolves arise in a person?
“Based on name & form, sir.
“And how do they go to diversity?
“Through the properties, sir.
“And what do they have as their origination?
“They have contact as their origination, sir.
“And what do they have as their meeting place?
“They have feeling as their meeting place, sir.
“And what do they have as their presiding state?
“They have concentration as their presiding state, sir.
“And what do they have as their governing principle?
“They have mindfulness as their governing principle, sir.
“And what do they have as their surpassing state?
“They have discernment as their surpassing state, sir.
“And what do they have as their heartwood?
“They have release as their heartwood, sir.
“And where do they gain their footing?
“They gain their footing in the deathless, sir.
“Samiddhi, on being asked, 'Based on what do thoughts & resolves arise in a person?' you have answered, 'Based on name & form.'
“When asked, 'And how do they go to diversity?' you have answered, 'Through the properties.'
“When asked, 'And what do they have as their origination?' you have answered, 'They have contact as their origination.'
“When asked, 'And what do they have as their meeting place?' you have answered, 'They have feeling as their meeting place.'
“When asked, 'And what do they have as their presiding state?' you have answered, 'They have concentration as their presiding state.'
“When asked, 'And what do they have as their governing principle?' you have answered, 'They have mindfulness as their governing principle.'
“When asked, 'And what do they have as their surpassing state?' you have answered, 'They have discernment as their surpassing state.'
“When asked, 'And what do they have as their heartwood?' you have answered, 'They have release as their heartwood.'
“When asked, 'And where do they gain their footing?' you have answered, 'They gain their footing in the deathless.'
“Very good, Samiddhi, very good.
It's good, the way you have answered when questioned, but don't get conceited about that.”
Then Ven.
Maha Kotthita went to Ven.
Sariputta and exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Sariputta, “Is it the case, friend Sariputta, that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose, 'May an action is to be experienced in the here-&-now be turned into an action is to be experienced by me in a future life?' “No, my friend.
“Then is it the case, friend Sariputta, that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose, 'May an action is to be experienced in a future life be turned into an action is to be experienced by me in the here-&-now?' “No, my friend.
“Then is it the case, friend Sariputta, that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose, 'May an action is to be experienced as pleasure be turned into an action is to be experienced by me as pain?' “No, my friend.
“Then is it the case, friend Sariputta, that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose, 'May an action is to be experienced as pain be turned into an action is to be experienced by me as pleasure?' “No, my friend.
“Then is it the case, friend Sariputta, that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose, 'May an action is to be experienced when fully ripened be turned into an action is to be experienced by me when not fully ripened?' “No, my friend.
“Then is it the case, friend Sariputta, that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose, 'May an action is to be experienced when not fully ripened be turned into an action is to be experienced by me when fully ripened?' “No, my friend.
“Then is it the case, friend Sariputta, that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose, 'May an action is to be experienced as a great deal be turned into an action is to be experienced by me as next to nothing?' “No, my friend.
“Then is it the case, friend Sariputta, that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose, 'May an action is to be experienced as next to nothing be turned into an action is to be experienced by me as a great deal?' “No, my friend.
“Then is it the case, friend Sariputta, that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose, 'May an action is to be experienced be turned into an action is not to be experienced by me?' “No, my friend.
“Then is it the case, friend Sariputta, that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose, 'May an action is not to be experienced be turned into an action is to be experienced by me?' “No, my friend.
“Now, friend Sariputta, when you are asked, 'Is it the case that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose, “May an action is to be experienced in the here-&-now be turned into an action is to be experienced by me in a future life?”' you say, 'No, my friend.' When asked, 'Is it the case that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose, “May an action is to be experienced in a future life be turned into an action is to be experienced by me in the here-&-now”… “May an action is to be experienced as pleasure be turned into an action is to be experienced by me as pain?”… “May an action is to be experienced as pain be turned into an action is to be experienced by me as pleasure?”… “May an action is to be experienced when fully ripened be turned into an action is to be experienced by me when not fully ripened?”… “May an action is to be experienced when not fully ripened be turned into an action is to be experienced by me when fully ripened?”… “May an action is to be experienced as a great deal be turned into an action is to be experienced by me as next to nothing?”… “May an action is to be experienced as next to nothing be turned into an action is to be experienced by me as a great deal?”… “May an action is to be experienced be turned into an action is not to be experienced by me?”… “May an action is not to be experienced be turned into an action is to be experienced by me?”' you say, 'No, my friend.' So, then, with what purpose is the holy life lived under the Blessed One?
“The holy life, my friend, is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose of knowing, seeing, attaining, realizing, & breaking through to what has been unknown, unseen, unattained, unrealized, and not broken through to.
“And what, friend Sariputta, is the unknown, unseen, unattained, unrealized and not broken-through-to that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose of knowing, seeing, attaining, realizing, & breaking through to?
“'This is stress,' my friend; 'This is the origination of stress,' my friend; 'This is the cessation of stress,' my friend; 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress,' my friend, is the unknown, unseen, unattained, unrealized and not broken-through-to that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose of knowing, seeing, attaining, realizing, & breaking through to.
This is the unknown, unseen, unattained, unrealized and not broken-through-to that the holy life is lived under the Blessed One with the purpose of knowing, seeing, attaining, realizing, & breaking through to.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying in Rajagaha, on Vulture Peak Mountain.
Then Sutavan the wanderer went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One: “One day recently when I was staying right here in Rajagaha, at Giribbaja, I heard it in the Blessed One's presence, learned it in the Blessed One's presence: 'Sutavan, an arahant monk whose mental fermentations are ended, who has reached fulfillment, done the task, laid down the burden, attained the true goal, totally destroyed the fetter of becoming, and who is released through right gnosis, cannot possibly transgress these five principles.
It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to intentionally deprive a living being of life.
It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to take, in the manner of stealing, what is not given.
It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to engage in sexual intercourse.
It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to tell a conscious lie.
It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to consume stored-up sensual things as he did before, when he was a householder.' Now, did I hear this rightly from the Blessed One?
Did I learn it rightly, attend to it rightly, understand it rightly?
“Yes, Sutavan, you heard it rightly, learned it rightly, attended to it rightly, & understood it rightly.
Both before & now I say to you that an arahant monk whose mental fermentations are ended, who has reached fulfillment, done the task, laid down the burden, attained the true goal, totally destroyed the fetter of becoming, and who is released through right gnosis, cannot possibly transgress these nine principles.
” It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to intentionally deprive a living being of life.
It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to take, in the manner of stealing, what is not given.
It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to engage in sexual intercourse.
It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to tell a conscious lie.
It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to consume stored-up sensual things as he did before, when he was a householder.
” It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to follow a bias based on desire.
It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to follow a bias based on aversion.
It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to follow a bias based on fear.
It is impossible for a monk whose mental fermentations are ended to follow a bias based on delusion.
“Both before and now I say to you that an arahant monk whose mental fermentations are ended, who has reached fulfillment, done the task, laid down the burden, attained the true goal, totally destroyed the fetter of becoming, and who is released through right gnosis, cannot possibly transgress these nine principles.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he said to the monks: “Monks, if wanderers who are members of other sects should ask you, 'What, friend, are the prerequisites for the development of the wings to self-awakening?' how would you answer them?
“For us, lord, the teachings have the Blessed One as their root, their guide, & their arbitrator.
It would be good if the Blessed One himself would explicate the meaning of this statement.
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the monks will remember it.
“In that case, monks, listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said, “If wanderers who are members of other sects should ask you, 'What, friend, are the prerequisites for the development of the wings to self-awakening?' you should answer, 'There is the case where a monk has admirable friends, admirable companions, admirable comrades.
This is the first prerequisite for the development of the wings to self-awakening.
“'Furthermore, the monk is virtuous.
He dwells restrained in accordance with the Patimokkha, consummate in his behavior & sphere of activity.
He trains himself, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
This is the second prerequisite for the development of the wings to self-awakening.
“'Furthermore, he gets to hear at will, easily & without difficulty, talk that is truly sobering & conducive to the opening of awareness, i.e., talk on modesty, on contentment, on seclusion, on non-entanglement, on arousing persistence, on virtue, on concentration, on discernment, on release, and on the knowledge & vision of release.
This is the third prerequisite for the development of the wings to self-awakening.
“'Furthermore, he keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and for taking on skillful mental qualities.
He is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
This is the fourth prerequisite for the development of the wings to self-awakening.
“'Furthermore, he is discerning, endowed with the discernment of arising & passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
This is the fifth prerequisite for the development of the wings to self-awakening.'
“Monks, when a monk has admirable friends, admirable companions, admirable comrades, it is to be expected that he will be virtuous, will dwell restrained in accordance with the Patimokkha, consummate in his behavior & sphere of activity, and will train himself, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
“When a monk has admirable friends, admirable companions, admirable comrades, it is to be expected that he will get to hear at will, easily & without difficulty, talk that is truly sobering and conducive to the opening of awareness, i.e., talk on modesty, on contentment, on seclusion, on non-entanglement, on arousing persistence, on virtue, on concentration, on discernment, on release, and on the knowledge & vision of release.
“When a monk has admirable friends, admirable companions, admirable comrades, it is to be expected that he will keep his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities, and for taking on skillful mental qualities — steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
“When a monk has admirable friends, admirable companions, admirable comrades, it is to be expected that he will be discerning, endowed with discernment of arising & passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
“And furthermore, monks, when the monk is established in these five qualities, there are four additional qualities he should develop: He should develop the unattractive so as to abandon lust.
He should develop good will so as to abandon ill will.
He should develop mindfulness of in-&-out breathing so as to cut off distractive thinking.
He should develop the perception of inconstancy so as to uproot the conceit, 'I am.' For a monk perceiving inconstancy, the perception of not-self is made firm.
One perceiving not-self attains the uprooting of the conceit, 'I am' — Unbinding in the here & now.”
“Monks, there are these eight grounds for laziness.
Which eight?
“There is the case where a monk has some work to do.
The thought occurs to him: 'I will have to do this work.
But when I have done this work, my body will be tired.
Why don't I lie down?' So he lies down.
He doesn't make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the first grounds for laziness.
“Then there is the case where a monk has done some work.
The thought occurs to him: 'I have done some work.
Now that I have done work, my body is tired.
Why don't I lie down?' So he lies down.
He doesn't make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the second grounds for laziness.
“Then there is the case where a monk has to go on a journey.
The thought occurs to him: 'I will have to go on this journey.
But when I have gone on the journey, my body will be tired.
Why don't I lie down?' So he lies down.
He doesn't make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the third grounds for laziness.
“Then there is the case where a monk has gone on a journey.
The thought occurs to him: 'I have gone on a journey.
Now that I have gone on a journey, my body is tired.
Why don't I lie down?' So he lies down.
He doesn't make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the fourth grounds for laziness.
“Then there is the case where a monk, having gone for alms in a village or town, does not get as much coarse or refined food as he needs to fill himself up.
The thought occurs to him: 'I, having gone for alms in a village or town, have not gotten as much coarse or refined food as I need to fill myself up.
This body of mine is tired & unsuitable for work.
Why don't I lie down?' So he lies down.
He doesn't make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the fifth grounds for laziness.
“Then there is the case where a monk, having gone for alms in a village or town, does get as much coarse or refined food as he needs to fill himself up.
The thought occurs to him: 'I, having gone for alms in a village or town, have gotten as much coarse or refined food as I need to fill myself up.
This body of mine is heavy & unsuitable for work, as if I were many months pregnant.
Why don't I lie down?' So he lies down.
He doesn't make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the sixth grounds for laziness.
“Then there is the case where a monk comes down with a slight illness.
The thought occurs to him: 'I have come down with a slight illness.
There's a need to lie down.' So he lies down.
He doesn't make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the seventh grounds for laziness.
“Then there is the case where a monk has recovered from his illness, not long after his recovery.
The thought occurs to him: 'I have recovered from my illness.
It's not long after my recovery.
This body of mine is weak & unsuitable for work.
Why don't I lie down?' So he lies down.
He doesn't make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the eighth grounds for laziness.
“These are the eight grounds for laziness.
“There are these eight grounds for the arousal of energy.
Which eight?
“There is the case where a monk has some work to do.
The thought occurs to him: 'I will have to do this work.
But when I am doing this work, it will not be easy to attend to the Buddha's message.
Why don't I make an effort beforehand for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized?' So he makes an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the first grounds for the arousal of energy.
“Then there is the case where a monk has done some work.
The thought occurs to him: 'I have done some work.
While I was doing work, I couldn't attend to the Buddha's message.
Why don't I make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized?' So he makes an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the second grounds for the arousal of energy.
“Then there is the case where a monk has to go on a journey.
The thought occurs to him: 'I will have to go on this journey.
But when I am going on the journey, it will not be easy to attend to the Buddha's message.
Why don't I make an effort beforehand for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized?' So he makes an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the third grounds for the arousal of energy.
“Then there is the case where a monk has gone on a journey.
The thought occurs to him: 'I have gone on a journey.
While I was going on the journey, I couldn't attend to the Buddha's message.
Why don't I make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized?' So he makes an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the fourth grounds for the arousal of energy.
“Then there is the case where a monk, having gone for alms in a village or town, does not get as much coarse or refined food as he needs to fill himself up.
The thought occurs to him: 'I, having gone for alms in a village or town, have not gotten as much coarse or refined food as I need to fill myself up.
This body of mine is light & suitable for work.
Why don't I make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized?' So he makes an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the fifth grounds for the arousal of energy.
“Then there is the case where a monk, having gone for alms in a village or town, does get as much coarse or refined food as he needs to fill himself up.
The thought occurs to him: 'I, having gone for alms in a village or town, have gotten as much coarse or refined food as I need to fill myself up.
This body of mine is light & suitable for work.
Why don't I make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized?' So he makes an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the sixth grounds for the arousal of energy.
“Then there is the case where a monk comes down with a slight illness.
The thought occurs to him: 'I have come down with a slight illness.
Now, there's the possibility that it could get worse.
Why don't I make an effort beforehand for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized?' So he makes an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the seventh grounds for the arousal of energy.
“Then there is the case where a monk has recovered from his illness, not long after his recovery.
The thought occurs to him: 'I have recovered from my illness.
It's not long after my recovery.
Now, there's the possibility that the illness could come back.
Why don't I make an effort beforehand for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized?' So he makes an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
This is the eighth grounds for the arousal of energy.
“These are the eight grounds for the arousal of energy.”
Translator's note: This discourse is important in that it explicitly refers to the practice of the four frames of reference as a form of concentration practice, mastered in terms of the levels of jhana.
Then a certain monk went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “It would be good if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief so that, having heard the Dhamma from the Blessed One, I might dwell alone in seclusion: heedful, ardent, & resolute.
“But it is in just this way that some worthless men make a request but then, having been told the Dhamma, think they should tag along right behind me.
“May the Blessed One teach me the Dhamma in brief!
May the One Well-gone teach me the Dhamma in brief!
It may well be that I will understand the Blessed One's words.
It may well be that I will become an heir to the Blessed One's words.
“Then, monk, you should train yourself thus: 'My mind will be established inwardly, well-composed.
No evil, unskillful qualities, once they have arisen, will remain consuming the mind.' That's how you should train yourself.
“Then you should train yourself thus: 'Good-will, as my awareness-release, will be developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, & well-undertaken.' That's how you should train yourself.
When you have developed this concentration in this way, you should develop this concentration with directed thought & evaluation, you should develop it with no directed thought & a modicum of evaluation, you should develop it with no directed thought & no evaluation, you should develop it accompanied by rapture… not accompanied by rapture… endowed with a sense of enjoyment; you should develop it endowed with equanimity.
“When this concentration is thus developed, thus well-developed by you, you should then train yourself thus: 'Compassion, as my awareness-release… Appreciation, as my awareness-release… Equanimity, as my awareness-release, will be developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, & well-undertaken.' That's how you should train yourself.
When you have developed this concentration in this way, you should develop this concentration with directed thought & evaluation, you should develop it with no directed thought & a modicum of evaluation, you should develop it with no directed thought & no evaluation, you should develop it accompanied by rapture… not accompanied by rapture… endowed with a sense of enjoyment; you should develop it endowed with equanimity.
“When this concentration is thus developed, thus well-developed by you, you should then train yourself thus: 'I will remain focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.' That's how you should train yourself.
When you have developed this concentration in this way, you should develop this concentration with directed thought & evaluation, you should develop it with no directed thought & a modicum of evaluation, you should develop it with no directed thought & no evaluation, you should develop it accompanied by rapture… not accompanied by rapture… endowed with a sense of enjoyment; you should develop it endowed with equanimity.
“When this concentration is thus developed, thus well-developed by you, you should train yourself: 'I will remain focused on feelings in & of themselves… the mind in & of itself… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.' That's how you should train yourself.
When you have developed this concentration in this way, you should develop this concentration with directed thought & evaluation, you should develop it with no directed thought & a modicum of evaluation, you should develop it with no directed thought & no evaluation, you should develop it accompanied by rapture… not accompanied by rapture… endowed with a sense of enjoyment; you should develop it endowed with equanimity.
“When this concentration is thus developed, thus well-developed by you, then wherever you go, you will go in comfort.
Wherever you stand, you will stand in comfort.
Wherever you sit, you will sit in comfort.
Wherever you lie down, you will lie down in comfort.
Then that monk, having been admonished by an admonishment from the Blessed One, got up from his seat and bowed down to the Blessed One, circled around him, keeping the Blessed One to his right side, and left.
Then, dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute, he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And thus he became another one of the arahants.
Monks, there are these eight individuals who are worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, the unsurpassed field of merit for the world.
Which eight?
The one who has entered the stream, the one who has entered upon the course for the realization of the fruit of stream-entry, the once-returner, the one who has entered upon the course for the realization of the fruit of once-returning, the non-returner, the one who has entered upon the course for the realization of the fruit of non-returning, the arahant, the one who has entered upon the course for arahantship
Monks, these are the eight individuals who are worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, the unsurpassed field of merit for the world.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling among the Koliyans.
Now the Koliyans have a town named Kakkarapatta.
There Dighajanu the Koliyan went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “We are lay people enjoying sensuality; living crowded with spouses & children; using Kasi fabrics & sandalwood; wearing garlands, scents, & creams; handling gold & silver.
May the Blessed One teach the Dhamma for those like us, for our happiness & well-being in this life, for our happiness & well-being in lives to come.
“There are these four qualities, TigerPaw, that lead to a lay person's happiness and well-being in this life.
Which four?
Being consummate in initiative, being consummate in vigilance, admirable friendship, and maintaining one's livelihood in tune.
“And what does it mean to be consummate in initiative?
There is the case where a lay person, by whatever occupation he makes his living — whether by farming or trading or cattle tending or archery or as a king's man or by any other craft — is clever and untiring at it, endowed with discrimination in its techniques, enough to arrange and carry it out.
This is called being consummate in initiative.
“And what does it mean to be consummate in vigilance?
There is the case when a lay person has righteous wealth — righteously gained, coming from his initiative, his striving, his making an effort, gathered by the strength of his arm, earned by his sweat — he manages to protect it through vigilance, 'How shall neither kings nor thieves make off with this property of mine, nor fire burn it, nor water sweep it away, nor hateful heirs make off with it?' This is called being consummate in vigilance.
“And what is meant by admirable friendship?
There is the case where a lay person, in whatever town or village he may dwell, spends time with householders or householders' sons, young or old, who are advanced in virtue.
He talks with them, engages them in discussions.
He emulates consummate conviction in those who are consummate in conviction, consummate virtue in those who are consummate in virtue, consummate generosity in those who are consummate in generosity, and consummate discernment in those who are consummate in discernment.
This is called admirable friendship.
“And what does it mean to maintain one's livelihood in tune?
There is the case where a lay person, knowing the income and outflow of his wealth, maintains a livelihood in tune, neither a spendthrift nor a penny-pincher,, 'Thus will my income exceed my outflow, and my outflow will not exceed my income.' Just as when a weigher or his apprentice, when holding the scales, knows, 'It has tipped down so much or has tipped up so much,' in the same way, the lay person, knowing the income and outflow of his wealth, maintains a livelihood in tune, neither a spendthrift nor a penny-pincher,, 'Thus will my income exceed my outflow, and my outflow will not exceed my income.' If a lay person has a small income but maintains a grand livelihood, it will be rumored of him, 'This clansman devours his wealth like a fruit-tree eater.' If a lay person has a large income but maintains a miserable livelihood, it will be rumored of him, 'This clansman will die of starvation.' But when a lay person, knowing the income and outflow of his wealth, maintains a livelihood in tune, neither a spendthrift nor a penny-pincher,, 'Thus will my income exceed my outflow, and my outflow will not exceed my income,' this is called maintaining one's livelihood in tune.
“These are the four drains on one's store of wealth: debauchery in sex; debauchery in drink; debauchery in gambling; and evil friendship, evil companionship, evil camaraderie.
Just as if there were a great reservoir with four inlets and four drains, and a man were to close the inlets and open the drains, and the sky were not to pour down proper showers, the depletion of that great reservoir could be expected, not its increase.
In the same way, these are the four drains on one's store of wealth: debauchery in sex; debauchery in drink; debauchery in gambling; and evil friendship, evil companionship, evil camaraderie.
These are the four inlets to one's store of wealth: no debauchery in sex; no debauchery in drink; no debauchery in gambling; and admirable friendship, admirable companionship, admirable camaraderie.
Just as if there were a great reservoir with four inlets and four drains, and a man were to open the inlets and close the drains, and the sky were to pour down proper showers, the increase of that great reservoir could be expected, not its depletion.
In the same way, these are the four inlets to one's store of wealth: no debauchery in sex; no debauchery in drink; no debauchery in gambling; and admirable friendship, admirable companionship, admirable camaraderie.
“These, TigerPaw, are the four qualities that lead to a lay person's happiness and well-being in this life.
“There are these four qualities that lead to a lay person's happiness and well-being in lives to come.
Which four?
Being consummate in conviction, being consummate in virtue, being consummate in generosity, being consummate in discernment.
“And what does it mean to be consummate in conviction?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones has conviction, is convinced of the Tathagata's Awakening: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy and rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge and conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine and human beings, awakened, blessed.' This is called being consummate in conviction.
“And what does it mean to be consummate in virtue?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones abstains from taking life, abstains from stealing, abstains from illicit sexual conduct, abstains from lying, abstains from taking intoxicants that cause heedlessness.
This is called being consummate in virtue.
“And what does it mean to be consummate in generosity?
There is the case of a disciple of the noble ones, his awareness cleansed of the stain of miserliness, living at home, freely generous, openhanded, delighting in being magnanimous, responsive to requests, delighting in the distribution of alms.
This is called being consummate in generosity.
“And what does it mean to be consummate in discernment?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones is discerning, endowed with discernment of arising and passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
This is called being consummate in discernment.
“These, TigerPaw, are the four qualities that lead to a lay person's happiness and well-being in lives to come.”
I have heard that at one time the Blessed One was staying at Vesali, in the Peaked Roof Hall in the Great Forest.
Then Mahapajapati Gotami went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, stood to one side.
As she was standing there she said to him: “It would be good, lord, if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief such that, having heard the Dhamma from the Blessed One, I might dwell alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute.
“Gotami, the qualities of which you may know, 'These qualities lead to passion, not to dispassion; to being fettered, not to being unfettered; to accumulating, not to shedding; to self-aggrandizement, not to modesty; to discontent, not to contentment; to entanglement, not to seclusion; to laziness, not to aroused persistence; to being burdensome, not to being unburdensome': You may categorically hold, 'This is not the Dhamma, this is not the Vinaya, this is not the Teacher's instruction.'
“As for the qualities of which you may know, 'These qualities lead to dispassion, not to passion; to being unfettered, not to being fettered; to shedding, not to accumulating; to modesty, not to self-aggrandizement; to contentment, not to discontent; to seclusion, not to entanglement; to aroused persistence, not to laziness; to being unburdensome, not to being burdensome': You may categorically hold, 'This is the Dhamma, this is the Vinaya, this is the Teacher's instruction.' That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, Mahapajapati Gotami delighted at his words.
Thus have I heard: At one time the Exalted One was staying near Savatthi at the Eastern monastery in the mansion Migara's mother.
Then Visakha, Migara's mother, approached the Exalted One; having approached and bowed down she sat down in a suitable place.
When she was seated the Exalted One spoke thus to Visakha, Migara's Mother:
“Visakha, when the Uposatha undertaken with its eight component practices, is entered on, it is of great fruit, of great advantage, of great splendor, of great range.
And how, Visakha, is the Uposatha undertaken with its eight component practices, entered on, is of great fruit, great advantage, great splendor and great range?
“Here, Visakha, a noble disciple considers thus:
“'For all their lives the arahants dwell having abandoned killing living beings, refrain from killing living beings, they have laid down their staffs, laid down their weapons, they are conscientious, sympathetic, compassionate for the good of all living beings; so today I dwell, for this night and day, having abandoned killing living beings, refraining from killing living beings, I am one who has laid down my staff, laid down my weapon, I am conscientious, sympathetic, compassionate for the good of all living beings.
By this practice, following after the arahants, the Uposatha will be entered on by me.'
“It is undertaken by this first practice.
” 'For all their lives the arahants dwell having abandoned taking what is not given, refrain from taking what is not given, they are takers of what is given, those who expect only what is given, themselves become clean without thieving; so today I dwell, for this night and day, having abandoned taking what is not given, refraining from taking what is not given.
I am a taker of what is given, one who expects only what is given, by myself become clean without thieving.
By this practice, following after the arahants, the Uposatha will be entered on by me.'
“It is undertaken by this second practice.
” 'For all their lives the arahants dwell having abandoned unchaste conduct, they are of chaste conduct, living aloof, refrain from sex which is the way of common society; so today I dwell, for this night and day, having abandoned unchaste conduct, I am of chaste conduct, living aloof, refraining from sex which is the common way of society.
By this practice, following after the arahants, the Uposatha will be entered on by me.'
“It is undertaken by this third practice.
” 'For all their lives the arahants dwell having abandoned false speech, refrain from false speech, they are speakers of truth, joiners of truth, firm-in-truth, grounded-on-truth, not speakers of lies to the world; so today I dwell, for this night and day, having abandoned false speech, refraining from false speech, a speaker of truth, a joiner of truth, firm-in-truth, grounded-on-truth, not a speaker of lies to the world.
By this practice, following after the arahants, the Uposatha will be entered on by me.'
“It is undertaken by this fourth practice.
” 'For all their lives the arahants dwell having abandoned distilled and fermented intoxicants which are the occasion for carelessness and refrain from them; so today I dwell, for this night and day, having abandoned distilled and fermented intoxicants which are the occasion for carelessness, refraining from them.
By this practice, following after the arahants, the Uposatha will be entered on by me.'
“It is undertaken by this fifth practice.
” 'For all their lives the arahants are one-mealers, refrain from eating outside the time, desisting at night, so today I am a one-mealer, refraining from eating outside the time, desisting at night.
By this practice, following after the arahants, the Uposatha will be entered on by me.'
“It is undertaken by this sixth practice.
” 'For all their lives the arahants refrain from dancing, singing, music, going to see entertainments, wearing garments, smartening with perfumes and beautifying with cosmetics; so today I refrain from dancing, singing, music, going to see entertainments, wearing ornaments, smartening with perfumes and beautifying with cosmetics.
By this practice, following after the arahants, the Uposatha will be entered on by me.'
“It is undertaken by this seventh practice.
” 'For all their lives the arahants having abandoned high beds and large beds, refraining from high beds and large beds, they make use of a low sleeping place, a bed or a strewing of grass; so today I have abandoned high beds and large beds, refraining from high beds and large beds, I make use of a low sleeping place, a bed or a strewing of grass.
By this practice, following after the arahants the Uposatha will be entered on by me.'
“It is undertaken by this eighth practice.
“Thus indeed, Visakha, is the Uposatha entered on and undertaken with its eight component practices, of great fruit, of great advantage, of great splendor, of great range.
“How great a fruit?
How great an advantage?
How great a splendor?
How great a range?
“Just as though, Visakha, one might have power, dominion and kingship over sixteen great countries abounding in the seven treasures — that is to say, Anga, Magadha, Kasi, Kosala, Vajji, Malla, Ceti, Vansa, Kure, Pancala, Maccha, Surasena, Assaka, Avanti, Gandhara and Kamboja, yet it is not worth a sixteenth part of the Uposatha undertaken with its eight practices.
For what reason?
Miserable is kingship over men compared with heavenly bliss.
“That which among men is fifty years, Visakha, is one night and day of the devas of the Four Great Kings, their month has thirty of those days, their year twelve of those months; the lifespan of the devas of the Four Great Kings is five hundred of those heavenly years.
Now here a certain woman or man, having entered on the Uposatha undertaken with its eight practices, at the break up of the body, after death, may arise to fellowship with the devas of the Four Great Kings — such a thing indeed is known, Visakha.
It was in connection with this that I have said: Miserable is kingship over men compared with heavenly bliss.
“That which among men is a hundred years, Visakha, is one night and day of the devas of the Thirty-three, their month has thirty of those days, their year twelve of those months; the lifespan of the devas of the Thirty-three is one thousand of those heavenly years.
Now here a certain woman or man, having entered on the Uposatha undertaken with the eight practices, at the break up of the body, after death, may arise to fellowship with the devas of the Thirty-three — such a thing indeed is known, Visakha.
It was in connection with this that I have said: Miserable is kingship over men compared with heavenly bliss.
“That which among men is two hundred years, Visakha, is one night and day of the Yama devas, their month has thirty of those days, their year twelve of those months; the lifespan of the Yama devas is two thousand of those heavenly years.
Now here a certain woman or man, having entered on the Uposatha undertaken with the eight practices, at the break-up of the body, after death, may arise to fellowship with the Yama devas — such a thing indeed is known, Visakha.
It was in connection with this that I have said: Miserable is kingship over men compared with heavenly bliss.
“That which among men is four hundred years, Visakha, is one night and day of the Tusita devas, their month has thirty of those days, their year twelve of those months; the lifespan of the Tusita devas is four thousand of those heavenly years.
Now here a certain woman or man, having entered on the Uposatha undertaken with the eight practices, at the break up of the body, after death, may arise to fellowship with the Tusita devas — such a thing indeed is known, Visakha.
It was in connection with this that I have said: Miserable is kingship over men compared with heavenly bliss.
“That which among men is eight hundred years, Visakha, is one night and day of the Nimmanarati devas, their month has thirty of those days, their year twelve of those months; the lifespan of the Nimmanarati devas is eight thousand of those heavenly years.
Now here a certain woman or man, having entered on the Uposatha undertaken with the eight practices, at the break up of the body, after death may arise to fellowship with the Nimmanarati devas — such a thing indeed is known, Visakha.
It was in connection with this that I have said: Miserable is kingship over men compared with heavenly bliss.
“That which among men is sixteen hundred years, Visakha, is one night and day of the Paranimmitavasavatti devas, their month has thirty of those days, their year twelve of those months; the lifespan of the Paranimmitavasavatti devas is sixteen thousand of those heavenly years.
Now here a certain woman or man, having entered on the Uposatha undertaken with the eight practices, at the break up of the body, after death, may arise to fellowship with the Paranimmitavasavatti devas — such a thing indeed is known, Visakha.
It was in connection with this that I have said: Miserable is kingship over men compared with heavenly bliss.
“Kill no life, nor take what is not given, speak no lie, nor be an alcoholic, refrain from sex and unchaste conduct, at night do not eat out-of-time food, neither bear garlands nor indulge with perfume, and make your bed a mat upon the ground: this indeed is called the eight-part uposatha taught by the Buddha gone to dukkha's end.
The radiance of the sun and moon, both beautiful to see, follow on from each other, dispelling the darkness as they go through the heavens, illumining the sky and brightening the quarters and the treasure found between them: pearls and crystals and auspicious turquoises, gold nuggets and the gold called “ore,” monetary gold with gold dust carried down — compared with the eight-part uposatha, though they are enjoyed, are not a sixteenth part — as the shining of the moon in all the groups of stars.
Hence indeed the woman and the man who are virtuous enter on uposatha having eight parts and having made merits bringing forth happiness blameless they obtain heavenly abodes.
— PTS iv.
pp.-
“Lord, if my dear kin and relatives were to enter on the uposatha undertaken with its eight practices, it would be for their benefit and happiness for many a day.
Lord, if all the warrior-nobles, brahmans, merchants and laborers were to enter on the uposatha undertaken with its eight practices, it would be for their benefit and happiness for many a day.
“So it is, Vasettha.
If all the warrior-nobles, brahmans, merchants and laborers were to enter on the uposatha undertaken with its eight practices, it would be for their benefit and happiness for many a day.
If this world with its devas, maras and brahmas, this generation with its samanas and brahmans, together with its rulers and mankind were to enter on the uposatha undertaken with its eight practices, it would be for their benefit and happiness for many a day.
Vasettha, if these great sala trees were to enter on the uposatha undertaken with its eight practices it would be for their benefit and happiness for many a day, that is, if they were conscious, what to speak of mankind.
— 
Thus have I heard:
At one time the Blessed One was residing in Jetavana, the monastery of Anathapindika, near Savatthi.
At that time the Blessed One, having called all the bhikkhus together, addressed them thus: “Bhikkhus!” The bhikkhus answered in assent: “Lord!” The Blessed One then gave the following teaching on Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Uposatha is comprised of eight factors which the Ariyan disciple observes, the observation of which brings glorious and radiant fruit and benefit.
“Bhikkhus.
What is the Uposatha which, observed by the Ariyan disciples, brings glorious and radiant fruit and benefit?
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up the intentional taking of life.
The club and sword have been laid down.
They have shame and are compassionate toward all beings.'
“All of you have given up the intentional taking of life, have put down all weapons, are possessed of shame and are compassionate toward all beings.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the first factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up taking what has not been given.
They take only what is given, are intent on taking only what is given.
They are not thieves.
Their behavior is spotless.'
“All of you have given up the taking of what has not been given, are ones who do not take what is not given, are intent on taking only what is given, are not thieves.
Your behavior is spotless.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the second factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up that which is an obstacle to the Brahma-faring.
Their practice is like that of a Brahma.
They are far from sexual intercourse, which is a practice of lay people.'
“All of you have given up that which is an obstacle to the Brahma-faring and behave like a Brahma.
Your behavior is far from sexual intercourse.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the third factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up the telling of lies.
They utter only the truth and are intent on the truth.
Their speech is firm and is composed of reason.
Their speech does not waver from that which is a mainstay for the world.'
“All of you have given up the telling of lies.
You speak only the truth and are intent only on that which is true.
Your speech is firm and with reason.
Your speech does not waver from that which is a mainstay for the world.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the fourth factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up the taking of liquors and intoxicants, of that which intoxicates, causing carelessness.
They are far from intoxicants.'
“All of you have given up the taking of liquors and intoxicants.
You abstain from drink which causes carelessness.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the fifth factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, eat at one time only and do not partake of food in the evening.
They abstain from food at the 'wrong time'.
“All of you eat at one time only and do not partake of food in the evening.
You abstain from food at the 'wrong time.' For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the sixth factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up singing and dancing, the playing of musical instruments and the watching of entertainments, which are stumbling blocks to that which is wholesome.
Nor do they bedeck themselves with ornaments, flowers or perfume.'
“All of you have given up singing and dancing, the playing of musical instruments and the watching of entertainments, which are stumbling blocks to that which is wholesome.
You do not bedeck yourselves with ornaments, flowers or perfume.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the seventh factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
Ariyan disciples in this Religion reflect thus:
“'All arahants, for as long as life lasts, have given up lying on large or high beds.
They are content with low beds or bedding made of grass.'
“All of you have given up lying on large or high beds.
You are content with low beds or beds made of grass.
For all of this day and night, in this manner, you will be known as having followed the arahants, and the Uposatha will have been observed by you.
This is the eighth factor of the Uposatha.
“Bhikkhus.
The Uposatha is comprised of these eight factors which the Ariyan disciple observes, and it is of great and glorious fruit and benefit.
Thus the Blessed One spoke on the Uposatha.
The bhikkhus were delighted and rejoiced at his words.
“Monks, the taking of life — when indulged in, developed, & pursued — is something that leads to hell, leads to rebirth as a common animal, leads to the realm of the hungry shades.
The slightest of all the results coming from the taking of life is that, when one becomes a human being, it leads to a short life span.
“Stealing — when indulged in, developed, & pursued — is something that leads to hell, leads to rebirth as a common animal, leads to the realm of the hungry shades.
The slightest of all the results coming from stealing is that, when one becomes a human being, it leads to the loss of one's wealth.
“Illicit sexual behavior — when indulged in, developed, & pursued — is something that leads to hell, leads to rebirth as a common animal, leads to the realm of the hungry shades.
The slightest of all the results coming from illicit sexual behavior is that, when one becomes a human being, it leads to rivalry & revenge.
“Telling falsehoods — when indulged in, developed, & pursued — is something that leads to hell, leads to rebirth as a common animal, leads to the realm of the hungry shades.
The slightest of all the results coming from telling falsehoods is that, when one becomes a human being, it leads to being falsely accused.
“Divisive tale-bearing — when indulged in, developed, & pursued — is something that leads to hell, leads to rebirth as a common animal, leads to the realm of the hungry shades.
The slightest of all the results coming from divisive tale-bearing is that, when one becomes a human being, it leads to the breaking of one's friendships.
“Harsh speech — when indulged in, developed, & pursued — is something that leads to hell, leads to rebirth as a common animal, leads to the realm of the hungry shades.
The slightest of all the results coming from harsh speech is that, when one becomes a human being, it leads to unappealing sounds.
“Frivolous chattering — when indulged in, developed, & pursued — is something that leads to hell, leads to rebirth as a common animal, leads to the realm of the hungry shades.
The slightest of all the results coming from frivolous chattering is that, when one becomes a human being, it leads to words that aren't worth taking to heart.
“The drinking of fermented & distilled liquors — when indulged in, developed, & pursued — is something that leads to hell, leads to rebirth as a common animal, leads to the realm of the hungry shades.
The slightest of all the results coming from drinking fermented & distilled liquors is that, when one becomes a human being, it leads to mental derangement.”
“Monks, there are these eight rewards of merit, rewards of skillfulness, nourishments of happiness, celestial, resulting in happiness, leading to heaven, leading to what is desirable, pleasurable, & appealing, to welfare & happiness.
Which eight?
“There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones has gone to the Buddha for refuge.
This is the first reward of merit, reward of skillfulness, nourishment of happiness, celestial, resulting in happiness, leading to heaven, leading to what is desirable, pleasurable, & appealing; to welfare & to happiness.
“Furthermore, the disciple of the noble ones has gone to the Dhamma for refuge.
This is the second reward of merit…
“Furthermore, the disciple of the noble ones has gone to the Sangha for refuge.
This is the third reward of merit…
“Now, there are these five gifts, five great gifts — original, long-standing, traditional, ancient, unadulterated, unadulterated from the beginning — that are not open to suspicion, will never be open to suspicion, and are unfaulted by knowledgeable contemplatives & brahmans.
Which five?
“There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones, abandoning the taking of life, abstains from taking life.
In doing so, he gives freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings.
In giving freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings, he gains a share in limitless freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, and freedom from oppression.
This is the first gift, the first great gift — original, long-standing, traditional, ancient, unadulterated, unadulterated from the beginning — that is not open to suspicion, will never be open to suspicion, and is unfaulted by knowledgeable contemplatives & brahmans.
And this is the fourth reward of merit…
“Furthermore, abandoning taking what is not given, the disciple of the noble ones abstains from taking what is not given.
In doing so, he gives freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings.
In giving freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings, he gains a share in limitless freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, and freedom from oppression.
This is the second gift, the second great gift… and this is the fifth reward of merit…
“Furthermore, abandoning illicit sex, the disciple of the noble ones abstains from illicit sex.
In doing so, he gives freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings.
In giving freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings, he gains a share in limitless freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, and freedom from oppression.
This is the third gift, the third great gift… and this is the sixth reward of merit…
“Furthermore, abandoning lying, the disciple of the noble ones abstains from lying.
In doing so, he gives freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings.
In giving freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings, he gains a share in limitless freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, and freedom from oppression.
This is the fourth gift, the fourth great gift… and this is the seventh reward of merit…
“Furthermore, abandoning the use of intoxicants, the disciple of the noble ones abstains from taking intoxicants.
In doing so, he gives freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings.
In giving freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, freedom from oppression to limitless numbers of beings, he gains a share in limitless freedom from danger, freedom from animosity, and freedom from oppression.
This is the fifth gift, the fifth great gift — original, long-standing, traditional, ancient, unadulterated, unadulterated from the beginning — that is not open to suspicion, will never be open to suspicion, and is unfaulted by knowledgeable contemplatives & brahmans.
And this is the eighth reward of merit, reward of skillfulness, nourishment of happiness, celestial, resulting in happiness, leading to heaven, leading to what is desirable, pleasurable, & appealing; to welfare & to happiness.
Translator's note: In this sutta, the Buddha instructs rich householders how to preserve and increase their prosperity and how to avoid loss of wealth.
Wealth alone, however, does not make a complete man nor a harmonious society.
Possession of wealth all too often multiplies man's desires, and he is ever in the pursuit of amassing more wealth and power.
This unrestrained craving, however, leaves him dissatisfied and stifles his inner growth.
It creates conflict and disharmony in society through the resentment of the underprivileged who feel themselves exploited by the effects of unrestrained craving.
Therefore the Buddha follows up on his advice on material welfare with four essential conditions for spiritual welfare: confidence, virtue, liberality and wisdom.
These four will instill in man a sense of higher values.
He will then not only pursue his own material concern, but also be aware of his duty toward society.
To mention only one of the implications: a wisely and generously employed liberality will reduce tensions and conflicts in society.
Thus the observing of these conditions of material and spiritual welfare will make for an ideal citizen in an ideal society.
Thus have I heard.
Once the Exalted One was dwelling amongst the Koliyans, in their market town named Kakkarapatta.
Then Dighajanu, a Koliyan, approached the Exalted One, respectfully saluted Him and sat on one side.
Thus seated, he addressed the Exalted One as follows:
“We, Lord, are laymen who enjoy worldly pleasure.
We lead a life encumbered by wife and children.
We use sandalwood of Kasi.
We deck ourselves with garlands, perfume and unguents.
We use gold and silver.
To those like us, O Lord, let the Exalted One preach the Dhamma, teach those things that lead to weal and happiness in this life and to weal and happiness in future life.
“Four conditions, Vyagghapajja, conduce to a householder's weal and happiness in this very life.
Which four?
“The accomplishment of persistent effort, the accomplishment of watchfulness, good friendship and balanced livelihood.
“What is the accomplishment of persistent effort?
“Herein, Vyagghapajja, by whatsoever activity a householder earns his living, whether by farming, by trading, by rearing cattle, by archery, by service under the king, or by any other kind of craft — at that he becomes skillful and is not lazy.
He is endowed with the power of discernment as to the proper ways and means; he is able to carry out and allocate.
This is called the accomplishment of persistent effort.
“What is the accomplishment of watchfulness?
“Herein, Vyagghapajja, whatsoever wealth a householder is in possession of, obtained by dint of effort, collected by strength of arm, by the sweat of his brow, justly acquired by right means — such he husbands well by guarding and watching so that kings would not seize it, thieves would not steal it, fire would not burn it, water would not carry it away, nor ill-disposed heirs remove it.
This is the accomplishment of watchfulness.
“What is good friendship?
“Herein, Vyagghapajja, in whatsoever village or market town a householder dwells, he associates, converses, engages in discussions with householders or householders' sons, whether young and highly cultured or old and highly cultured, full of faith, full of virtue, full of charity, full of wisdom.
He acts in accordance with the faith of the faithful, with the virtue of the virtuous, with the charity of the charitable, with the wisdom of the wise.
This is called good friendship.
“What is balanced livelihood?
“Herein, Vyagghapajja, a householder knowing his income and expenses leads a balanced life, neither extravagant nor miserly, knowing that thus his income will stand in excess of his expenses, but not his expenses in excess of his income.
“Just as the goldsmith, or an apprentice of his, knows, on holding up a balance, that by so much it has dipped down, by so much it has tilted up; even so a householder, knowing his income and expenses leads a balanced life, neither extravagant nor miserly, knowing that thus his income will stand in excess of his expenses, but not his expenses in excess of his income.
“If, Vyagghapajja, a householder with little income were to lead an extravagant life, there would be those who say — 'This person enjoys his property like one who eats wood-apple.' If, Vyagghapajja, a householder with a large income were to lead a wretched life, there would be those who say — 'This person will die like a starveling.'
“The wealth thus amassed, Vyagghapajja, has four sources of destruction:
” Debauchery, drunkenness, gambling, friendship, companionship and intimacy with evil-doers.
“Just as in the case of a great tank with four inlets and outlets, if a man should close the inlets and open the outlets and there should be no adequate rainfall, decrease of water is to be expected in that tank, and not an increase; even so there are four sources for the destruction of amassed wealth — debauchery, drunkenness, gambling, and friendship, companionship and intimacy with evil-doers.
“There are four sources for the increase of amassed wealth: abstinence from debauchery, abstinence from drunkenness, non-indulgence in gambling, friendship, companionship and intimacy with the good.
“Just as in the case of a great tank with four inlets and four outlets, if a person were to open the inlets and close the outlets, and there should also be adequate rainfall, an increase in water is certainly to be expected in that tank and not a decrease, even so these four conditions are the sources of increase of amassed wealth.
“These four conditions, Vyagghapajja, are conducive to a householder's weal and happiness in this very life.
“Four conditions, Vyagghapajja, conduce to a householder's weal and happiness in his future life.
Which four?
“The accomplishment of faith, the accomplishment of virtue, the accomplishment of charity and the accomplishment of wisdom.
“What is the accomplishment of faith?
“Herein a householder is possessed of faith, he believes in the Enlightenment of the Perfect One: Thus, indeed, is that Blessed One: he is the pure one, fully enlightened, endowed with knowledge and conduct, well-gone, the knower of worlds, the incomparable leader of men to be tamed, the teacher of gods and men, all-knowing and blessed.
This is called the accomplishment of faith.
“What is the accomplishment of virtue?
“Herein a householder abstains from killing, stealing, sexual misconduct, lying, and from intoxicants that cause infatuation and heedlessness.
This is called the accomplishment of virtue.
“What is the accomplishment of charity?
“Herein a householder dwells at home with heart free from the stain of avarice, devoted to charity, open-handed, delighting in generosity, attending to the needy, delighting in the distribution of alms.
This is called the accomplishment of charity.
“What is the accomplishment of wisdom?
“Herein a householder is wise: he is endowed with wisdom that understands the arising and cessation; he is possessed of the noble penetrating insight that leads to the destruction of suffering.
This is called the accomplishment of wisdom.
“These four conditions, Vyagghapajja, conduce to a householder's weal and happiness in his future life.”
Then Ven.
Sariputta went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, bowed down to him and sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “Sariputta, how many are the strengths of a monk whose effluents are ended, endowed with which he affirms the ending of the effluents: 'The effluents are ended in me'?
“Eight, lord, are the strengths of a monk whose effluents are ended, endowed with which he affirms the ending of the effluents: 'The effluents are ended in me.' Which eight?
“There is the case where the inconstancy of all fabrications as they have come to be is well seen with right discernment by a monk whose effluents are ended.
The fact that the inconstancy of all fabrications as they have come to be is well seen with right discernment by a monk whose effluents are ended is a strength of a monk whose effluents are ended, with reference to which he affirms the ending of the effluents: 'The effluents are ended in me.'
“Furthermore, sensual passions as they have come to be are well seen with right discernment as analogous to hot charcoals by a monk whose effluents are ended.
The fact that sensual passions as they have come to be are well seen with right discernment as analogous to hot charcoals by a monk whose effluents are ended is also a strength of a monk whose effluents are ended, with reference to which he affirms the ending of the effluents: 'The effluents are ended in me.'
“Furthermore, the mind of a monk whose effluents are ended inclines toward seclusion, leans toward seclusion, tends toward seclusion, stays in seclusion, delights in renunciation, entirely rid of the qualities that act as a basis for the effluents.
The fact that the mind of a monk whose effluents are ended inclines toward seclusion, leans toward seclusion, tends toward seclusion, stays in seclusion, delights in renunciation, entirely rid of the qualities that act as a basis for the effluents is also is a strength of a monk whose effluents are ended, with reference to which he affirms the ending of the effluents: 'The effluents are ended in me.'
“Furthermore, the four establishings of mindfulness are developed, well-developed by a monk whose effluents are ended.
The fact that the four establishings of mindfulness are developed, well-developed by a monk whose effluents are ended is also is a strength of a monk whose effluents are ended, with reference to which he affirms the ending of the effluents: 'The effluents are ended in me.'
“Furthermore, the four bases of power are developed, well-developed by a monk whose effluents are ended…
“Furthermore, the five faculties are developed, well-developed by a monk whose effluents are ended…
“Furthermore, the seven factors for Awakening are developed, well-developed by a monk whose effluents are ended…
“Furthermore, the noble eightfold path is developed, well-developed by a monk whose effluents are ended.
The fact that the noble eightfold path is developed, well-developed by a monk whose effluents are ended is also is a strength of a monk whose effluents are ended, with reference to which he affirms the ending of the effluents: 'The effluents are ended in me.'
“These, lord, are the eight strengths of a monk whose effluents are ended, endowed with which he affirms the ending of the effluents: 'The effluents are ended in me.'”
Once the Blessed One was staying among the Bhaggas in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Haunt.
And at that time Ven.
Anuruddha was living among the Cetis in the Eastern Bamboo Park.
Then, as he was alone in seclusion, this line of thinking arose in Ven.
Anuruddha's awareness: “This Dhamma is for one who is modest, not for one who is self-aggrandizing.
This Dhamma is for one who is content, not for one who is discontent.
This Dhamma is for one who is reclusive, not for one who is entangled.
This Dhamma is for one whose persistence is aroused, not for one who is lazy.
This Dhamma is for one whose mindfulness is established, not for one whose mindfulness is confused.
This Dhamma is for one whose mind is centered, not for one whose mind is uncentered.
This Dhamma is for one endowed with discernment, not for whose discernment is weak.
Then the Blessed One, realizing with his awareness the line of thinking in Ven.
Anuruddha's awareness — just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — disappeared from among the Bhaggas in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Haunt, and re-appeared among the Cetis in the Eastern Bamboo Park, right in front of Ven.
Anuruddha.
There he sat down on a prepared seat.
As for Ven.
Anuruddha, having bowed down to the Blessed One, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the Blessed One said to him, “Good, Anuruddha, very good.
It's good that you think these thoughts of a great person: 'This Dhamma is for one who is modest, not for one who is self-aggrandizing.
This Dhamma is for one who is content, not for one who is discontent.
This Dhamma is for one who is reclusive, not for one who is entangled.
This Dhamma is for one whose persistence is aroused, not for one who is lazy.
This Dhamma is for one whose mindfulness is established, not for one whose mindfulness is confused.
This Dhamma is for one whose mind is centered, not for one whose mind is uncentered.
This Dhamma is for one endowed with discernment, not for one whose discernment is weak.' Now then, Anuruddha, think the eighth thought of a great person: 'This Dhamma is for one who enjoys non-objectification, who delights in non-objectification, not for one who enjoys & delights in objectification.'
“Anuruddha, when you think these eight thoughts of a great person, then — whenever you want — quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, you will enter & remain in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
When you think these eight thoughts of a great person, then — whenever you want — with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, you will enter & remain in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance… with the fading of rapture, you will remain in equanimity, mindful & alert, physically sensitive to pleasure.
You will enter & remain in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous and mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' When you think these eight thoughts of a great person, then — whenever you want — with the abandoning of pleasure & pain, as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress, you will enter & remain in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
“Now, when you think these eight thoughts of a great person and become a person who can attain at will, without trouble or difficulty, these four jhanas — heightened mental states providing a pleasant abiding in the here & now — then your robe of cast-off rags will seem to you to be just like the clothes chest of a householder or householder's son, full of clothes of many colors.
As you live contented, it will serve for your delight, for a comfortable abiding, for non-agitation, & for alighting on Unbinding.
“When you think these eight thoughts of a great person and become a person who can attain at will, without trouble or difficulty, these four jhanas — heightened mental states providing a pleasant abiding in the here & now — then your meal of almsfood will seem to you to be just like the rice & wheat of a householder or householder's son, cleaned of black grains, and served with a variety of sauces & seasonings… your dwelling at the foot of a tree will seem to you to be just like the gabled mansion of a householder or householder's son, plastered inside & out, draft-free, bolted, and with its shutters closed… your bed on a spread of grass will seem to you like the couch of a householder or householder's son, spread with long-haired coverlets, white woolen coverlets, embroidered coverlets, antelope-hide & deer-skin rugs, covered with a canopy, and with red cushions for the head & feet…
“When you think these eight thoughts of a great person and become a person who can attain at will, without trouble or difficulty, these four jhanas — heightened mental states providing a pleasant abiding in the here & now — then your medicine of strong-smelling urine will seem to you to be just like the various tonics of a householder or householder's son: ghee, fresh butter, oil, honey, and molasses sugar.
As you live contented, it will serve for your delight, for a comfortable abiding, for non-agitation, & for alighting on Unbinding.
“Now, then, Anuruddha, you are to stay right here among the Cetis for the coming Rains Retreat.
“As you say, lord,” Ven.
Anuruddha replied.
Then, having given this exhortation to Ven.
Anuruddha, the Blessed One — as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — disappeared from the Eastern Bamboo Park of the Cetis and reappeared among the Bhaggas in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Haunt.
He sat down on a prepared seat and, as he was sitting there, he addressed the monks: “Monks, I will teach you the eight thoughts of a great person.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said, “Now, what are the eight thoughts of a great person?
This Dhamma is for one who is modest, not for one who is self-aggrandizing.
This Dhamma is for one who is content, not for one who is discontent.
This Dhamma is for one who is reclusive, not for one who is entangled.
This Dhamma is for one whose persistence is aroused, not for one who is lazy.
This Dhamma is for one whose mindfulness is established, not for one whose mindfulness is confused.
This Dhamma is for one whose mind is centered, not for one whose mind is uncentered.
This Dhamma is for one endowed with discernment, not for one whose discernment is weak.
This Dhamma is for one who enjoys non-objectification, who delights in non-objectification, not for one who enjoys & delights in objectification.
“'This Dhamma is for one who is modest, not for one who is self-aggrandizing.' Thus was it said.
With reference to what was it said?
There is the case where a monk, being modest, does not want it to be known that 'He is modest.' Being content, he does not want it to be known that 'He is content.' Being reclusive, he does not want it to be known that 'He is reclusive.' His persistence being aroused, he does not want it to be known that 'His persistence is aroused.' His mindfulness being established, he does not want it to be known that 'His mindfulness is established.' His mind being centered, he does not want it to be known that 'His mind is centered.' Being endowed with discernment, he does not want it to be known that 'He is endowed with discernment.' Enjoying non-objectification, he does not want it to be known that 'He is enjoying non-objectification.' 'This Dhamma is for one who is modest, not for one who is self-aggrandizing.' Thus was it said.
And with reference to this was it said.
“'This Dhamma is for one who is content, not for one who is discontent.' Thus was it said.
With reference to what was it said?
There is the case where a monk is content with any old robe cloth at all, any old almsfood, any old lodging, any old medicinal requisites for curing sickness at all.
'This Dhamma is for one who is content, not for one who is discontent.' Thus was it said.
And with reference to this was it said.
“'This Dhamma is for one who is reclusive, not for one who is entangled.' Thus was it said.
With reference to what was it said?
There is the case where a monk, when living in seclusion, is visited by monks, nuns, lay men, lay women, kings, royal ministers, sectarians & their disciples.
With his mind bent on seclusion, tending toward seclusion, inclined toward seclusion, aiming at seclusion, relishing renunciation, he converses with them only as much as is necessary for them to take their leave.
'This Dhamma is for one who is reclusive, not for one who is entangled.' Thus was it said.
And with reference to this was it said.
“'This Dhamma is for one whose persistence is aroused, not for one who is lazy.' Thus was it said.
With reference to what was it said?
There is the case where a monk keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and taking on skillful mental qualities.
He is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
'This Dhamma is for one whose persistence is aroused, not for one who is lazy.' Thus was it said.
And with reference to this was it said.
“'This Dhamma is for one whose mindfulness is established, not for one whose mindfulness is confused.' Thus was it said.
With reference to what was it said?
There is the case where a monk is mindful, highly meticulous, remembering & able to call to mind even things that were done & said long ago.
'This Dhamma is for one whose mindfulness is established, not for one whose mindfulness is confused.' Thus was it said.
And with reference to this was it said.
“'This Dhamma is for one whose mind is centered, not for one whose mind is uncentered.' Thus was it said.
With reference to what was it said?
There is the case where a monk, quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful mental qualities, enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
With the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' With the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
'This Dhamma is for one whose mind is centered, not for one whose mind is uncentered.' Thus was it said.
And with reference to this was it said.
“'This Dhamma is for one endowed with discernment, not for one whose discernment is weak.' Thus was it said.
With reference to what was it said?
There is the case where a monk is discerning, endowed with discernment of arising & passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
'This Dhamma is for one endowed with discernment, not for one whose discernment is weak.' Thus was it said.
And with reference to this was it said.
“'This Dhamma is for one who enjoys non-objectification, who delights in non-objectification, not for one who enjoys & delights in objectification.' Thus was it said.
With reference to what was it said?
There is the case where a monk's mind leaps up, grows confident, steadfast, & is firm in the cessation of objectification.
'This Dhamma is for one who enjoys non-objectification, who delights in non-objectification, not for one who enjoys & delights in objectification.' Thus was it said.
And with reference to this was it said.
Now, during the following Rains Retreat, Ven.
Anuruddha stayed right there in the Eastern Bamboo Park among the Cetis.
Dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute, he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And thus Ven.
Anuruddha became another one of the arahants.
Then, on attaining arahantship, he uttered this verse:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying in Rajagaha, at Jivaka's Mango Grove.
Then Jivaka Komarabhacca went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “Lord, to what extent is one a lay follower?
“Jivaka, when one has gone to the Buddha for refuge, has gone to the Dhamma for refuge, and has gone to the Sangha for refuge, then to that extent is one a lay follower.
“And to what extent, lord, is one a virtuous lay follower?
“Jivaka, when one abstains from taking life, from stealing, from sexual misconduct, from lying, and from fermented & distilled drinks that lead to heedlessness, then to that extent is one a virtuous lay follower.
“And to what extent, lord, is one a lay follower who practices for his own benefit but not that of others?
“Jivaka, when a lay follower himself is consummate in conviction but does not encourage others in the consummation of conviction; when he himself is consummate in virtue but does not encourage others in the consummation of virtue; when he himself is consummate in generosity but does not encourage others in the consummation of generosity; when he himself desires to see the monks but does not encourage others to see the monks; when he himself wants to hear the true Dhamma but does not encourage others to hear the true Dhamma; when he himself habitually remembers the Dhamma he has heard but does not encourage others to remember the Dhamma they have heard; when he himself explores the meaning of the Dhamma he has heard but does not encourage others to explore the meaning of the Dhamma they have heard; when he himself, knowing both the Dhamma & its meaning, practices the Dhamma in line with the Dhamma, but does not encourage others to practice the Dhamma in line with the Dhamma: then to that extent he is a lay follower who practices for his own benefit but not for the benefit of others.
“And to what extent, lord, is one a lay follower who practices both for his own benefit & the benefit of others?
“Jivaka, when a lay follower himself is consummate in conviction and encourages others in the consummation of conviction; when he himself is consummate in virtue and encourages others in the consummation of virtue; when he himself is consummate in generosity and encourages others in the consummation of generosity; when he himself desires to see the monks and encourages others to see the monks; when he himself wants to hear the true Dhamma and encourages others to hear the true Dhamma; when he himself habitually remembers the Dhamma he has heard and encourages others to remember the Dhamma they have heard; when he himself explores the meaning of the Dhamma he has heard and encourages others to explore the meaning of the Dhamma they have heard; when he himself, knowing both the Dhamma & its meaning, practices the Dhamma in line with the Dhamma and encourages others to practice the Dhamma in line with the Dhamma: then to that extent he is a lay follower who practices both for his own benefit and for the benefit of others.”
Once the Blessed One was dwelling among the Sakyas in Nigrodha Park at Kapilavatthu.
There, Mahanama the Sakyan approached the Blessed One.
Having approached and paid respect to the Blessed One, he sat aside.
Then, seated aside, Mahanama the Sakyan said thus to the Blessed One:
“Venerable sir, in what way is one a lay follower?
“Mahanama, inasmuch as one has gone to the Buddha for refuge, has gone to the Dhamma for refuge, has gone to the Sangha for refuge; in that way, Mahanama, one is a lay follower.
“Then, venerable sir, in what way is a lay follower virtuous?
“Mahanama, inasmuch as a lay follower abstains from destroying living beings; abstains from taking what is not given; abstains from sexual misconduct; abstains from lying; and abstains from wine, liquor and intoxicants that are causes for heedlessness; in that way, Mahanama, a lay follower is virtuous.
“Then, venerable sir, in what way is a lay follower engaged in his own welfare, but not in others' welfare?
“Mahanama, inasmuch as a lay follower is possessed of faith himself, but rouses not others to possess faith; is possessed of virtue himself, but rouses not others to possess virtue; is possessed of liberality himself, but rouses not others to possess liberality; is himself desirous of meeting with monks, but rouses not others to meet with monks; is himself desirous of hearing the true Dhamma, but rouses not others to hear the true Dhamma; is himself habitually mindful of the Dhamma that is heard, but rouses not others to be mindful of the Dhamma; has himself ascertained the meaning/benefit of the Dhamma that is heard, but rouses not others to ascertain the meaning/benefit; having known the meaning/benefit, having known the Dhamma, is himself committed to the practice according to the Dhamma, but rouses not others to be committed to the practice according to the Dhamma; in that way, Mahanama, a lay follower is engaged in his own welfare, but not in others' welfare.
“Then, venerable sir, in what way is a lay follower engaged in his own welfare and in others' welfare?
“Mahanama, inasmuch as a lay follower is possessed of faith himself, and rouses others to possess faith; is possessed of virtue himself, and rouses others to possess virtue; is possessed of liberality himself, and rouses others to possess liberality; is himself desirous of meeting with monks, and rouses others to meet with monks; is himself desirous of hearing the true Dhamma, and rouses others to hear the true Dhamma; is himself habitually mindful of the Dhamma that is heard, and rouses others to be mindful of the Dhamma; is himself ascertained of the meaning/benefit of the Dhamma that is heard, and rouses others to ascertain the meaning/benefit; having known the meaning/benefit, having known the Dhamma, is himself committed to the practice according to the Dhamma, and rouses others to be committed to the practice according to the Dhamma; in that way, Mahanama, a lay follower is engaged in his own welfare and in others' welfare.”
Translator's note: The four grounds for the bonds of fellowship appear in the early Mahayana sutras as guidelines for every aspiring bodhisattva — one of the few teachings that even the more radical Mahayana sutras adopt from the early canons.
The following sutta, which maintains that these four qualities are required for developing any large following, may account for this fact.
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Alavi at the Aggalava Shrine.
Then Hatthaka of Alavi, surrounded by approximately lay followers, went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the Blessed One said to him, “Large is your following, Hatthaka.
How have you won over this large following?
“Lord, I have won over this large following through the four grounds for the bonds of fellowship taught by the Blessed One.
When I know that, 'This person is to be won over by giving,' then I win him/her over by giving.
When I know that, 'This person is to be won over by kind words,' then I win him/her over by kind words.
When I know that, 'This person is to be won over by beneficial help,' then I win him/her over by beneficial help.
When I know that, 'This person is to be won over by consistency,' then I win him/her over by consistency.
Awed by the wealth of my family, they regard me as worth listening to, which would not be the case if I were poor.
“It's good, Hatthaka, it's very good that this is the means by which you have won over a large following.
All those in the past who have won over a large following have done so by means of these four same grounds for the bonds of fellowship.
All those in the future who will win over a large following will do so by means of these four same grounds for the bonds of fellowship.
All those at present who are winning over a large following do so by means of these four same grounds for the bonds of fellowship.
Then, having been instructed, urged, roused, & encouraged by the Blessed One with a talk on Dhamma, Hatthaka of Alavi got up from his seat, bowed down to the Blessed One, circled him — keeping him on his right — and left.
Not long after he had left, the Blessed One said to the monks, “Monks, remember Hatthaka of Alavi as being endowed with eight amazing, astounding qualities.
Which eight?
Hatthaka of Alavi is endowed with conviction.
He is virtuous.
He has a sense of conscience.
He has a sense of concern.
He is learned.
He is generous.
He is discerning.
He is modest.
Remember Hatthaka of Alavi as being endowed with these eight amazing, astounding qualities.”
Translator's note: On the surface, the qualities the Buddha attributes to Hatthaka in this sutta do not seem especially “amazing” or “astounding.” Keep in mind, however, that the Canon depicts Hatthaka as very wealthy, and the Commentary adds that he is a prince.
To find such qualities in a person of power and wealth is fairly amazing.
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Alavi at the Aggalava Shrine.
There he addressed the monks: “Monks, remember Hatthaka of Alavi as being endowed with seven amazing, astounding qualities.
Which seven?
Monks, Hatthaka of Alavi is endowed with conviction.
He is virtuous.
He has a sense of conscience.
He has a sense of concern.
He is learned.
He is generous.
He is discerning.
Remember Hatthaka of Alavi as being endowed with these seven amazing, astounding qualities.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said it, the One Well-gone, getting up from his seat, went into his dwelling.
Then early in the morning a certain monk, having put on his robes and carrying his bowl & outer robe, went to Hatthaka of Alavi's home.
On arrival, he sat down on a seat made ready.
Then Hatthaka of Alavi approached the monk and, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the monk said to him, “Friend, the Blessed One has described you as being endowed with seven amazing, astounding qualities.
Which seven?
'Hatthaka of Alavi is endowed with conviction.
He is virtuous.
He has a sense of conscience.
He has a sense of concern.
He is learned.
He is generous.
He is discerning.' Friend, the Blessed One has described you as being endowed with these seven amazing, astounding qualities.
“I hope, sir, that there were no white-clad householders there.
“No, friend, there were no white-clad householders there.
“It's good, sir, that there were no white-clad householders there.
Then the monk, having received alms at Hatthaka of Alavi's home, departed.
After his meal, returning from his alms round, he went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, 
“It's good, monk, it's very good that the clansman is modest and does not want others to know of the skillful qualities present in him.
In that case, monk, remember Hatthaka of Alavi as being endowed with this eighth amazing, astounding quality: modesty.”
“Monks, I will teach you the eight unruly horses and eight faults in horses, the eight unruly men and eight faults in men.
Listen and pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks replied.
The Blessed One said: “Now, which are the eight unruly horses and eight faults in horses?
“There is the case where some unruly horses — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — back up and push the chariot back with their hindquarters.
Some unruly horses are like this.
This is the first fault in a horse.
“Then again, some unruly horses — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — jump back and hit the carriage railing, breaking the triple bar.
Some unruly horses are like this.
This is the second fault in a horse.
“Then again, some unruly horses — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — kick the chariot pole and stomp on it.
Some unruly horses are like this.
This is the third fault in a horse.
“Then again, some unruly horses — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — go off the road and make the chariot turn over.
Some unruly horses are like this.
This is the fourth fault in a horse.
“Then again, some unruly horses — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — rear up and paw the air.
Some unruly horses are like this.
This is the fifth fault in a horse.
“Then again, some unruly horses — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — not heeding the goad, bite through the bit with their teeth and go where they will.
Some unruly horses are like this.
This is the sixth fault in a horse.
“Then again, some unruly horses — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — go neither forward nor back, but stand right there like a post.
Some unruly horses are like this.
This is the seventh fault in a horse.
“Then again, some unruly horses — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — draw in their forefeet, draw in their hindfeet, and sit down right there on their four feet.
Some unruly horses are like this.
This is the eighth fault in a horse.
“These, monks, are the eight unruly horses and eight faults in horses.
“And which are the eight unruly men and eight faults in men?
“There is the case where the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, denies the offense, 'I don't remember.
I don't remember.' He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — backs up and pushes the chariot back with its hindquarters.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the first fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, attacks the accuser: 'What use is there in your speaking, you inexperienced fool.
Think of yourself as worthy to be spoken to.' He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — jumps back and hits the carriage railing, breaking the triple bar.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the second fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, accuses the accuser in return: 'You, too, have committed an offense of this name.
You make amends for it first.' He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — kicks the chariot pole and stomps on it.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the third fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, wanders from one thing to another, straying outside the topic, displaying anger, irritation, & sulkiness.
He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — goes off the road and makes the chariot turn over.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the fourth fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, speaks waving his arms around in the midst of the Sangha.
He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — rears up and paws the air.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the fifth fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, not heeding the Sangha, not heeding his accuser, goes off where he will, still an offender.
He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — not heeding the goad, bites through the bit with its teeth and goes where it will.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the sixth fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, 'I've neither committed an offense, nor have I committed an offense,' vexes the Sangha by falling silent.
He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — goes neither forward nor back, but stands right there like a post.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the seventh fault in a man.
“Then again, the monks accuse a monk of an offense.
He, being accused of an offense by the monks, says this: 'Why do you venerable ones persecute me so much?
I'll disavow the training and return to the lower life.' On having disavowed the training and returned to the lower life he says, 'I hope you venerable ones are gratified now!' He, I tell you, is just like the unruly horse who — when goaded, ordered, and told 'Go!' by the charioteer — draws in its forefeet, draws in its hind feet, and sits down right there on its four feet.
Some unruly men are like this.
This is the eighth fault in a man.
“These, monks, are the eight unruly men and eight faults in men.”
“Endowed with eight qualities, a king's auspicious thoroughbred steed is worthy of a king, is a king's asset, counts as a very limb of his king.
Which eight?
“There is the case where a king's auspicious thoroughbred steed is well-born on both sides, his mother's & his father's; he is born in the country where other auspicious thoroughbred steeds are born.
“When given food, whether fresh or dried, he eats it carefully, without scattering it around.
“He feels disgust at sitting or lying down in urine or excrement.
“He is composed & easy to live with, and doesn't harass the other horses.
“Whatever tricks or deceits or wiles or subterfuges he has, he shows them as they actually are to his trainer, so that his trainer can try to straighten them out.
“When in harness he gives rise to the thought, 'Whether the other horses want to pull or not, I'll pull here.'
“When going, he goes the straight path.
“He is steadfast and remains steadfast to the end of life & death.
“Endowed with these eight qualities, a king's auspicious thoroughbred steed is worthy of a king, is a king's asset, counts as a very limb of his king.
“In the same way, a monk endowed with eight qualities is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, an incomparable field of merit for the world.
Which eight?
“There is the case where a monk is virtuous.
He dwells restrained in accordance with the Patimokkha, consummate in his behavior & sphere of activity.
He trains himself, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
“When given food, whether coarse or refined, he eats it carefully, without complaining.
“He feels disgust at bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, mental misconduct, at the development of evil, unskillful qualities.
“He is composed & easy to live with, and doesn't harass the other monks.
“Whatever tricks or deceits or wiles or subterfuges he has, he shows them as they actually are to the Teacher or to his knowledgeable companions in the holy life, so that the Teacher or his knowledgeable companions in the holy life can try to straighten them out.
“When in training he gives rise to the thought, 'Whether the other monks want to train or not, I'll train here.'
“When going, he goes the straight path; here the straight path is this: right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
“He dwells with his persistence aroused, 'Gladly would I let the flesh & blood in my body dry up, leaving just the skin, tendons, & bones, but if I have not attained what can be reached through human steadfastness, human persistence, human striving, there will be no relaxing my persistence.' “Endowed with these eight qualities, a monk is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, an incomparable field of merit for the world.”
“Monks, speaking rightly of Nanda, one could say, 'He is a son of a good family.' Speaking rightly of Nanda, one could say, 'He is strong.' Speaking rightly of Nanda, one could say, 'He is handsome.' Speaking rightly of Nanda, one could say, 'He is fiercely passionate.' If Nanda did not guard the doors of his senses, know moderation in eating, be devoted to wakefulness, and be endowed with mindfulness & alertness, how would he be able to follow the holy life, complete & pure?
“This is Nanda's guarding of the doors of his senses: If he should look to the east, he looks focusing his entire awareness, 'As I am looking thus to the east, greed & distress, evil unskillful qualities, will not flow out.' That's how he is alert there.
If he should look to the west… the north… the south… above… below… to the intermediate directions, he looks focusing his entire awareness, 'As I am looking thus to the intermediate directions, greed & distress, evil unskillful qualities, will not flow out.' That's how he is alert there.
This is Nanda's guarding of the doors of his senses.
“This is Nanda's knowledge of moderation in eating: Nanda takes his food reflecting appropriately, not playfully, nor for intoxication, nor for putting on bulk, nor for beautification, but simply for the survival & continuance of this body, for ending its afflictions, for the support of the holy life, 'I will destroy old feelings & not create new feelings.
Thus I will maintain myself, be blameless, & live in comfort.' This is Nanda's knowledge of moderation in eating.
“This is Nanda's devotion to wakefulness: There is the case where Nanda during the day, sitting & pacing back & forth, cleanses his mind of any qualities that would hold the mind in check.
During the first watch of the night, sitting & pacing back & forth, he cleanses his mind of any qualities that would hold the mind in check.
During the second watch of the night, reclining on his right side, he takes up the lion's posture, one foot placed on top of the other, mindful, alert, with his mind set on getting up.
During the last watch of the night, sitting & pacing back & forth, he cleanses his mind of any qualities that would hold the mind in check.
This is Nanda's devotion to wakefulness.
“This is Nanda's being in mindfulness & alertness: There is the case where feelings are known to Nanda as they arise, known as they persist, known as they subside.
Perceptions are known as they arise, known as they persist, known as they subside.
Thoughts are known as they arise, known as they persist, known as they subside.
This is Nanda's being in mindfulness & alertness.
“Monks, if Nanda did not guard the doors of his senses, know moderation in eating, be devoted to wakefulness, and be endowed with mindfulness & alertness, how would he be able to follow the holy life, complete & pure?”
On one occasion Ven.
Uttara was staying in Mahisavatthu on Sankheyyaka Mountain in Dhavajalika.
There he addressed the monks:
“Friends, it's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on his own failings.
It's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on the failings of others.
It's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on his own attainments.
It's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on the attainments of others.
Now on that occasion the Great King Vessavana had gone from the north to the south on some business or other.
He heard Ven.
Uttara in Mahisavatthu on Sankheyyaka Mountain in Dhavajalika teaching the monks the Dhamma in this way: “Friends, it's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on his own failings.
It's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on the failings of others.
It's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on his own attainments.
It's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on the attainments of others.” So — just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — the Great King Vessavana disappeared from Dhavajalika on Sankheyyaka Mountain in Mahisavatthu and reappeared among the devas of the Heaven of the Thirty-three.
Then he went to Sakka the deva-king and, on arrival, said, “You should know, dear sir, that Ven.
Uttara in Mahisavatthu on Sankheyyaka Mountain in Dhavajalika is teaching the monks the Dhamma in this way: 'Friends, it's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on his own failings… on the failings of others… on his own attainments… on the attainments of others.' So Sakka the deva-king — just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — disappeared from the devas of the Heaven of the Thirty-three and reappeared in Mahisavatthu on Sankheyyaka Mountain in Dhavajalika in Ven.
Uttara's presence.
Then he went to Ven.
Uttara and, on arrival, bowed down to him and stood to one side.
As he was standing there, he said to Ven.
Uttara, “Is it true, venerable sir, that Ven.
Uttara is teaching the monks the Dhamma in this way: 'Friends, it's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on his own failings… on the failings of others… on his own attainments… on the attainments of others'?
“Yes, deva-king.
“But is this Ven.
Uttara's own extemporaneous invention, or is it the saying of the Blessed One, the Worthy One, the Rightly Self-awakened One?
“Very well, then, deva-king, I will give you an analogy, for there are cases where it's through an analogy that observant people can understand the meaning of what is being said.
Suppose that not far from a village or town there was a great pile of grain, from which a great crowd of people were carrying away grain on their bodies, on their heads, in their laps, or in their cupped hands.
If someone were to approach that great crowd of people and ask them, 'From where are you carrying away grain?' answering in what way would that great crowd of people answer so as to be answering rightly?
“Venerable sir, they would answer, 'We are carrying it from that great pile of grain,' so as to be answering rightly.
“In the same way, deva-king, whatever is well said is all a saying of the Blessed One, the Worthy One, the Rightly Self-awakened One.
Adopting it again & again from there do we & others speak.
“Amazing, venerable sir.
Astounding, venerable sir — how well that has been said by Ven.
Uttara: 'Whatever is well said is all a saying of the Blessed One, the Worthy One, the Rightly Self-awakened One.
Adopting it again & again from there do we & others speak.' * On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha on Vulture Peak Mountain, not long after Devadatta's departure.
There, referring to Devadatta, he addressed the monks: 'Monks, it's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on his own failings.
It's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on the failings of others.
It's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on his own attainments.
It's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on the attainments of others.
“'Conquered by eight untrue dhammas, his mind overcome, Devadatta is headed for a state of deprivation, headed for hell, there to stay for an eon, incurable.
Which eight?
“'Conquered by material gain, his mind overcome, Devadatta is headed for a state of deprivation, headed for hell, there to stay for an eon, incurable.
“'Conquered by lack of material gain…
“'Conquered by status…
“'Conquered by lack of status…
“'Conquered by offerings…
“'Conquered by lack of offerings…
“'Conquered by evil ambition…
“'Conquered by evil friendship, his mind overcome, Devadatta is headed for a state of deprivation, headed for hell, there to stay for an eon, incurable.
“'Monks, it's good for a monk to keep conquering again & again any arisen material gain.
It's good for a monk to keep conquering again & again any arisen lack of material gain… any arisen status… any arisen lack of status… any arisen offerings… any arisen lack of offerings… any arisen evil ambition… any arisen evil friendship.
“'And for what compelling reason should a monk keep conquering again & again any arisen material gain… any arisen evil friendship?
Because when one dwells not having conquered any arisen material gain, effluents arise, along with vexations & fevers.
But when one dwells having conquered any arisen material gain, those effluents, vexations, & fevers are not.
“'It's for this compelling reason that a monk should keep conquering again & again any arisen material gain… any arisen evil friendship.
“'Therefore, monks, you should train yourselves: 'We will keep conquering again & again any arisen material gain… any arisen lack of material gain… any arisen status… any arisen lack of status… any arisen offerings… any arisen lack of offerings… any arisen evil ambition… any arisen evil friendship.' That's how you should train yourselves.' *
“Up to now, Ven.
Uttara, the four companies — monks, nuns, lay men, & lay women — have not established this Dhamma-discourse among human beings.
Take up this Dhamma-discourse, Ven.
Uttara!
Master this Dhamma-discourse, Ven.
Uttara!
Remember this Dhamma-discourse, Ven.
Uttara!
Connected with the goal is this Dhamma-discourse, and basic to the holy life!
See also: AN..
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha on Vulture Peak Mountain, not long after Devadatta's departure.
There, referring to Devadatta, he addressed the monks: “Monks, it's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on his own failings.
It's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on the failings of others.
It's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on his own attainments.
It's good for a monk periodically to have reflected on the attainments of others.
“Conquered by eight untrue dhammas, his mind overcome, Devadatta is headed for a state of deprivation, headed for hell, there to stay for an eon, incurable.
Which eight?
“Conquered by material gain, his mind overcome, Devadatta is headed for a state of deprivation, headed for hell, there to stay for an eon, incurable.
“Conquered by lack of material gain…
“Conquered by status…
“Conquered by lack of status…
“Conquered by offerings…
“Conquered by lack of offerings…
“Conquered by evil ambition…
“Conquered by evil friendship, his mind overcome, Devadatta is headed for a state of deprivation, headed for hell, there to stay for an eon, incurable.
“Monks, it's good for a monk to keep conquering again & again any arisen material gain.
It's good for a monk to keep conquering again & again any arisen lack of material gain… any arisen status… any arisen lack of status… any arisen offerings… any arisen lack of offerings… any arisen evil ambition… any arisen evil friendship.
“And for what compelling reason should a monk keep conquering again & again any arisen material gain… any arisen evil friendship?
Because when one dwells not having conquered any arisen material gain, effluents arise, along with vexations & fevers.
But when one dwells having conquered any arisen material gain, those effluents, vexations, & fevers are not.
“It's for this compelling reason that a monk should keep conquering again & again any arisen material gain… any arisen evil friendship.
“Therefore, monks, you should train yourselves: 'We will keep conquering again & again any arisen material gain… any arisen lack of material gain… any arisen status… any arisen lack of status… any arisen offerings… any arisen lack of offerings… any arisen evil ambition… any arisen evil friendship.' That's how you should train yourselves.
See also: AN..
“Monks, these eight worldly conditions spin after the world, and the world spins after these eight worldly conditions.
Which eight?
Gain, loss, status, disgrace, censure, praise, pleasure, & pain.
These are the eight worldly conditions that spin after the world, and the world spins after these eight worldly conditions.
“For an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person there arise gain, loss, status, disgrace, censure, praise, pleasure, & pain.
For a well-instructed disciple of the noble ones there also arise gain, loss, status, disgrace, censure, praise, pleasure, & pain.
So what difference, what distinction, what distinguishing factor is there between the well-instructed disciple of the noble ones and the uninstructed run-of-the-mill person?
“For us, lord, the teachings have the Blessed One as their root, their guide, & their arbitrator.
It would be good if the Blessed One himself would explicate the meaning of this statement.
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the monks will remember it.
“In that case, monks, listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said, “Gain arises for an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person.
He does not reflect, 'Gain has arisen for me.
It is inconstant, stressful, & subject to change.' He does not discern it as it actually is.
“Loss arises… Status arises… Disgrace arises… Censure arises… Praise arises… Pleasure arises…
“Pain arises.
He does not reflect, 'Pain has arisen for me.
It is inconstant, stressful, & subject to change.' He does not discern it as it actually is.
“His mind remains consumed with the gain.
His mind remains consumed with the loss… with the status… the disgrace… the censure… the praise… the pleasure.
His mind remains consumed with the pain.
“He welcomes the arisen gain and rebels against the arisen loss.
He welcomes the arisen status and rebels against the arisen disgrace.
He welcomes the arisen praise and rebels against the arisen censure.
He welcomes the arisen pleasure and rebels against the arisen pain.
As he is thus engaged in welcoming & rebelling, he is not released from birth, aging, or death; from sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, or despairs.
He is not released, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
“Now, gain arises for a well-instructed disciple of the noble ones.
He reflects, 'Gain has arisen for me.
It is inconstant, stressful, & subject to change.' He discerns it as it actually is.
“Loss arises… Status arises… Disgrace arises… Censure arises… Praise arises… Pleasure arises…
“Pain arises.
He reflects, 'Pain has arisen for me.
It is inconstant, stressful, & subject to change.' He discerns it as it actually is.
“His mind does not remain consumed with the gain.
His mind does not remain consumed with the loss… with the status… the disgrace… the censure… the praise… the pleasure.
His mind does not remain consumed with the pain.
“He does not welcome the arisen gain, or rebel against the arisen loss.
He does not welcome the arisen status, or rebel against the arisen disgrace.
He does not welcome the arisen praise, or rebel against the arisen censure.
He does not welcome the arisen pleasure, or rebel against the arisen pain.
As he thus abandons welcoming & rebelling, he is released from birth, aging, & death; from sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
He is released, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
“This is the difference, this the distinction, this the distinguishing factor between the well-instructed disciple of the noble ones and the uninstructed run-of-the-mill person.”
“Monks, these eight causes, these eight requisite conditions lead to the acquiring of the as-yet-unacquired discernment that is basic to the holy life, and to the increase, plenitude, development, & culmination of that which has already been acquired.
Which eight?
“There is the case where a monk lives in apprenticeship to the Teacher or to a respectable comrade in the holy life in whom he has established a strong sense of conscience, fear of blame, love, & respect.
This, monks, is the first cause, the first requisite condition that leads to the acquiring of the as-yet-unacquired discernment that is basic to the holy life, and to the increase, plenitude, development, & culmination of that which has already been acquired.
“As he lives in apprenticeship under the Teacher or under a respectable comrade in the holy life in whom he has established a strong sense of conscience, fear of blame, love, & respect, he approaches him at the appropriate times to ask & question him: 'What, venerable sir, is the meaning of this statement?' He reveals what is hidden, makes plain what is obscure, and dispels perplexity in many kinds of perplexing things.
This is the second cause, the second requisite condition…
“Having heard the Dhamma, he achieves a twofold seclusion: seclusion in body & seclusion in mind.
This is the third cause, the third requisite condition…
“He is virtuous.
He dwells restrained in accordance with the Patimokkha, consummate in his behavior & sphere of activity.
He trains himself, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
This is the fourth cause, the fourth requisite condition…
“He has heard much, has retained what he has heard, has stored what he has heard.
Whatever teachings are admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, admirable in the end, that — in their meaning & expression — proclaim the holy life that is entirely complete & pure: those he has listened to often, retained, discussed, accumulated, examined with his mind, & well-penetrated in terms of his views.
This is the fifth cause, the fifth requisite condition…
“He keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and for taking on skillful mental qualities.
He is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
This is the sixth cause, the sixth requisite condition…
“When he is in the midst of the Sangha he doesn't talk on & on about a variety of things.
Either he speaks Dhamma himself or he invites another to do so, and he feels no disdain for noble silence.
This is the seventh cause, the seventh requisite condition…
“He remains focused on arising & passing away with regard to the five aggregates: 'Such is form, such its origination, such its disappearance.
Such is feeling… Such is perception… Such are fabrications… Such is consciousness, such its origination, such its disappearance.' This, monks, is the eighth cause, the eighth requisite condition that leads to the acquiring of the as-yet-unacquired discernment that is basic to the holy life, and to the increase, plenitude, development, & culmination of that which has already been acquired.
“When this is the case, his comrades in the holy life hold him in esteem: 'This venerable one lives in apprenticeship to the Teacher or to a respectable comrade in the holy life in whom he has established a strong sense of conscience, fear of blame, love, & respect.
Surely, knowing, he knows; seeing, he sees.' This is a factor leading to endearment, to respect, to development, to consonance, to unification.
” 'As he lives in apprenticeship under the Teacher or under a respectable comrade in the holy life in whom he has established a strong sense of conscience, fear of blame, love, & respect, he approaches him at the appropriate times to ask & question him: 'What, venerable sir, is the meaning of this statement?' He reveals what is hidden, makes plain what is obscure, and dispels perplexity in all kinds of perplexing things.
Surely, knowing, he knows; seeing, he sees.' This is a factor leading to endearment, to respect, to development, to consonance, to unification.
” 'Having heard the Dhamma, he achieves a twofold seclusion: seclusion in body & seclusion in mind.
Surely, knowing, he knows; seeing, he sees.' This, too, is a factor leading to endearment, to respect, to development, to consonance, to unification.
” 'He is virtuous.
He dwells restrained in accordance with the Patimokkha, consummate in his behavior & sphere of activity.
He trains himself, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
Surely, knowing, he knows; seeing, he sees.' This, too, is a factor leading to endearment, to respect, to development, to consonance, to unification.
” 'He has heard much, has retained what he has heard, has stored what he has heard.
Whatever teachings are admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, admirable in the end, that — in their meaning & expression — proclaim the holy life that is entirely complete & pure: those he has listened to often, retained, discussed, accumulated, examined with his mind, & well-penetrated in terms of his views.
Surely, knowing, he knows; seeing, he sees.' This, too, is a factor leading to endearment, to respect, to development, to consonance, to unification.
” 'He keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and for taking on skillful mental qualities.
He is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
Surely, knowing, he knows; seeing, he sees.' This, too, is a factor leading to endearment, to respect, to development, to consonance, to unification.
” 'When he is in the midst of the Sangha he doesn't talk on & on about a variety of things.
Either he speaks Dhamma himself or he invites another to do so, and he feels no disdain for noble silence.
Surely, knowing, he knows; seeing, he sees.' This, too, is a factor leading to endearment, to respect, to development, to consonance, to unification.
” 'He remains focused on arising & passing away with regard to the five aggregates: 'Such is form, such its origination, such its disappearance.
Such is feeling… Such is perception… Such are fabrications… Such is consciousness, such its origination, such its disappearance.' Surely, knowing, he knows; seeing, he sees.' This, too, is a factor leading to endearment, to respect, to development, to consonance, to unification.
“These, monks, are the eight causes, the eight requisite conditions that lead to the acquiring of the as-yet-unacquired discernment that is basic to the holy life, and to the increase, plenitude, development, & culmination of that which has already been acquired.”
Then Ven.
Upali went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “It would be good, lord, if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief such that, having heard the Dhamma from the Blessed One, I might dwell alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute.
“Upali, the qualities of which you may know, 'These qualities do not lead to utter disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to calm, to direct knowledge, to self-awakening, nor to Unbinding': You may categorically hold, 'This is not the Dhamma, this is not the Vinaya, this is not the Teacher's instruction.'
“As for the qualities of which you may know, 'These qualities lead to utter disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to calm, to direct knowledge, to self-awakening, to Unbinding': You may categorically hold, 'This is the Dhamma, this is the Vinaya, this is the Teacher's instruction.'”
“Once, monks, there was a teacher named Araka, a sectarian leader who was free of passion for sensual pleasures.
He had many hundreds of students and he taught them the Dhamma in this way: 'Next to nothing, brahmans, is the life of human beings — limited, trifling, of much stress & many despairs.
One should touch this like a sage, do what is skillful, follow the holy life.
For one who is born there is no freedom from death.
“'Just as a dewdrop on the tip of a blade of grass quickly vanishes with the rising of the sun and does not stay long, in the same way, brahmans, the life of human beings is like a dewdrop — limited, trifling, of much stress & many despairs.
One should touch this like a sage, do what is skillful, follow the holy life.
For one who is born there is no freedom from death.
“'Just as when the rain-devas send rain in fat drops, and a bubble on the water quickly vanishes and does not stay long, in the same way, brahmans, the life of human beings is like a water bubble — limited, trifling, of much stress & many despairs.
One should touch this like a sage, do what is skillful, follow the holy life.
For one who is born there is no freedom from death.
“'Just as a line drawn in the water with a stick quickly vanishes and does not stay long, in the same way, brahmans, the life of human beings is like a line drawn in the water with a stick — limited, trifling, of much stress & many despairs.
One should touch this like a sage, do what is skillful, follow the holy life.
For one who is born there is no freedom from death.
“'Just as a river flowing down from the mountains, going far, its current swift, carrying everything with it, so that there is not a moment, an instant, a second where it stands still, but instead it goes & rushes & flows, in the same way, brahmans, the life of human beings is like a river flowing down from the mountains — limited, trifling, of much stress & many despairs.
One should touch this like a sage, do what is skillful, follow the holy life.
For one who is born there is no freedom from death.
“'Just as a strong man forming a drop of spit on the tip of his tongue would spit it out with little effort, in the same way, brahmans, the life of human beings is like a drop of spit — limited, trifling, of much stress & many despairs.
One should touch this like a sage, do what is skillful, follow the holy life.
For one who is born there is no freedom from death.
“'Just as a sliver of meat thrown into an iron pan heated all day quickly vanishes and does not stay long, in the same way, brahmans, the life of human beings is like a sliver of meat — limited, trifling, of much stress & many despairs.
One should touch this like a sage, do what is skillful, follow the holy life.
For one who is born there is no freedom from death.
“'Just as a cow to be slaughtered being led to the slaughterhouse, with every step of its foot closer to its slaughtering, closer to death, in the same way, brahmans, the life of human beings is like a cow to be slaughtered — limited, trifling, of much stress & many despairs.
One should touch this like a sage, do what is skillful, follow the holy life.
For one who is born there is no freedom from death.'
“Now at that time, monks, the human life span was, years, with girls marriageable at.
And at that time there were six afflictions: cold, heat, hunger, thirst, defecation, & urination.
Yet even though people were so long-lived, long-lasting, with so few afflictions, that teacher Araka taught the Dhamma to his disciples in this way: 'Next to nothing, brahmans, is the life of human beings — limited, trifling, of much stress & many despairs.
One should touch this like a sage, do what is skillful, follow the holy life.
For one who is born there is no freedom from death.'
“At present, monks, one speaking rightly would say, 'Next to nothing is the life of human beings — limited, trifling, of much stress & many despairs.
One should touch this like a sage, do what is skillful, follow the holy life.
For one who is born there is no freedom from death.' At present, monks, one who lives a long time is years old or a little bit more.
Living years, one lives for seasons: seasons of cold, seasons of heat, seasons of rain.
Living for seasons, one lives for, months: months of cold, months of heat, months of rain.
Living for, months, one lives for, fortnights: fortnights of cold, fortnights of heat, fortnights of rain.
Living for, fortnights, one lives for, days:, days of cold,, days of heat,, days of rain.
Living for, days, one eats, meals:, meals in the cold,, meals in the heat,, meals in the rain — counting the taking of mother's milk and obstacles to eating.
These are the obstacles to eating: when one doesn't eat while angered, when one doesn't eat while suffering or stressed, when one doesn't eat while sick, when one doesn't eat on the observance day, when one doesn't eat while poor.
“Thus, monks, I have reckoned the life of a person living for years: I have reckoned the life span, reckoned the seasons, reckoned the years, reckoned the months, reckoned the fortnights, reckoned the nights, reckoned the days, reckoned the meals, reckoned the obstacles to eating.
Whatever a teacher should do — seeking the welfare of his disciples, out of sympathy for them — that have I done for you.
Over there are the roots of trees; over there, empty dwellings.
Practice jhana, monks.
Don't be heedless.
Don't later fall into regret.
This is our message to you all.
See also: MN; AN.-; Sn.
Translators' note: In this sutta, from the Anguttara Nikaya's Book of the Sevens, the Buddha compares seven pairs of situations a monk might hypothetically face and asks the monks to choose which of each pair is the better.
While listening to the Buddha's explanations of the correct choice in each case, sixty monks become enlightened — another instance of enlightenment directly from hearing a talk by the Buddha.
Thus have I heard.
Once the Blessed One was wandering among the Kosala people together with a large company of monks.
Entering a major path, the Blessed One saw in a certain spot a great mass of fire, burning, blazing, glowing.
After seeing it and stepping down from the path he sat on the appointed seat at the root of a tree.
After sitting down the Blessed One said to the monks: “Do you see, monks, that great mass of fire, burning, blazing, glowing?” — “ Yes, venerable Sir.
“What do you think, monks?
Which would in fact be the better?
Embracing that great mass of fire, burning, blazing, glowing, and sitting or lying down close to it?
Or, embracing a kshatriya or brahman or householder woman with young and tender hands and feet, and sitting or lying down close to her?” — “This, venerable Sir, would surely be the better: Embracing a kshatriya or brahman or householder woman with young and tender hands and feet, and sitting or lying down close to her.
For it would be painful, venerable Sir, to embrace that great, burning, blazing, glowing mass of fire, and sit or lie down close to it.
“Let me tell you, monks, let me explain to you, monks, that this would surely be the better for one who is of poor conduct, an evil-minded one, a filthy doer of complete wickedness who acts in an underhand manner, who pretends to be a recluse yet is not a recluse, who pretends to lead the holy life yet does not lead the holy life, an inwardly-putrid, impure-natured one: Embracing that great mass of fire, burning, blazing, glowing, and sitting or lying down close to it.
What is the reason for this?
Because on account of that, monks, he would go to death, or to a pain like that of death, but he would not, on account of that, on the break-up of the body after death be reborn into a place of woe, a realm of misery, a place of suffering, a purgatory.
“But, monks, if one who is of poor conduct, an evil-minded one, a filthy doer of complete wickedness who acts in an underhand manner, who pretends to be a recluse yet is not a recluse, who pretends to lead the holy life yet does not lead the holy life, an inwardly-putrid, impure-natured one, were to embrace a kshatriya or brahman or householder woman with young and tender hands and feet, and sit or lie down close to her — for him, monks, there would be a long period of harm and suffering, and on the break-up of the body after death he would be reborn into a place of woe, a realm of misery, a place of suffering, a purgatory.
“What do you think, monks?
Which would in fact be the better?
If a strong man, having twisted a firm horse-hair rope around both calves, were to rub, so that the rope cut the skin, and having cut the skin it cut the under-skin, and having cut the under-skin it cut the flesh, and having cut the flesh it cut the sinew, and having cut the sinew it cut the bone, and having cut the bone it left the marrow exposed?
Or, to derive enjoyment from the homage of rich kshatriyas, or rich brahmans, or rich householders?” — “This, venerable Sir, is surely the better: To derive enjoyment from the homage of rich kshatriyas, or rich brahmans, or rich householders.
For it would be painful, venerable Sir, if a strong man, having twisted a firm hair-rope around both calves, were to rub, so that the rope cut the skin and so on until it left the marrow exposed.
“Let me tell you, monks, let me explain to you, monks, that this would surely be the better for one who is of poor conduct, an impure-natured one: If a strong man, having twisted a firm horse-hair rope around both calves, were to rub, so that the rope cut the skin and so on until it left the marrow exposed.
What is the reason for this?
Because on account of that, monks, he would go to death, or to a pain like that of death, but on account of that he would not, on the break-up of the body after death, be reborn into a place of woe, a realm of misery, a place of suffering, a purgatory.
“But, monks, if one who is of poor conduct, an evil-minded one, a filthy doer of complete wickedness, an impure-natured one, were to derive enjoyment from the homage of rich kshatriyas, or rich brahmans, or rich householders — for him, monks, there would be a long period of harm and suffering, and on the break-up of the body after death he would be reborn into a place of woe, a realm of misery, a place of suffering, a purgatory.
“What do you think, monks?
Which would in fact be the better?
If a strong man were to strike the nether-quarters with a sharp, oil-cleaned sword?
Or, to derive enjoyment when rich kshatriyas, brahmans, or householders press the palms together in prayer?
“Let me tell you, monks, let me explain to you, that this would surely be the better for one who is of poor conduct, an impure-natured one: If a strong man were to strike the nether-quarters with a sharp, oil-cleaned sword.
“What do you think, monks?
Which would in fact be the better?
If a strong man were to wrap the body with a red-hot sheet of iron, burning, blazing, glowing?
Or, to derive enjoyment from the robes given in faith by rich kshatriyas, brahmans, or householders?
“Let me tell you, monks, let me explain to you, that this would surely be the better for one who is of poor conduct, an impure-natured one: If a strong man were to wrap the body with a red-hot sheet of iron.
“What do you think, monks?
Which would in fact be the better?
If a strong man, having opened the mouth with a red-hot iron spike, were to hurl into the mouth a red-hot iron ball, burning, blazing, glowing, so that one's lips would burn, then the mouth would burn, then the tongue would burn, then the throat would burn, then the chest would burn, and when it was received by the lower intestine, it would be expelled from the lower part of the body?
Or, to derive enjoyment from the food received on alms-round and given in faith by rich kshatriyas, brahmans, or householders?
“Let me tell you, monks, let me explain to you, that this would surely be the better for one who is of poor conduct, an impure-natured one: If a strong man, having opened the mouth with a red-hot iron spike were to hurl into the mouth a red-hot iron ball.
“What do you think, monks?
Which would in fact be the better?
If a strong man, having gripped the head or shoulder, were to force one sit or lie on a red-hot iron bed or chair?
Or, to derive enjoyment from a chair given in faith by rich kshatriyas, or brahmans, or householders?
“Let me tell you, monks, let me explain to you, that this would surely be the better for one who is of poor conduct, an impure-natured one: If a strong man, having gripped the head or shoulder, were to force one sit or lie on a red-hot iron bed or chair.
“What do you think, monks?
Which would in fact be the better?
If a strong man, having gripped one, heels up, head down, were to force one down into a red-hot iron cauldron, burning, blazing, glowing, and where there is boiling scum on top, he were to go once up, once down, and then once sideways?
Or, to derive enjoyment from an abode given in faith by rich kshatriyas, or brahmans, or householders?
“Let me tell you, monks, let me explain to you, that this would surely be the better for one who is of poor conduct, an impure-natured one: If a strong man, having gripped one, heels up, head down, were to force one down into a red-hot iron cauldron.
“Because of what I have said here, monks, you should train yourselves such that the gifts of those whose requisites we use — the robes, alms-bowl, chair, bed, and medicine as a support when sick — will have great fruits, great merits, and our going forth will not be in vain, will be fruitful, will have a result.
Thus should you train yourselves, thoroughly seeing that for your own benefit, monks, it is right to strive with heedfulness; thoroughly seeing that for the benefit of others, monks, it is right to strive with heedfulness; and thoroughly seeing that for the benefit of both, monks, it is right to strive with heedfulness.
Thus spoke the Blessed One.
And while this explanation was being delivered, hot blood rose out of the mouths of sixty monks; another sixty monks abandoned the training and returned to the lower life, saying, “It is too difficult to do, Blessed One, it is too difficult to do”; while the minds of another sixty monks abandoned clinging and were liberated from the aasava-s.
“Monks, when a royal frontier fortress is well provided with the seven requisites of a fortress, and can obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — the four types of food, then it is said to be a royal frontier fortress that can't be undone by external foes or duplicitous allies.
“And with which seven requisites of a fortress is it well provided?
“There is the case where a royal frontier fortress has a foundation post — deeply rooted, well embedded, immovable, & unshakable.
With this first requisite of a fortress it is well provided for the protection of those within and to ward off those without.
“Furthermore, the royal frontier fortress has a moat, both deep & wide.
With this second requisite of a fortress it is well provided for the protection of those within and to ward off those without.
“Furthermore, the royal frontier fortress has an encircling road, both high & wide.
With this third requisite of a fortress it is well provided for the protection of those within and to ward off those without.
“Furthermore, in the royal frontier fortress many weapons are stored, both arrows & things to be hurled.
With this fourth requisite of a fortress it is well provided for the protection of those within and to ward off those without.
“Furthermore, the royal frontier fortress has a large army stationed within — elephant soldiers, cavalry, charioteers, bowmen, standard-bearers, billeting officers, soldiers of the supply corps, noted princes, commando heroes, infantry, & slaves.
With this fifth requisite of a fortress it is well provided for the protection of those within and to ward off those without.
“Furthermore, the royal frontier fortress has a gate-keeper — wise, experienced, intelligent — to keep out those he doesn't know and to let in those he does.
With this sixth requisite of a fortress it is well provided for the protection of those within and to ward off those without.
“Furthermore, the royal frontier fortress has ramparts: high & thick & completely covered with plaster.
With this seventh requisite of a fortress it is well provided for the protection of those within and to ward off those without.
“These are the seven requisites of a fortress with which it is well provided.
“And which are the four types of food that it can obtain at will, without difficulty, without trouble?
“There is the case where the royal frontier fortress has large stores of grass, timber & water for the delight, convenience, & comfort of those within, and to ward off those without.
Furthermore, it has large stores of rice & barley for the delight, convenience, & comfort of those within, and to ward off those without.
Furthermore, it has large stores of sesame, green gram, & other beans for the delight, convenience, & comfort of those within, and to ward off those without.
Furthermore, it has large stores of tonics — ghee, fresh butter, oil, honey, molasses, & salt — for the delight, convenience, & comfort of those within, and to ward off those without.
These are the four types of food it can obtain at will, without difficulty, without trouble.
“When a royal frontier fortress is well provided with these seven requisites of a fortress, and can obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — these four types of food, then it is said to be a royal frontier fortress that can't be undone by external foes or duplicitous allies.
“In the same way, monks, when a disciple of the noble ones is endowed with seven true qualities and can obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — the four jhanas, heightened mental states that provide a pleasant abiding in the here-&-now, he is said to be a disciple of the noble ones who can't be undone by Mara, can't be undone by the Evil One.
“Now, with which seven true qualities is he endowed?
“Just as the royal frontier fortress has a foundation post — deeply rooted, well embedded, immovable, & unshakable — for the protection of those within and to ward off those without; in the same way a disciple of the noble ones has conviction, is convinced of the Tathagata's Awakening: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy and rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, a knower of the cosmos, an unexcelled trainer of those persons ready to be tamed, teacher of human & divine beings, awakened, blessed.' With conviction as his foundation post, the disciple of the noble ones abandons what is unskillful, develops what is skillful, abandons what is blameworthy, develops what is blameless, and looks after himself with purity.
With this first true quality is he endowed.
“Just as the royal frontier fortress has a moat, both deep & wide, for the protection of those within and to ward off those without; in the same way, the disciple of the noble ones has a sense of shame.
He feels shame at bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, mental misconduct.
He feels shame at falling into evil, unskillful actions.
With shame as his moat, the disciple of the noble ones abandons what is unskillful, develops what is skillful, abandons what is blameworthy, develops what is blameless, and looks after himself with purity.
With this second true quality is he endowed.
“Just as the royal frontier fortress has an encircling road, both high & wide, for the protection of those within and to ward off those without; in the same way, the disciple of the noble ones has a sense of concern.
He feels concern for bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, mental misconduct.
He feels concern at falling into evil, unskillful actions.
With concern as his encircling road, the disciple of the noble ones abandons what is unskillful, develops what is skillful, abandons what is blameworthy, develops what is blameless, and looks after himself with purity.
With this third true quality is he endowed.
“Just as the royal frontier fortress has many weapons stored, both arrows & things to be hurled, for the protection of those within and to ward off those without; in the same way, the disciple of the noble ones has heard much, has retained what he has heard, has stored what he has heard.
Whatever teachings are admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, admirable in the end, that — in their meaning & expression — proclaim the holy life that is entirely complete & pure: those he has listened to often, retained, discussed, accumulated, examined with his mind, and well-penetrated in terms of his views.
With learning as his weapons, the disciple of the noble ones abandons what is unskillful, develops what is skillful, abandons what is blameworthy, develops what is blameless, and looks after himself with purity.
With this fourth true quality is he endowed.
“Just as the royal frontier fortress has a large army stationed within — elephant soldiers, cavalry, charioteers, bowmen, standard-bearers, billeting officers, soldiers of the supply corps, noted princes, commando heroes, infantry, & slaves — for the protection of those within and to ward off those without; in the same way a disciple of the noble ones keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and taking on skillful mental qualities, is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
With persistence as his army, the disciple of the noble ones abandons what is unskillful, develops what is skillful, abandons what is blameworthy, develops what is blameless, and looks after himself with purity.
With this fifth true quality is he endowed.
“Just as the royal frontier fortress has a gate-keeper — wise, experienced, intelligent — to keep out those he doesn't know and to let in those he does, for the protection of those within and to ward off those without; in the same way a disciple of the noble ones is mindful, highly meticulous, remembering & able to call to mind even things that were done & said long ago.
With mindfulness as his gate-keeper, the disciple of the ones abandons what is unskillful, develops what is skillful, abandons what is blameworthy, develops what is blameless, and looks after himself with purity.
With this sixth true quality is he endowed.
“Just as the royal frontier fortress has ramparts — high & thick & completely covered with plaster — for the protection of those within and to ward off those without; in the same way a disciple of the noble ones is discerning, endowed with discernment of arising and passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
With discernment as his covering of plaster, the disciple of the noble ones abandons what is unskillful, develops what is skillful, abandons what is blameworthy, develops what is blameless, and looks after himself with purity.
With this seventh true quality is he endowed.
“These are the seven true qualities with which he is endowed.
“And which are the four jhanas — heightened mental states that provide a pleasant abiding in the here-&-now — that he can obtain at will, without difficulty, without trouble?
Just as a royal frontier fortress has large stores of grass, timber & water for the delight, convenience, & comfort of those within, and to ward off those without; in the same way the disciple of the noble ones, quite withdrawn from sensual pleasures, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, enters & remains in the first jhana — rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation — for his own delight, convenience, & comfort, and to alight on Unbinding.
Just as a royal frontier fortress has large stores of rice & barley for the delight, convenience, & comfort of those within, and to ward off those without; in the same way the disciple of the noble ones, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, enters & remains in the second jhana — rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance — for his own delight, convenience, & comfort, and to alight on Unbinding.
Just as a royal frontier fortress has large stores of sesame, green gram, & other beans for the delight, convenience, & comfort of those within, and to ward off those without; in the same way the disciple of the noble ones, with the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding,' for his own delight, convenience, & comfort, and to alight on Unbinding.
Just as a royal frontier fortress has large stores of tonics — ghee, fresh butter, oil, honey, molasses, & salt — for the delight, convenience, & comfort of those within, and to ward off those without; in the same way the disciple of the noble ones, with the abandoning of pleasure & stress, as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress, enters & remains in the fourth jhana — purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain — for his own delight, convenience, & comfort, and to alight on Unbinding.
“These are the four jhanas — heightened mental states that provide a pleasant abiding in the here-&-now — that he can obtain at will, without difficulty, without trouble.
“When a disciple of the noble ones is endowed with these seven true qualities and can obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — these four jhanas, heightened mental states that provide a pleasant abiding in the here-&-now, he is said to be a disciple of the noble ones who can't be undone by Mara, can't be undone by the Evil One.”
“These seven things — pleasing to an enemy, bringing about an enemy's aim — come to a man or woman who is angry.
Which seven?
“There is the case where an enemy wishes of an enemy, 'O, may this person be ugly!' Why is that?
An enemy is not pleased with an enemy's good looks.
Now, when a person is angry — overcome with anger, oppressed with anger — then regardless of the fact that he may be well-bathed, well-anointed, dressed in white clothes, his hair & beard neatly trimmed, he is ugly nevertheless, all because he is overcome with anger.
This is the first thing pleasing to an enemy, bringing about an enemy's aim, that comes to a man or woman who is angry.
“Furthermore, an enemy wishes of an enemy, 'O, may this person sleep badly!' Why is that?
An enemy is not pleased with an enemy's restful sleep.
Now, when a person is angry — overcome with anger, oppressed with anger — then regardless of the fact that he sleeps on a bed spread with a white blanket, spread with a woolen coverlet, spread with a flower-embroidered bedspread, covered with a rug of deerskins, with a canopy overhead, or on a sofa with red cushions at either end, he sleeps badly nevertheless, all because he is overcome with anger.
This is the second thing pleasing to an enemy, bringing about an enemy's aim, that comes to a man or woman who is angry.
“Furthermore, an enemy wishes of an enemy, 'O, may this person not profit!' Why is that?
An enemy is not pleased with an enemy's profits.
Now, when a person is angry — overcome with anger, oppressed with anger — then even when he suffers a loss, he thinks, 'I've gained a profit'; and even when he gains a profit, he thinks, 'I've suffered a loss.' When he has grabbed hold of these ideas that work in mutual opposition, they lead to his long-term suffering & loss, all because he is overcome with anger.
This is the third thing pleasing to an enemy, bringing about an enemy's aim, that comes to a man or woman who is angry.
“Furthermore, an enemy wishes of an enemy, 'O, may this person not have any wealth!' Why is that?
An enemy is not pleased with an enemy's wealth.
Now, when a person is angry — overcome with anger, oppressed with anger — then whatever wealth he has, earned through his efforts & enterprise, amassed through the strength of his arm, and piled up through the sweat of his brow — righteous wealth righteously gained — the king orders it sent to the royal treasury all because he is overcome with anger.
This is the fourth thing pleasing to an enemy, bringing about an enemy's aim, that comes to a man or woman who is angry.
“Furthermore, an enemy wishes of an enemy, 'O, may this person not have any reputation!' Why is that?
An enemy is not pleased with an enemy's reputation.
Now, when a person is angry — overcome with anger, oppressed with anger — whatever reputation he has gained from being heedful, it falls away, all because he is overcome with anger.
This is the fifth thing pleasing to an enemy, bringing about an enemy's aim, that comes to a man or woman who is angry.
“Furthermore, an enemy wishes of an enemy, 'O, may this person not have any friends!' Why is that?
An enemy is not pleased with an enemy's having friends.
Now, when a person is angry — overcome with anger, oppressed with anger — his friends, companions, & relatives will avoid him from afar, all because he is overcome with anger.
This is the sixth thing pleasing to an enemy, bringing about an enemy's aim, that comes to a man or woman who is angry.
“Furthermore, an enemy wishes of an enemy, 'O, may this person, on the break-up of the body, after death, reappear in the plane of deprivation, the bad bourn, the lower realms, in hell!' Why is that?
An enemy is not pleased with an enemy's going to heaven.
Now, when a person is angry — overcome with anger, oppressed with anger — he engages in misconduct with the body, misconduct with speech, misconduct with the mind.
Having engaged in misconduct with the body, misconduct with speech, misconduct with the mind, then — on the break-up of the body, after death — he reappears in the plane of deprivation, the bad bourn, the lower realms, in hell, all because he was overcome with anger.
This is the seventh thing pleasing to an enemy, bringing about an enemy's aim, that comes to a man or woman who is angry.
“These are the seven things — pleasing to an enemy, bringing about an enemy's aim — that come to a man or woman who is angry.”
“And how is a monk one with a sense of Dhamma?
There is the case where a monk knows the Dhamma: dialogues, narratives of mixed prose and verse, explanations, verses, spontaneous exclamations, quotations, birth stories, amazing events, question & answer sessions.
If he didn't know the Dhamma — dialogues, narratives of mixed prose and verse, explanations, verses, spontaneous exclamations, quotations, birth stories, amazing events, question & answer sessions — he wouldn't be said to be one with a sense of Dhamma.
So it's because he does know the Dhamma — dialogues… question & answer sessions — that he is said to be one with a sense of Dhamma.
This is one with a sense of Dhamma.
“And how is a monk one with a sense of meaning?
There is the case where a monk knows the meaning of this & that statement — 'This is the meaning of that statement; that is the meaning of this.' If he didn't know the meaning of this & that statement — 'This is the meaning of that statement; that is the meaning of this' — he wouldn't be said to be one with a sense of meaning.
So it's because he does know the meaning of this & that statement — 'This is the meaning of that statement; that is the meaning of this' — that he is said to be one with a sense of meaning.
This is one with a sense of Dhamma & a sense of meaning.
“And how is a monk one with a sense of himself?
There is the case where a monk knows himself: 'This is how far I have come in conviction, virtue, learning, liberality, discernment, quick-wittedness.' If he didn't know himself — 'This is how far I have come in conviction, virtue, learning, liberality, discernment, quick-wittedness' — he wouldn't be said to be one with a sense of himself.
So it's because he does know himself — 'This is how far I have come in conviction, virtue, learning, liberality, discernment, quick-wittedness' — that he is said to be one with a sense of himself.
This is one with a sense of Dhamma, a sense of meaning, & a sense of himself.
“And how is a monk one with a sense of moderation?
There is the case where a monk knows moderation in accepting robes, almsfood, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for curing the sick.
If he didn't know moderation in accepting robes, almsfood, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for curing the sick, he wouldn't be said to be one with a sense of moderation.
So it's because he does know moderation in accepting robes, almsfood, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for curing the sick, that he is said to be one with a sense of moderation.
This is one with a sense of Dhamma, a sense of meaning, a sense of himself, & a sense of moderation.
“And how is a monk one with a sense of time?
There is the case where a monk knows the time: 'This is the time for recitation; this, the time for questioning; this, the time for making an effort; this, the time for seclusion.' If he didn't know the time — 'This is the time for recitation; this, the time for questioning; this, the time for making an effort; this, the time for seclusion' — he wouldn't be said to be one with a sense of time.
So it's because he does know the time — 'This is the time for recitation; this, the time for questioning; this, the time for making an effort; this, the time for seclusion' — that he is said to be one with a sense of time.
This is one with a sense of Dhamma, a sense of meaning, a sense of himself, a sense of moderation, & a sense of time.
“And how is a monk one with a sense of social gatherings?
There is the case where a monk knows his social gathering: 'This is a social gathering of noble warriors; this, a social gathering of brahmans; this, a social gathering of householders; this, a social gathering of contemplatives; here one should approach them in this way, stand in this way, act in this way, sit in this way, speak in this way, stay silent in this way.' If he didn't know his social gathering — 'This is a social gathering of noble warriors; this, a social gathering of brahmans; this, a social gathering of householders; this, a social gathering of contemplatives; here one should approach them in this way, stand in this way, act in this way, sit in this way, speak in this way, stay silent in this way' — he wouldn't be said to be one with a sense of social gatherings.
So it's because he does know his social gathering — 'This is a social gathering of noble warriors; this, a social gathering of brahmans; this, a social gathering of householders; this, a social gathering of contemplatives; here one should approach them in this way, stand in this way, act in this way, sit in this way, speak in this way, stay silent in this way' — that he is said to be one with a sense of social gatherings.
This is one with a sense of Dhamma, a sense of meaning, a sense of himself, a sense of moderation, a sense of time, & a sense of social gatherings.
“And how is a monk one with a sense of distinctions among individuals?
There is the case where people are known to a monk in terms of two categories.
“Of two people — one who wants to see noble ones and one who doesn't — the one who doesn't want to see noble ones is to be criticized for that reason, the one who does want to see noble ones is, for that reason, to be praised.
“Of two people who want to see noble ones — one who wants to hear the true Dhamma and one who doesn't — the one who doesn't want to hear the true Dhamma is to be criticized for that reason, the one who does want to hear the true Dhamma is, for that reason, to be praised.
“Of two people who want to hear the true Dhamma — one who listens with an attentive ear and one who listens without an attentive ear — the one who listens without an attentive ear is to be criticized for that reason, the one who listens with an attentive ear is, for that reason, to be praised.
“Of two people who listen with an attentive ear — one who, having listened to the Dhamma, remembers it, and one who doesn't — the one who, having listened to the Dhamma, doesn't remember it is to be criticized for that reason, the one who, having listened to the Dhamma, does remember the Dhamma is, for that reason, to be praised.
“Of two people who, having listened to the Dhamma, remember it — one who explores the meaning of the Dhamma he has remembered and one who doesn't — the one who doesn't explore the meaning of the Dhamma he has remembered is to be criticized for that reason, the one who does explore the meaning of the Dhamma he has remembered is, for that reason, to be praised.
“Of two people who explore the meaning of the Dhamma they have remembered — one who practices the Dhamma in line with the Dhamma, having a sense of Dhamma, having a sense of meaning, and one who doesn't — the one who doesn't practice the Dhamma in line with the Dhamma, having a sense of Dhamma, having a sense of meaning, is to be criticized for that reason, the one who does practice the Dhamma in line with the Dhamma, having a sense of Dhamma, having a sense of meaning is, for that reason, to be praised.
“Of two people who practice the Dhamma in line with the Dhamma, having a sense of Dhamma, having a sense of meaning — one who practices for both his own benefit and that of others, and one who practices for his own benefit but not that of others — the one who practices for his own benefit but not that of others is to be criticized for that reason, the one who practices for both his own benefit and that of others is, for that reason, to be praised.
“This is how people are known to a monk in terms of two categories.
And this is how a monk is one with a sense of distinctions among individuals.
“A monk endowed with these seven qualities is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, an unexcelled field of merit for the world.
See also: AN..
“Bhikkhus, seven things gratifying and helpful to an enemy befall one who is angry, whether a woman or a man.
What are the seven?
“Here, bhikkhus, an enemy wishes thus for his enemy: 'Let him be ugly.' Why is that?
No enemy relishes an enemy's beauty.
Now when this person is angry, a prey to anger, ruled by anger, be he ever so well bathed, and well anointed, with hair and beard trimmed, and clothed in white, yet he is ugly through his being a prey to anger.
This is the first thing gratifying and helpful to an enemy that befalls one who is angry, whether a woman or a man.
“Also an enemy wishes thus for his enemy: 'Let him lie in pain.' Why is that?
No enemy relishes an enemy's lying in comfort.
Now when this person is angry, a prey to anger, ruled by anger, for all he may lie on a couch spread with rugs, blankets and counterpanes with a deerskin cover, a canopy and red cushions for the head and feet, yet he lies only in pain through his being a prey to anger.
This is the second thing gratifying to an enemy that befalls one who is angry, whether a woman or a man.
“Also an enemy wishes thus for his enemy: 'Let him have no prosperity.' Why is that?
No enemy relishes an enemy's prosperity.
Now when this person is angry, prey to anger, ruled by anger, he mistakes bad for good and he mistakes good for bad, and each being taken wrongly in the other's sense, these things for long conduce to his harm and suffering, through his being a prey to anger.
This is the third thing gratifying and helpful to an enemy that befalls one who is angry, whether a woman or a man.
“Also an enemy wishes thus for his enemy: 'Let him not be rich.' Why is that?
No enemy relishes an enemy's having riches.
Now when a person is angry, a prey to anger, should he have riches gained by endeavor, built up by the strength of his arm, earned by sweat, lawful and lawfully acquired, yet the king's treasury gathers through his being a prey to anger.
This is the fourth thing gratifying and helpful to an enemy that befalls one who is a prey to anger, whether a woman or a man.
“Also an enemy wishes thus for his enemy: 'Let him not be famous.' Why is that?
No enemy relishes an enemy's having fame.
Now when a person is angry, a prey to anger, ruled by anger, what fame he may have acquired by diligence he loses through his being a prey to anger.
This is the fifth thing gratifying and helpful to an enemy that befalls one who is a prey to anger, whether a woman or a man.
“Also an enemy wishes thus for his enemy: 'Let him have no friends.' Why is that?
No enemy relishes and enemy's having friends.
Now when this person is angry, a prey to anger, ruled by anger, the friends he may have, his companions, relatives and kin, will keep away from him through his being a prey to anger.
This is the sixth thing gratifying and helpful to an enemy that befalls one who is a prey to anger, whether a woman or a man.
“Also an enemy wishes thus for his enemy: 'Let him on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a state of deprivation, in a bad destination, in perdition, even in hell.' Why is that?
No enemy relishes an enemy's going to a good destination.
Now when this person is angry, a prey to anger, ruled by anger, he misconducts himself in body, speech and mind, and by his misconduct in body, speech and mind, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation, in a bad destination, in perdition, even in hell, through his being a prey to anger.
This is the seventh thing gratifying and helpful to an enemy that befalls one who is angry, whether a woman or a man.”
Once the Blessed One was living among the Bhaggas in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Haunt.
At that time Ven.
Maha Moggallana sat nodding near the village of Kallavalaputta, in Magadha.
The Blessed One, with his purified divine eye, surpassing the human, saw Ven.
Maha Moggallana as he sat nodding near the village of Kallavalaputta, in Magadha.
As soon as he saw this — just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — he disappeared from among the Bhaggas in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Haunt, and re-appeared near the village of Kallavalaputta, in Magadha, right in front of Ven.
Maha Moggallana.
There he sat down on a prepared seat.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to Ven.
Maha Moggallana, “Are you nodding, Moggallana?
Are you nodding?
“Yes, lord.
“Well then, Moggallana, whatever perception you have in mind when drowsiness descends on you, don't attend to that perception, don't pursue it.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
“But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then recall to your awareness the Dhamma as you have heard & memorized it, re-examine it & ponder it over in your mind.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
“But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then repeat aloud in detail the Dhamma as you have heard & memorized it.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
“But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then pull both your earlobes and rub your limbs with your hands.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
“But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then get up from your seat and, after washing your eyes out with water, look around in all directions and upward to the major stars & constellations.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
“But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then attend to the perception of light, resolve on the perception of daytime, by night as by day, and by day as by night.
By means of an awareness thus open & unhampered, develop a brightened mind.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
“But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then — percipient of what lies in front & behind — set a distance to meditate walking back & forth, your senses inwardly immersed, your mind not straying outwards.
It's possible that by doing this you will shake off your drowsiness.
“But if by doing this you don't shake off your drowsiness, then — reclining on your right side — take up the lion's posture, one foot placed on top of the other, mindful, alert, with your mind set on getting up.
As soon as you wake up, get up quickly, with the thought, 'I won't stay indulging in the pleasure of lying down, the pleasure of reclining, the pleasure of drowsiness.' That is how you should train yourself.
“Furthermore, Moggallana, should you train yourself: 'I will not visit families with my pride lifted high.' That is how you should train yourself.
Among families there are many jobs that have to be done, so that people don't pay attention to a visiting monk.
If a monk visits them with his trunk lifted high, the thought will occur to him, 'Now who, I wonder, has caused a split between me and this family?
The people seem to have no liking for me.' Getting nothing, he becomes abashed.
Abashed, he becomes restless.
Restless, he becomes unrestrained.
Unrestrained, his mind is far from concentration.
“Furthermore, Moggallana, should you train yourself: 'I will speak no confrontational speech.' That is how you should train yourself.
When there is confrontational speech, a lot of discussion can be expected.
When there is a lot of discussion, there is restlessness.
One who is restless becomes unrestrained.
Unrestrained, his mind is far from concentration.
“It's not the case, Moggallana, that I praise association of every sort.
But it's not the case that I dispraise association of every sort.
I don't praise association with householders and renunciates.
But as for dwelling places that are free from noise, free from sound, their atmosphere devoid of people, appropriately secluded for resting undisturbed by human beings: I praise association with dwelling places of this sort.
When this was said, Ven.
Moggallana said to the Blessed One: “Briefly, lord, in what respect is a monk released through the ending of craving, utterly complete, utterly free from bonds, a follower of the utterly holy life, utterly consummate: foremost among human & heavenly beings?
“There is the case, Moggallana, where a monk has heard, 'All phenomena are unworthy of attachment.' Having heard that all phenomena are unworthy of attachment, he fully knows all things.
Fully knowing all things, he fully comprehends all things.
Fully comprehending all things, then whatever feeling he experiences — pleasure, pain, neither pleasure nor pain — he remains focused on inconstancy, focused on dispassion, focused on cessation, focused on relinquishing with regard to that feeling.
As he remains focused on inconstancy, focused on dispassion, focused on cessation, focused on relinquishing with regard to that feeling, he is unsustained by anything in the world.
Unsustained, he is not agitated.
Unagitated, he is unbound right within.
He discerns: 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
“It is in this respect, Moggallana, that a monk, in brief, is released through the ending of craving, utterly complete, utterly free from bonds, a follower of the utterly holy life, utterly consummate: foremost among human & heavenly beings.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Kimila, in the Bamboo Grove.
Then Ven.
Kimila went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “What is the cause, lord, what is the reason why, when a Tathagata has become totally unbound, the true Dhamma does not last a long time?
“Kimila, there is the case where, when a Tathagata has become totally unbound, the monks, nuns, male lay followers, & female lay followers live without respect, without deference, for the Teacher; live without respect, without deference, for the Dhamma… the Sangha… the Training… concentration… heedfulness; live without respect, without deference, for hospitality.
This is the cause, this is the reason why, when a Tathagata has become totally unbound, the true Dhamma does not last a long time.
“And what is the cause, what is the reason why, when a Tathagata has become totally unbound, the true Dhamma does last a long time?
“Kimila, there is the case where, when a Tathagata has become totally unbound, the monks, nuns, male lay followers, & female lay followers live with respect, with deference, for the Teacher; live with respect, with deference, for the Dhamma… the Sangha… the Training… concentration… heedfulness; live with respect, with deference, for hospitality.
This is the cause, this is the reason why, when a Tathagata has become totally unbound, the true Dhamma does last a long time.
See also: SN.
Then a certain monk went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One, “Lord, what is the cause, what is the reason, why uncertainty doesn't arise in an instructed disciple of the noble ones over the undeclared issues?
“Because of the cessation of views, monk, uncertainty doesn't arise in an instructed disciple of the noble ones over the undeclared issues.
The view-standpoint, 'The Tathagata exists after death,' the view-standpoint, 'The Tathagata doesn't exist after death,' the view-standpoint, 'The Tathagata both does and doesn't exist after death,' the view-standpoint, 'The Tathagata neither does nor doesn't exist after death': The uninstructed run-of-the-mill person doesn't discern view, doesn't discern the origination of view, doesn't discern the cessation of view, doesn't discern the path of practice leading to the cessation of view, and so for him that view grows.
He is not freed from birth, aging, & death; from sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, and despairs.
He is not freed, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
But the instructed disciple of the noble ones discerns view, discerns the origination of view, discerns the cessation of view, discerns the path of practice leading to the cessation of view, and so for him that view ceases.
He is freed from birth, aging, & death; from sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, and despairs.
He is freed, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
“Thus knowing, thus seeing, the instructed disciple of the noble ones doesn't declare that 'The Tathagata exists after death,' doesn't declare that 'The Tathagata doesn't exist after death,' doesn't declare that 'The Tathagata both does and doesn't exist after death,' doesn't declare that 'The Tathagata neither does nor doesn't exist after death.' Thus knowing, thus seeing, he is thus of a nature not to declare the undeclared issues.
Thus knowing, thus seeing, he isn't paralyzed, doesn't quake, doesn't shiver or shake over the undeclared issues.
“'The Tathagata exists after death' — this craving-standpoint, this perception-standpoint, this product of conceiving, this product of elaboration, this clinging-standpoint: That's anguish.
'The Tathagata doesn't exist after death': That's anguish.
'The Tathagata both does and doesn't exist after death': That's anguish.
'The Tathagata neither does nor doesn't exist after death': That's anguish.
The uninstructed run-of-the-mill person doesn't discern anguish, doesn't discern the origination of anguish, doesn't discern the cessation of anguish, doesn't discern the path of practice leading to the cessation of anguish, and so for him that anguish grows.
He is not freed from birth, aging, & death; from sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, and despairs.
He is not freed, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
But the instructed disciple of the noble ones discerns anguish, discerns the origination of anguish, discerns the cessation of anguish, discerns the path of practice leading to the cessation of anguish, and so for him that anguish ceases.
He is freed from birth, aging, & death; from sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, and despairs.
He is freed, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
“Thus knowing, thus seeing, the instructed disciple of the noble ones doesn't declare that 'The Tathagata exists after death,' doesn't declare that 'The Tathagata doesn't exist after death,' doesn't declare that 'The Tathagata both does and doesn't after death,' doesn't declare that 'The Tathagata neither does nor doesn't exist after death.' Thus knowing, thus seeing, he is thus of a nature not to declare the undeclared issues.
Thus knowing, thus seeing, he isn't paralyzed, doesn't quake, doesn't shiver or shake over the undeclared issues.
See also: MN; MN 
Translator's note: This discourse discusses the motivations one might have for being generous, and rates in ascending order the results that different motivations can lead to.
The Commentary notes that the highest motivation, untainted by lower motivations and leading to non-returning, requires a certain level of mastery in concentration and insight in order to be one's genuine motivation for giving.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying in Campa, on the shore of Gaggara Lake.
Then a large number of lay followers from Campa went to Ven.
Sariputta and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there they said to Ven.
Sariputta: “It has been a long time, venerable sir, since we have had a chance to hear a Dhamma talk in the Blessed One's presence.
It would be good if we could get to hear a Dhamma talk in the Blessed One's presence.
“Then in that case, my friends, come again on the next Uposatha day, and perhaps you'll get to hear a Dhamma talk in the Blessed One's presence.
“As you say, venerable sir,” the lay followers from Campa said to Ven.
Sariputta.
Rising from their seats, bowing down to him, and then circling him — keeping him on their right — they left.
Then, on the following Uposatha day, the lay followers from Campa went to Ven.
Sariputta and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, stood to one side.
Then Ven.
Sariputta, together with the lay followers from Campa, went to the Blessed One and on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One: “Might there be the case where a person gives a gift of a certain sort and it does not bear great fruit or great benefit, whereas another person gives a gift of the same sort and it bears great fruit and great benefit?
“Yes, Sariputta, there would be the case where a person gives a gift of a certain sort and it does not bear great fruit or great benefit, whereas another person gives a gift of the same sort and it bears great fruit and great benefit.
“Lord, what is the cause, what is the reason, why a person gives a gift of a certain sort and it does not bear great fruit or great benefit, whereas another person gives a gift of the same sort and it bears great fruit and great benefit?
“Sariputta, there is the case where a person gives a gift seeking his own profit, with a mind attached, seeking to store up for himself, 'I'll enjoy this after death.' He gives his gift — food, drink, clothing, a vehicle; a garland, perfume, & ointment; bedding, shelter, & a lamp — to a brahman or a contemplative.
What do you think, Sariputta?
Might a person give such a gift as this?
“Yes, lord.
“Having given this gift seeking his own profit — with a mind attached, seeking to store up for himself,, 'I'll enjoy this after death' — on the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the Four Great Kings.
Then, having exhausted that action, that power, that status, that sovereignty, he is a returner, coming back to this world.
“Then there is the case of a person who gives a gift not seeking his own profit, not with a mind attached, not seeking to store up for himself, nor, 'I'll enjoy this after death.' Instead, he gives a gift with the thought, 'Giving is good.' He gives his gift — food, drink, clothing, a vehicle; a garland, perfume, & ointment; bedding, shelter, & a lamp — to a brahman or a contemplative.
What do you think, Sariputta?
Might a person give such a gift as this?
“Yes, lord.
“Having given this gift with the thought, 'Giving is good,' on the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the Devas of the Thirty-three.
Then, having exhausted that action, that power, that status, that sovereignty, he is a returner, coming back to this world.
“Or, instead of thinking, 'Giving is good,' he gives a gift with the thought, 'This was given in the past, done in the past, by my father & grandfather.
It would not be right for me to let this old family custom be discontinued'… on the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the Devas of the Hours.
Then, having exhausted that action, that power, that status, that sovereignty, he is a returner, coming back to this world.
“Or, instead… he gives a gift with the thought, 'I am well-off.
These are not well-off.
It would not be right for me, being well-off, not to give a gift to those who are not well-off'… on the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the Contented Devas.
Then, having exhausted that action, that power, that status, that sovereignty, he is a returner, coming back to this world.
“Or, instead… he gives a gift with the thought, 'Just as there were the great sacrifices of the sages of the past — Atthaka, Vamaka, Vamadeva, Vessamitta, Yamataggi, Angirasa, Bharadvaja, Vasettha, Kassapa, & Bhagu — in the same way will this be my distribution of gifts'… on the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the devas who delight in creation.
Then, having exhausted that action, that power, that status, that sovereignty, he is a returner, coming back to this world.
“Or, instead… he gives a gift with the thought, 'When this gift of mine is given, it makes the mind serene.
Gratification & joy arise'… on the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of the devas who have power over the creations of others.
Then, having exhausted that action, that power, that status, that sovereignty, he is a returner, coming back to this world.
“Or, instead of thinking, 'When this gift of mine is given, it makes the mind serene.
Gratification & joy arise,' he gives a gift with the thought, 'This is an ornament for the mind, a support for the mind.' He gives his gift — food, drink, clothing, a vehicle; a garland, perfume, & ointment; bedding, shelter, & a lamp — to a brahman or a contemplative.
What do you think, Sariputta?
Might a person give such a gift as this?
“Yes, lord.
“Having given this, not seeking his own profit, not with a mind attached, not seeking to store up for himself, nor, 'I'll enjoy this after death,'
” — nor with the thought, 'Giving is good,'
” — nor with the thought, 'This was given in the past, done in the past, by my father & grandfather.
It would not be right for me to let this old family custom be discontinued,'
” — nor with the thought, 'I am well-off.
These are not well-off.
It would not be right for me, being well-off, not to give a gift to those who are not well-off,' nor with the thought, 'Just as there were the great sacrifices of the sages of the past — Atthaka, Vamaka, Vamadeva, Vessamitta, Yamataggi, Angirasa, Bharadvaja, Vasettha, Kassapa, & Bhagu — in the same way this will be my distribution of gifts,'
” — nor with the thought, 'When this gift of mine is given, it makes the mind serene.
Gratification & joy arise,'
” — but with the thought, 'This is an ornament for the mind, a support for the mind' — on the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of Brahma's Retinue.
Then, having exhausted that action, that power, that status, that sovereignty, he is a non-returner.
He does not come back to this world.
“This, Sariputta, is the cause, this is the reason, why a person gives a gift of a certain sort and it does not bear great fruit or great benefit, whereas another person gives a gift of the same sort and it bears great fruit and great benefit.”
“I will teach you a Dhamma discourse on bondage & lack of bondage.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said: “A woman attends inwardly to her feminine faculties, her feminine gestures, her feminine manners, feminine poise, feminine desires, feminine voice, feminine charms.
She is excited by that, delighted by that.
Being excited & delighted by that, she attends outwardly to masculine faculties, masculine gestures, masculine manners, masculine poise, masculine desires, masculine voices, masculine charms.
She is excited by that, delighted by that.
Being excited & delighted by that, she wants to be bonded to what is outside her, wants whatever pleasure & happiness that arise based on that bond.
Delighting, caught up in her femininity, a woman goes into bondage with reference to men.
This is how a woman does not transcend her femininity.
“A man attends inwardly to his masculine faculties, masculine gestures, masculine manners, masculine poise, masculine desires, masculine voice, masculine charms.
He is excited by that, delighted by that.
Being excited & delighted by that, he attends outwardly to feminine faculties, feminine gestures, feminine manners, feminine poise, feminine desires, feminine voices, feminine charms.
He is excited by that, delighted by that.
Being excited & delighted by that, he wants to be bonded to what is outside him, wants whatever pleasure & happiness that arise based on that bond.
Delighting, caught up in his masculinity, a man goes into bondage with reference to women.
This is how a man does not transcend his masculinity.
“And how is there lack of bondage?
A woman does not attend inwardly to her feminine faculties… feminine charms.
She is not excited by that, not delighted by that… does not attend outwardly to masculine faculties… masculine charms.
She is not excited by that, not delighted by that… does not want to be bonded to what is outside her, does not want whatever pleasure & happiness that arise based on that bond.
Not delighting, not caught up in her femininity, a woman does not go into bondage with reference to men.
This is how a woman transcends her femininity.
“A man does not attend inwardly to his masculine faculties… masculine charms.
He is not excited by that, not delighted by that… does not attend outwardly to feminine faculties… feminine charms.
He is not excited by that, not delighted by that… does not want to be bonded to what is outside him, does not want whatever pleasure & happiness that arise based on that bond.
Not delighting, not caught up in his masculinity, a man does not go into bondage with reference to women.
This is how a man transcends his masculinity.
“This is how there is lack of bondage.
And this is the Dhamma discourse on bondage & lack of bondage.”
“Monks, a friend endowed with seven qualities is worth associating with.
Which seven?
He gives what is hard to give.
He does what is hard to do.
He endures what is hard to endure.
He reveals his secrets to you.
He keeps your secrets.
When misfortunes strike, he doesn't abandon you.
When you're down & out, he doesn't look down on you.
A friend endowed with these seven qualities is worth associating with.”
“Monks, these seven perceptions, when developed & pursued, are of great fruit, of great benefit.
They gain a footing in the Deathless, have the Deathless as their final end.
Which seven?
The perception of the unattractive, the perception of death, the perception of loathsomeness in food, the perception of distaste for every world, the perception of inconstancy, the perception of stress in what is inconstant, the perception of not-self in what is stressful.
“'The perception of the unattractive, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
“When a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of the unattractive, his mind shrinks away from the completion of the sexual act, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance.
Just as a cock's feather or a piece of tendon, when thrown into a fire, shrinks away, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in; in the same way, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of the unattractive, his mind shrinks away from the completion of the sexual act, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance.
If, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of the unattractive, his mind inclines to the completion of the sexual act, or if non-loathing takes a stance, then he should realize, 'I have not developed the perception of the unattractive; there is no step-by-step distinction in me; I have not arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
But if, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of the unattractive, his mind shrinks away from the completion of the sexual act, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance, then he should realize, 'I have developed the perception of the unattractive; there is a step-by-step distinction in me; I have arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
“'The perception of the unattractive, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'The perception of death, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
“When a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of death, his mind shrinks away from fervor for life, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance.
Just as a cock's feather or a piece of tendon, when thrown into a fire, shrinks away, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in; in the same way, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of death, his mind shrinks away from fervor for life, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance.
If, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of death, his mind inclines to fervor for life, or if non-loathing takes a stance, then he should realize, 'I have not developed the perception of death; there is no step-by-step distinction in me; I have not arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
But if, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of death, his mind shrinks away from fervor for life, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance, then he should realize, 'I have developed the perception of death; there is a step-by-step distinction in me; I have arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
“'The perception of death, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'The perception of loathsomeness in food, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
“When a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of loathsomeness in food, his mind shrinks away from craving for flavors, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance.
Just as a cock's feather or a piece of tendon, when thrown into a fire, shrinks away, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in; in the same way, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of loathsomeness in food, his mind shrinks away from craving for flavors, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance.
If, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of loathsomeness in food, his mind inclines to craving for flavors, or if non-loathing takes a stance, then he should realize, 'I have not developed the perception of loathsomeness in food; there is no step-by-step distinction in me; I have not arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
But if, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of loathsomeness in food, his mind shrinks away from craving for flavors, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance, then he should realize, 'I have developed the perception of loathsomeness in food; there is a step-by-step distinction in me; I have arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
“'The perception of loathsomeness in food, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'The perception of distaste for every world, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
“When a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of distaste for every world, his mind shrinks away from worldly embellishments, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance.
Just as a cock's feather or a piece of tendon, when thrown into a fire, shrinks away, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in; in the same way, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of distaste for every world, his mind shrinks away from worldly embellishments, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance.
If, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of distaste for every world, his mind inclines to worldly embellishments, or if non-loathing takes a stance, then he should realize, 'I have not developed the perception of distaste for every world; there is no step-by-step distinction in me; I have not arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
But if, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of distaste for every world, his mind shrinks away from worldly embellishments, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance, then he should realize, 'I have developed the perception of distaste for every world; there is a step-by-step distinction in me; I have arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
“'The perception of distaste for every world, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'The perception of inconstancy, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
“When a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of inconstancy, his mind shrinks away from gains, offerings, & fame, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance.
Just as a cock's feather or a piece of tendon, when thrown into a fire, shrinks away, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in; in the same way, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of inconstancy, his mind shrinks away from gains, offerings, & fame, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance.
If, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of inconstancy, his mind inclines to gains, offerings, & fame, or if non-loathing takes a stance, then he should realize, 'I have not developed the perception of inconstancy; there is no step-by-step distinction in me; I have not arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
But if, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of inconstancy, his mind shrinks away from gains, offerings, & fame, bends away, pulls back, and is not drawn in, and either equanimity or loathing take a stance, then he should realize, 'I have developed the perception of inconstancy; there is a step-by-step distinction in me; I have arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
“'The perception of inconstancy, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'The perception of stress in what is inconstant, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
“When a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of stress in what is inconstant, a fierce perception of danger & fear is established in him toward idleness, indolence, laziness, heedlessness, lack of commitment, & lack of reflection, as if toward a murderer with an upraised sword.
If, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of stress in what is inconstant, a fierce perception of danger & fear is not established in him toward idleness, indolence, laziness, heedlessness, lack of commitment, & lack of reflection, as if toward a murderer with an upraised sword, then he should realize, 'I have not developed the perception of stress in what is inconstant; there is no step-by-step distinction in me; I have not arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
But if, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of stress in what is inconstant, a fierce perception of danger & fear is established in him toward idleness, indolence, laziness, heedlessness, lack of commitment, & lack of reflection, as if toward a murderer with an upraised sword, then he should realize, 'I have developed the perception of stress in what is inconstant; there is a step-by-step distinction in me; I have arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
“'The perception of stress in what is inconstant, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'The perception of not-self in what is stressful, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
“When a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of not-self in what is stressful, his heart is devoid of I-making & my-making with regard to this conscious body and externally with regard to all themes, has transcended pride, is at peace, and is well-released.
If, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of not-self in what is stressful, his heart is not devoid of I-making & my-making with regard to this conscious body and externally with regard to all themes, has not transcended pride, is not at peace, and is not well-released, then he should realize, 'I have not developed the perception of not-self in what is stressful; there is no step-by-step distinction in me; I have not arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
But if, when a monk's awareness often remains steeped in the perception of not-self in what is stressful, his heart is devoid of I-making & my-making with regard to this conscious body and externally with regard to all themes, has transcended pride, is at peace, and is well-released, then he should realize, 'I have developed the perception of not-self in what is stressful; there is a step-by-step distinction in me; I have arrived at the fruit of development.' In that way he is alert there.
“'The perception of not-self in what is stressful, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit, of great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end': Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“Monks, these seven perceptions, when developed & pursued, are of great fruit, of great benefit.
They gain a footing in the Deathless, have the Deathless as their final end.”
“Last night, monks, a certain devata in the far extreme of the night, her extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of Jeta's Grove, came to me and, on arrival, bowed down to me and stood to one side.
As she was standing there, she said to me, 'These seven qualities, lord, lead to a monk's non-decline.
Which seven?
Respect for the teacher, respect for the Dhamma, respect for the Sangha, respect for training, respect for concentration, compliance, having admirable friends.
These seven qualities, lord, lead to a monk's non-decline.'
“That is what that devata said.
Having said it, she bowed down to me, circled me three times, and then disappeared right there.
When this was said, Ven.
Sariputta said to the Blessed One, “This, lord, is how I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One's brief statement.
“There is the case where a monk himself has respect for the Teacher.
He speaks in praise of having respect for the Teacher.
With regard to those other monks who don't have respect for the Teacher, he gets them to undertake respect for the Teacher.
As for those other monks who do have respect for the Teacher, he at the proper times speaks in praise of them — truly, accurately.
“There is the case where a monk himself has respect for the Dhamma…
“There is the case where a monk himself has respect for the Sangha…
“There is the case where a monk himself has respect for training…
“There is the case where a monk himself has respect for concentration…
“There is the case where a monk himself is compliant…
“There is the case where a monk himself has admirable friends.
He speaks in praise of having admirable friends.
With regard to those other monks who don't have admirable friends, he gets them to undertake admirable friendship.
As for those other monks who do have admirable friends, he at the proper times speaks in praise of them — truly, accurately.
“This, lord, is how I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One's brief statement.”
“Last night, monks, a certain devata in the far extreme of the night, her extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of Jeta's Grove, came to me and, on arrival, bowed down to me and stood to one side.
As she was standing there, she said to me, 'These seven qualities, lord, lead to a monk's non-decline.
Which seven?
Respect for the teacher, respect for the Dhamma, respect for the Sangha, respect for training, respect for concentration, compliance, having admirable friends.
These seven qualities, lord, lead to a monk's non-decline.'
“That is what that devata said.
Having said it, she bowed down to me, circled me three times, and then disappeared right there.”
“Last night, monks, a certain devata in the far extreme of the night, her extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of Jeta's Grove, came to me and, on arrival, bowed down to me and stood to one side.
As she was standing there, she said to me, 'These seven qualities, lord, lead to a monk's non-decline.
Which seven?
Respect for the teacher, respect for the Dhamma, respect for the Sangha, respect for training, respect for concentration, respect for shame, respect for compunction.
These seven qualities, lord, lead to a monk's non-decline.'
“That is what that devata said.
Having said it, she bowed down to me, circled me three times, and then disappeared right there.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying in Rajagaha, on Vulture Peak Mountain.
There he addressed the monks: “Monks, I will teach you the seven conditions that lead to no decline.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said: “And which seven are the conditions that lead to no decline?
“As long as the monks meet often, meet a great deal, their growth can be expected, not their decline.
“As long as the monks meet in harmony, adjourn from their meetings in harmony, and conduct Sangha business in harmony, their growth can be expected, not their decline.
“As long as the monks neither decree what has been undecreed nor repeal what has been decreed, but practice undertaking the training rules as they have been decreed, their growth can be expected, not their decline.
“As long as the monks honor, respect, venerate, and do homage to the elder monks — those with seniority who have long been ordained, the fathers of the Sangha, leaders of the Sangha — regarding them as worth listening to, their growth can be expected, not their decline.
“As long as the monks do not submit to the power of any arisen craving that leads to further becoming, their growth can be expected, not their decline.
“As long as the monks see their own benefit in wilderness dwellings, their growth can be expected, not their decline.
“As long as the monks each keep firmly in mind: 'If there are any well-behaved fellow followers of the chaste life who have yet to come, may they come; and may the well-behaved fellow-followers of the chaste life who have come live in comfort,' their growth can be expected, not their decline.
“As long as the monks remain steadfast in these seven conditions, and as long as these seven conditions endure among the monks, the monks' growth can be expected, not their decline.”
Then a certain devata, in the far extreme of the night, her extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of Jeta's Grove, went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to him, she stood to one side.
As she was standing there, she said to the Blessed One, “These seven qualities, lord, lead to a monk's non-decline.
Which seven?
Respect for the teacher, respect for the Dhamma, respect for the Sangha, respect for training, respect for concentration, respect for heedfulness, respect for hospitality.
These seven qualities, lord, lead to the non-decline of a monk.
That is what the devata said.
The Teacher approved.
Sensing, “The Teacher approves of me,” the devata bowed down to the Blessed One and, circled him three times, keeping him to his right, and then disappeared right there.
Then when the night had past, The Blessed One addressed the monks: “Last night, monks, a certain devata in the far extreme of the night, her extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of Jeta's Grove, came to me and, on arrival, bowed down to me and stood to one side.
As she was standing there, she said to me, 'These seven qualities, lord, lead to a monk's non-decline.
Which seven?
Respect for the teacher, respect for the Dhamma, respect for the Sangha, respect for training, respect for concentration, respect for heedfulness, respect for hospitality.
These seven qualities, lord, lead to the non-decline of a monk.'
“That is what that devata said.
Having said it, she bowed down to me, circled me three times, and then disappeared right there.”
“Monks, seven types of individuals are to be found existing in the world.
Which seven?
“There is the case where an individual sinks down once and stays sunk.
There is the case where an individual, on coming to the surface, sinks down again.
There is the case where an individual, on coming to the surface, stays there.
There is the case where an individual, on coming to the surface, opens his eyes & looks around.
There is the case where an individual, on coming to the surface, heads across.
There is the case where an individual, on coming to the surface, gains a foothold.
Then there is the case where an individual, on coming to the surface, crosses over, reaches the far shore, stands on high ground, a brahman.
“And how does an individual sink down once and stay sunk?
There is the case where an individual is endowed with exclusively dark, unskillful qualities.
That's how an individual sinks down once and stays sunk.
“And how does an individual, on coming to the surface, sink down again?
There is the case where an individual comes to the surface, 'Conviction in skillful qualities is good, conscience is good, concern is good, persistence is good, discernment with regard to skillful qualities is good.' But his conviction neither remains nor grows, but simply wanes away.
His conscience, his concern, his persistence, his discernment neither remain nor grow, but simply wane away.
That's how an individual, on coming to the surface, sinks down again.
“And how does an individual, on coming to the surface, stay there?
There is the case where an individual comes to the surface, 'Conviction in skillful qualities is good, conscience is good, concern is good, persistence is good, discernment with regard to skillful qualities is good.' His conviction doesn't wane, but instead develops & remains.
His conscience, his concern, his persistence, his discernment don't wane, but instead develop & remain.
That's how an individual, on coming to the surface, stays there.
“And how does an individual, on coming to the surface, open his eyes & look around?
There is the case where an individual comes to the surface, 'Conviction in skillful qualities is good, conscience is good, concern is good, persistence is good, discernment with regard to skillful qualities is good.' With the total ending of three fetters, he becomes a stream-winner, steadfast, never again destined for states of woe, headed for self-awakening.
That's how an individual, on coming to the surface, opens his eyes & looks around.
“And how does an individual, on coming to the surface, head across?
There is the case where an individual comes to the surface, 'Conviction in skillful qualities is good, conscience is good, concern is good, persistence is good, discernment with regard to skillful qualities is good.' With the total ending of three fetters, and with the attenuation of passion, aversion, & delusion, he becomes a once-returner, who — on returning only one more time to this world — will make an ending to stress.
That's how an individual, on coming to the surface, heads across.
“And how does an individual, on coming to the surface, gain a foothold?
There is the case where an individual comes to the surface, 'Conviction in skillful qualities is good, conscience is good, concern is good, persistence is good, discernment with regard to skillful qualities is good.' With the total ending of the five lower fetters, he is due to be reborn, there to be totally unbound, never again to return from that world.
That's how an individual, on coming to the surface, gains a foothold.
“And how does an individual, on coming to the surface, cross over, reach the far shore, stand on high ground, a brahman?
There is the case where an individual comes to the surface, 'Conviction in skillful qualities is good, conscience is good, concern is good, persistence is good, discernment with regard to skillful qualities is good.' With the ending of the mental fermentations, he enters & remains in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having directly known and realized them for himself right in the here & now.
That's how an individual, on coming to the surface, crosses over, reaches the far shore, stands on high ground, a brahman.
“These are the seven types of individuals to be found existing in the world.”
“Monks, there are these seven obsessions.
Which seven?
” The obsession of sensual passion.
” The obsession of resistance.
” The obsession of views.
” The obsession of uncertainty.
” The obsession of conceit.
” The obsession of passion for becoming.
” The obsession of ignorance.
“These are the seven obsessions.
See also: AN.
“Monks, with the abandoning & destruction of the seven obsessions, the holy life is fulfilled.
Which seven?
The obsession of sensual passion, the obsession of resistance, the obsession of views, the obsession of uncertainty, the obsession of conceit, the obsession of passion for becoming, the obsession of ignorance.
With the abandoning & destruction of these seven obsessions, the holy life is fulfilled.
“When, for a monk, the obsession of sensual passion has been abandoned, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising; when, for him, the obsession of resistance… the obsession of views… the obsession of uncertainty… the obsession of conceit… the obsession of passion for becoming… the obsession of ignorance has been abandoned, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising: this is called a monk who has cut through craving, has turned away from the fetter, and — by rightly breaking through conceit — has put an end to suffering & stress.”
Then Ugga, the king's chief minister, approached the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One: “It's amazing, lord, & awesome, how prosperous Migara Rohaneyya is, how great his treasures, how great his resources!
“But what is his property, Ugga?
What are his great treasures & great resources?
“One hundred thousand pieces of gold, lord, to say nothing of his silver.
“That is treasure, Ugga.
I don't say that it's not.
And that treasure is open to fire, floods, kings, thieves, & hateful heirs.
But these seven treasures are not open to fire, flood, kings, thieves, or hateful heirs.
Which seven?
The treasure of conviction, the treasure of virtue, the treasure of conscience, the treasure of concern, the treasure of listening, the treasure of generosity, the treasure of discernment.
These, Ugga, are the seven treasures that are not open to fire, flood, kings, thieves, or hateful heirs.
“Monks, there are these seven treasures.
Which seven?
The treasure of conviction, the treasure of virtue, the treasure of conscience, the treasure of concern, the treasure of listening, the treasure of generosity, the treasure of discernment.
“And what is the treasure of conviction?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones has conviction, is convinced of the Tathagata's Awakening: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy and rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.' This is called the treasure of conviction.
“And what is the treasure of virtue?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones abstains from taking life, abstains from stealing, abstains from illicit sexual conduct, abstains from lying, abstains from taking intoxicants that cause heedlessness.
This, monks, is called the treasure of virtue.
“And what is the treasure of conscience?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones feels shame at bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, mental misconduct.
This is called the treasure of conscience.
“And what is the treasure of concern?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones feels concern for bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, mental misconduct.
This is called the treasure of concern.
“And what is the treasure of listening?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones has heard much, has retained what he/she has heard, has stored what he/she has heard.
Whatever teachings are admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, admirable in the end, that — in their meaning and expression — proclaim the holy life that is entirely complete and pure: those he/she has listened to often, retained, discussed, accumulated, examined with his/her mind, and well-penetrated in terms of his/her views.
This is called the treasure of listening.
“And what is the treasure of generosity?
There is the case of a disciple of the noble ones, his awareness cleansed of the stain of stinginess, living at home, freely generous, openhanded, delighting in being magnanimous, responsive to requests, delighting in the distribution of alms.
This is called the treasure of generosity.
“And what is the treasure of discernment?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones is discerning, endowed with discernment of arising & passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
This is called the treasure of discernment.”
“In seeing six rewards, it's enough motivation for a monk to establish the perception of not-self with regard to all phenomena without exception.
Which six?
'I won't be fashioned in connection with any world.
My I-making will be stopped.
My my-making will be stopped.
I'll be endowed with uncommon knowledge.
I'll become one who rightly sees cause, along with causally-originated phenomena.'
“In seeing these six rewards, it's enough motivation for a monk to establish the perception of not-self with regard to all phenomena without exception.
See also: AN.; AN..
“In seeing six rewards, it's enough motivation for a monk to establish the perception of stress with regard to all fabrications without exception.
Which six?
'The perception of disenchantment will be established within me with regard to all fabrications, like a murderer with a drawn sword.
My mind will rise above every world.
I'll become one who sees peace in Unbinding.
My obsessions will go to their destruction.
I'll be one who has completed his task.
The Teacher will have been served with good will.'
“In seeing these six rewards, it's enough motivation for a monk to establish the perception of stress with regard to all fabrications without exception.
See also: AN.; AN..
“In seeing six rewards, it's enough motivation for a monk to establish the perception of inconstancy with regard to all fabrications without exception.
Which six?
'All fabrications will appear as unstable.
My mind will not delight in any world.
My mind will rise above every world.
My heart will be inclined to Unbinding.
My fetters will go to their abandoning.
I'll be endowed with the foremost qualities of the contemplative life.'
“In seeing these six rewards, it's enough for a monk to establish the perception of inconstancy with regard to all fabrications without exception.
See also: AN.; AN..
“Monks, there are these six rewards in realizing the fruit of stream-entry.
Which six?
One is certain of the true Dhamma.
One is not subject to falling back.
There is no suffering over what has had a limit placed on it.
One is endowed with uncommon knowledge.
One rightly sees cause, along with causally-originated phenomena.
“These are the six rewards in realizing the fruit of stream-entry.”
“Endowed with these six qualities, a person is incapable of alighting on the lawfulness, the rightness of skillful mental qualities even when listening to the true Dhamma.
Which six?
“When the Doctrine & Discipline declared by the Tathagata is being taught, he does not listen well, does not give ear, does not apply his mind to gnosis, grabs hold of what is worthless, rejects what is worthwhile, and is not endowed with the patience to conform with the teaching.
“Endowed with these six qualities, a person is incapable of alighting on the lawfulness, the rightness of skillful mental qualities even when listening to the true Dhamma.
“Endowed with these six qualities, a person is capable of alighting on the lawfulness, the rightness of skillful mental qualities even while listening to the true Dhamma.
Which six?
“When the Doctrine & Discipline declared by the Tathagata is being taught, he listens well, gives ear, applies his mind to gnosis, rejects what is worthless, grabs hold of what is worthwhile, and is endowed with the patience to conform with the teaching.
“Endowed with these six qualities, a person is capable of alighting on the lawfulness, the rightness of skillful mental qualities even while listening to the true Dhamma.”
“Endowed with these six qualities, a person is incapable of alighting on the lawfulness, the rightness of skillful mental qualities even when listening to the true Dhamma.
Which six?
“He has killed his mother; he has killed his father; he has killed an arahant; he has, with corrupt intent, caused the blood of a Tathagata to flow; he has caused a split in the Sangha; or he is a person of dull discernment, slow & dull-witted.
“Endowed with these six qualities, a person is incapable of alighting on the lawfulness, the rightness of skillful mental qualities even when listening to the true Dhamma.
“Endowed with these six qualities, a person is capable of alighting on the lawfulness, the rightness of skillful mental qualities even while listening to the true Dhamma.
Which six?
“He has not killed his mother; he has not killed his father; he has not killed an arahant; he has not, with corrupt intent, caused the blood of a Tathagata to flow; he has not caused a split in the Sangha; and he is a discerning person, not slow or dull-witted.
“Endowed with these six qualities, a person is capable of alighting on the lawfulness, the rightness of skillful mental qualities even while listening to the true Dhamma.”
“Endowed with these six qualities, a person is incapable of alighting on the lawfulness, the rightness of skillful mental qualities even when listening to the true Dhamma.
Which six?
“He is endowed with a kamma obstruction, a defilement obstruction, a result-of--kamma obstruction; he lacks conviction, has no desire, and has dull discernment.
“Endowed with these six qualities, a person is incapable of alighting on the lawfulness, the rightness of skillful mental qualities even when listening to the true Dhamma.
“Endowed with these six qualities, a person is capable of alighting on the lawfulness, the rightness of skillful mental qualities even while listening to the true Dhamma.
Which six?
“He is not endowed with a kamma obstruction, a defilement obstruction, or a result-of--kamma obstruction; he has conviction, has the desire, and is discerning.
“Endowed with these six qualities, a person is capable of alighting on the lawfulness, the rightness of skillful mental qualities even while listening to the true Dhamma.”
“A monk endowed with six qualities is incapable of realizing the unexcelled cooled state.
Which six?
There is the case where a monk doesn't rein in his mind when it should be reined in.
He doesn't exert his mind when it should be exerted.
He doesn't gladden his mind when it should be gladdened.
He doesn't watch over his mind when it should be watched over.
He is intent on what is lowly.
And he delights in self-identity.
A monk endowed with these six qualities is incapable of realizing the unexcelled cooled state.
“A monk endowed with six qualities is capable of realizing the unexcelled cooled state.
Which six?
There is the case where a monk reins in his mind when it should be reined in.
He exerts his mind when it should be exerted.
He gladdens his mind when it should be gladdened.
He watches over his mind when it should be watched over.
He is intent on what is exquisite.
And he delights in Unbinding.
A monk endowed with these six qualities is capable of realizing the unexcelled cooled state.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha, on Vulture Peak Mountain.
And on that occasion Ven.
Sona was staying near Rajagaha in the Cool Wood.
Then, as Ven.
Sona was meditating in seclusion, this train of thought arose in his awareness: “Of the Blessed One's disciples who have aroused their persistence, I am one, but my mind is not released from the fermentations through lack of clinging/sustenance.
Now, my family has enough wealth that it would be possible to enjoy wealth & make merit.
What if I were to disavow the training, return to the lower life, enjoy wealth, & make merit?
Then the Blessed One, as soon as he perceived with his awareness the train of thought in Ven.
Sona's awareness — as a strong man might stretch out his bent arm or bend his outstretched arm — disappeared from Vulture Peak Mountain, appeared in the Cool Wood right in front of Ven.
Sona, and sat down on a prepared seat.
Ven.
Sona, after bowing down to the Blessed One, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “Just now, as you were meditating in seclusion, didn't this train of thought appear to your awareness: 'Of the Blessed One's disciples who have aroused their persistence, I am one, but my mind is not released from the fermentations… What if I were to disavow the training, return to the lower life, enjoy wealth, & make merit?' “Yes, lord.
“Now what do you think, Sona.
Before, when you were a house-dweller, were you skilled at playing the vina?
“Yes, lord.
“And what do you think: when the strings of your vina were too taut, was your vina in tune & playable?
“No, lord.
“And what do you think: when the strings of your vina were too loose, was your vina in tune & playable?
“No, lord.
“And what do you think: when the strings of your vina were neither too taut nor too loose, but tuned to be right on pitch, was your vina in tune & playable?
“Yes, lord.
“In the same way, Sona, over-aroused persistence leads to restlessness, overly slack persistence leads to laziness.
Thus you should determine the right pitch for your persistence, attunethe pitch of the faculties, and there pick up your theme.
“Yes, lord,” Ven.
Sona answered the Blessed One.
Then, having given this exhortation to Ven.
Sona, the Blessed One — as a strong man might stretch out his bent arm or bend his outstretched arm — disappeared from the Cool Wood and appeared on Vulture Peak Mountain.
So after that, Ven.
Sona determined the right pitch for his persistence, attuned the pitch of the faculties, and there picked up his theme.
Dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute, he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And thus Ven.
Sona became another one of the arahants.
Then, on the attainment of arahantship, this thought occurred to Ven.
Sona: “What if I were to go to the Blessed One and, on arrival, to declare gnosis in his presence?” So he then went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “When a monk is an arahant, his fermentations ended, who has reached fulfillment, done the task, laid down the burden, attained the true goal, totally destroyed the fetter of becoming, and is released through right gnosis, he is dedicated to six things: renunciation, seclusion, non-afflictiveness, the ending of craving, the ending of clinging/sustenance, & non-deludedness.
“Now it may occur to a certain venerable one to think, 'Perhaps it is entirely dependent on conviction that this venerable one is dedicated to renunciation,' but it should not be seen in that way.
The monk whose fermentations are ended, having fulfilled, does not see in himself anything further to do, or anything further to add to what he has done.
It is because of the ending of passion, because of his being free of passion, that he is dedicated to renunciation.
It is because of the ending of aversion, because of his being free of aversion, that he is dedicated to renunciation.
It is because of the ending of delusion, because of his being free of delusion, that he is dedicated to renunciation.
“Now it may occur to a certain venerable one to think, 'Perhaps it is because he desires gain, honor, & fame that this venerable one is dedicated to seclusion'… 'Perhaps it is because he falls back on attachment to precepts & practices as being essential that he is dedicated to non-afflictiveness,' but it should not be seen in that way.
The monk whose fermentations are ended, having fulfilled, does not see in himself anything further to do, or anything further to add to what he has done.
It is because of the ending of passion, because of his being free of passion, that he is dedicated to non-afflictiveness.
It is because of the ending of aversion, because of his being free of aversion, that he is dedicated to non-afflictiveness.
It is because of the ending of delusion, because of his being free of delusion, that he is dedicated to non-afflictiveness.
“It is because of the ending of passion, because of his being free of passion… because of the ending of aversion, because of his being free of aversion… because of the ending of delusion, because of his being free of delusion, that he is dedicated to the ending of craving… the ending of clinging/sustenance… non-deludedness.
“Even if powerful forms cognizable by the eye come into the visual range of a monk whose mind is thus rightly released, his mind is neither overpowered nor even engaged.
Being still, having reached imperturbability, he focuses on their passing away.
And even if powerful sounds… aromas… flavors… tactile sensations… Even if powerful ideas cognizable by the intellect come into the mental range of a monk whose mind is thus rightly released, his mind is neither overpowered nor even engaged.
Being still, having reached imperturbability, he focuses on their passing away.
“Just as if there were a mountain of rock — without cracks, without fissures, one solid mass — and then from the east there were to come a powerful storm of wind & rain: the mountain would neither shiver nor quiver nor shake.
And then from the west… the north… the south there were to come a powerful storm of wind & rain: the mountain would neither shiver nor quiver nor shake.
In the same way, even if powerful forms cognizable by the eye come into the visual range of a monk whose mind is thus rightly released, his mind is neither overpowered nor even engaged.
Being still, having reached imperturbability, he focuses on their passing away.
And even if powerful sounds… aromas… flavors… tactile sensations… Even if powerful ideas cognizable by the intellect come into the mental range of a monk whose mind is thus rightly released, his mind is neither overpowered nor even engaged.
Being still, having reached imperturbability, he focuses on their passing away.”
“I will teach you the penetrative explanation that is a Dhamma explanation.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said: “And which penetrative explanation is a Dhamma explanation?
“Sensuality should be known.
The cause by which sensuality comes into play should be known.
The diversity in sensuality should be known.
The result of sensuality should be known.
The cessation of sensuality should be known.
The path of practice for the cessation of sensuality should be known.
“Feeling should be known.
The cause by which feeling comes into play should be known.
The diversity in feeling should be known.
The result of feeling should be known.
The cessation of feeling should be known.
The path of practice for the cessation of feeling should be known.
“Perception should be known.
The cause by which perception comes into play should be known.
The diversity in perception should be known.
The result of perception should be known.
The cessation of perception should be known.
The path of practice for the cessation of perception should be known.
“Fermentations should be known.
The cause by which fermentations come into play should be known.
The diversity in fermentations should be known.
The result of fermentations should be known.
The cessation of fermentations should be known.
The path of practice for the cessation of fermentations should be known
“Kamma should be known.
The cause by which kamma comes into play should be known.
The diversity in kamma should be known.
The result of kamma should be known.
The cessation of kamma should be known.
The path of practice for the cessation of kamma should be known.
“Stress should be known.
The cause by which stress comes into play should be known.
The diversity in stress should be known.
The result of stress should be known.
The cessation of stress should be known.
The path of practice for the cessation of stress should be known.
“'Sensuality should be known.
The cause by which sensuality comes into play… The diversity in sensuality… The result of sensuality… The cessation of sensuality… The path of practice for the cessation of sensuality should be known.' Thus it has been said.
In reference to what was it said?
“There are these five strings of sensuality.
Which five?
Forms cognizable via the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing; sounds cognizable via the ear… aromas cognizable via the nose… flavors cognizable via the tongue… tactile sensations cognizable via the body — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
But these are not sensuality.
They are called strings of sensuality in the discipline of the noble ones.
“And what is the cause by which sensuality comes into play?
Contact is the cause by which sensuality comes into play.
“And what is the diversity in sensuality?
Sensuality with regard to forms is one thing, sensuality with regard to sounds is another, sensuality with regard to aromas is another, sensuality with regard to flavors is another, sensuality with regard to tactile sensations is another.
This is called the diversity in sensuality.
“And what is the result of sensuality?
One who wants sensuality produces a corresponding state of existence, on the side of merit or demerit.
This is called the result of sensuality.
“And what is the cessation of sensuality?
From the cessation of contact is the cessation of sensuality; and just this noble eightfold path — right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration — is the way leading to the cessation of sensuality.
“Now when a disciple of the noble ones discerns sensuality in this way, the cause by which sensuality comes into play in this way, the diversity of sensuality in this way, the result of sensuality in this way, the cessation of sensuality in this way, & the path of practice leading to the cessation of sensuality in this way, then he discerns this penetrative holy life as the cessation of sensuality.
“'Sensuality should be known.
The cause by which sensuality comes into play… The diversity in sensuality… The result of sensuality… The cessation of sensuality… The path of practice for the cessation of sensuality should be known.' Thus it has been said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'Feeling should be known.
The cause by which feeling comes into play… The diversity in feeling… The result of feeling… The cessation of feeling… The path of practice for the cessation of feeling should be known.' Thus it has been said.
In reference to what was it said?
“There are these three kinds of feeling: a feeling of pleasure, a feeling of pain, & feeling of neither pleasure nor pain.
“And what is the cause by which feeling comes into play?
Contact is the cause by which feeling comes into play.
“And what is the diversity in feeling?
There is the feeling of pleasure connected with the baits of the world.
There is the feeling of pleasure not connected with the baits of the world.
There is the feeling of pain connected with the baits of the world.
There is the feeling of pain not connected with the baits of the world.
There is the feeling of neither pleasure nor pain connected with the baits of the world.
There is the feeling of neither pleasure nor pain not connected with the baits of the world.
This is called the diversity in feeling.
“And what is the result of feeling?
One who feels a feeling produces a corresponding state of existence, on the side of merit or demerit.
This is called the result of feeling.
“And what is the cessation of feeling?
From the cessation of contact is the cessation of feeling; and just this noble eightfold path — right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration — is the way leading to the cessation of feeling.
“Now when a disciple of the noble ones discerns feeling in this way, the cause by which feeling comes into play in this way, the diversity of feeling in this way, the result of feeling in this way, the cessation of feeling in this way, & the path of practice leading to the cessation of feeling in this way, then he discerns this penetrative holy life as the cessation of feeling.
“'Feeling should be known.
The cause by which feeling comes into play… The diversity in feeling… The result of feeling… The cessation of feeling… The path of practice for the cessation of feeling should be known.' Thus it has been said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'Perception should be known.
The cause by which perception comes into play… The diversity in perception… The result of perception… The cessation of perception… The path of practice for the cessation of perception should be known.' Thus it has been said.
In reference to what was it said?
“There are these six kinds of perception: the perception of form, the perception of sound, the perception of aroma, the perception of flavor, the perception of tactile sensation, the perception of ideas.
“And what is the cause by which perception comes into play?
Contact is the cause by which perception comes into play.
“And what is the diversity in perception?
Perception with regard to forms is one thing, perception with regard to sounds is another, perception with regard to aromas is another, perception with regard to flavors is another, perception with regard to tactile sensations is another, perception with regard to ideas is another.
This is called the diversity in perception.
“And what is the result of perception?
Perception has expression as its result, I tell you.
However a person perceives something, that is how he expresses it: 'I have this sort of perception.' This is called the result of perception.
“And what is the cessation of perception?
From the cessation of contact is the cessation of perception; and just this noble eightfold path — right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration — is the way leading to the cessation of perception.
“Now when a disciple of the noble ones discerns perception in this way, the cause by which perception comes into play in this way, the diversity of perception in this way, the result of perception in this way, the cessation of perception in this way, & the path of practice leading to the cessation of perception in this way, then he discerns this penetrative holy life as the cessation of perception.
“'Perception should be known.
The cause by which perception comes into play… The diversity in perception… The result of perception… The cessation of perception… The path of practice for the cessation of perception should be known.' Thus it has been said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'Fermentations should be known.
The cause by which fermentations come into play… The diversity in fermentations… The result of fermentations… The cessation of fermentations… The path of practice for the cessation of fermentations should be known.' Thus it has been said.
In reference to what was it said?
“There are these three kinds of fermentations: the fermentation of sensuality, the fermentation of becoming, the fermentation of ignorance.
“And what is the cause by which fermentations come into play?
Ignorance is the cause by which fermentations come into play.
“And what is the diversity in fermentations?
There are fermentations that lead to hell, those that lead to the animal womb, those that lead to the realm of the hungry shades, those that lead to the human world, those that lead to the world of the devas.
This is called the diversity in fermentations.
“And what is the result of fermentations?
One who is immersed in ignorance produces a corresponding state of existence, on the side of merit or demerit.
This is called the result of fermentations.
“And what is the cessation of fermentations?
From the cessation of ignorance is the cessation of fermentations; and just this noble eightfold path — right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration — is the way leading to the cessation of fermentations.
“Now when a disciple of the noble ones discerns fermentations in this way, the cause by which fermentations come into play in this way, the diversity of fermentations in this way, the result of fermentations in this way, the cessation of fermentations in this way, & the path of practice leading to the cessation of fermentations in this way, then he discerns this penetrative holy life as the cessation of fermentations.
“'Fermentations should be known.
The cause by which fermentations come into play… The diversity in fermentations… The result of fermentations… The cessation of fermentations… The path of practice for the cessation of fermentations should be known.' Thus it has been said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'Kamma should be known.
The cause by which kamma comes into play should be known.
The diversity in kamma should be known.
The result of kamma should be known.
The cessation of kamma should be known.
The path of practice for the cessation of kamma should be known.' Thus it has been said.
In reference to what was it said?
“Intention, I tell you, is kamma.
Intending, one does kamma by way of body, speech, & intellect.
“And what is the cause by which kamma comes into play?
Contact is the cause by which kamma comes into play.
“And what is the diversity in kamma?
There is kamma to be experienced in hell, kamma to be experienced in the realm of common animals, kamma to be experienced in the realm of the hungry shades, kamma to be experienced in the human world, kamma to be experienced in the world of the devas.
This is called the diversity in kamma.
“And what is the result of kamma?
The result of kamma is of three sorts, I tell you: that which arises right here & now, that which arises later, and that which arises following that.
This is called the result of kamma.
“And what is the cessation of kamma?
From the cessation of contact is the cessation of kamma; and just this noble eightfold path — right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration — is the path of practice leading to the cessation of kamma.
“Now when a disciple of the noble ones discerns kamma in this way, the cause by which kamma comes into play in this way, the diversity of kamma in this way, the result of kamma in this way, the cessation of kamma in this way, & the path of practice leading to the cessation of kamma in this way, then he discerns this penetrative holy life as the cessation of kamma.
“'Kamma should be known.
The cause by which kamma comes into play… The diversity in kamma… The result of kamma… The cessation of kamma… The path of practice for the cessation of kamma should be known.' Thus it has been said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'Stress should be known.
The cause by which stress comes into play should be known.
The diversity in stress should be known.
The result of stress should be known.
The cessation of stress should be known.
The path of practice for the cessation of stress should be known.' Thus it has been said.
In reference to what was it said?
Birth is stress, aging is stress, death is stress; sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair are stress; association with the unbeloved is stress; separation from the loved is stress; not getting what is wanted is stress.
In short, the five clinging-aggregates are stress.
“And what is the cause by which stress comes into play?
Craving is the cause by which stress comes into play.
“And what is the diversity in stress?
There is major stress & minor, slowly fading & quickly fading.
This is called the diversity in stress.
“And what is the result of stress?
There are some cases in which a person overcome with pain, his mind exhausted, grieves, mourns, laments, beats his breast, & becomes bewildered.
Or one overcome with pain, his mind exhausted, comes to search outside, 'Who knows a way or two to stop this pain?' I tell you, monks, that stress results either in bewilderment or in search.
This is called the result of stress.
“And what is the cessation of stress?
From the cessation of craving is the cessation of stress; and just this noble eightfold path — right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration — is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.
“Now when a disciple of the noble ones discerns stress in this way, the cause by which stress comes into play in this way, the diversity of stress in this way, the result of stress in this way, the cessation of stress in this way, & the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress in this way, then he discerns this penetrative holy life as the cessation of stress.
“'Stress should be known.
The cause by which stress comes into play… The diversity in stress… The result of stress… The cessation of stress… The path of practice for the cessation of stress should be known.' Thus it was said, and in reference to this was it said.
“And this is the penetrative explanation that is a Dhamma explanation.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
And at that time Ven.
Khema and Ven.
Sumana were staying near Savatthi in the Blind Man's Grove.
Then Ven.
Khema and Ven.
Sumana went to the Blessed One and on arrival, have bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, Ven.
Khema said to the Blessed One, “When a monk is an arahant, with his fermentations ended — one who has reached fulfillment, done the task, laid down the burden, attained the true goal, totally destroyed the fetter of becoming, and is released through right gnosis — the thought doesn't occur to him that 'There is someone better than me,' or 'There is someone equal to me,' or 'There is someone worse than me.'” That is what Ven.
Khema said, and the Teacher approved.
Sensing that “The Teacher approves of me,” Ven.
Khema got up from his seat, bowed down to the Blessed One, circled him — keeping him on his right — and left.
Then Ven.
Sumana, not long after Ven.
Khema had left, said to the Blessed One, “When a monk is an arahant, with his fermentations ended — one who has reached fulfillment, done the task, laid down the burden, attained the true goal, totally destroyed the fetter of becoming, and is released through right gnosis — the thought doesn't occur to him that 'There is no one better than me,' or 'There is no one equal to me,' or 'There is no one worse than me.'” That is what Ven.
Sumana said, and the Teacher approved.
Sensing that “The Teacher approves of me,” Ven.
Sumana got up from his seat, bowed down to the Blessed One, circled him — keeping him on his right — and left.
Then the Blessed One, not long after Ven.
Khema & Ven.
Sumana had left, said to the monks, “Monks, this is how clansmen declare gnosis.
The meaning is stated, but without mention of self.
Yet there are some worthless people who declare gnosis as if in jest.
They will fall into trouble afterward.
Then Ven.
Ananda went to Ven.
Sariputta and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to Ven.
Sariputta, “Friend Sariputta, to what extent does a monk hear Dhamma that he has not heard, do the Dhammas he has heard not get confused, do the Dhammas he has touched with his awareness stay current, and does he understand what was not understood?
“Friend Ananda is learned.
Let the answer occur to him.
“In that case, friend Sariputta, listen to the Dhamma.
Pay careful attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, friend,” Ven.
Sariputta responded.
Ven.
Ananda said, “There is the case, friend, where a monk masters the Dhamma: dialogues, narratives of mixed prose & verse, explanations, verses, spontaneous exclamations, quotations, birth stories, amazing events, question & answer sessions.
He teaches the Dhamma in detail — as he has heard it, as he has remembered it — to others.
He gets others to recite the Dhamma in detail — as they have heard it, as they have remembered it.
He holds a group chanting of the Dhamma in detail — as he has heard it, as he has remembered it.
He thinks about & evaluates the Dhamma as he has heard it, as he has remembered it; he contemplates it with his intellect.
He enters the Rains in monasteries in which there are senior monks who are learned, who know the tradition, who are holders of the Dhamma, the Vinaya, & the Matika.
Having approached them periodically, he questions them & quizzes them: 'How it this, venerable sirs?
What is the meaning of this?' They make open for him what wasn't open, make plain what wasn't plain, dispel doubt on various doubtful points.
“It's to this extent, friend Sariputta, that a monk hears Dhamma he has not heard, that the Dhammas he has heard do not get confused, that the Dhammas he has touched with his awareness stay current, and that he understands what was not understood.
“It's amazing, my friend.
It's astounding, my friend, how well-said that was by friend Ananda.
And we will remember friend Ananda as endowed with these six qualities: Friend Ananda has mastered the Dhamma: dialogues, narratives of mixed prose and verse, explanations, verses, spontaneous exclamations, quotations, birth stories, amazing events, question & answer sessions.
Friend Ananda teaches the Dhamma in detail — as he has heard it, as he has remembered it — to others.
Friend Ananda gets others to recite the Dhamma in detail — as they have heard it, as they have remembered it.
Friend Ananda holds a group chanting of the Dhamma in detail — as he has heard it, as he has remembered it.
Friend Ananda thinks about & evaluates the Dhamma as he has heard it, as he has remembered it; he contemplates it with his intellect.
Friend Ananda enters the Rains in monasteries in which there are senior monks who are learned, who know the tradition, who are holders of the Dhamma, the Vinaya, & the Matika.
Having approached them periodically, he questions them & quizzes them: 'How it this, venerable sirs?
What is the meaning of this?' They make open for friend Ananda what wasn't open, make plain what wasn't plain, dispel doubt on various doubtful points.”
Then Moliyasivaka the wanderer went to the Blessed One and exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One, “'The Dhamma is visible here-&-now, the Dhamma is visible here-&-now,' it is said.
To what extent is the Dhamma visible here-&-now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves?
“Very well, then, Sivaka, I will ask you a question in return.
Answer as you see fit.
What do you think: When greed is present within you, do you discern that 'Greed is present within me'?
And when greed is not present within you, do you discern that 'Greed is not present within me'?
“Yes, lord.
“The fact that when greed is present within you, you discern that greed is present within you; and when greed is not present within you, you discern that greed is not present within you: that is one way in which the Dhamma is visible in the here-&-now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.
“What do you think: When aversion is present within you… When delusion is present within you… When a greedy quality is present within you… When an aversive quality is present within you…
“What do you think: When a delusive quality is present within you, do you discern that 'A delusive quality is present within me'?
And when a delusive quality is not present within you, do you discern that 'A delusive quality is not present within me'?
“Yes, lord.
“The fact that when a delusive quality is present within you, you discern that a delusive quality is present within you; and when a delusive quality is not present within you, you discern that a delusive quality is not present within you: that is one way in which the Dhamma is visible in the here-&-now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.
“Magnificent, lord!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way the has Blessed One — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the Community of monks.
May the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge, from this day forward, for life.”
On one occasion Ven.
Maha Cunda was staying among the Cetis in Sanjatiya.
There he addressed the monks, “Friend monks!
“Yes, friend,” the monks responded to him.
Ven.
Maha Cunda said, “Friends, there is the case where Dhamma-devotee monks disparage jhana monks, saying, 'These people are absorbed and besorbed in jhana, saying, “We are absorbed, we are absorbed.” But why, indeed, are they absorbed?
For what purpose are they absorbed?
How are they absorbed?' In that, the Dhamma-devotee monks do not shine brightly, and the jhana monks do not shine brightly.
That is not practicing for the welfare of the masses, for the happiness of the masses, for the good of the masses, nor for the welfare & happiness of human & divine beings.
“Then there is the case where jhana monks disparage Dhamma-devotee monks, saying, 'These people say, “We are Dhamma-devotees, we are Dhamma-devotees,' but they are excitable, boisterous, unsteady, mouthy, loose in their talk, muddled in their mindfulness, unalert, unconcentrated, their minds wandering, their senses uncontrolled.
Why, indeed, are they Dhamma devotees?
For what purpose are they Dhamma devotees?
How are they Dhamma devotees?' In that, the jhana monks do not shine brightly, and the Dhamma-devotee monks do not shine brightly.
That is not practicing for the welfare of the masses, for the happiness of the masses, for the good of the masses, nor for the welfare & happiness of human & divine beings.
“Then there is the case where Dhamma-devotee monks praise only Dhamma-devotee monks, and not jhana monks.
In that, the Dhamma-devotee monks do not shine brightly, and the jhana monks do not shine brightly.
That is not practicing for the welfare of the masses, for the happiness of the masses, for the good of the masses, nor for the welfare & happiness of human & divine beings.
“Then there is the case where jhana monks praise only jhana monks, and not Dhamma-devotee monks.
In that, the jhana monks do not shine brightly, and the Dhamma-devotee monks do not shine brightly.
That is not practicing for the welfare of the masses, for the happiness of the masses, for the good of the masses, nor for the welfare & happiness of human & divine beings.
“Thus, friends, you should train yourselves: 'Being Dhamma-devotee monks, we will speak in praise of jhana monks.' That's how you should train yourselves.
Why is that?
Because these are amazing people, hard to find in the world, i.e., those who dwell touching the deathless element with the body.
“And thus, friends, you should train yourselves: 'Being jhana monks, we will speak in praise of Dhamma-devotee monks.' That's how you should train yourselves.
Why is that?
Because these are amazing people, hard to find in the world, i.e., those who penetrate with discernment statements of deep meaning.”
“Monks, for one who partakes of sensuality, poverty is suffering in the world.
“Yes, lord.
“And a poor, destitute, penniless person gets into debt.
For one who partakes of sensuality, getting into debt is suffering in the world.
“Yes, lord.
“And a poor, destitute, penniless person, having gotten into debt, owes interest payments.
For one who partakes of sensuality, interest payment is suffering in the world.
“Yes, lord.
“And when a poor, destitute, penniless person owing interest payments does not pay interest on time, they serve him notice.
For one who partakes of sensuality, being served notice is suffering in the world.
“Yes, lord.
“And when a poor, destitute, penniless person, being served notice, does not pay, they hound him.
For one who partakes of sensuality, being hounded is suffering in the world.
“Yes, lord.
“And when a poor, destitute, penniless person, being hounded, does not pay, he is put into bondage.
For one who partakes of sensuality, bondage is suffering in the world.
“Yes, lord.
“Thus, monks, poverty is suffering in the world for one who partakes of sensuality.
Getting into debt is suffering in the world for one who partakes of sensuality.
Interest payment is suffering in the world for one who partakes of sensuality.
Being served notice is suffering in the world for one who partakes of sensuality.
Being hounded is suffering in the world for one who partakes of sensuality.
Bondage is suffering in the world for one who partakes of sensuality.
“In the same way, monks, whoever has no conviction with regard to skillful mental qualities, no sense of conscience with regard to skillful mental qualities, no sense of concern with regard to skillful mental qualities, no persistence with regard to skillful mental qualities, no discernment with regard to skillful mental qualities is, in the discipline of a noble one, said to be poor, destitute, & penniless.
“He — poor, destitute, & penniless, having no conviction with regard to skillful mental qualities, no sense of conscience… no sense of concern… no persistence… no discernment with regard to skillful mental qualities — engages in misconduct by way of the body, misconduct by way of speech, misconduct by way of the mind.
For him, I tell you, this is getting into debt.
“For the purpose of concealing his bodily misconduct, he formulates evil desires: He desires, 'May they not know about me.' He resolves, 'May they not know about me.' He speaks, 'May they not know about me.' He makes an effort with his body, 'May they not know about me.' For the purpose of concealing his verbal misconduct… For the purpose of concealing his mental misconduct, he formulates evil desires: He desires, 'May they not know about me.' He resolves, 'May they not know about me.' He speaks, 'May they not know about me.' He makes an effort with his body, 'May they not know about me.' For him, I tell you, this is interest payment.
“And then his well-behaved companions in the holy life say about him, 'This venerable one acts in this way, behaves in this way.' For him, I tell you, this is being served notice.
“And then, when he has gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, he is beset with evil, unskillful thoughts accompanied by remorse.
For him, I tell you, this is being hounded.
“He — poor, destitute, & penniless, having engaged in misconduct by way of the body, misconduct by way of speech, & misconduct by way of the mind — on the break-up of the body, after death, is bound by the bond of hell or the bond of the animal womb.
And I can imagine no one other bond so tormenting, so painful, so obstructive to the unexcelled rest from bondage, as the bond of hell or the bond of the animal womb.”
Translator's note: The frame story here is common to three suttas: AN., AN., and AN..
Although the conversation takes a different turn in each case, in all three cases the Buddha takes the opportunity to teach some unusually plain-spoken truths.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One, on a wandering tour among the Kosalans with a large community of monks, arrived at a Kosalan brahman village named Icchanangala.
There he stayed in the Icchanangala forest grove.
The brahman householders of Icchanangala heard it said, “Gotama the contemplative — the son of the Sakyans, having gone forth from the Sakyan clan — on a wandering tour among the Kosalans with a large community of monks — has arrived at Icchanangala and is staying in the Icchanangala forest grove.
And of that Master Gotama this fine reputation has spread: 'He is indeed a Blessed One, worthy, & rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, a knower of the cosmos, an unexcelled trainer of those persons ready to be tamed, teacher of human & divine beings, awakened, blessed.
He has made known — having realized it through direct knowledge — this world with its devas, maras, & brahmas, its generations with their contemplatives & brahmans, their rulers & common people; has explained the Dhamma admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, admirable in the end; has expounded the holy life both in its particulars & in its essence, entirely perfect, surpassingly pure.
It is good to see such a worthy one.' So the brahman householders of Icchanangala, when the night was gone, taking many staple & non-staple foods, went to the gate house of the Icchanangala forest grove.
On arrival they stood there making a loud racket, a great racket.
Now at that time Ven.
Nagita was the Blessed One's attendant.
So the Blessed One addressed Ven.
Nagita: “Nagita, what is that loud racket, that great racket, like fishermen with a catch of fish?
“Lord, those are the brahman householders of Icchanangala standing at the gate house to the Icchanangala forest grove, having brought many staple & non-staple foods for the sake of the Blessed One & the community of monks.
“May I have nothing to do with honor, Nagita, and honor nothing to do with me.
Whoever cannot obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — as I do, the pleasure of renunciation, the pleasure of seclusion, the pleasure of peace, the pleasure of self-awakening, let him consent to this slimy-excrement-pleasure, this torpor-pleasure, this pleasure of gains, offerings, & fame.
“Lord, let the Blessed One acquiesce now!
Let the One Well-gone acquiesce now!
Now is the time for the Blessed One's acquiescence, lord!
Now is the time for the Blessed One's acquiescence, lord!
Wherever the Blessed One will go now, the brahmans of the towns & countryside will be so inclined.
Just as when the rain-devas send rain in fat drops, the waters flow with the incline, in the same way, wherever the Blessed One will go now, the brahmans of the towns & countryside will be so inclined.
Why is that?
Because such is the Blessed One's virtue & discernment.
“May I have nothing to do with honor, Nagita, and honor nothing to do with me.
Whoever cannot obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — as I do, the pleasure of renunciation, the pleasure of seclusion, the pleasure of peace, the pleasure of self-awakening, let him consent to this slimy-excrement-pleasure, this torpor-pleasure, this pleasure of gains, offerings, & fame.
“Even some devas, Nagita, cannot obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — as I do, the pleasure of renunciation, the pleasure of seclusion, the pleasure of peace, the pleasure of self-awakening.
When you all live together, assemble together, and live committed to dwelling with a group, the thought occurs: 'Surely these venerable ones cannot obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — as I do, the pleasure of renunciation, the pleasure of seclusion, the pleasure of peace, the pleasure of self-awakening, which is why they live together, assemble together, and live committed to dwelling with a group.'
“There is the case, Nagita, where I see monks laughing out loud, sporting around, tickling one another with their fingers.
The thought occurs to me, 'Surely these venerable ones cannot obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — as I do, the pleasure of renunciation, the pleasure of seclusion, the pleasure of peace, the pleasure of self-awakening, which is why they are laughing out loud, sporting around, tickling one another with their fingers.'
“Then there is the case where I see monks — having eaten as much as they want, filling their bellies — live committed to the pleasure of lying down, the pleasure of sensory contacts, the pleasure of torpor.
The thought occurs to me, 'Surely these venerable ones cannot obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — as I do, the pleasure of renunciation, the pleasure of seclusion, the pleasure of peace, the pleasure of self-awakening, which is why they — having eaten as much as they want, filling their bellies — live committed to the pleasure of lying down, the pleasure of sensory contacts, the pleasure of torpor.
“Then there is the case where I see a monk sitting in concentration in a village dwelling.
The thought occurs to me, 'Soon a monastery attendant will disturb this venerable one in some way, or a novice will, and rouse him from his concentration.' And so I am not pleased with that monk's village-dwelling.
“But then there is the case where I see a monk sitting, nodding, in the wilderness.
The thought occurs to me, 'Soon this venerable one will dispel his drowsiness & fatigue and attend to the wilderness-perception, unified.' And so I am pleased with that monk's wilderness-dwelling.
“Then there is the case where I see a wilderness monk sitting unconcentrated in the wilderness.
The thought occurs to me, 'Soon this venerable one will center his unconcentrated mind, or protect his concentrated mind.' And so I am pleased with that monk's wilderness-dwelling.
“Then there is the case where I see a wilderness monk sitting in concentration in the wilderness.
The thought occurs to me, 'Soon this venerable one will release his unreleased mind, or protect his released mind.' And so I am pleased with that monk's wilderness-dwelling.
“Then there is the case where I see a village-dwelling monk who receives robes, alms food, shelter, & medicinal requisites for curing the sick.
Receiving, as he likes, those gains, offerings, & fame, he neglects seclusion, he neglects isolated forest & wilderness dwellings.
He makes his living by visiting villages, towns, & cities.
And so I am not pleased with that monk's village-dwelling.
“Then there is the case where I see a wilderness monk who receives robes, alms food, shelter, & medicinal requisites for curing the sick.
Fending off those gains, offerings, & fame, he doesn't neglect seclusion, doesn't neglect isolated forest & wilderness dwellings.
And so I am pleased with that monk's wilderness-dwelling.
“But when I am traveling along a road and see no one in front or behind me, at that time I have my ease, even when urinating & defecating.
See also: AN.
Translator's note: The frame story here is common to three suttas: AN., AN., and AN..
Although the conversation takes a different turn in each case, in all three cases the Buddha takes the opportunity to teach some unusually plain-spoken truths.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One, on a wandering tour among the Kosalans with a large community of monks, arrived at a Kosalan brahman village named Icchanangala.
There he stayed in the Icchanangala forest grove.
The brahman householders of Icchanangala heard it said, “Gotama the contemplative — the son of the Sakyans, having gone forth from the Sakyan clan — on a wandering tour among the Kosalans with a large community of monks — has arrived at Icchanangala and is staying in the Icchanangala forest grove.
And of that Master Gotama this fine reputation has spread: 'He is indeed a Blessed One, worthy, & rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, a knower of the cosmos, an unexcelled trainer of those persons ready to be tamed, teacher of human & divine beings, awakened, blessed.
He has made known — having realized it through direct knowledge — this world with its devas, maras, & brahmas, its generations with their contemplatives & brahmans, their rulers & common people; has explained the Dhamma admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, admirable in the end; has expounded the holy life both in its particulars & in its essence, entirely perfect, surpassingly pure.
It is good to see such a worthy one.' So the brahman householders of Icchanangala, when the night was gone, taking many staple & non-staple foods, went to the gate house of the Icchanangala forest grove.
On arrival they stood there making a loud racket, a great racket.
Now at that time Ven.
Nagita was the Blessed One's attendant.
So the Blessed One addressed Ven.
Nagita: “Nagita, what is that loud racket, that great racket, like fishermen with a catch of fish?
“Lord, those are the brahman householders of Icchanangala standing at the gate house to the Icchanangala forest grove, having brought many staple & non-staple foods for the sake of the Blessed One & the community of monks.
“May I have nothing to do with honor, Nagita, and honor nothing to do with me.
Whoever cannot obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — as I do, the pleasure of renunciation, the pleasure of seclusion, the pleasure of peace, the pleasure of self-awakening, let him consent to this slimy-excrement-pleasure, this torpor-pleasure, this pleasure of gains, offerings, & fame.
“Lord, let the Blessed One acquiesce now!
Let the One Well-gone acquiesce now!
Now is the time for the Blessed One's acquiescence, lord!
Now is the time for the Blessed One's acquiescence, lord!
Wherever the Blessed One will go now, the brahmans of the towns & countryside will be so inclined.
Just as when the rain-devas send rain in fat drops, the waters flow with the incline, in the same way, wherever the Blessed One will go now, the brahmans of the towns & countryside will be so inclined.
Why is that?
Because such is the Blessed One's virtue & discernment.
“May I have nothing to do with honor, Nagita, and honor nothing to do with me.
Whoever cannot obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — as I do, the pleasure of renunciation, the pleasure of seclusion, the pleasure of peace, the pleasure of self-awakening, let him consent to this slimy-excrement-pleasure, this torpor-pleasure, this pleasure of gains, offerings, & fame.
“Nagita, there is the case where I see a monk sitting in concentration in a village dwelling.
The thought occurs to me, 'Soon a monastery attendant will disturb this venerable one in some way, or a novice will, and rouse him from his concentration.' And so I am not pleased with that monk's village-dwelling.
“But then there is the case where I see a monk sitting, nodding, in the wilderness.
The thought occurs to me, 'Soon this venerable one will dispel his drowsiness & fatigue and attend to the wilderness-perception, unified.' And so I am pleased with that monk's wilderness-dwelling.
“Then there is the case where I see a wilderness monk sitting unconcentrated in the wilderness.
The thought occurs to me, 'Soon this venerable one will center his unconcentrated mind, or protect his concentrated mind.' And so I am pleased with that monk's wilderness-dwelling.
“Then there is the case where I see a wilderness monk sitting in concentration in the wilderness.
The thought occurs to me, 'Soon this venerable one will release his unreleased mind, or protect his released mind.' And so I am pleased with that monk's wilderness-dwelling.

“Then there is the case where I see a village-dwelling monk who receives robes, alms food, shelter, & medicinal requisites for curing the sick.
Receiving, as he likes, those gains, offerings, & fame, he neglects seclusion, he neglects isolated forest & wilderness dwellings.
He makes his living by visiting villages, towns, & cities.
And so I am not pleased with that monk's village-dwelling.
“Then there is the case where I see a wilderness monk who receives robes, alms food, shelter, & medicinal requisites for curing the sick.
Fending off those gains, offerings, & fame, he doesn't neglect seclusion, doesn't neglect isolated forest & wilderness dwellings.
And so I am pleased with that monk's wilderness-dwelling.
“But when I am traveling along a road and see no one in front or behind me, at that time I have my ease, even when urinating & defecating.”
In ancient times when seafaring merchants put to sea in ships, they took with them a bird to sight land.
When the ship was out of sight of land, they released the bird; and it flew eastward and westward, northward and southward, upward and all around.
And if the bird saw no land, it returned to the ship; but if the bird sighted land nearby, it was truly gone.
Once upon a time there was a royal fig tree called Steadfast, belonging to king Koravya, whose five outstretched branches provided a cool and pleasing shade.
Its girth extended a hundred miles, and its roots spread out for forty miles.
And the fruits of that tree were indeed great: As large as harvest baskets — such were its succulent fruits — and as clear as the honey of bees.
One portion was enjoyed by the king, along with his household of women; one portion was enjoyed by the army; one portion was enjoyed by the people of the town and village; one portion was enjoyed by brahmans and ascetics; and one portion was enjoyed by the beasts and birds.
Nobody guarded the fruits of that royal tree, and neither did anyone harm one another for the sake of its fruits.
But then a certain man came along who fed upon as much of Steadfast's fruits as he wanted, broke off a branch, and wandered on his way.
And the deva who dwelled in Steadfast thought to herself: “It is astonishing, it is truly amazing, that such an evil man would dare to feed upon as much of Steadfast's fruits as he wants, break off a branch, and then wander on his way!
Now, what if Steadfast were in the future to bear no more fruit?” And so the royal fig tree Steadfast bore no more fruit.
So then king Koravya went up to where Sakka, chief among the gods, was dwelling, and having approached said this: “Surely you must know, sire, that Steadfast, the royal fig tree, no longer bears fruit?” And then Sakka created a magical creation of such a form that a mighty wind and rain came down and toppled the royal fig tree Steadfast, uprooting it entirely.
And then the deva who dwelled in Steadfast grieved, lamented, and stood weeping on one side with a face full of tears.
And then Sakka, chief among the gods, went up to where the deva was standing, and having approached said this: “Why is it, deva, that you grieve and lament and stand on one side with a face full of tears?” “It is because, sire, a mighty wind and rain has come and toppled my abode, uprooting it entirely.
“And were you, deva, upholding the dhamma of trees when this happened?” “But how is it, sire, that a tree upholds the dhamma of trees?
“Like this, deva: Root-cutters take the root of the tree; bark-strippers take the bark; leaf-pickers take the leaves; flower-pickers take the flowers; fruit-pickers take the fruits — and none of this is reason enough for a deva to think only of herself or become morose.
Thus it is, deva, that a tree upholds the dhamma of trees.
“Then indeed, sire, I was not upholding the dhamma of trees when the mighty wind and rain came and toppled my abode, uprooting it entirely.” “If it were the case, deva, that you were to uphold the dhamma of trees, it may be that your abode might be as it was before.” “I will indeed, sire, uphold the dhamma of trees!
May my abode be as it was before!
And then Sakka, chief among the gods, created a magical creation of such a form that a mighty wind and rain came down and raised up the royal fig tree Steadfast, and its roots were entirely healed.
His given name was Siddhattha; as a wandering ascetic he went by his mother's clan name, Gotama; he was known throughout his world as the sage of his father's family, or Sakyamuni; and when enlightened he became known as Buddha, the Awakened One.
His followers most often referred to him as Bhagavant, or “Blessed One,” but the name he almost always used for himself was Tathagata.
Tathagata has always been an awkward word to translate.
Tatha on its own means something like “so,” “thus,” or “in this way”; and gata is the past participle of the verb to go, and simply means “gone.” We therefore often find the phrase translated in the texts as “Thus-gone” or “the Thus-Gone one.” The commentator Buddhaghosa lists eight different ways the word can be construed, and in the process engages in some characteristically creative etymology.
I admit to having never really understood the import of the term Tathagata — until I came across this story.
With the image of the bird released by the sailors, searching for land upon which to alight, a number of things began to fall into place.
To begin with we should recognize two ways the expression is used: one referring to the Buddha as a being who will no longer be reborn, and the other describing how the consciousness of an awakened person still in this world relates to the object of experience.
Sometimes when one of the arahants passes away, Mara like a dark cloud can be seen searching for where their consciousness has become re-established.
In such cases, the Buddha says of the arahant that their consciousness is “not stationed anew anywhere”.
In this sense the Buddha is clearly using the epithet “Tathagata” to mean that he will not be reborn again — like the bird leaving the ship without returning, his consciousness does not alight again in any of the worlds to become re-bound with another body.
But there is also a sense in which the phrase aptly describes the nature of the awakened mind here in this life.
When his questioners try to pin the Buddha down about whether his consciousness survives after death, he rebukes them by saying that even here and now the consciousness of a Tathagata is untraceable, since there is no means of measuring or knowing it.
The awakened mind is said to be unattached to anything in the world — like a bird that does not alight upon and thus get bound to any object of experience.
In fact learning to un-attach the mind from its fetters is a good deal of what insight meditation training is all about.
The Satipatthana Sutta, for example, states that when practicing mindfulness properly a person “abides independent, not clinging to anything in the world”.
The householder Anathapindika, just before his death, received instructions from Sariputta urging him to train himself thus: “I will not cling to what is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, encountered, sought after, and examined by the mind; my consciousness will not be dependent on any of that”.
All this combines to suggest that a crucial aspect of the Buddha's teaching is the notion of consciousness being unattached to mental or physical objects.
In moment-to-moment practice this means letting go of attachments and letting experience be simply what it is.
Perhaps with proper practice we can live as a bird freely circling the ship of our body and our world, rather than as one imprisoned in a cage on its deck.
Like every Buddhist story, this one works on many levels simultaneously.
It is no accident that the great tree has five branches, or that the word used for each portion is khandha — the term designating the five aggregates of form, feeling, perception, formations and consciousness.
The man eating his fill of fruit is manifesting greed, craving or desire, and his breaking of the branch represents hatred, anger or aversion.
These are two of the three poisonous roots out of which all unwholesome action arises.
Thus the entire image is representative of a person being wronged by another or facing the eruption of their own latent tendencies for harmful action.
Notice that the story does not teach the “evil man” the folly of his ways, since there is often nothing one can do to avoid such people or such inclinations in oneself.
The teaching is more about our response to transgression.
Sakka's point is that it is self-centered to react petulantly to such an affront, and that the only suitable response is with kindness and generosity — to oneself as well as to others.
As the Dhammapada so aptly says, “Never at any time in this world are hostilities resolved by hostility; but by kindness they are resolved — this is an eternal truth”.
This teaching is given to Dhammika, a monk who complains of his treatment by certain laypeople.
The Buddha reflects the situation back upon Dhammika, who as it turns out does not treat his fellow monks very well.
It is an occasion to teach Dhammika, with the help of this story, the “dhamma of a recluse,” which boils down to “not returning the insult of the insulter, the anger of the angry or the abuse of the abuser.”
Then a certain brahman approached the Blessed One; having approached the Blessed One, he exchanged friendly greetings.
After pleasant conversation had passed between them, he sat to one side.
Having sat to one side, the brahman spoke to the Blessed One thus:
“Venerable Gotama, I am one of such a doctrine, of such a view: ‘There is no self-doer, there is no other-doer.’”
“I have not, brahman, seen or heard such a doctrine, such a view.
How, indeed, could one — moving forward by himself, moving back by himself — say: ‘There is no self-doer, there is no other-doer’?
What do you think, brahmin, is there an element or principle of initiating or beginning an action?”
“Just so, Venerable Sir.”
“When there is an element of initiating, are initiating beings clearly discerned?”
“Just so, Venerable Sir.”
“So, brahmin, when there is the element of initiating, initiating beings are clearly discerned; of such beings, this is the self-doer, this, the other-doer.

“What do you think, brahmin, is there an element of exertion… is there an element of effort… is there an element of steadfastness… is there an element of persistence… is there an element of endeavoring?” 
“Just so, Venerable Sir.”
“When there is an element of endeavoring, are endeavoring beings clearly discerned?”
“Just so, Venerable Sir.”
“So, brahmin, when there is the element of endeavoring, endeavoring beings are clearly discerned; of such beings, this is the self-doer, this, the other-doer.
I have not, brahmin, seen or heard such a doctrine, such a view as yours.
How, indeed, could one — moving forward by himself, moving back by himself — say ‘There is no self-doer, there is no other-doer’?”
“Superb, Venerable Gotama!
Superb, Venerable Gotama!
Venerable Gotama has made the Dhamma clear in many ways, as though he were turning upright what had been turned upside down, revealing what had been concealed, showing the way to one who was lost, or holding up a lamp in the dark: ‘Those who have eyes see forms!’ Just so, the Venerable Gotama has illuminated the Dhamma in various ways.
I go to Venerable Gotama as refuge, and to the Dhamma, and to the assembly of monks.
From this day, for as long as I am endowed with breath, let Venerable Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha on Vulture's Peak Mountain.
Then early in the morning, Ven.
Sariputta put on his robes and, carrying his bowl and outer robe, was coming down from Vulture's Peak Mountain with a large group of monks when he saw a large wood pile off to one side.
Seeing it, he said to the monks, “Friends, do you see that large wood pile over there?
“Yes, friend,” the monks replied.
“Friends, if he wanted to, a monk with psychic power, having attained mastery of his mind, could will that wood pile to be nothing but earth.
Why is that?
There is earth-property in that wood pile, in dependence on which he could will that wood pile to be nothing but earth.
“If he wanted to, a monk with psychic power, having attained mastery of his mind, could will that wood pile to be nothing but water… fire… wind… beautiful… unattractive.
Why is that?
There is the property of the unattractive in that wood pile, in dependence on which he could will that wood pile to be nothing but unattractive.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
And on that occasion the lay woman Velukandaki, Nanda's mother, had established a donation endowed with six factors for the community of monks headed by Sariputta & Moggallana.
The Blessed One saw with his divine eye, surpassing the human, that the laywoman Velukandaki, Nanda's mother, had established a donation endowed with six factors for the community of monks headed by Sariputta & Moggallana.
On seeing this, he addressed the monks: “Monks, the lay woman Velukandaki, Nanda's mother, has established a donation endowed with six factors for the community of monks headed by Sariputta & Moggallana.
“And how is a donation endowed with six factors?
There is the case where there are the three factors of the donor, the three factors of the recipients.
“And which are the three factors of the donor?
There is the case where the donor, before giving, is glad; while giving, his/her mind is bright & clear; and after giving is gratified.
These are the three factors of the donor.
“And which are the three factors of the recipients?
There is the case where the recipients are free of passion or are practicing for the subduing of passion; free of aversion or practicing for the subduing of aversion; and free of delusion or practicing for the subduing of delusion.
These are the three factors of the recipients.
“Such are the three factors of the donor, the three factors of the recipients.
And this is how a donation is endowed with six factors.
“And it is not easy to take the measure of the merit of a donation thus endowed with six factors as 'just this much a bonanza of merit, a bonanza of what is skillful — a nutriment of bliss, heavenly, resulting in bliss, leading to heaven — that leads to what is desirable, pleasing, charming, beneficial, pleasant.' It is simply reckoned as a great mass of merit, incalculable, immeasurable.

“Just as it is not easy to take the measure of the great ocean as 'just this many buckets of water, just this many hundreds of buckets of water, just this many thousands of buckets of water, or just this many hundreds of thousands of buckets of water.' It is simply reckoned as a great mass of water, incalculable, immeasurable.
In the same way, it is not easy to take the measure of the merit of a donation thus endowed with six factors as 'just this much a bonanza of merit, a bonanza of what is skillful — a nutriment of bliss, heavenly, resulting in bliss, leading to heaven — that leads to what is desirable, pleasing, charming, beneficial, pleasant.' It is simply reckoned as a great mass of merit, incalculable, immeasurable.”
I have heard that at one time the Blessed One was staying at Nadika, in the Brick Hall.
There he addressed the monks, “Monks, mindfulness of death — when developed & pursued — is of great fruit & great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end.
And how is mindfulness of death developed & pursued so that it is of great fruit & great benefit, gains a footing in the Deathless, and has the Deathless as its final end?
“There is the case where a monk, as day departs and night returns, reflects: 'Many are the causes of my death.
A snake might bite me, a scorpion might sting me, a centipede might bite me.
That would be how my death would come about.
That would be an obstruction for me.
Stumbling, I might fall; my food, digested, might trouble me; my bile might be provoked, my phlegm… piercing wind forces might be provoked.
That would be how my death would come about.
That would be an obstruction for me.' Then the monk should investigate: 'Are there any evil, unskillful mental qualities unabandoned by me that would be an obstruction for me were I to die in the night?' If, on reflecting, he realizes that there are evil, unskillful mental qualities unabandoned by him that would be an obstruction for him were he to die in the night, then he should put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, undivided mindfulness, & alertness for the abandoning of those very same evil, unskillful qualities.
Just as when a person whose turban or head was on fire would put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, undivided mindfulness, & alertness to put out the fire on his turban or head, in the same way the monk should put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, undivided mindfulness, & alertness for the abandoning of those very same evil, unskillful qualities.
But if, on reflecting, he realizes that there are no evil, unskillful mental qualities unabandoned by him that would be an obstruction for him were he to die in the night, then for that very reason he should dwell in joy & rapture, training himself day & night in skillful qualities.
“Further, there is the case where a monk, as night departs and day returns, reflects: 'Many are the causes of my death.
A snake might bite me, a scorpion might sting me, a centipede might bite me.
That would be how my death would come about.
That would be an obstruction for me.
Stumbling, I might fall; my food, digested, might trouble me; my bile might be provoked, my phlegm… piercing wind forces might be provoked.
That would be how my death would come about.
That would be an obstruction for me.' Then the monk should investigate: 'Are there any evil, unskillful mental qualities unabandoned by me that would be an obstruction for me were I to die during the day?' If, on reflecting, he realizes that there are evil, unskillful mental qualities unabandoned by him that would be an obstruction for him were he to die during the day, then he should put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, undivided mindfulness, & alertness for the abandoning of those very same evil, unskillful qualities.
Just as when a person whose turban or head was on fire would put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, undivided mindfulness, & alertness to put out the fire on his turban or head, in the same way the monk should put forth extra desire, effort, diligence, endeavor, undivided mindfulness, & alertness for the abandoning of those very same evil, unskillful qualities.
But if, on reflecting, he realizes that there are no evil, unskillful mental qualities unabandoned by him that would be an obstruction for him were he to die during the day, then for that very reason he should dwell in joy & rapture, training himself day & night in skillful qualities.
“This, monks, is how mindfulness of death is developed & pursued so that it is of great fruit & great benefit, gains a footing in the Deathless, and has the Deathless as its final end.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted in the Blessed One's words.
I have heard that at one time the Blessed One was staying at Nadika, in the Brick Hall.
There he addressed the monks, “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks replied.
The Blessed One said, “Mindfulness of death, when developed & pursued, is of great fruit & great benefit.
It gains a footing in the Deathless, has the Deathless as its final end.
Therefore you should develop mindfulness of death.
When this was said, a certain monk addressed the Blessed One, “I already develop mindfulness of death.
“And how do you develop mindfulness of death?
“I think, 'O, that I might live for a day & night, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal.' This is how I develop mindfulness of death.
Then another monk addressed the Blessed One, “I, too, already develop mindfulness of death.
“And how do you develop mindfulness of death?
“I think, 'O, that I might live for a day, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal.' This is how I develop mindfulness of death.
Then another monk addressed the Blessed One, “I, too, develop mindfulness of death.”… “I think, 'O, that I might live for the interval that it takes to eat a meal, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal.'… Then another monk addressed the Blessed One, “I, too, develop mindfulness of death.”… “I think, 'O, that I might live for the interval that it takes to swallow having chewed up four morsels of food, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal.'… Then another monk addressed the Blessed One, “I, too, develop mindfulness of death.”… “I think, 'O, that I might live for the interval that it takes to swallow having chewed up one morsel of food, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal.'… Then another monk addressed the Blessed One, “I, too, develop mindfulness of death.”… “I think, 'O, that I might live for the interval that it takes to breathe out after breathing in, or to breathe in after breathing out, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal.' This is how I develop mindfulness of death.
When this was said, the Blessed One addressed the monks.
“Whoever develops mindfulness of death, thinking, 'O, that I might live for a day & night… for a day… for the interval that it takes to eat a meal… for the interval that it takes to swallow having chewed up four morsels of food, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal' — they are said to dwell heedlessly.
They develop mindfulness of death slowly for the sake of ending the effluents.
“But whoever develops mindfulness of death, thinking, 'O, that I might live for the interval that it takes to swallow having chewed up one morsel of food… for the interval that it takes to breathe out after breathing in, or to breathe in after breathing out, that I might attend to the Blessed One's instructions.
I would have accomplished a great deal' — they are said to dwell heedfully.
They develop mindfulness of death acutely for the sake of ending the effluents.
“Therefore you should train yourselves: 'We will dwell heedfully.
We will develop mindfulness of death acutely for the sake of ending the effluents.' That is how you should train yourselves.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted in the Blessed One's words.

Once the Blessed One was staying among the Bhaggas in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Haunt.
At that time, Nakula's father, the householder, was diseased, in pain, severely ill.
Then Nakula's mother said to him: “Don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized being worried at the time of death.
“Now it may be that you are thinking, 'Nakula's mother will not be able to support the children or maintain the household after I'm gone,' but you shouldn't see things in that way.
I am skilled at spinning cotton, at carding matted wool.
I can support the children and maintain the household after you are gone.
So don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized being worried at the time of death.
“Now it may be that you are thinking, 'Nakula's mother will take another husband after I'm gone,' but you shouldn't see things in that way.
You know as well as I how my fidelity has been constant for the past sixteen years.
So don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized death when one is worried.
“Now it may be that you are thinking, 'Nakula's mother will have no desire to go see the Blessed One, to go see the community of monks, after I'm gone,' but you shouldn't see things in that way.
I will have an even greater desire to go see the Blessed One, to go see the community of monks, after you are gone.
So don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized being worried at the time of death.
“Now it may be that you are thinking, 'Nakula's mother will not act fully in accordance with the precepts after I'm gone,' but you shouldn't see things in that way.
To the extent that the Blessed One has white-clad householder female disciples who act fully in accordance with the precepts, I am one of them.
If anyone doubts or denies this, let him go ask the Blessed One, the worthy one, the rightly self-awakened one who is staying among the Bhaggas in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Haunt.
So don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized being worried at the time of death.
“Now it may be that you are thinking, 'Nakula's mother will not attain inner tranquillity of awareness after I'm gone,' but you shouldn't see things in that way.
To the extent that the Blessed One has white-clad householder female disciples who attain inner tranquillity of awareness, I am one of them.
If anyone doubts or denies this, let him go ask the Blessed One, the worthy one, the rightly self-awakened one who is staying among the Bhaggas in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Haunt.
So don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized being worried at the time of death.
“Now it may be that you are thinking, 'Nakula's mother will not reach firm ground in this Doctrine & Discipline, will not attain a firm foothold, will not attain consolation, overcome her doubts, dispel her perplexity, reach fearlessness or gain independence from others with regard to the Teacher's message,' but you shouldn't see things in that way.
To the extent that the Blessed One has white-clad householder female disciples who reach firm ground in this Doctrine & Discipline, attain a firm foothold, attain consolation, overcome their doubts, dispel their perplexity, reach fearlessness, & gain independence from others with regard to the Teacher's message, I am one of them.
If anyone doubts or denies this, let him go ask the Blessed One, the worthy one, the rightly self-awakened one who is staying among the Bhaggas in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Haunt.
So don't be worried as you die, householder.
Death is painful for one who is worried.
The Blessed One has criticized being worried at the time of death.
While Nakula's father the householder was being exhorted by Nakula's mother with this exhortation, his disease was immediately allayed.
And he recovered from his disease.
That was how Nakula's father's disease was abandoned.
Then, soon after Nakula's father the householder had recovered from being sick, not long after his recovery from his illness, he went leaning on a stick to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “It is your gain, your great gain, householder, that you have Nakula's mother — sympathetic & wishing for your welfare — as your counselor & instructor.
To the extent that I have white-clad householder female disciples who act fully in accordance with the precepts, she is one of them.
To the extent that I have white-clad householder female disciples who attain inner tranquillity of awareness, she is one of them.
To the extent that I have white-clad householder female disciples who reach firm ground in this Doctrine & Discipline, attain a firm foothold, attain consolation, overcome their doubts, dispel their perplexity, reach fearlessness, & gain independence from others with regard to the Teacher's message, she is one of them.
It is your gain, your great gain, householder, that you have Nakula's mother — sympathetic & wishing for your welfare — as your counselor & instructor.
See also: SN.; SN.
“Monks, these six properties are means of escape.
Which six?
“There is the case where a monk might say, 'Although good will has been developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, and well-undertaken by me as my awareness-release, still ill will keeps overpowering my mind.' He should be told, 'Don't say that.
You shouldn't speak in that way.
Don't misrepresent the Blessed One, for it's not right to misrepresent the Blessed One, and the Blessed One wouldn't say that.
It's impossible, there is no way that — when good will has been developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, and well-undertaken as an awareness-release — ill will would still keep overpowering the mind.
That possibility doesn't exist, for this is the escape from ill will: good will as an awareness-release.'
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk might say, 'Although compassion has been developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, and well-undertaken by me as my awareness-release, still viciousness keeps overpowering my mind.' He should be told, 'Don't say that.
You shouldn't speak in that way.
Don't misrepresent the Blessed One, for it's not right to misrepresent the Blessed One, and the Blessed One wouldn't say that.
It's impossible, there is no way that — when compassion has been developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, and well-undertaken as an awareness-release — viciousness would still keep overpowering the mind.
That possibility doesn't exist, for this is the escape from viciousness: compassion as an awareness-release.'
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk might say, 'Although appreciation has been developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, and well-undertaken by me as my awareness-release, still resentment keeps overpowering my mind.' He should be told, 'Don't say that.
You shouldn't speak in that way.
Don't misrepresent the Blessed One, for it's not right to misrepresent the Blessed One, and the Blessed One wouldn't say that.
It's impossible, there is no way that — when appreciation has been developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, and well-undertaken as an awareness-release — resentment would still keep overpowering the mind.
That possibility doesn't exist, for this is the escape from resentment: appreciation as an awareness-release.'
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk might say, 'Although equanimity has been developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, and well-undertaken by me as my awareness-release, still passion keeps overpowering my mind.' He should be told, 'Don't say that.
You shouldn't speak in that way.
Don't misrepresent the Blessed One, for it's not right to misrepresent the Blessed One, and the Blessed One wouldn't say that.
It's impossible, there is no way that — when equanimity has been developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, and well-undertaken as an awareness-release — passion would still keep overpowering the mind.
That possibility doesn't exist, for this is the escape from passion: equanimity as an awareness-release.'
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk might say, 'Although the signless has been developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, and well-undertaken by me as my awareness-release, still my consciousness follows the drift of signs.' He should be told, 'Don't say that.
You shouldn't speak in that way.
Don't misrepresent the Blessed One, for it's not right to misrepresent the Blessed One, and the Blessed One wouldn't say that.
It's impossible, there is no way that — when the signless has been developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, and well-undertaken as an awareness-release — consciousness would follow the drift of signs.
That possibility doesn't exist, for this is the escape from all signs: the signless as an awareness-release.'
“Furthermore, there is the case where a monk might say, 'Although “I am” is gone, and I do not assume that “I am this,” still the arrow of uncertainty & perplexity keeps overpowering my mind.' He should be told, 'Don't say that.
You shouldn't speak in that way.
Don't misrepresent the Blessed One, for it's not right to misrepresent the Blessed One, and the Blessed One wouldn't say that.
It's impossible, there is no way that — when “I am” is gone, and “I am this” is not assumed — the arrow of uncertainty & perplexity would keep overpowering the mind.
That possibility doesn't exist, for this is the escape from the arrow of uncertainty & perplexity: the uprooting of the conceit, “I am.”'
“These, monks, are six properties that are means of escape.”
“Monks, these six are conditions that are conducive to amiability, that engender feelings of endearment, engender feelings of respect, leading to a sense of fellowship, a lack of disputes, harmony, & a state of unity.
Which six?
“There is the case where a monk is set on bodily acts of good will with regard to his fellows in the holy life, to their faces & behind their backs.
This is a condition that is conducive to amiability, that engenders feelings of endearment, engenders feelings of respect, leading to a sense of fellowship, a lack of disputes, harmony, & a state of unity.
“Furthermore, the monk is set on verbal acts of good will with regard to his fellows in the holy life, to their faces & behind their backs.
This is a condition that is conducive to amiability, that engenders feelings of endearment, engenders feelings of respect, leading to a sense of fellowship, a lack of disputes, harmony, & a state of unity.
“Furthermore, the monk is set on mental acts of good will with regard to his fellows in the holy life, to their faces & behind their backs.
This is a condition that is conducive to amiability, that engenders feelings of endearment, engenders feelings of respect, leading to a sense of fellowship, a lack of disputes, harmony, & a state of unity.
“Furthermore, whatever righteous gains the monk may obtain in a righteous way — even if only the alms in his bowl — he does not consume them alone.
He consumes them after sharing them in common with his virtuous fellows in the holy life.
This is a condition that is conducive to amiability, that engenders feelings of endearment, engenders feelings of respect, leading to a sense of fellowship, a lack of disputes, harmony, & a state of unity.
“Furthermore — with reference to the virtues that are untorn, unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered, liberating, praised by the wise, untarnished, leading to concentration — the monk dwells with his virtue in tune with that of his fellows in the holy life, to their faces & behind their backs.
This is a condition that is conducive to amiability, that engenders feelings of endearment, engenders feelings of respect, leading to a sense of fellowship, a lack of disputes, harmony, & a state of unity.
“Furthermore — with reference to views that are noble, leading outward, that lead those who act in accordance with them to the right ending of suffering & stress — the monk dwells with his views in tune with those of his fellows in the holy life, to their faces & behind their backs.
This is a condition that is conducive to amiability, that engenders feelings of endearment, engenders feelings of respect, leading to a sense of fellowship, a lack of disputes, harmony, & a state of unity.
“These are the six conditions that are conducive to amiability, that engender feelings of endearment, engender feelings of respect, leading to a sense of fellowship, a lack of disputes, harmony, & a state of unity.”
Translator's note: The suttas in this section of the Fives are formulaic, and the Canon does not give them names.
The following group of suttas deals with the topic of stinginess, and so I have named the group after their topic.
“Monks, there are these five forms of stinginess.
Which five?
Stinginess as to one's monastery, stinginess as to one's family, stinginess as to one's gains, stinginess as to one's status, and stinginess as to the Dhamma.
These are the five forms of stinginess.
And the meanest of these five is this: stinginess as to the Dhamma.
“With the abandoning and eradication of the five forms of stinginess, the holy life is fulfilled.
Which five?
“With the abandoning and eradication of stinginess as to one's monastery, the holy life is fulfilled.
With the abandoning and eradication of stinginess as to one's family… stinginess as to one's gains… stinginess as to one's status… stinginess as to the Dhamma, the holy life is fulfilled.
“With the abandoning and eradication of these five forms of stinginess, the holy life is fulfilled.
“Without abandoning these five qualities, one is incapable of entering & remaining in the first jhana.
Which five?
Stinginess as to one's monastery, stinginess as to one's family, stinginess as to one's gains, stinginess as to one's status, and stinginess as to the Dhamma.
Without abandoning these five qualities, one is incapable of entering & remaining in the first jhana.
“With the abandoning of these five qualities, one is capable of entering & remaining in the first jhana.
Which five?
Stinginess as to one's monastery… one's family… one's gains… one's status, and stinginess as to the Dhamma.
With the abandoning of these five qualities, one is capable of entering & remaining in the first jhana.
“Without abandoning these five qualities, one is incapable of entering & remaining in the second jhana… the third jhana… the fourth jhana; incapable of realizing the fruit of stream-entry… the fruit of once-returning… the fruit of non-returning… arahantship.
Which five?
Stinginess as to one's monastery… one's family… one's gains… one's status, and stinginess as to the Dhamma.
Without abandoning these five qualities, one is incapable of entering & remaining in the second jhana… the third jhana… the fourth jhana; one is incapable realizing the fruit of stream-entry… the fruit of once-returning… the fruit of non-returning… arahantship.
“With the abandoning of these five qualities, one is capable of entering & remaining in the second jhana… the third jhana… the fourth jhana; capable of realizing the fruit of stream-entry… the fruit of once-returning… the fruit of non-returning… arahantship.
Which five?
Stinginess as to one's monastery… one's family… one's gains… one's status, and stinginess as to the Dhamma.
With the abandoning of these five qualities, one is capable of entering & remaining in the second jhana… the third jhana… the fourth jhana; capable realizing the fruit of stream-entry… the fruit of once-returning… the fruit of non-returning… arahantship.
“Without abandoning these five qualities, one is incapable of entering & remaining in the first jhana.
Which five?
Stinginess as to one's monastery, stinginess as to one's family, stinginess as to one's gains, stinginess as to one's status, and ingratitude.
Without abandoning these five qualities, one is incapable of entering & remaining in the first jhana.
“With the abandoning of these five qualities, one is capable of entering & remaining in the first jhana… “Without abandoning these five qualities, one is incapable of entering & remaining in the second jhana… the third jhana… the fourth jhana; incapable of realizing the fruit of stream-entry… the fruit of once-returning… the fruit of non-returning… arahantship.
Which five?
Stinginess as to one's monastery, stinginess as to one's family, stinginess as to one's gains, stinginess as to one's status, and ingratitude.
Without abandoning these five qualities, one is incapable of entering & remaining in the second jhana… the third jhana… the fourth jhana; one is incapable realizing the fruit of stream-entry… the fruit of once-returning… the fruit of non-returning… arahantship.
“With the abandoning of these five qualities, one is capable of entering & remaining in the second jhana… the third jhana… the fourth jhana; capable of realizing the fruit of stream-entry… the fruit of once-returning… the fruit of non-returning… arahantship…”
“There are these five rewards in listening to the Dhamma.
Which five?
“One hears what one has not heard before.
One clarifies what one has heard before.
One gets rid of doubt.
One's views are made straight.
One's mind grows serene.
“These are the five rewards in listening to the Dhamma.”
“Five properties lead to escape.
Which five?
“There is the case where the mind of a monk, when attending to sensual pleasures, doesn't leap up at sensual pleasures, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or released in sensual pleasures.
But when attending to renunciation, his mind leaps up at renunciation, grows confident, steadfast, & released in renunciation.
When his mind is rightly-gone, rightly developed, has rightly risen above, gained release, and become disjoined from sensual pleasures, then whatever fermentations, torments, & fevers there are that arise in dependence on sensuality, he is released from them.
He does not experience that feeling.
This is expounded as the escape from sensual pleasures.
“Furthermore, there is the case where the mind of a monk, when attending to ill will, doesn't leap up at ill will, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or released in ill will.
But when attending to non-ill will, his mind leaps up at non-ill will, grows confident, steadfast, & released in non-ill will.
When his mind is rightly-gone, rightly developed, has rightly risen above, gained release, and become disjoined from ill will, then whatever fermentations, torments, & fevers there are that arise in dependence on ill will, he is released from them.
He does not experience that feeling.
This is expounded as the escape from ill will.
“Furthermore, there is the case where the mind of a monk, when attending to harmfulness, doesn't leap up at harmfulness, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or released in harmfulness.
But when attending to harmlessness, his mind leaps up at harmlessness, grows confident, steadfast, & released in harmlessness.
When his mind is rightly-gone, rightly developed, has rightly risen above, gained release, and become disjoined from harmfulness, then whatever fermentations, torments, & fevers there are that arise in dependence on harmfulness, he is released from them.
He does not experience that feeling.
This is expounded as the escape from harmfulness.
“Furthermore, there is the case where the mind of a monk, when attending to forms, doesn't leap up at forms, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or released in forms.
But when attending to the formless, his mind leaps up at the formless, grows confident, steadfast, & released in the formless.
When his mind is rightly-gone, rightly developed, has rightly risen above, gained release, and become disjoined from forms, then whatever fermentations, torments, & fevers there are that arise in dependence on forms, he is released from them.
He does not experience that feeling.
This is expounded as the escape from forms.
“Furthermore, there is the case where the mind of a monk, when attending to self-identity, doesn't leap up at self-identity, doesn't grow confident, steadfast, or released in self-identity.
But when attending to the cessation of self-identity, his mind leaps up at the cessation of self-identity, grows confident, steadfast, & released in the cessation of self-identity.
When his mind is rightly-gone, rightly developed, has rightly risen above, gained release, and become disjoined from self-identity, then whatever fermentations, torments, & fevers there are that arise in dependence on self-identity, he is released from them.
He does not experience that feeling.
This is expounded as the escape from self-identity.
“Delight in sensuality does not obsess him.
Delight in ill will does not obsess him.
Delight in harmfulness does not obsess him.
Delight in form does not obsess him.
Delight in self-identity does not obsess him.
From the lack of any obsession with sensuality, the lack of any obsession with ill will… to harmfulness… to form… to self-identity, he is called a monk without attachment.
He has cut through craving, has turned away from the fetter, and by rightly breaking through conceit he has put an end to suffering & stress.
“These are the five properties that lead to escape.”
“On the occasion when a virtuous person who has gone forth approaches a family, there the people give rise to a great deal of merit by five means.
Which five?
“On the occasion when a virtuous person who has gone forth approaches a family, the minds of the people, on seeing him, are brightened.
On that occasion the family is practicing the practice leading to heaven.
“On the occasion when a virtuous person who has gone forth approaches a family, the people rise up to greet him, bow down, give him/her a seat.
On that occasion the family is practicing the practice leading to birth in a high family.
“On the occasion when a virtuous person who has gone forth approaches a family, the people dispel their stinginess.
On that occasion the family is practicing the practice leading to great influence.
“On the occasion when a virtuous person who has gone forth approaches a family, the people share with him/her in line with their ability, in line with their strength.
On that occasion the family is practicing the practice leading to great wealth.
“On the occasion when a virtuous person who has gone forth approaches a family, the people inquire, ask questions, listen to the Dhamma.
On that occasion the family is practicing the practice leading to great discernment.
“On the occasion when a virtuous person who has gone forth approaches a family, there the people give rise to a great deal of merit by these five means.
See also: MN 
“Monks, a statement endowed with five factors is well-spoken, not ill-spoken.
It is blameless & unfaulted by knowledgeable people.
Which five?
“It is spoken at the right time.
It is spoken in truth.
It is spoken affectionately.
It is spoken beneficially.
It is spoken with a mind of good-will.
“A statement endowed with these five factors is well-spoken, not ill-spoken.
It is blameless & unfaulted by knowledgeable people.”
“When the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, five great dreams appeared to him.
Which five?
“When the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, this great earth was his great bed.
The Himalayas, king of mountains, was his pillow.
His left hand rested in the eastern sea, his right hand in the western sea, and both feet in the southern sea.
When the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, this was the first great dream that appeared to him.
“Furthermore, when the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, a woody vine growing out of his navel stood reaching to the sky.
When the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, this was the second great dream that appeared to him.
“Furthermore, when the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, white worms with black heads crawling up from his feet covered him as far as his knees.
When the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, this was the third great dream that appeared to him.
“Furthermore, when the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, four different-colored birds coming from the four directions fell at his feet and turned entirely white.
When the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, this was the fourth great dream that appeared to him.
“Furthermore, when the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, he walked back & forth on top of a giant mountain of excrement but was not soiled by the excrement.
When the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, this was the fifth great dream that appeared to him.
“Now, when the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, and this great earth was his great bed, the Himalayas, king of mountains, was his pillow, his left hand rested in the eastern sea, his right hand in the western sea, and both feet in the southern sea: this first great dream appeared to let him know that he would awaken to the unexcelled right self-awakening.
“When the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, and a woody vine growing out of his navel stood reaching to the sky: this second great dream appeared to let him know that when he had awakened to the noble eightfold path, he would proclaim it well as far as there are human & celestial beings.
“When the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, and white worms with black heads crawling up from his feet covered him as far as his knees: this third great dream appeared to let him know that many white-clothed householders would go for life-long refuge to the Tathagata.
“When the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, and four different-colored birds coming from the four directions fell at his feet and turned entirely white: this fourth great dream appeared to let him know that people from the four castes — brahmans, noble-warriors, merchants, and laborers — having gone forth from the home life into homelessness in the Dhamma & Vinaya taught by the Tathagata, would realize unexcelled release.
“When the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, and he walked back & forth on top of a giant mountain of excrement but was not soiled by the excrement: this fifth great dream appeared to let him know that the Tathagata would receive gifts of robes, alms food, lodgings, & medicinal requisites to cure the sick, but he would use them unattached to them, uninfatuated, guiltless, seeing the drawbacks, and discerning the escape from them.
“When the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — was still just an unawakened bodhisatta, these five great dreams appeared to him.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was wandering on a tour among the Kosalans with a large community of monks.
As he was going along a road, he saw a large sala forest in a certain place.
Going down from the road, he went to the sala forest.
On reaching it, he plunged into it and at a certain spot, broke into a smile.
Then the thought occurred to Ven.
Ananda, “What is the cause, what is the reason, for the Blessed One's breaking into a smile?
It's not without purpose that Tathagata's break into smile.” So he said to the Blessed One, “What is the cause, what is the reason, for the Blessed One's breaking into a smile?
It's not without purpose that Tathagata's break into smile.
“In this spot, Ananda, there was once a great city: powerful, prosperous, populous, crowded with people.
And on that city, Kassapa the Blessed One, worthy & fully self-awakened, dwelled dependent.
Now, Kassapa the Blessed One, worthy & fully self-awakened, had a lay follower named Gavesin who didn't practice in full in terms of his virtue.
But because of Gavesin, there were people who had been inspired to declare themselves lay followers, and yet who also didn't practice in full in terms of their virtue.
“Then the thought occurred to Gavesin the lay follower: 'I am the benefactor of these lay followers, their leader, the one who has inspired them.
But I don't practice in full in terms of my virtue, just as they don't practice in full in terms of their virtue.
In that we're exactly even; there's nothing extra.
How about something extra!' So he went to the lay followers and on arrival said to them, 'From today onward I want you to know me as someone who practices in full in terms of my virtue.'
“Then the thought occurred to the lay followers: 'Master Gavesin is our benefactor, our leader, the one who has inspired us.
He will now practice in full in terms of his virtue.
So why shouldn't we?' So they went to Gavesin the lay follower and on arrival said to him, 'From today onward we want Master Gavesin to know the lay followers as people who practice in full in terms of their virtue.'
“Then the thought occurred to Gavesin the lay follower: 'I am the benefactor of these lay followers, their leader, the one who has inspired them.
I practice in full in terms of my virtue, just as they practice in full in terms of their virtue.
In that we're exactly even; there's nothing extra.
How about something extra!' So he went to the lay followers and on arrival said to them, 'From today onward I want you to know me as someone who practices the chaste life, the life apart, abstaining from intercourse, the act of villagers.'
“Then the thought occurred to the lay followers: 'Master Gavesin is our benefactor, our leader, the one who has inspired us.
He will now practice the chaste life, the life apart, abstaining from intercourse, the act of villagers.
So why shouldn't we?' So they went to Gavesin the lay follower and on arrival said to him, 'From today onward we want Master Gavesin to know the lay followers as people who practice the chaste life, the life apart, abstaining from intercourse, the act of villagers.'
“Then the thought occurred to Gavesin the lay follower: 'I am the benefactor of these lay followers, their leader, the one who has inspired them.
I practice in full in terms of my virtue, just as they practice in full in terms of their virtue.
I practice the chaste life, the life apart, abstaining from intercourse, the act of villagers, just as they practice the chaste life, the life apart, abstaining from intercourse, the act of villagers.
In that we're exactly even; there's nothing extra.
How about something extra!' So he went to the lay followers and on arrival said to them, 'From today onward I want you to know me as someone who eats only one meal a day, refraining in the night, abstaining from a meal at the wrong time.'
“Then the thought occurred to the lay followers: 'Master Gavesin is our benefactor, our leader, the one who has inspired us.
He will now eat only one meal a day, refraining in the night, abstaining from a meal at the wrong time.
So why shouldn't we?' So they went to Gavesin the lay follower and on arrival said to him, 'From today onward we want Master Gavesin to know the lay followers as people who eat only one meal a day, refraining in the night, abstaining from a meal at the wrong time.'
“Then the thought occurred to Gavesin the lay follower: 'I am the benefactor of these lay followers, their leader, the one who has inspired them.
I practice in full in terms of my virtue, just as they practice in full in terms of their virtue.
I practice the chaste life, the life apart, abstaining from intercourse, the act of villagers, just as they practice the chaste life, the life apart, abstaining from intercourse, the act of villagers.
I eat only one meal a day, refraining in the night, abstaining from a meal at the wrong time, just as they eat only one meal a day, refraining in the night, abstaining from a meal at the wrong time.
In that we're exactly even; there's nothing extra.
How about something extra!'
“So he went to Kassapa the Blessed One, worthy & fully self-awakened, and on arrival said to him, 'Lord, may I receive the Going Forth in the Blessed One's presence.
May I receive the Full Acceptance.' So he received the Going Forth in the presence of Kassapa the Blessed One, worthy & fully self-awakened; he received the Full Acceptance.
And not long after his Acceptance — dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute — he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the chaste life, for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.' And thus Gavesin the monk became another one of the arahants.
“Then the thought occurred to the lay followers: 'Master Gavesin is our benefactor, our leader, the one who has inspired us.
Having shaven off his hair & beard, having put on the ochre robe, he has gone forth from the home life into homelessness.
So why shouldn't we?'
“So they went to Kassapa the Blessed One, worthy & fully self-awakened, and on arrival said to him, 'Lord, may we receive the Going Forth in the Blessed One's presence.
May we receive the Full Acceptance.' So they received the Going Forth in the presence of Kassapa the Blessed One, worthy & fully self-awakened; they received the Full Acceptance.
“Then the thought occurred to Gavesin the monk: 'I obtain at will — without difficulty, without hardship — this unexcelled bliss of release.
O, that these monks may obtain at will — without difficulty, without hardship — this unexcelled bliss of release!' Then those monks — dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute — in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the chaste life, for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for themselves in the here & now.
They knew: 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.' And thus did those monks — headed by Gavesin, striving at what is more & more excellent, more & more refined — realize unexcelled release.
“So, Ananda, you should train yourselves: 'Striving at what is more & more excellent, more & more refined, we will realize unexcelled release.' That's how you should train yourselves.”
“Monks, a lay follower should not engage in five types of business.
Which five?
Business in weapons, business in human beings, business in meat, business in intoxicants, and business in poison.
“These are the five types of business that a lay follower should not engage in.”
Then Anathapindika the householder, surrounded by about lay followers, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
So the Blessed One said to Ven.
Sariputta: “Sariputta, when you know of a householder clothed in white, that he is restrained in terms of the five training rules and that he obtains at will, without difficulty, without hardship, four pleasant mental abidings in the here & now, then if he wants he may state about himself: 'Hell is ended; animal wombs are ended; the state of the hungry shades is ended; states of deprivation, destitution, the bad bourns are ended!
I am a stream-winner, steadfast, never again destined for states of woe, headed for self-awakening!'
“Now, in terms of which five training rules is he restrained?
“There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones abstains from taking life, abstains from taking what is not given, abstains from illicit sex, abstains from lying, abstains from distilled & fermented drinks that cause heedlessness.
“These are the five training rules in terms of which he is restrained.
“And which four pleasant mental abidings in the here & now does he obtain at will, without difficulty, without hardship?
“There is the case where the disciple of the noble ones is endowed with verified confidence in the Awakened One: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy & rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.' This is the first pleasant mental abiding in the here & now that he has attained, for the purification of the mind that is impure, for the cleansing of the mind that is unclean.
“Furthermore, he is endowed with verified confidence in the Dhamma: 'The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One, to be seen here & now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.' This is the second pleasant mental abiding in the here & now that he has attained, for the purification of the mind that is impure, for the cleansing of the mind that is unclean.
“Furthermore, he is endowed with verified confidence in the Sangha: 'The Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced well… who have practiced straight-forwardly… who have practiced methodically… who have practiced masterfully — in other words, the four pairs, the eight individuals — they are the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples: worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, the incomparable field of merit for the world.' This is the third pleasant mental abiding in the here & now that he has attained, for the purification of the mind that is impure, for the cleansing of the mind that is unclean.
“Furthermore, he is endowed with virtues that are appealing to the noble ones: untorn, unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered, liberating, praised by the wise, untarnished, leading to concentration.
This is the fourth pleasant mental abiding in the here & now that he has attained, for the purification of the mind that is impure, for the cleansing of the mind that is unclean.
“These are the four pleasant mental abidings in the here & now that he obtains at will, without difficulty, without hardship.
“Sariputta, when you know of a householder clothed in white, that he is restrained in terms of the five training rules and that he obtains at will, without difficulty, without hardship, four pleasant mental abidings in the here & now, then if he wants he may state about himself: 'Hell is ended; animal wombs are ended; the state of the hungry shades is ended; states of deprivation, destitution, the bad bourns are ended!
I am a stream-winner, steadfast, never again destined for states of woe, headed for self-awakening!'
Then Anathapindika the householder, surrounded by about lay followers, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the Blessed One said to him, “Householder, you have provided the community of monks with robes, alms food, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for the sick, but you shouldn't rest content with the thought, 'We have provided the community of monks with robes, alms food, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for the sick.' So you should train yourself, 'Let's periodically enter & remain in seclusion & rapture.' That's how you should train yourself.
When this was said, Ven.
Sariputta said to the Blessed One, “It's amazing, lord.
It's astounding, how well put that was by the Blessed One: 'Householder, you have provided the community of monks with robes, alms food, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for the sick, but you shouldn't rest content with the thought, “We have provided the community of monks with robes, alms food, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for the sick.” So you should train yourself, “Let's periodically enter & remain in seclusion & rapture.” That's how you should train yourself.'
“Lord, when a disciple of the noble ones enters & remains in seclusion & rapture, there are five possibilities that do not exist at that time: The pain & distress dependent on sensuality do not exist at that time.
The pleasure & joy dependent on sensuality do not exist at that time.
The pain & distress dependent on what is unskillful do not exist at that time.
The pleasure & joy dependent on what is unskillful do not exist at that time.
The pain & distress dependent on what is skillful do not exist at that time.
When a disciple of the noble ones enters & remains in seclusion & rapture, these five possibilities do not exist at that time.
“Excellent, Sariputta.
Excellent.
When a disciple of the noble ones enters & remains in seclusion & rapture, there are five possibilities that do not exist at that time: The pain & distress dependent on sensuality do not exist at that time.
The pleasure & joy dependent on sensuality do not exist at that time.
The pain & distress dependent on what is unskillful do not exist at that time.
The pleasure & joy dependent on what is unskillful do not exist at that time.
The pain & distress dependent on what is skillful do not exist at that time.
When a disciple of the noble ones enters & remains in seclusion & rapture, these five possibilities do not exist at that time.”
“Endowed with these five qualities, a lay follower is an outcaste of a lay follower, a stain of a lay follower, a dregs of a lay follower.
Which five?
He/she does not have conviction; is unvirtuous; is eager for protective charms & ceremonies; trusts protective charms & ceremonies, not kamma; and searches for recipients of his/her offerings outside, and gives offerings there first.
Endowed with these five qualities, a lay follower is an outcaste of a lay follower, a stain of a lay follower, a dregs of a lay follower.
“Endowed with these five qualities, a lay follower is a jewel of a lay follower, a lotus of a lay follower, a fine flower of a lay follower.
Which five?
He/she has conviction; is virtuous; is not eager for protective charms & ceremonies; trusts kamma, not protective charms & ceremonies; does not search for recipients of his/her offerings outside, and gives offerings here first.
Endowed with these five qualities, a lay follower is a jewel of a lay follower, a lotus of a lay follower, a fine flower of a lay follower.”
Then Ven.
Sariputta addressed the monks: “Friend monks.
“Yes, friend,” the monks responded to him.
Ven.
Sariputta said: “All those who ask questions of another do so from any one of five motivations.
Which five?
“One asks a question of another through stupidity & bewilderment.
One asks a question of another through evil desires & overwhelmed with greed.
One asks a question of another through contempt.
One asks a question of another when desiring knowledge.
Or one asks a question with this thought, 'If, when asked, he answers correctly, well & good.
If not, then I will answer correctly.'
“All those who ask questions of another do so from any one of these five motivations.
And as for me, when I ask a question of another, it's with this thought: 'If, when asked, he answers correctly, well & good.
If not, then I will answer correctly.'
“There are these five ways of subduing hatred by which, when hatred arises in a monk, he should wipe it out completely.
Which five?
“When one gives birth to hatred for an individual, one should develop good will for that individual.
Thus the hatred for that individual should be subdued.
“When one gives birth to hatred for an individual, one should develop compassion for that individual.
Thus the hatred for that individual should be subdued.
“When one gives birth to hatred for an individual, one should develop equanimity toward that individual.
Thus the hatred for that individual should be subdued.
“When one gives birth to hatred for an individual, one should pay him no mind & pay him no attention.
Thus the hatred for that individual should be subdued.
“When one gives birth to hatred for an individual, one should direct one's thoughts to the fact of his being the product of his actions: 'This venerable one is the doer of his actions, heir to his actions, born of his actions, related by his actions, and has his actions as his arbitrator.
Whatever action he does, for good or for evil, to that will he fall heir.' Thus the hatred for that individual should be subdued.
“These are five ways of subduing hatred by which, when hatred arises in a monk, he should wipe it out completely.”
Then Ven.
Sariputta addressed the monks: “Friend monks.
“Yes, friend,” the monks responded to him.
Ven.
Sariputta said: “There are these five ways of subduing hatred by which, when hatred arises in a monk, he should wipe it out completely.
Which five?
“There is the case where some people are impure in their bodily behavior but pure in their verbal behavior.
Hatred for a person of this sort should be subdued.
“There is the case where some people are impure in their verbal behavior but pure in their bodily behavior.
Hatred for a person of this sort should also be subdued.
“There is the case where some people are impure in their bodily behavior & verbal behavior, but who periodically experience mental clarity & calm.
Hatred for a person of this sort should also be subdued.
“There is the case where some people are impure in their bodily behavior & verbal behavior, and who do not periodically experience mental clarity & calm.
Hatred for a person of this sort should also be subdued.
“There is the case where some people are pure in their bodily behavior & their verbal behavior, and who periodically experience mental clarity & calm.
Hatred for a person of this sort should also be subdued.
“Now as for a person who is impure in his bodily behavior but pure in his verbal behavior, how should one subdue hatred for him?
Just as when a monk who makes use of things that are thrown away sees a rag in the road: Taking hold of it with his left foot and spreading it out with his right, he would tear off the sound part and go off with it.
In the same way, when the individual is impure in his bodily behavior but pure in his verbal behavior, one should at that time pay no attention to the impurity of his bodily behavior, and instead pay attention to the purity of his verbal behavior.
Thus the hatred for him should be subdued.
“And as for a person who is impure in his verbal behavior, but pure in his bodily behavior, how should one subdue hatred for him?
Just as when there is a pool overgrown with slime & water plants, and a person comes along, burning with heat, covered with sweat, exhausted, trembling, & thirsty.
He would jump into the pool, part the slime & water plants with both hands, and then, cupping his hands, drink the water and go on his way.
In the same way, when the individual is impure in his verbal behavior but pure in his bodily behavior, one should at that time pay no attention to the impurity of his verbal behavior, and instead pay attention to the purity of his bodily behavior.
Thus the hatred for him should be subdued.
“And as for a person who is impure in his bodily behavior & verbal behavior, but who periodically experiences mental clarity & calm, how should one subdue hatred for him?
Just as when there is a little puddle in a cow's footprint, and a person comes along, burning with heat, covered with sweat, exhausted, trembling, & thirsty.
The thought would occur to him, 'Here is this little puddle in a cow's footprint.
If I tried to drink the water using my hand or cup, I would disturb it, stir it up, & make it unfit to drink.
What if I were to get down on all fours and slurp it up like a cow, and then go on my way?' So he would get down on all fours, slurp up the water like a cow, and then go on his way.
In the same way, when an individual is impure in his bodily behavior & verbal behavior, but periodically experiences mental clarity & calm, one should at that time pay no attention to the impurity of his bodily behavior…the impurity of his verbal behavior, and instead pay attention to the fact that he periodically experiences mental clarity & calm.
Thus the hatred for him should be subdued.
“And as for a person who is impure in his bodily behavior & verbal behavior, and who does not periodically experience mental clarity & calm, how should one subdue hatred for him?
Just as when there is a sick man — in pain, seriously ill — traveling along a road, far from the next village & far from the last, unable to get the food he needs, unable to get the medicine he needs, unable to get a suitable assistant, unable to get anyone to take him to human habitation.
Now suppose another person were to see him coming along the road.
He would do what he could out of compassion, pity, & sympathy for the man, thinking, 'O that this man should get the food he needs, the medicine he needs, a suitable assistant, someone to take him to human habitation.
Why is that?
So that he won't fall into ruin right here.' In the same way, when a person is impure in his bodily behavior & verbal behavior, and who does not periodically experience mental clarity & calm, one should do what one can out of compassion, pity, & sympathy for him, thinking, 'O that this man should abandon wrong bodily conduct and develop right bodily conduct, abandon wrong verbal conduct and develop right verbal conduct, abandon wrong mental conduct and develop right mental conduct.
Why is that?
So that, on the break-up of the body, after death, he won't fall into the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, purgatory.' Thus the hatred for him should be subdued.
“And as for a person who is pure in his bodily behavior & verbal behavior, and who periodically experiences mental clarity & calm, how should one subdue hatred for him?
Just as when there is a pool of clear water — sweet, cool, & limpid, with gently sloping banks, & shaded on all sides by trees of many kinds — and a person comes along, burning with heat, covered with sweat, exhausted, trembling, & thirsty.
Having plunged into the pool, having bathed & drunk & come back out, he would sit down or lie down right there in the shade of the trees.
In the same way, when an individual is pure in his bodily behavior & verbal behavior, and periodically experiences mental clarity & calm, one should at that time pay attention to the purity of his bodily behavior…the purity of his verbal behavior, and to the fact that he periodically experiences mental clarity & calm.
Thus the hatred for him should be subdued.
An entirely inspiring individual can make the mind grow serene.
“These are five ways of subduing hatred by which, when hatred arises in a monk, he should wipe it out completely.
See also: AN..
“Bhikkhus, there are these five ways of removing annoyance, by which annoyance can be entirely removed by a bhikkhu when it arises in him.
What are the five?
“Loving-kindness can be maintained in being toward a person with whom you are annoyed: this is how annoyance with him can be removed.
“Compassion can be maintained in being toward a person with whom you are annoyed; this too is how annoyance with him can be removed.
“Onlooking equanimity can be maintained in being toward a person with whom you are annoyed; this too is how annoyance with him can be removed.
“The forgetting and ignoring of a person with whom you are annoyed can be practiced; this too is how annoyance with him can be removed.
“Ownership of deeds in a person with whom you are annoyed can be concentrated upon thus: 'This good person is owner of his deeds, heir to his deeds, his deeds are the womb from which he is born, his deeds are his kin for whom he is responsible, his deeds are his refuge, he is heir to his deeds, be they good or bad.' This too is how annoyance with him can be removed.
“These are the five ways of removing annoyance, by which annoyance can be entirely removed in a bhikkhu when it arises in him.”
“These five are a person of integrity's gifts.
Which five?
A person of integrity gives a gift with a sense of conviction.
A person of integrity gives a gift attentively.
A person of integrity gives a gift in season.
A person of integrity gives a gift with an empathetic heart.
A person of integrity gives a gift without adversely affecting himself or others.
“Having given a gift with a sense of conviction, he — wherever the result of that gift ripens — is rich, with much wealth, with many possessions.
And he is well-built, handsome, extremely inspiring, endowed with a lotus-like complexion.
“Having given a gift attentively, he — wherever the result of that gift ripens — is rich, with much wealth, with many possessions.
And his children, wives, slaves, servants, and workers listen carefully to him, lend him their ears, and serve him with understanding hearts.
“Having given a gift in season, he — wherever the result of that gift ripens — is rich, with much wealth, with many possessions.
And his goals are fulfilled in season.
“Having given a gift with an empathetic heart, he — wherever the result of that gift ripens — is rich, with much wealth, with many possessions.
And his mind inclines to the enjoyment of the five strings of lavish sensuality.
“Having given a gift without adversely affecting himself or others, he — wherever the result of that gift ripens — is rich, with much wealth, with many possessions.
And not from anywhere does destruction come to his property — whether from fire, from water, from kings, from thieves, or from hateful heirs.
“These five are a person of integrity's gifts.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Kosambi, in Ghosita's Park.
Now at that time Ven.
Udayin was sitting surrounded by a large assembly of householders, teaching the Dhamma.
Ven.
Ananda saw Ven.
Udayin sitting surrounded by a large assembly of householders, teaching the Dhamma, and on seeing him went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, he bowed down to the Blessed One and sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “Ven.
Udayin, lord, is sitting surrounded by a large assembly of householders, teaching the Dhamma.
“It's not easy to teach the Dhamma to others, Ananda.
The Dhamma should be taught to others only when five qualities are established within the person teaching.
Which five?
” The Dhamma should be taught with the thought, 'I will speak step-by-step.'
” The Dhamma should be taught with the thought, 'I will speak explaining the sequence.'
” The Dhamma should be taught with the thought, 'I will speak out of compassion.'
” The Dhamma should be taught with the thought, 'I will speak not for the purpose of material reward.'
” The Dhamma should be taught with the thought, 'I will speak without hurting myself or others.'
“It's not easy to teach the Dhamma to others, Ananda.
The Dhamma should be taught to others only when these five qualities are established within the person teaching.
See also:Sn.; AN.; DN.
“Endowed with five qualities, monks, a king's elephant is not worthy of a king, is not a king's asset, does not count as a very limb of his king.
Which five?
There is the case where a king's elephant is not resilient to sights, not resilient to sounds, not resilient to aromas, not resilient to flavors, not resilient to tactile sensations.
“And how is a king's elephant not resilient to sights?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, sees a troop of elephants, a troop of cavalry, a troop of chariots, a troop of foot soldiers, and so he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is not resilient to sights.
“And how is a king's elephant not resilient to sounds?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, hears the sound of elephants, the sound of cavalry, the sound of chariots, the sound of foot soldiers, the resounding din of drums, cymbals, conchs, & tom-toms, and so he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is not resilient to sounds.
“And how is a king's elephant not resilient to aromas?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, smells the stench of the urine & feces of those pedigreed royal elephants who are at home in the battlefield, and so he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is not resilient to aromas.
“And how is a king's elephant not resilient to flavors?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, goes without his ration of grass & water for one day, two days, three days, four days, five, and so he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is not resilient to flavors.
“And how is a king's elephant not resilient to tactile sensations?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, is pierced by a flight of arrows, two flights, three flights, four flights, five flights of arrows, and so he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is not resilient to tactile sensations.
“Endowed with these five qualities, monks, a king's elephant is not worthy of a king, is not a king's asset, does not count as a very limb of his king.
“In the same way, a monk endowed with five qualities is not deserving of gifts, deserving of hospitality, deserving of offerings, deserving of respect, nor is he an unexcelled field of merit for the world.
Which five?
There is the case where a monk is not resilient to sights, not resilient to sounds, not resilient to aromas, not resilient to flavors, not resilient to tactile sensations.
“And how is a monk not resilient to sights?
There is the case where a monk, on seeing a sight with the eye, feels passion for a sight that incites passion and cannot center his mind.
This is how a monk is not resilient to sights.
“And how is a monk not resilient to sounds?
There is the case where a monk, on hearing a sound with the ear, feels passion for a sound that incites passion and cannot center his mind.
This is how a monk is not resilient to sounds.
“And how is a monk not resilient to aromas?
There is the case where a monk, on smelling an aroma with the nose, feels passion for an aroma that incites passion and cannot center his mind.
This is how a monk is not resilient to aromas.
“And how is a monk not resilient to flavors?
There is the case where a monk, on tasting a flavor with the tongue, feels passion for a flavor that incites passion and cannot center his mind.
This is how a monk is not resilient to flavors.
“And how is a monk not resilient to tactile sensations?
There is the case where a monk, on touching a tactile sensation with the body, feels passion for a tactile sensation that incites passion and cannot center his mind.
This is how a monk is not resilient to tactile sensations.
“Endowed with these five qualities, a monk is not deserving of gifts, deserving of hospitality, deserving of offerings, deserving of respect, nor is he an unexcelled field of merit for the world.
“Now, a king's elephant endowed with five qualities is worthy of a king, is a king's asset, counts as a very limb of his king.
Which five?
There is the case where a king's elephant is resilient to sights, resilient to sounds, resilient to aromas, resilient to flavors, resilient to tactile sensations.
“And how is a king's elephant resilient to sights?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, sees a troop of elephants, a troop of cavalry, a troop of chariots, a troop of foot soldiers, but he doesn't falter or faint, he steels himself and engages in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is resilient to sights.
“And how is a king's elephant resilient to sounds?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, hears the sound of elephants, the sound of cavalry, the sound of chariots, the sound of foot soldiers, the resounding din of drums, cymbals, conchs, & tom-toms, but he doesn't falter or faint, he steels himself and engages in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is resilient to sounds.
“And how is a king's elephant resilient to aromas?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, smells the stench of the urine & feces of those pedigreed royal elephants who are at home in the battlefield, but he doesn't falter or faint, he steels himself and engages in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is not resilient to aromas.
“And how is a king's elephant resilient to flavors?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, goes without his ration of grass & water for one day, two days, three days, four days, five, but he doesn't falter or faint, he steels himself and engages in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is resilient to flavors.
“And how is a king's elephant resilient to tactile sensations?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, is pierced by a flight of arrows, two flights, three flights, four flights, five flights of arrows, but he doesn't falter or faint, he steels himself and engages in the battle.
This is how a king's elephant is resilient to tactile sensations.
“Endowed with these five qualities, monks, a king's elephant is worthy of a king, is a king's asset, counts as a very limb of his king.
“In the same way, a monk endowed with five qualities is deserving of gifts, deserving of hospitality, deserving of offerings, deserving of respect, an unexcelled field of merit for the world.
Which five?
There is the case where a monk is resilient to sights, resilient to sounds, resilient to aromas, resilient to flavors, resilient to tactile sensations.
“And how is a monk resilient to sights?
There is the case where a monk, on seeing a sight with the eye, feels no passion for a sight that incites passion and can center his mind.
This is how a monk is resilient to sights.
“And how is a monk resilient to sounds?
There is the case where a monk, on hearing a sound with the ear, feels no passion for a sound that incites passion and can center his mind.
This is how a monk is resilient to sounds.
“And how is a monk resilient to aromas?
There is the case where a monk, on smelling an aroma with the nose, feels no passion for an aroma that incites passion and can center his mind.
This is how a monk is resilient to aromas.
“And how is a monk resilient to flavors?
There is the case where a monk, on tasting a flavor with the tongue, feels no passion for a flavor that incites passion and can center his mind.
This is how a monk is resilient to flavors.
“And how is a monk resilient to tactile sensations?
There is the case where a monk, on touching a tactile sensation with the body, feels no passion for a tactile sensation that incites passion and can center his mind.
This is how a monk is resilient to tactile sensations.
“Endowed with these five qualities, a monk is deserving of gifts, deserving of hospitality, deserving of offerings, deserving of respect, an unexcelled field of merit for the world.”
“Endowed with five qualities, a king's elephant is worthy of a king, is a king's asset, counts as a very limb of his king.
Which five?
There is the case where a king's elephant is a listener, a destroyer, a protector, an endurer, and a goer.
“And how is a king's elephant a listener?
There is the case where, whenever the tamer of tamable elephants gives him a task, then — regardless of whether he has or hasn't done it before — he pays attention, applies his whole mind, and lends ear.
This is how a king's elephant is a listener.
“And how is a king's elephant a destroyer?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, destroys an elephant together with its rider, destroys a horse together with its rider, destroys a chariot together with its driver, destroys a foot soldier.
This is how a king's elephant is a destroyer.
“And how is a king's elephant a protector?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, protects his forequarters, protects his hindquarters, protects his forefeet, protects his hindfeet, protects his head, protects his ears, protects his tusks, protects his trunk, protects his tail, protects his rider.
This is how a king's elephant is a protector.
“And how is a king's elephant an endurer?
There is the case where a king's elephant, having gone into battle, endures blows from spears, swords, arrows, & axes; he endures the resounding din of drums, cymbals, conchs, & tom-toms.
This is how a king's elephant is an endurer.
“And how is a king's elephant a goer?
There is the case where — in whichever direction the tamer of tamable elephants sends him, regardless of whether he has or hasn't gone there before — a king's elephant goes there right away.
This is how a king's elephant is a goer.
“Endowed with these five qualities, a king's elephant is worthy of a king, is a king's asset, counts as a very limb of his king.
“In the same way, a monk endowed with five qualities is deserving of gifts, deserving of hospitality, deserving of offerings, deserving of respect, an unexcelled field of merit for the world.
Which five?
There is the case where a monk is a listener, a destroyer, a protector, an endurer, and a goer.
“And how is a monk a listener?
There is the case where, when the Dhamma & Discipline declared by the Tathagata is being taught, a monk pays attention, applies his whole mind, and lends ear to the Dhamma.
This is how a monk is a listener.
“And how is a monk a destroyer?
There is the case where a monk does not tolerate an arisen thought of sensuality.
He abandons it, destroys it, dispels it, & wipes it out of existence.
He does not tolerate an arisen thought of ill will… an arisen thought of cruelty… He does not tolerate arisen evil, unskillful mental qualities.
He abandons them, destroys them, dispels them, & wipes them out of existence.
This is how a monk is a destroyer.
“And how is a monk a protector?
There is the case where a monk, on seeing a form with the eye, does not grasp at any theme or particulars by which — if he were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the eye — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail him.
He practices with restraint.
He guards the faculty of the eye.
He achieves restraint with regard to the faculty of the eye.
“On hearing a sound with the ear…
“On smelling an aroma with the nose…
“On tasting a flavor with the tongue…
“On touching a tactile sensation with the body…
“On cognizing an idea with the intellect, he does not grasp at any theme or particulars by which — if he were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the intellect — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail him.
He practices with restraint.
He guards the faculty of the intellect.
He achieves restraint with regard to the faculty of the intellect.
“This is how a monk is a protector.
“And how is a monk an endurer?
There is the case where a monk is resilient to cold, heat, hunger, & thirst; the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, & reptiles; ill-spoken, unwelcome words & bodily feelings that, when they arise, are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, disagreeable, displeasing, & menacing to life.
This is how a monk is an endurer.
“And how is a monk a goer?
There is the case where a monk goes right away to that direction to which he has never been before in the course of this long stretch of time — in other words, to the resolution of all fabrications, the relinquishment of all acquisitions, the ending of craving, dispassion, cessation, Unbinding.
This is how a monk is a goer.
“Endowed with these five qualities a monk is deserving of gifts, deserving of hospitality, deserving of offerings, deserving of respect, an unexcelled field of merit for the world.”
“Monks, there are these five kinds of loss.
Which five?
Loss of relatives, loss of wealth, loss through disease, loss in terms of virtue, loss in terms of views.
It's not by reason of loss of relatives, loss of wealth, or loss through disease that beings — with the break-up of the body, after death — reappear in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell.
It's by reason of loss in terms of virtue and loss in terms of views that beings — with the break-up of the body, after death — reappear in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell.
These are the five kinds of loss.
“There are these five ways of being consummate.
Which five?
Being consummate in terms of relatives, being consummate in terms of wealth, being consummate in terms of freedom from disease, being consummate in terms of virtue, being consummate in terms of views.
It's not by reason of being consummate in terms of relatives, being consummate in terms of wealth, or being consummate in terms of freedom from disease that beings — with the break-up of the body, after death — reappear in the good destinations, in the heavenly world.
It's by reason of being consummate in virtue and being consummate in terms of views that beings — with the break-up of the body, after death — reappear in the good destinations, in the heavenly world.
These are the five ways of being consummate.”
Translator's note: This discourse lists the five grave deeds that are said to prevent one's chances of attaining any of the noble attainments in this lifetime.
People who commit them fall — immediately at the moment of death — into hell.
No help from outside is able to mitigate the sufferings they will endure in hell, and thus they are said to be incurable.
Only when the results of these deeds have worked themselves out will they be released from hell.
Even if they return to the human plane, they will continue to suffer the consequences of their deeds.
For example, Ven.
Moggallana, one of the Buddha's foremost disciples, killed his parents many aeons ago, and the results of that deed pursued him even through his final lifetime, when he was beaten to death.
“There are these five inhabitants of the states of deprivation, inhabitants of hell, who are in agony & incurable.
Which five?
One who has killed his/her mother, one who has killed his/her father, one who has killed an arahant, one who — with a corrupted mind — has caused the blood of a Tathagata to flow, and one who has caused a split in the Sangha.
These are the five inhabitants of the states of deprivation, inhabitants of hell, who are in agony & incurable.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Vesali, in the Great Forest, at the Gabled Pavilion.
Then, in the late afternoon, he left his seclusion and went to the sick ward, where he saw a monk who was weak & sickly.
Seeing him, he sat down on a prepared seat.
As he was sitting there, he addressed the monks: “When these five things don't leave a monk who is weak & sickly, it can be expected of him that, before long — with the ending of the fermentations — he will enter & remain in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having realized & directly known them for himself in the here & now.
Which five?
“There is the case where a monk remains focused on unattractiveness with regard to the body, is percipient of foulness with regard to food, is percipient of distaste with regard to every world, is percipient of the undesirability of all fabrications, and has the perception of death well established within himself.
“When these five things don't leave a monk who is weak & sickly, it can be expected of him that, before long — with the ending of the fermentations — he will enter & remain in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having realized & directly known them for himself in the here & now.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Magadhans at Andhakavinda.
Then Ven.
Ananda went to him and, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the Blessed One said to him, “Ananda, the new monks — those who have not long gone forth, who are newcomers in this Dhamma & Discipline — should be encouraged, exhorted, and established in these five things.
Which five?
“'Come, friends, be virtuous.
Dwell restrained in accordance with the Patimokkha, consummate in your behavior & sphere of activity.
Train yourselves, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.' Thus they should be encouraged, exhorted, & established in restraint in accordance with the Patimokkha.
“'Come, friends, dwell with your sense faculties guarded, with mindfulness as your protector, with mindfulness as your chief, with your intellect self-protected, endowed with an awareness protected by mindfulness.' Thus they should be encouraged, exhorted, & established in restraint of the senses.
“'Come, friends, speak only a little, place limits on your conversation.' Thus they should be encouraged, exhorted, & established in limited conversation.
“'Come, friends, dwell in the wilderness.
Resort to remote wilderness & forest dwellings.' Thus they should be encouraged, exhorted, & established in physical seclusion.
“Come, friends, develop right view.
Be endowed with right vision.' Thus they should be encouraged, exhorted, & established in right vision.
“New monks — those who have not long gone forth, who are newcomers in this Dhamma & Discipline — should be encouraged, exhorted, and established in these five things.”
“Endowed with five qualities, a monk pursuing mindfulness of breathing will in no long time penetrate the Unprovoked.
Which five?
“He is a person who imposes only a little: one of few duties & projects, easy to support, easily contented with the requisites of life.
“He is a person who eats only a little food, committed to not indulging his stomach.
“He is a person of only a little sloth, committed to wakefulness.
“He lives in the wilderness, in an isolated dwelling place.
“He reflects on the mind as it is released.
“Endowed with these five qualities, a monk pursuing mindfulness of breathing will in no long time penetrate the Unprovoked.”
“Endowed with five qualities, a monk pursuing mindfulness of breathing will in no long time penetrate the Unprovoked.
Which five?
“He is a person who imposes only a little: one of few duties & projects, easy to support, easily contented with the requisites of life.
“He is a person who eats only a little food, committed to not indulging his stomach.
“He is a person of only a little sloth, committed to wakefulness.
“He is a person of much learning, who has retained what he heard, has stored what he has heard.
Whatever teachings are admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, admirable in the end, that — in their meaning & expression — proclaim the holy life that is entirely complete & pure: those he has listened to often, retained, discussed, accumulated, examined with his mind, and well-penetrated in terms of his views.
“He reflects on the mind as it is released.
“Endowed with these five qualities, a monk pursuing mindfulness of breathing will in no long time penetrate the Unprovoked.”
“Endowed with five qualities, a monk pursuing mindfulness of breathing will in no long time penetrate the Unprovoked.
Which five?
“He is a person who imposes only a little: one of few duties & projects, easy to support, easily contented with the requisites of life.
“He is a person who eats only a little food, committed to not indulging his stomach.
“He is a person of only a little sloth, committed to wakefulness.
“He gets to hear at will, easily & without difficulty, talk that is truly sobering & conducive to the opening of awareness: talk on modesty, contentment, seclusion, non-entanglement, arousing persistence, virtue, concentration, discernment, release, and the knowledge & vision of release.
“He reflects on the mind as it is released.
“Endowed with these five qualities, a monk pursuing mindfulness of breathing will in no long time penetrate the Unprovoked.”
“Monks, these five future dangers, unarisen at present, will arise in the future.
Be alert to them and, being alert, work to get rid of them.
Which five?
“There will be, in the course of the future, monks desirous of fine robes.
They, desirous of fine robes, will neglect the practice of wearing cast-off cloth; will neglect isolated forest and wilderness dwellings; will move to towns, cities, and royal capitals, taking up residence there.
For the sake of a robe they will do many kinds of unseemly, inappropriate things.
“This, monks, is the first future danger, unarisen at present, that will arise in the future.
Be alert to it and, being alert, work to get rid of it.
“Furthermore, in the course of the future there will be monks desirous of fine food.
They, desirous of fine food, will neglect the practice of going for alms; will neglect isolated forest and wilderness dwellings; will move to towns, cities, and royal capitals, taking up residence there and searching out the tip-top tastes with the tip of the tongue.
For the sake of food they will do many kinds of unseemly, inappropriate things.
“This, monks, is the second future danger, unarisen at present, that will arise in the future.
Be alert to it and, being alert, work to get rid of it.
“Furthermore, in the course of the future there will be monks desirous of fine lodgings.
They, desirous of fine lodgings, will neglect the practice of living in the wilds; will neglect isolated forest and wilderness dwellings; will move to towns, cities, and royal capitals, taking up residence there.
For the sake of lodgings they will do many kinds of unseemly, inappropriate things.
“This, monks, is the third future danger, unarisen at present, that will arise in the future.
Be alert to it and, being alert, work to get rid of it.
“Furthermore, in the course of the future there will be monks who will live in close association with nuns, female probationers, and female novices.
As they interact with nuns, female probationers, and female novices, they can be expected either to lead the holy life dissatisfied or to fall into one of the grosser offenses, leaving the training, returning to a lower way of life.
“This, monks, is the fourth future danger, unarisen at present, that will arise in the future.
Be alert to it and, being alert, work to get rid of it.
“Furthermore, in the course of the future there will be monks who will live in close association with monastery attendants and novices.
As they interact with monastery attendants and novices, they can be expected to live intent on storing up all kinds of possessions and to stake out crops and fields.
“This, monks, is the fifth future danger, unarisen at present, that will arise in the future.
Be alert to it and, being alert, work to get rid of it.
“These, monks, are the five future dangers, unarisen at present, that will arise in the future.
Be alert to them and, being alert, work to get rid of them.” 
“Monks, these five future dangers, unarisen at present, will arise in the future.
Be alert to them and, being alert, work to get rid of them.
Which five?
“There will be, in the course of the future, monks undeveloped in body, undeveloped in virtue, undeveloped in mind, undeveloped in discernment.
They — being undeveloped in body, undeveloped in virtue, undeveloped in mind, undeveloped in discernment — will give full ordination to others and will not be able to discipline them in heightened virtue, heightened mind, heightened discernment.
These too will then be undeveloped in body… virtue… mind… discernment.
They — being undeveloped in body… virtue… mind… discernment — will give full ordination to still others and will not be able to discipline them in heightened virtue, heightened mind, heightened discernment.
These too will then be undeveloped in body… virtue… mind… discernment.
Thus from corrupt Dhamma comes corrupt discipline; from corrupt discipline, corrupt Dhamma.
“This, monks, is the first future danger, unarisen at present, that will arise in the future.
Be alert to it and, being alert, work to get rid of it.
“And again, there will be in the course of the future monks undeveloped in body, undeveloped in virtue, undeveloped in mind, undeveloped in discernment.
They — being undeveloped in body, undeveloped in virtue, undeveloped in mind, undeveloped in discernment — will take on others as students and will not be able to discipline them in heightened virtue, heightened mind, heightened discernment.
These too will then be undeveloped in body… virtue… mind… discernment.
They — being undeveloped in body… virtue… mind… discernment — will take on still others as students and will not be able to discipline them in heightened virtue, heightened mind, heightened discernment.
These too will then be undeveloped in body… virtue… mind… discernment.
Thus from corrupt Dhamma comes corrupt discipline; from corrupt discipline, corrupt Dhamma.
“This, monks, is the second future danger, unarisen at present, that will arise in the future.
Be alert to it and, being alert, work to get rid of it.
“And again, there will be in the course of the future monks undeveloped in body… virtue… mind… discernment.
They — being undeveloped in body… virtue… mind… discernment — when giving a talk on higher Dhamma or a talk composed of questions and answers, will fall into dark mental states without being aware of it.
Thus from corrupt Dhamma comes corrupt discipline; from corrupt discipline, corrupt Dhamma.
“This, monks, is the third future danger, unarisen at present, that will arise in the future.
Be alert to it and, being alert, work to get rid of it.
“And again, there will be in the course of the future monks undeveloped in body… virtue… mind… discernment.
They — being undeveloped in body… virtue… mind… discernment — will not listen when discourses that are words of the Tathagata — deep, profound, transcendent, connected with the Void — are being recited.
They will not lend ear, will not set their hearts on knowing them, will not regard these teachings as worth grasping or mastering.
But they will listen when discourses that are literary works — the works of poets, elegant in sound, elegant in rhetoric, the work of outsiders, words of disciples — are recited.
They will lend ear and set their hearts on knowing them.
They will regard these teachings as worth grasping and mastering.
Thus from corrupt Dhamma comes corrupt discipline; from corrupt discipline, corrupt Dhamma.
“This, monks, is the fourth future danger, unarisen at present, that will arise in the future.
Be alert to it and, being alert, work to get rid of it.
“And again, there will be in the course of the future monks undeveloped in body… virtue… mind… discernment.
They — being undeveloped in body… virtue… mind… discernment — will become elders living in luxury, lethargic, foremost in falling back, shirking the duties of solitude.
They will not make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
They will become an example for later generations, who will become luxurious in their living, lethargic, foremost in falling back, shirking the duties of solitude, and who will not make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
Thus from corrupt Dhamma comes corrupt discipline; from corrupt discipline, corrupt Dhamma.
“This, monks, is the fifth future danger, unarisen at present, that will arise in the future.
Be alert to it and, being alert, work to get rid of it.
“These, monks, are the five future dangers, unarisen at present, that will arise in the future.
Be alert to them and, being alert, work to get rid of them.
See also: SN.; AN.; AN.; AN.
“Monks, these five future dangers are just enough, when considered, for a monk — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
Which five?
“There is the case where a monk reminds himself of this: At present I am young, black-haired, endowed with the blessings of youth in the first stage of life.
The time will come, though, when this body is beset by old age.
When one is overcome with old age and decay, it is not easy to pay attention to the Buddha's teachings.
It is not easy to reside in isolated forest or wilderness dwellings.
Before this unwelcome, disagreeable, displeasing thing happens, let me first make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized, so that — endowed with that Dhamma — I will live in peace even when old.
“This is the first future danger that is just enough, when considered, for a monk — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Furthermore, the monk reminds himself of this: At present I am free from illness and discomfort, endowed with good digestion: not too cold, not too hot, of medium strength and tolerance.
The time will come, though, when this body is beset with illness.
When one is overcome with illness, it is not easy to pay attention to the Buddha's teachings.
It is not easy to reside in isolated forest or wilderness dwellings.
Before this unwelcome, disagreeable, displeasing thing happens, let me first make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized, so that — endowed with that Dhamma — I will live in peace even when ill.
“This is the second future danger that is just enough, when considered, for a monk — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Furthermore, the monk reminds himself of this: At present food is plentiful, alms are easy to come by.
It is easy to maintain oneself by gleanings and patronage.
The time will come, though, when there is famine: Food is scarce, alms are hard to come by, and it is not easy to maintain oneself by gleanings and patronage.
When there is famine, people will congregate where food is plentiful.
There they will live packed and crowded together.
When one is living packed and crowded together, it is not easy to pay attention to the Buddha's teachings.
It is not easy to reside in isolated forest or wilderness dwellings.
Before this unwelcome, disagreeable, displeasing thing happens, let me first make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized, so that — endowed with that Dhamma — I will live in peace even when there is famine.
“This is the third future danger that is just enough, when considered, for a monk — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Furthermore, the monk reminds himself of this: At present people are in harmony, on friendly terms, without quarreling, like milk mixed with water, viewing one another with eyes of affection.
The time will come, though, when there is danger and an invasion of savage tribes.
Taking power, they will surround the countryside.
When there is danger, people will congregate where it is safe.
There they will live packed and crowded together.
When one is living packed and crowded together, it is not easy to pay attention to the Buddha's teachings.
It is not easy to reside in isolated forest or wilderness dwellings.
Before this unwelcome, disagreeable, displeasing thing happens, let me first make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized, so that — endowed with that Dhamma — I will live in peace even when there is danger.
“This is the fourth future danger that is just enough, when considered, for a monk — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Furthermore, the monk reminds himself of this: At present the Sangha — in harmony, on friendly terms, without quarreling — lives in comfort with a single recitation.
The time will come, though, when the Sangha splits.
When the Sangha is split, it is not easy to pay attention to the Buddha's teachings.
It is not easy to reside in isolated forest or wilderness dwellings.
Before this unwelcome, disagreeable, displeasing thing happens, let me first make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized, so that — endowed with that Dhamma — I will live in peace even when the Sangha is split.
“This is the fifth future danger that is just enough, when considered, for a monk — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“These are the five future dangers that are just enough, when considered, for a monk — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
See also: AN.; AN.; AN.
Translator's note: See the note to the preceding discourse.
“Monks, there are these five types of warriors who can be found existing in the world.
Which five?
“There is the case of a warrior who — taking his sword & shield, strapping on his bow & quiver — goes down into the thick of battle.
There in the battle he strives & makes effort.
But while he is striving & making an effort, his opponents strike him down and finish him off.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the first type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“Then there is the warrior who — taking his sword & shield, strapping on his bow & quiver — goes down into the thick of battle.
There in the battle he strives & makes effort.
But while he is striving & making an effort, his opponents wound him.
He gets carried out and taken to his relatives.
But while he is being taken to his relatives, before he has reached them he dies along the way.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the second type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“Then there is the warrior who — taking his sword & shield, strapping on his bow & quiver — goes down into the thick of battle.
There in the battle he strives & makes effort.
But while he is striving & making an effort, his opponents wound him.
He gets carried out and taken to his relatives, who nurse him and care for him, but he dies of that injury.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the third type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“Then there is the warrior who — taking his sword & shield, strapping on his bow & quiver — goes down into the thick of battle.
There in the battle he strives & makes effort.
But while he is striving & making an effort, his opponents wound him.
He gets carried out and taken to his relatives.
His relatives nurse him and care for him, and he recovers from his injury.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the fourth type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“Then there is the warrior who — taking his sword & shield, strapping on his bow & quiver — goes down into the thick of battle.
On winning the battle, victorious in battle, he comes out at the very head of the battle.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the fifth type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“These are the five types of warriors who can be found existing in the world.
“In the same way, monks, there are these five warrior-like individuals who can be found existing among the monks.
Which five?
“There is the case of the monk who dwells in dependence on a certain village or town.
Early in the morning, having put on his robes and carrying his bowl & outer robe, he goes into the village or town for alms — with his body, speech, & mind unprotected, with mindfulness unestablished, with his sense faculties unguarded.
There he sees a woman improperly dressed or half-naked.
As he sees her improperly dressed or half-naked, lust ravages his mind.
With his mind ravaged by lust, he — without renouncing the training, without declaring his weakness — engages in sexual intercourse.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who — taking his sword & shield, strapping on his bow & quiver — goes down into the thick of battle.
There in the battle he strives & makes effort.
But while he is striving & making an effort, his opponents strike him down and finish him off.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the first type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“Then there is the case of the monk who dwells in dependence on a certain village or town.
Early in the morning, having put on his robes and carrying his bowl & outer robe, he goes into the village or town for alms — with his body, speech, & mind unprotected, with mindfulness unestablished, with his sense faculties unguarded.
There he sees a woman improperly dressed or half-naked.
As he sees her improperly dressed or half-naked, lust ravages his mind.
With his mind ravaged by lust, he burns in body & mind.
The thought occurs to him: 'What if I were to go to the monastery and tell the monks: “Friends, I am assailed by lust, overcome by lust.
I can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring my weakness in the training, renouncing the training, I will return to the lower life.”' He heads toward the monastery, but before he arrives there, along the way, he declares his weakness in the training, renounces the training, and returns to the lower life.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who — taking his sword & shield, strapping on his bow & quiver — goes down into the thick of battle.
There in the battle he strives & makes effort.
But while he is striving & making an effort, his opponents wound him.
He gets carried out and taken to his relatives.
But while he is being taken to his relatives, before he has reached them he dies along the way.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the second type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“Then there is the case of the monk who dwells in dependence on a certain village or town.
Early in the morning, having put on his robes and carrying his bowl & outer robe, he goes into the village or town for alms — with his body, speech, & mind unprotected, with mindfulness unestablished, with his sense faculties unguarded.
There he sees a woman improperly dressed or half-naked.
As he sees her improperly dressed or half-naked, lust ravages his mind.
With his mind ravaged by lust, he burns in body & mind.
The thought occurs to him: 'What if I were to go to the monastery and tell the monks: “Friends, I am assailed by lust, overcome by lust.
I can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring my weakness in the training, renouncing the training, I will return to the lower life.”' Going to the monastery, he tells the monks, 'Friends, I am assailed by lust, overcome by lust.
I can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring my weakness in the training, renouncing the training, I will return to the lower life.'
“Then his companions in the holy life admonish & instruct him, 'Friend, the Blessed One has said that sensual pleasures are of little satisfaction, of much stress, much despair, & greater drawbacks.
The Blessed One has compared sensual pleasures to a chain of bones — of much stress, much despair, & greater drawbacks.
He has compared sensual pleasures to a lump of flesh… a grass torch… a pit of glowing embers… a dream… borrowed goods… the fruits of a tree… a slaughterhouse… spears & swords… a poisonous snake — of much stress, much despair, & greater drawbacks.
Find delight, friend, in the holy life.
Don't declare your weakness in the training, renounce the training, or return to the lower life.'
“Thus admonished & instructed by his companions in the holy life, he says, 'Even though the Blessed One has said that sensual pleasures are of little satisfaction, of much stress, much despair, & greater drawbacks, still I can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring my weakness in the training, renouncing the training, I will return to the lower life.' So he declares his weakness in the training, renounces the training, and returns to the lower life.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who — taking his sword & shield, strapping on his bow & quiver — goes down into the thick of battle.
There in the battle he strives & makes effort.
But while he is striving & making an effort, his opponents wound him.
He gets carried out and taken to his relatives, who nurse him and care for him, but he dies of that injury.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the third type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“Then there is the case of the monk who dwells in dependence on a certain village or town.
Early in the morning, having put on his robes and carrying his bowl & outer robe, he goes into the village or town for alms — with his body, speech, & mind unprotected, with mindfulness unestablished, with his sense faculties unguarded.
There he sees a woman improperly dressed or half-naked.
As he sees her improperly dressed or half-naked, lust ravages his mind.
With his mind ravaged by lust, he burns in body & mind.
The thought occurs to him: 'What if I were to go to the monastery and tell the monks: “Friends, I am assailed by lust, overcome by lust.
I can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring my weakness in the training, renouncing the training, I will return to the lower life.”' Going to the monastery, he tells the monks, 'Friends, I am assailed by lust, overcome by lust.
I can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring my weakness in the training, renouncing the training, I will return to the lower life.'
“Then his companions in the holy life admonish & instruct him, 'Friend, the Blessed One has said that sensual pleasures are of little satisfaction, of much stress, much despair, & greater drawbacks.
The Blessed One has compared sensual pleasures to a chain of bones — of much stress, much despair, & greater drawbacks.
He has compared sensual pleasures to a lump of flesh… a grass torch… a pit of glowing embers… a dream… borrowed goods… the fruits of a tree… a slaughterhouse… spears & swords… a poisonous snake — of much stress, much despair, & greater drawbacks.
Find delight, friend, in the holy life.
Don't declare your weakness in the training, renounce the training, or return to the lower life.'
“Thus admonished & instructed by his companions in the holy life, he responds, 'I will strive, friends.
I will remember.
I will find delight in the holy life.
I won't yet declare my weakness in the training, renounce the training, or return to the lower life.' This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who — taking his sword & shield, strapping on his bow & quiver — goes down into the thick of battle.
There in the battle he strives & makes effort.
But while he is striving & making an effort, his opponents wound him.
He gets carried out and taken to his relatives, who nurse him and care for him, and he recovers from his injury.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the fourth type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“Then there is the case of the monk who dwells in dependence on a certain village or town.
Early in the morning, having put on his robes and carrying his bowl & outer robe, he goes into the village or town for alms — with his body, speech, & mind protected, with mindfulness established, with his sense faculties guarded.
On seeing a form with the eye, does not grasp at any theme or particulars by which — if he were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the eye — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail him.
He practices with restraint.
He guards the faculty of the eye.
He achieves restraint with regard to the faculty of the eye.
“On hearing a sound with the ear…
“On smelling an aroma with the nose…
“On tasting a flavor with the tongue…
“On touching a tactile sensation with the body…
“On cognizing an idea with the intellect, he does not grasp at any theme or particulars by which — if he were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the intellect — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail him.
He practices with restraint.
He guards the faculty of the intellect.
He achieves restraint with regard to the faculty of the intellect.
“Returning from his almsround, after his meal, he resorts to a secluded dwelling place: the wilderness, the foot of a tree, a mountain, a glen, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a forest grove, the open air, a haystack.
Having gone to the wilderness, the foot of a tree, or an empty building, he sits down, crosses his legs, holds his body erect, and brings mindfulness to the fore.
“Abandoning covetousness with regard to the world, he dwells with an awareness devoid of covetousness.
He cleanses his mind of covetousness.
Abandoning ill will & anger, he dwells with an awareness devoid of ill will, sympathetic with the welfare of all living beings.
He cleanses his mind of ill will & anger.
Abandoning sloth & drowsiness, he dwells with an awareness devoid of sloth & drowsiness, mindful, alert, percipient of light.
He cleanses his mind of sloth & drowsiness.
Abandoning restlessness & anxiety, he dwells undisturbed, his mind inwardly stilled.
He cleanses his mind of restlessness & anxiety.
Abandoning uncertainty, he dwells having crossed over uncertainty, with no perplexity with regard to skillful mental qualities.
He cleanses his mind of uncertainty.
“Having abandoned these five hindrances, corruptions of awareness that weaken discernment, then — quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities — he enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
With the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' With the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
“With his mind thus concentrated, purified, & bright, unblemished, free from defects, pliant, malleable, steady, & attained to imperturbability, he directs and inclines it to the knowledge of the ending of the mental fermentations.
He discerns, as it has come to be, that 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the way leading to the cessation of stress… These are mental fermentations… This is the origination of fermentations… This is the cessation of fermentations… This is the way leading to the cessation of fermentations.' His heart, thus knowing, thus seeing, is released from the fermentation of sensuality, the fermentation of becoming, the fermentation of ignorance.
With release, there is the knowledge, 'Released.' He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
“This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who — taking his sword & shield, strapping on his bow & quiver — goes down into the thick of battle.
On winning the battle, victorious in battle, he comes out at the very head of the battle.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the fifth type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“These are the five warrior-like individuals who can be found existing among the monks.” 
Translator's note: This discourse is addressed to monks, and deals with their battle to maintain their celibacy and to come out victorious in the practice.
The Buddha compares the victorious monk to a victorious warrior, an analogy that was probably intended to appeal to the monks' masculine pride.
In this analogy, a celibate is not a wimp, but is instead a warrior to the highest degree.
Because the first confrontation for a man trying to maintain his celibacy involves his attraction to women, women play the role of first-line enemy in this discourse.
Unfortunately, we don't have any record of how the Buddha advised his nun followers on how to maintain their celibacy, so we don't know if he would have used a woman-warrior analogy when teaching them to resist their attraction to men, or if he would have replaced it with another analogy to appeal more specifically to their feminine pride.
However, there are discourses in the Pali canon that depict nuns as successfully maintaining their celibacy when confronted by men in the forest.
A prime example is Therigatha XIV; there are other examples of nuns resisting temptation in the Bhikkhuni Samyutta.
Ultimately, of course, the true enemy lies, not without, but within.
This is shown by the fact that the monk in this discourse has to go off alone and put an end to the fermentation of sensual passion in his own mind before he can be considered truly victorious.
“Monks, there are these five types of warriors who can be found existing in the world.
Which five?
“There is the case of a warrior who, on seeing a cloud of dust, falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the first type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“Then there is the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust, but on seeing the top of the enemy's banner, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the second type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“Then there is the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust & the top of the enemy's banner, but on hearing the tumult, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the third type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“Then there is the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust, the top of the enemy's banner, & the tumult, but when in hand-to-hand combat he is struck and falls wounded.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the fourth type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“Then there is the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust, the top of the enemy's banner, the tumult, & the hand-to-hand combat.
On winning the battle, victorious in battle, he comes out at the very head of the battle.
Some warriors are like this.
This is the fifth type of warrior who can be found existing in the world.
“These are the five types of warriors who can be found existing in the world.
“In the same way, monks, there are these five warrior-like individuals who can be found existing among the monks.
Which five?
“There is the case of the monk who, on seeing a cloud of dust, falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring his weakness in the training, he leaves the training and returns to the lower life.
What is the cloud of dust for him?
There is the case of the monk who hears, 'In that village or town over there is a woman or girl who is shapely, good-looking, charming, endowed with the foremost lotus-like complexion.' On hearing this, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring his weakness in the training, he leaves the training and returns to the lower life.
That, for him, is the cloud of dust.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who, on seeing a cloud of dust, falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the first type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“Then there is the case of the monk who can handle the cloud of dust, but on seeing the top of the enemy's banner, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring his weakness in the training, he leaves the training and returns to the lower life.
What is the top of the banner for him?
There is the case of the monk who not only hears that 'In that village or town over there is a woman or girl who is shapely, good-looking, charming, endowed with the foremost lotus-like complexion.' He sees for himself that in that village or town over there is a woman or girl who is shapely, good-looking, charming, endowed with the foremost lotus-like complexion.
On seeing her, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring his weakness in the training, he leaves the training and returns to the lower life.
That, for him, is the top of the banner.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust, but on seeing the top of the enemy's banner, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the second type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“Then there is the case of the monk who can handle the cloud of dust & the top of the enemy's banner, but on hearing the tumult, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring his weakness in the training, he leaves the training and returns to the lower life.
What is the tumult for him?
There is the case of the monk who has gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty building.
A woman approaches him and giggles at him, calls out to him, laughs aloud, & teases him.
On being giggled at, called out to, laughed at, & teased by the woman, he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't continue in the holy life.
Declaring his weakness in the training, he leaves the training and returns to the lower life.
That, for him, is the tumult.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust & the top of the enemy's banner, but on hearing the tumult he falters, faints, doesn't steel himself, can't engage in the battle.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the third type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“Then there is the case of the monk who can handle the cloud of dust, the top of the enemy's banner, & the tumult, but when in hand-to-hand combat he is struck and falls wounded.
What is the hand-to-hand combat for him?
There is the case of the monk who has gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty building.
A woman approaches him and sits down right next to him, lies down right next to him, throws herself all over him.
When she sits down right next to him, lies down right next to him, and throws herself all over him, he — without renouncing the training, without declaring his weakness — engages in sexual intercourse.
This, for him, is hand-to-hand combat.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust, the top of the enemy's banner, & the tumult, but when in hand-to-hand combat he is struck and falls wounded.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the fourth type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“Then there is the case of the monk who can handle the cloud of dust, the top of the enemy's banner, the tumult, & hand-to-hand combat.
On winning the battle, victorious in battle, he comes out at the very head of the battle.
What is victory in the battle for him?
There is the case of the monk who has gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty dwelling.
A woman approaches him and sits down right next to him, lies down right next to him, throws herself all over him.
When she sits down right next to him, lies down right next to him, and throws herself all over him, he extricates himself, frees himself, and goes off where he will.
“He resorts to a secluded dwelling place: the wilderness, the foot of a tree, a mountain, a glen, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a forest grove, the open air, a haystack.
Having gone to the wilderness, the foot of a tree, or an empty building, he sits down, crosses his legs, holds his body erect, and brings mindfulness to the fore.
“Abandoning covetousness with regard to the world, he dwells with an awareness devoid of covetousness.
He cleanses his mind of covetousness.
Abandoning ill will & anger, he dwells with an awareness devoid of ill will, sympathetic with the welfare of all living beings.
He cleanses his mind of ill will & anger.
Abandoning sloth & drowsiness, he dwells with an awareness devoid of sloth & drowsiness, mindful, alert, percipient of light.
He cleanses his mind of sloth & drowsiness.
Abandoning restlessness & anxiety, he dwells undisturbed, his mind inwardly stilled.
He cleanses his mind of restlessness & anxiety.
Abandoning uncertainty, he dwells having crossed over uncertainty, with no perplexity with regard to skillful mental qualities.
He cleanses his mind of uncertainty.
“Having abandoned these five hindrances, corruptions of awareness that weaken discernment, then — quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities — he enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
With the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' With the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
“With his mind thus concentrated, purified, & bright, unblemished, free from defects, pliant, malleable, steady, & attained to imperturbability, he directs and inclines it to the knowledge of the ending of the mental fermentations.
He discerns, as it has come to be, that 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the way leading to the cessation of stress… These are mental fermentations… This is the origination of fermentations… This is the cessation of fermentations… This is the way leading to the cessation of fermentations.' His heart, thus knowing, thus seeing, is released from the fermentation of sensuality, the fermentation of becoming, the fermentation of ignorance.
With release, there is the knowledge, 'Released.' He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
“This, for him, is victory in the battle.
This individual, I tell you, is like the warrior who can handle the cloud of dust, the top of the enemy's banner, the tumult, & hand-to-hand combat.
On winning the battle, victorious in battle, he comes out at the very head of the battle.
Some individuals are like this.
This is the fifth type of warrior-like individual who can be found existing among the monks.
“These are the five warrior-like individuals who can be found existing among the monks.” 
Paṭisambhidā: formed from paṭi- + saṃ- + bhid, where paṭi + saṃ should probably be understood as 'back together', and the verbal root bhid means 'to break, split, sever'.
Rhys Davids and Stede propose that a literal rendering would be “resolving continuous breaking up”, and gloss this as 'analysis, analytic insight, discriminating knowledge'; moreover, they associate it with the idea of 'logical analysis'.
Bhikkhu Nyanatiloka similarly renders the term as 'analytical knowledge', but also as 'discrimination'.
Bhikkhu Ñāṇamoli voices a divergent view in a note to his translation of in Buddhaghosa's Visuddhimagga, XIV., where he renders paṭisambhidā as 'discrimination':
In this translation, I have decided to follow Ñāṇamoli's rendering of the term.
Even so, 'discrimination' does not so clearly capture the double sense of both 'taking apart' and 'combining together' that seems to be suggested by paṭisambhidā.
One kind of epistemological process which involves both of these activities is 'classification', in which various things, even within a given class or group, are divided and grouped according to their peculiar differences and similarities with respect to one another.
So, while each of the paṭisambhidā is itself a classification of a kind of knowledge, it is also possible that each one is also understood to be a kind of ability to 'classify' correctly the elements belonging to the kind of knowledge that falls into its scope.
In Visuddhimagga, Buddhaghosa, presents a list of what he considers to be twelve different kinds of paññā; the set of catasso paṭisambhidā, 'four discriminations', is the twelfth of these.
He goes on to give an extensive discussion of them, which, although of interest, is very much influenced by the Abhidhamma interpretation of the term: Buddhaghosa begins by citing the definition of the Abhidhamma Vibhaṅga, and then proceeds to follow the subsequent Vibhaṅga discussion.
If Buddhaghosa was indeed the author of the Sumaṅgalavilāsinī, then his Abhidhamma-based account of the four paṭisambhidā may well diverge from the original meaning of the term in the period in which the Suttas evolved and were committed to memory.
For the same reasons, this is very probably also the case for many commentarial interpretations of earlier Sutta concepts.
Paṭibhāna: 'understanding, illumination, intelligence, readiness or confidence of speech, promptitude, wit'.
Cf.
the Sanskrit pratibhāna, from prati- + √bhā, pratibhāti, 'to shine upon, to appear to the mind, to become clear or manifest'; thus pratibhāna, 'becoming clear or visible; obviousness; intelligence; eloquence; brilliancy; boldness, audacity'.
We might also cite here the definition from Vibhaṅga with which Buddhaghosa opens his discussion of the four paṭisambhidā:
Knowledge with respect to meaning is discrimination of meaning, knowledge with respect to dhamma is discrimination of dhamma, knowledge with respect to the linguistic expression of dhamma is discrimination of language, and knowledge with respect to kinds of knowledge is discrimination of paṭibhāna.
atthe ñāṇaṃ atthapaṭisambhidā, dhamme ñāṇaṃ dhammapaṭisambhidā, tatra dhammaniruttābhilāpe ñāṇaṃ niruttipaṭisambhidā, ñāṇesu ñāṇaṃ paṭibhānapaṭisambhidā.

Ñāṇamoli, in his translation of this passage as cited within Buddhaghosa's text, renders paṭibhāna as 'perspicuity'.
Yathā vimuttaṃ cittaṃ paccavekkhati.

In the 'Introduction' to the commentary to Dīgha Nikāya, known as the Sumaṅgalavilāsinī and traditionally attributed to Buddhaghosa, there is the following interesting reference to the 'four discriminations':
Moreover, a bhikkhu well-practised in Vinaya, depending on the attainment of virtue, arrives at the three knowledges… well-practised in Sutta, depending on the attainment of concentration, he arrives at the six higher knowledges… well-practised in Abhidhamma, depending on the attainment of wisdom, he arrives at the four discriminations…
vinaye pana suppaṭipanno bhikkhu sīlasampadaṃ nissāya tisso vijjā pāpuṇāti… sutte suppaṭipanno samādhisampadaṃ nissāya cha abhiññā pāpuṇāti… abhidhamme suppaṭipanno paññāsampadaṃ nissāya catasso paṭisambhidā pāpuṇāti… 
From this we see that the commentator believed that the 'four discriminations' were the result of mastery of the Abhidhamma, and that the Abhidhamma is associated with the development of wisdom.
However, given that the attainment of the four paṭisambidhā is mentioned here in this sutta, it follows that the paṭisambidhā cannot be a result of a mastery of the Abhidhamma, because the Abhidhamma did not even exist at the time of the compilation of the suttas.
We know this even according to the traditional evidence, from the reports of the First and Second Councils contained in the last two sections of the Cullavagga, the second part of the Khandhaka in the Vinaya Piṭaka.
In the report of the First Council therein, only the Vinaya and the Dhamma are mentioned: “Come, friends, let us chant the Dhamma and the Vinaya…”.
Venerable Mahākassapa questions Venerable Upāli concerning the contexts of the Vinaya; and then he questions the Venerable Ānanda concerning the contexts of the Suttas, starting with the Brahmajāla, then the Sāmaññaphala.
“In this way, he asked about the five Nikāyas; questioned consecutively, Venerable Ānanda answered.”.
Again, in the report of the Second Council, said in the text itself to have taken place one hundred years after the Buddha's Parinibbāna, the resolution of the dispute between the two groups of monks depends upon a sound knowledge of the Vinaya and the Dhamma.
Thus, for example: “The Venerable Elder has learned much Dhamma and Vinaya at the feet of his spiritual teacher.
When the Venerable Elder is reflecting upon the Dhamma and Vinaya, how is it?” The Venerable Revata, to whom this passage refers, is earlier described as “very learned, one to whom the āgama has been handed down, a bearer of the Dhamma, the Vinaya, the mātikā, intelligent, accomplished, wise, modest, meticulous, anxious to observe the discipline Here, the word mātikā, 'matrices, codes', most probably refers to the rules of the Pātimokkha-sutta: rules for monks and rules for nuns.
On this matter, see O.
von Hinüber, A Handbook of Pāli Literature, § and §.
See also Bhikkhus Bodhi and Ñāṇamoli, The Middle Length Discourses of the Buddha, p., n.: “The Codes are probably the rules of the Pātimokkha abstracted from their explanatory matrix, as well as lists of the primary doctrinal categories used for expounding the Dhamma.” Again, see also F.
Watanabe, Philosophy and its Development in the Nikāyas and Abhidhamma, p.:
This is clearly the earliest usage and meaning of the word mātikā, as it is found in the Vinaya and Suttas.
From such indications we may conclude that it was fundamentally anachronistic of the commentator to suppose that the paṭisambhidā were attainments resulting from a mastery of the much later Abhidhamma literature; for, the latter simply did not exist at the time of the learning, compilation and original transmission of the Suttas.
Now, in this present sutta, we find very specific reference made to five qualities: that is, the four paṭisambidhā in conjunction with what we must evidently take to be the fifth quality in question: “yathāvimuttaṃ cittaṃ paccavekkhati”, “he reflects upon mind as liberated”.
It is probable that this fifth quality is the crucial one, and that, without it, the four other qualities would by no means produce the result which is the theme of the sutta, i.e., “nacirasseva akuppaṃ paṭivijjhati”, “in no long time he penetrates and intuits the Unshakeable”.
Then a certain monk went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “'One who dwells in the Dhamma, one who dwells in the Dhamma': thus it is said, lord.
To what extent is a bhikkhu one who dwells in the Dhamma?
“Monk, there is the case where a monk studies the Dhamma: dialogues, narratives of mixed prose and verse, explanations, verses, spontaneous exclamations, quotations, birth stories, amazing events, question & answer sessions.
He spends the day in Dhamma-study.
He neglects seclusion.
He doesn't commit himself to internal tranquillity of awareness.
This is called a monk who is keen on study, not one who dwells in the Dhamma.
“Then there is the case where a monk takes the Dhamma as he has heard & studied it and teaches it in full detail to others.
He spends the day in Dhamma-description.
He neglects seclusion.
He doesn't commit himself to internal tranquillity of awareness.
This is called a monk who is keen on description, not one who dwells in the Dhamma.
“Then there is the case where a monk takes the Dhamma as he has heard & studied it and recites it in full detail.
He spends the day in Dhamma-recitation.
He neglects seclusion.
He doesn't commit himself to internal tranquillity of awareness.
This is called a monk who is keen on recitation, not one who dwells in the Dhamma.
“Then there is the case where a monk takes the Dhamma as he has heard & studied it and thinks about it, evaluates it, and examines it with his intellect.
He spends the day in Dhamma-thinking.
He neglects seclusion.
He doesn't commit himself to internal tranquillity of awareness.
This is called a monk who is keen on thinking, not one who dwells in the Dhamma.
“Then there is the case where a monk studies the Dhamma: dialogues, narratives of mixed prose and verse, explanations, verses, spontaneous exclamations, quotations, birth stories, amazing events, question & answer sessions.
He doesn't spend the day in Dhamma-study.
He doesn't neglect seclusion.
He commits himself to internal tranquillity of awareness.
This is called a monk who dwells in the Dhamma.
“Now, monk, I have taught you the person who is keen on study, the one who is keen on description, the one who is keen on recitation, the one who is keen on thinking, and the one who dwells in the Dhamma.
Whatever a teacher should do — seeking the welfare of his disciples, out of sympathy for them — that have I done for you.
Over there are the roots of trees; over there, empty dwellings.
Practice jhana, monk.
Don't be heedless.
Don't later fall into regret.
This is our message to you.
See also: AN.
“Monks, these five future dangers are just enough, when considered, for a monk living in the wilderness — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
Which five?
“There is the case where a monk living in the wilderness reminds himself of this: I am now living alone in the wilderness.
While I am living alone in the wilderness a snake might bite me, a scorpion might sting me, a centipede might bite me.
That would be how my death would come about.
That would be an obstruction for me.
So let me make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“This is the first future danger that is just enough, when considered, for a monk living in the wilderness — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Furthermore, the monk living in the wilderness reminds himself of this: I am now living alone in the wilderness.
While I am living alone in the wilderness, stumbling, I might fall; my food, digested, might trouble me; my bile might be provoked, my phlegm… piercing wind forces might be provoked.
That would be how my death would come about.
That would be an obstruction for me.
So let me make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“This is the second future danger that is just enough, when considered, for a monk living in the wilderness — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Furthermore, the monk living in the wilderness reminds himself of this: I am now living alone in the wilderness.
While I am living alone in the wilderness, I might meet up with vicious beasts: a lion or a tiger or a leopard or a bear or a hyena.
They might take my life.
That would be how my death would come about.
That would be an obstruction for me.
So let me make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“This is the third future danger that is just enough, when considered, for a monk living in the wilderness — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Furthermore, the monk living in the wilderness reminds himself of this: I am now living alone in the wilderness.
While I am living alone in the wilderness, I might meet up with youths on their way to committing a crime or on their way back.
They might take my life.
That would be how my death would come about.
That would be an obstruction for me.
So let me make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“This is the fourth future danger that is just enough, when considered, for a monk living in the wilderness — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“Furthermore, the monk living in the wilderness reminds himself of this: I am now living alone in the wilderness.
And in the wilderness are vicious non-human beings.
They might take my life.
That would be how my death would come about.
That would be an obstruction for me.
So let me make an effort for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“This is the fifth future danger that is just enough, when considered, for a monk living in the wilderness — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
“These are the five future dangers that are just enough, when considered, for a monk living in the wilderness — heedful, ardent, and resolute — to live for the attaining of the as-yet-unattained, the reaching of the as-yet-unreached, the realization of the as-yet-unrealized.
See also: AN.; AN.; AN.
“A female disciple of the noble ones who grows in terms of these five types of growth grows in the noble growth, grasps hold of what is essential, what is excellent in the body.
Which five?
She grows in terms of conviction, in terms of virtue, in terms of learning, in terms of generosity, in terms of discernment.
Growing in terms of these five types of growth, the female disciple of the noble ones grows in the noble growth, grasps hold of what is essential, what is excellent in the body.”
“These are the five factors for exertion.
Which five?
“There is the case where a monk has conviction, is convinced of the Tathagata's Awakening: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is pure & rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.'
“He is free from illness & discomfort, endowed with good digestion — not too cold, not too hot, of moderate strength — fit for exertion.
“He is neither fraudulent nor deceitful.
He declares himself to the Teacher or to his wise friends in the holy life in line with what he actually is.
“He keeps his energy aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and taking on skillful mental qualities.
He is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
“He is discerning, endowed with discernment leading to the arising of the goal — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
“These are the five factors for exertion.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Savatthi, in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's Monastery.
There he addressed the monks, “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks replied to the Blessed One.
The Blessed One said: “These five are obstacles, hindrances that overwhelm awareness and weaken discernment.
Which five?
“Sensual desire is an obstacle, a hindrance that overwhelms awareness and weakens discernment.
Ill will… Sloth & drowsiness… Restlessness & anxiety… Uncertainty is an obstacle, a hindrance that overwhelms awareness and weakens discernment.
These are the five obstacles, hindrances that overwhelm awareness and weaken discernment.
And when a monk has not abandoned these five obstacles, hindrances that overwhelm awareness and weaken discernment, when he is without strength and weak in discernment: for him to understand what is for his own benefit, to understand what is for the benefit of others, to understand what is for the benefit of both, to realize a superior human state, a truly noble distinction in knowledge & vision: that is impossible.
“Suppose there were a river, flowing down from the mountains — going far, its current swift, carrying everything with it — and a man would open channels leading away from it on both sides, so that the current in the middle of the river would be dispersed, diffused, & dissipated; it wouldn't go far, its current wouldn't be swift, and it wouldn't carry everything with it.
In the same way, when a monk has not abandoned these five obstacles, hindrances that overwhelm awareness and weaken discernment, when he is without strength and weak in discernment for him to understand what is for his own benefit, to understand what is for the benefit of others, to understand what is for the benefit of both, to realize a superior human state, a truly noble distinction in knowledge & vision: that is impossible.
“Now, when a monk has abandoned these five obstacles, hindrances that overwhelm awareness and weaken discernment, when he is strong in discernment: for him to understand what is for his own benefit, to understand what is for the benefit of others, to understand what is for the benefit of both, to realize a superior human state, a truly noble distinction in knowledge & vision: that is possible.
“Suppose there were a river, flowing down from the mountains — going far, its current swift, carrying everything with it — and a man would close the channels leading away from it on both sides, so that the current in the middle of the river would be undispersed, undiffused, & undissipated; it would go far, its current swift, carrying everything with it.
In the same way, when a monk has abandoned these five obstacles, hindrances that overwhelm awareness and weaken discernment, when he is strong in discernment: for him to understand what is for his own benefit, to understand what is for the benefit of others, to understand what is for the benefit of both, to realize a superior human state, a truly noble distinction in knowledge & vision: that is possible.”
Translator's note: This discourse gives the Buddha's recommendations for how to deal with grief.
The passage discussing eulogies, chants, etc., is a reference to funeral customs designed to channel the feelings of the bereaved in a productive direction.
As the Buddha notes, as long as these seem to be serving a purpose, engage in them.
Once they no longer seem to be serving a purpose, and one finds that one is indulging in grief, one should return to the important duties of one's life.
Once the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then King Pasenadi the Kosalan went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
Now, at that time Queen Mallika died.
Then a certain man went to the king and whispered in his ear: “Your majesty, Queen Mallika has died.” When this was said, King Pasenadi the Kosalan sat there miserable, sick at heart, his shoulders drooping, his face down, brooding, at a loss for words.
Then the Blessed One saw the king sitting there miserable, sick at heart… at a loss for words, and so said to him, “There are these five things, great king, that cannot be gotten by a contemplative, a brahman, a deva, a Mara, a Brahma, or anyone at all in the world.
Which five?
“'May what is subject to aging not age.' This is something that cannot be gotten by a contemplative, a brahman, a deva, a Mara, a Brahma, or anyone at all in the world.
“'May what is subject to illness not grow ill.' This is something that cannot be gotten by a contemplative, a brahman, a deva, a Mara, a Brahma, or anyone at all in the world.
“'May what is subject to death not die.' This is something that cannot be gotten by a contemplative, a brahman, a deva, a Mara, a Brahma, or anyone at all in the world.
“'May what is subject to ending not end.' This is something that cannot be gotten by a contemplative, a brahman, a deva, a Mara, a Brahma, or anyone at all in the world.
“'May what is subject to destruction not be destroyed.' This is something that cannot be gotten by a contemplative, a brahman, a deva, a Mara, a Brahma, or anyone at all in the world.
“Now, it happens to an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person that something that is subject to aging ages.
With the aging of what is subject to aging, he does not reflect: 'It doesn't happen only to me that what is subject to aging will age.
To the extent that there are beings — past & future, passing away & re-arising — it happens to all of them that what is subject to aging will age.
And if, with the aging of what is subject to aging, I were to sorrow, grieve, lament, beat my breast, & become distraught, food would not agree with me, my body would become unattractive, my affairs would go untended, my enemies would be gratified and my friends unhappy.' So, with the aging of what is subject to aging, he sorrows, grieves, laments, beats his breast, & becomes distraught.
This is called an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person pierced by the poisoned arrow of sorrow, tormenting himself.
“Furthermore, it happens to an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person that something that is subject to illness grows ill… that something subject to death dies… that something subject to ending ends… that something subject to destruction is destroyed.
With the destruction of what is subject to destruction, he does not reflect: 'It doesn't happen only to me that what is subject to destruction will be destroyed.
To the extent that there are beings — past & future, passing away & re-arising — it happens to all of them that what is subject to destruction will be destroyed.
And if, with the destruction of what is subject to destruction, I were to sorrow, grieve, lament, beat my breast, & become distraught, food would not agree with me, my body would become unattractive, my affairs would go untended, my enemies would be gratified and my friends unhappy.' So, with the destruction of what is subject to destruction, he sorrows, grieves, laments, beats his breast, & becomes distraught.
This is called an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person pierced by the poisoned arrow of sorrow, tormenting himself.
“Now, it happens to a well-instructed disciple of the noble ones that something that is subject to aging ages.
With the aging of what is subject to aging, he reflects: 'It doesn't happen only to me that what is subject to aging will age.
To the extent that there are beings — past & future, passing away & re-arising — it happens to all of them that what is subject to aging will age.
And if, with the aging of what is subject to aging, I were to sorrow, grieve, lament, beat my breast, & become distraught, food would not agree with me, my body would become unattractive, my affairs would go untended, my enemies would be gratified and my friends unhappy.' So, with the aging of what is subject to aging, he does not sorrow, grieve, or lament, does not beat his breast or become distraught.
This is called a well-instructed disciple of the noble ones who has pulled out the poisoned arrow of sorrow pierced with which the uninstructed run-of-the-mill person torments himself.
Sorrowless, arrowless, the disciple of the noble ones is totally unbound right within himself.
“Furthermore, it happens to a well-instructed disciple of the noble ones that something that is subject to illness grows ill… that something subject to death dies… that something subject to ending ends… that something subject to destruction is destroyed.
With the destruction of what is subject to destruction, he reflects: 'It doesn't happen only to me that what is subject to destruction will be destroyed.
To the extent that there are beings — past & future, passing away & re-arising — it happens to all of them that what is subject to destruction will be destroyed.
And if, with the destruction of what is subject to destruction, I were to sorrow, grieve, lament, beat my breast, & become distraught, food would not agree with me, my body would become unattractive, my affairs would go untended, my enemies would be gratified and my friends unhappy.' So, with the destruction of what is subject to destruction, he does not sorrow, grieve, or lament, does not beat his breast or become distraught.
This is called a well-instructed disciple of the noble ones who has pulled out the poisoned arrow of sorrow pierced with which the uninstructed run-of-the-mill person torments himself.
Sorrowless, arrowless, the disciple of the noble ones is totally unbound right within himself.
“These are the five things, great king, that cannot be gotten by a contemplative, a brahman, a deva, a Mara, a Brahma, or anyone at all in the world.”
“For a lay person, there are these five rewards of conviction.
Which five?
“When the truly good people in the world show compassion, they will first show compassion to people of conviction, and not to people without conviction.
When visiting, they first visit people of conviction, and not people without conviction.
When accepting gifts, they will first accept those from people with conviction, and not from people without conviction.
When teaching the Dhamma, they will first teach those with conviction, and not those without conviction.
A person of conviction, on the break-up of the body, after death, will arise in a good destination, the heavenly world.
For a lay person, these are the five rewards of conviction.
“Just as a large banyan tree, on level ground where four roads meet, is a haven for the birds all around, even so a lay person of conviction is a haven for many people: monks, nuns, male lay followers, & female lay followers.”
Then Anathapindika the householder went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the Blessed One said to him: “These five things, householder, are welcome, agreeable, pleasant, & hard to obtain in the world.
Which five?
“Long life is welcome, agreeable, pleasant, & hard to obtain in the world.
“Beauty is welcome, agreeable, pleasant, & hard to obtain in the world.
“Happiness is welcome, agreeable, pleasant, & hard to obtain in the world.
“Status is welcome, agreeable, pleasant, & hard to obtain in the world.
“Rebirth in heaven is welcome, agreeable, pleasant, & hard to obtain in the world.
“Now, I tell you, these five things are not to be obtained by reason of prayers or wishes.
If they were to be obtained by reason of prayers or wishes, who here would lack them?
It's not fitting for the disciple of the noble ones who desires long life to pray for it or to delight in doing so.
Instead, the disciple of the noble ones who desires long life should follow the path of practice leading to long life.
In so doing, he will attain long life, either human or divine.
“It's not fitting for the disciple of the noble ones who desires beauty to pray for it or to delight in doing so.
Instead, the disciple of the noble ones who desires beauty should follow the path of practice leading to beauty.
In so doing, he will attain beauty, either human or divine.
“It's not fitting for the disciple of the noble ones who desires happiness to pray for it or to delight in doing so.
Instead, the disciple of the noble ones who desires happiness should follow the path of practice leading to happiness.
In so doing, he will attain happiness, either human or divine.
“It's not fitting for the disciple of the noble ones who desires status to pray for it or to delight in doing so.
Instead, the disciple of the noble ones who desires status should follow the path of practice leading to status.
In so doing, he will attain status, either human or divine.
“It's not fitting for the disciple of the noble ones who desires rebirth in heaven to pray for it or to delight in doing so.
Instead, the disciple of the noble ones who desires rebirth in heaven should follow the path of practice leading to rebirth in heaven.
In so doing, he will attain rebirth in heaven.”
At one time the Lord was staying near Savatthi at Jeta Grove, Anathapindika's Monastery.
Then King Pasenadi of Kosala approached the Lord and having done so, paid his respects and sat down nearby.
Now at that time Queen Mallika died.
A certain man then approached the King and whispered in his ear: “Your Majesty, Queen Mallika has died.” At those words king Pasenadi was filled with grief and depression, and with shoulders drooping, head down, he sat glum, and with nothing to say.
The Lord saw the king sitting there like that and spoke to him in this way:
“Great king, there are these five circumstances not-to-be-got by monk, brahman, deva, Mara, Brahma, or by anyone in the world.
What are the five?
“That what is of the nature to decay may not decay, is a circumstance not-to-be-got by a monk… or by anyone in the world.
That what is of the nature to be diseased may not be diseased, is a circumstance not-to-be-got by a monk… or by anyone in the world.
“That what is of the nature to die may not die, is a circumstance not-to-be-got by a monk… or by anyone in the world.
“That what is of the nature to be exhausted may not be exhausted, is a circumstance not-to-be-got by a monk… or by anyone in the world.
“That what is of the nature to be destroyed may not be destroyed, is a circumstance, not-to-be-got by a monk… or by anyone in the world.
“Great king, for an uninstructed ordinary person what is of the nature to decay does decay, what is of the nature to be diseased does become diseased, what is of the nature to die does die, what is of the nature to be exhausted is exhausted and what is of the nature to be destroyed is destroyed — and when these things happen to him he does not reflect, “It's not only for me that what is of the nature to decay decays… that what is of the nature to be destroyed is destroyed, but wherever there are beings, coming and going, dying and being born, for all those beings what is of the nature to decay decays… what is of the nature to be destroyed is destroyed, and if I, when there is decay in what is of the nature to decay… when there is destruction in what is of the nature to be destroyed, should grieve, pine, and lament, and crying beat the breast and so fall into delusion, food would not be enjoyed, my body would become haggard, work would not be done and enemies would be pleased, while friends would be depressed.
Then, when there is decay in what is of the nature to decay, disease in what is of the nature to be diseased, death in what is of the nature to die, exhaustion in what is of the nature to be exhausted, destruction in what is of the nature to be destroyed, he grieves, pines and laments, and crying beats his breast and so falls into delusion.
“This is called an uninstructed ordinary person; pierced by the poisoned dart of grief, he just torments himself.
Great king, for the instructed Noble Disciple what is of the nature to decay does decay… and what is of the nature to be destroyed is destroyed… and when these things happen to him he does reflect, “It's not only for me that what is of the nature to decay decays… that what is of the nature to be destroyed, is destroyed, but wherever there are beings, coming and going, dying and being born, for all those beings what is of the nature to decay decays… what is of the nature to be destroyed is destroyed, and if I, when there is decay in what is of the nature to decay… when there is destruction in what is of the nature to be destroyed, should grieve, pine and lament, and crying beat the breast and so fall into delusion, food would not be enjoyed, my body would become haggard, work would not be done and enemies would be pleased while friends would be depressed.
Then when there is decay in what is of the nature to decay, disease in what is of the nature to be diseased, death in what is of the nature to die, exhaustion in what is of the nature to be exhausted, destruction in what is of the nature to be destroyed, he does not grieve or pine or lament, he does not beat his breast and fall into delusion.
“This is called an instructed Noble Disciple.
Drawn out is the poisoned dart of grief with which the uninstructed ordinary person torments himself.
Free of grief, free from the dart, the Noble Disciple has quenched himself completely.
“Great king, these are the five circumstances not-to-be-got by monk, brahman, deva, Mara, Brahma, or by anyone in the world.”
Then Anathapindika the householder went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the Blessed One said to him: “There are these five benefits that can be obtained from wealth.
Which five?
“There is the case where the disciple of the noble ones — using the wealth earned through his efforts & enterprise, amassed through the strength of his arm, and piled up through the sweat of his brow, righteous wealth righteously gained — provides himself with pleasure & satisfaction, and maintains that pleasure rightly.
He provides his mother & father with pleasure & satisfaction, and maintains that pleasure rightly.
He provides his children, his wife, his slaves, servants, & assistants with pleasure & satisfaction, and maintains that pleasure rightly.
This is the first benefit that can be obtained from wealth.
“Furthermore, the disciple of the noble ones — using the wealth earned through his efforts & enterprise, amassed through the strength of his arm, and piled up through the sweat of his brow, righteous wealth righteously gained — provides his friends & associates with pleasure & satisfaction, and maintains that pleasure rightly.
This is the second benefit that can be obtained from wealth.
“Furthermore, the disciple of the noble ones — using the wealth earned through his efforts & enterprise, amassed through the strength of his arm, and piled up through the sweat of his brow, righteous wealth righteously gained — wards off calamities coming from fire, flood, kings, thieves, or hateful heirs, and keeps himself safe.
This is the third benefit that can be obtained from wealth.
“Furthermore, the disciple of the noble ones — using the wealth earned through his efforts & enterprise, amassed through the strength of his arm, and piled up through the sweat of his brow, righteous wealth righteously gained — performs the five oblations: to relatives, guests, the dead, kings, & devas.
This is the fourth benefit that can be obtained from wealth.
“Furthermore, the disciple of the noble ones — using the wealth earned through his efforts & enterprise, amassed through the strength of his arm, and piled up through the sweat of his brow, righteous wealth righteously gained — institutes offerings of supreme aim, heavenly, resulting in happiness, leading to heaven, given to brahmans & contemplatives who abstain from intoxication & heedlessness, who endure all things with patience & humility, each taming himself, each restraining himself, each taking himself to Unbinding.
This is the fifth benefit that can be obtained from wealth.
“If it so happens that, when a disciple of the noble ones obtains these five benefits from wealth, his wealth goes to depletion, the thought occurs to him, 'Even though my wealth has gone to depletion, I have obtained the five benefits that can be obtained from wealth,' and he feels no remorse.
If it so happens that, when a disciple of the noble ones obtains these five benefits from wealth, his wealth increases, the thought occurs to him, 'I have obtained the five benefits that can be obtained from wealth, and my wealth has increased,' and he feels no remorse.
So he feels no remorse in either case.”
“In giving a meal, the donor gives five things to the recipient.
Which five?
He/she gives life, beauty, happiness, strength, & quick-wittedness.
Having given life, he/she has a share in long life, either human or divine.
Having given beauty, he/she has a share in beauty, either human or divine.
Having given happiness, he/she has a share in happiness, either human or divine.
Having given strength, he/she has a share in strength, either human or divine.
Having given quick-wittedness, he/she has a share in quick-wittedness, either human or divine.
In giving a meal, the donor gives these five things to the recipient.”
“There are these five seasonable gifts.
Which five?
One gives to a newcomer.
One gives to one going away.
One gives to one who is ill.
One gives in time of famine.
One sets the first fruits of field & orchard in front of those who are virtuous.
These are the five seasonable gifts.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Vesali, in the Great Forest, at the Gabled Pavilion.
Then General Siha went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “Is it possible, lord, to point out a fruit of generosity visible in the here & now?
“It is possible, Siha.
One who gives, who is a master of giving, is dear & charming to people at large.
And the fact that who is generous, a master of giving, is dear & charming to people at large: this is a fruit of generosity visible in the here & now.
“Furthermore, good people, people of integrity, admire one who gives, who is a master of giving.
And the fact that good people, people of integrity, admire one who gives, who is a master of giving: this, too, is a fruit of generosity visible in the here & now.
“Furthermore, the fine reputation of one who gives, who is a master of giving, is spread far & wide.
And the fact that the fine reputation of one who gives, who is a master of giving, is spread far & wide: this, too, is a fruit of generosity visible in the here & now.
“Furthermore, when one who gives, who is a master of giving, approaches any assembly of people — noble warriors, brahmans, householders, or contemplatives — he/she does so confidently & without embarrassment.
And the fact that when one who gives, who is a master of giving, approaches any assembly of people — noble warriors, brahmans, householders, or contemplatives — he/she does so confidently & without embarrassment: this, too, is a fruit of generosity visible in the here & now.
“Furthermore, at the break-up of the body, after death, one who gives, who is a master of giving, reappears in a good destination, the heavenly world.
And the fact that at the break-up of the body, after death, one who gives, who is a master of giving, reappears in a good destination, the heavenly world: this is a fruit of generosity in the next life.
When this was said, General Siha said to the Blessed One: “As for the four fruits of generosity visible in the here & now that have been pointed out by the Blessed One, it's not the case that I go by conviction in the Blessed One with regard to them.
I know them, too.
I am one who gives, a master of giving, dear & charming to people at large.
I am one who gives, a master of giving; good people, people of integrity, admire me.
I am one who gives, a master of giving, and my fine reputation is spread far & wide: 'Siha is generous, a doer, a supporter of the Sangha.' I am one who gives, a master of giving, and when I approach any assembly of people — noble warriors, brahmans, householders, or contemplatives — I do so confidently & without embarrassment.
“But when the Blessed One says to me, 'At the break-up of the body, after death, one who gives, who is a master of giving, reappears in a good destination, the heavenly world,' that I do not know.
That is where I go by conviction in the Blessed One.
“So it is, Siha.
So it is.
At the break-up of the body, after death, one who gives, who is a master of giving, reappears in a good destination, the heavenly world.
See also: AN..
Translator's note: The frame story here is common to three suttas: AN., AN., and AN..
Although the conversation takes a different turn in each case, in all three cases the Buddha takes the opportunity to teach some unusually plain-spoken truths.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One, on a wandering tour among the Kosalans with a large community of monks, arrived at a Kosalan brahman village named Icchanangala.
There he stayed in the Icchanangala forest grove.
The brahman householders of Icchanangala heard it said, “Gotama the contemplative — the son of the Sakyans, having gone forth from the Sakyan clan — on a wandering tour among the Kosalans with a large community of monks — has arrived at Icchanangala and is staying in the Icchanangala forest grove.
And of that Master Gotama this fine reputation has spread: 'He is indeed a Blessed One, worthy, & rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, a knower of the cosmos, an unexcelled trainer of those persons ready to be tamed, teacher of human & divine beings, awakened, blessed.
He has made known — having realized it through direct knowledge — this world with its devas, maras, & brahmas, its generations with their contemplatives & brahmans, their rulers & common people; has explained the Dhamma admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, admirable in the end; has expounded the holy life both in its particulars & in its essence, entirely perfect, surpassingly pure.
It is good to see such a worthy one.' So the brahman householders of Icchanangala, when the night was gone, taking many staple & non-staple foods, went to the gate house of the Icchanangala forest grove.
On arrival they stood there making a loud racket, a great racket.
Now at that time Ven.
Nagita was the Blessed One's attendant.
So the Blessed One addressed Ven.
Nagita: “Nagita, what is that loud racket, that great racket, like fishermen with a catch of fish?
“Lord, those are the brahman householders of Icchanangala standing at the gate house to the Icchanangala forest grove, having brought many staple & non-staple foods for the sake of the Blessed One & the community of monks.
“May I have nothing to do with honor, Nagita, and honor nothing to do with me.
Whoever cannot obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — as I do, the pleasure of renunciation, the pleasure of seclusion, the pleasure of peace, the pleasure of self-awakening, let him consent to this slimy-excrement-pleasure, this torpor-pleasure, this pleasure of gains, offerings, & fame.
“Lord, let the Blessed One acquiesce now!
Let the One Well-gone acquiesce now!
Now is the time for the Blessed One's acquiescence, lord!
Now is the time for the Blessed One's acquiescence, lord!
Wherever the Blessed One will go now, the brahmans of the towns & countryside will be so inclined.
Just as when the rain-devas send rain in fat drops, the waters flow with the incline, in the same way, wherever the Blessed One will go now, the brahmans of the towns & countryside will be so inclined.
Why is that?
Because such is the Blessed One's virtue & discernment.
“May I have nothing to do with honor, Nagita, and honor nothing to do with me.
Whoever cannot obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — as I do, the pleasure of renunciation, the pleasure of seclusion, the pleasure of peace, the pleasure of self-awakening, let him consent to this slimy-excrement-pleasure, this torpor-pleasure, this pleasure of gains, offerings, & fame.
“When one eats & drinks & chews & savors, there is excrement & urine: That is one's reward.
“When one loves, there arises the state of change & aberration, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair: That is one's reward.
“When one is committed to the theme of the unattractive, one takes a stance in the loathsomeness of the theme of beauty: That is one's reward.
“When one remains focused on the inconstancy of the six media of sensory contact, one takes a stance in the loathsomeness of contact: That is one's reward.
“When one remains focused on the arising & passing away of the five clinging aggregates, one takes a stance in the loathsomeness of clinging: That is one's reward.”
These are the five rewards for one who practices walking meditation.
Which five?

He can endure traveling by foot; he can endure exertion; he becomes free from disease; whatever he has eaten & drunk, chewed & savored, becomes well-digested; the concentration he wins while doing walking meditation lasts for a long time.
These are the five rewards for one who practices walking meditation.
Monks, there are these five benefits of walking up & down.
What five?
One is fit for long journeys; one is fit for striving; one has little disease; that which is eaten, drunk, chewed, tasted, goes through proper digestion; the composure attained by walking up & down is long-lasting.
These, monks, are the five benefits of walking up & down.
“Wise & mindful, you should develop immeasurable concentration.
When, wise & mindful, one has developed immeasurable concentration, five realizations arise right within oneself.
Which five?
“The realization arises right within oneself that 'This concentration is blissful in the present and will result in bliss in the future.'
“The realization arises right within oneself that 'This concentration is noble & not connected with the baits of the flesh.'
“The realization arises right within oneself that 'This concentration is not obtained by base people.'
“The realization arises right within oneself that 'This concentration is peaceful, exquisite, the acquiring of serenity, the attainment of unity, not kept in place by the fabrications of forceful restraint.'
“The realization arises right within oneself that 'I enter into this concentration mindfully, and mindfully I emerge from it.'
“Wise & mindful, you should develop immeasurable concentration.
When, wise & mindful, one has developed immeasurable concentration, these five realizations arise right within oneself.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Savatthi, in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks, “Monks, I will teach you the five-factored noble right concentration.
Listen, and pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks replied.
The Blessed One said: “Now what, monks, is five-factored noble right concentration?
There is the case where a monk — quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities — enters and remains in the first jhana: rapture and pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought and evaluation.
He permeates and pervades, suffuses and fills this very body with the rapture and pleasure born from withdrawal.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by rapture and pleasure born from withdrawal.
“Just as if a skilled bathman or bathman's apprentice would pour bath powder into a brass basin and knead it together, sprinkling it again and again with water, so that his ball of bath powder — saturated, moisture-laden, permeated within and without — would nevertheless not drip; even so, the monk permeates, suffuses and fills this very body with the rapture and pleasure born of withdrawal.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by rapture and pleasure born from withdrawal.
This is the first development of the five-factored noble right concentration.
“Furthermore, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters and remains in the second jhana: rapture and pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought and evaluation — internal assurance.
He permeates and pervades, suffuses and fills this very body with the rapture and pleasure born of composure.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by rapture and pleasure born of composure.
“Just like a lake with spring-water welling up from within, having no inflow from east, west, north, or south, and with the skies periodically supplying abundant showers, so that the cool fount of water welling up from within the lake would permeate and pervade, suffuse and fill it with cool waters, there being no part of the lake unpervaded by the cool waters; even so, the monk permeates and pervades, suffuses and fills this very body with the rapture and pleasure born of composure.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by rapture and pleasure born of composure.
This is the second development of the five-factored noble right concentration.
“And furthermore, with the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' He permeates and pervades, suffuses and fills this very body with the pleasure divested of rapture, so that there is nothing of his entire body unpervaded with pleasure divested of rapture.
“Just as in a blue-, white-, or red-lotus pond, there may be some of the blue, white, or red lotuses which, born and growing in the water, stay immersed in the water and flourish without standing up out of the water, so that they are permeated and pervaded, suffused and filled with cool water from their roots to their tips, and nothing of those blue, white, or red lotuses would be unpervaded with cool water; even so, the monk permeates and pervades, suffuses and fills this very body with the pleasure divested of rapture.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded with pleasure divested of rapture.
This is the third development of the five-factored noble right concentration.
“And furthermore, with the abandoning of pleasure and stress — as with the earlier disappearance of elation and distress — he enters and remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity and mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
He sits, permeating the body with a pure, bright awareness, so that there is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by pure, bright awareness.
“Just as if a man were sitting wrapped from head to foot with a white cloth so that there would be no part of his body to which the white cloth did not extend; even so, the monk sits, permeating his body with a pure, bright awareness.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by pure, bright awareness.
This is the fourth development of the five-factored noble right concentration.
“And furthermore, the monk has his theme of reflection well in hand, well attended to, well-considered, well-tuned by means of discernment.
“Just as if one person were to reflect on another, or a standing person were to reflect on a sitting person, or a sitting person were to reflect on a person lying down; even so, monks, the monk has his theme of reflection well in hand, well attended to, well-pondered, well-tuned by means of discernment.
This is the fifth development of the five-factored noble right concentration.
“When a monk has developed and pursued the five-factored noble right concentration in this way, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know and realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.
“Suppose that there were a water jar, set on a stand, brimful of water so that a crow could drink from it.
If a strong man were to tip it in any way at all, would water spill out?
“Yes, lord.
“In the same way, when a monk has developed and pursued the five-factored noble right concentration in this way, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know and realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.
“Suppose there were a rectangular water tank — set on level ground, bounded by dikes — brimful of water so that a crow could drink from it.
If a strong man were to loosen the dikes anywhere at all, would water spill out?
“Yes, lord.
“In the same way, when a monk has developed and pursued the five-factored noble right concentration in this way, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know and realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.
“Suppose there were a chariot on level ground at four crossroads, harnessed to thoroughbreds, waiting with whips lying ready, so that a skilled driver, a trainer of tamable horses, might mount and — taking the reins with his left hand and the whip with his right — drive out and back, to whatever place and by whichever road he liked; in the same way, when a monk has developed and pursued the five-factored noble right concentration in this way, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know and realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.
“If he wants, he wields manifold supranormal powers.
Having been one he becomes many; having been many he becomes one.
He appears.
He vanishes.
He goes unimpeded through walls, ramparts, and mountains as if through space.
He dives in and out of the earth as if it were water.
He walks on water without sinking as if it were dry land.
Sitting crosslegged he flies through the air like a winged bird.
With his hand he touches and strokes even the sun and moon, so mighty and powerful.
He exercises influence with his body even as far as the Brahma worlds.
He can witness this for himself whenever there is an opening.
“If he wants, he hears — by means of the divine ear-element, purified and surpassing the human — both kinds of sounds: divine and human, whether near or far.
He can witness this for himself whenever there is an opening.
“If he wants, he knows the awareness of other beings, other individuals, having encompassed it with his own awareness.
He discerns a mind with passion as a mind with passion, and a mind without passion as a mind without passion.
He discerns a mind with aversion as a mind with aversion, and a mind without aversion as a mind without aversion.
He discerns a mind with delusion as a mind with delusion, and a mind without delusion as a mind without delusion.
He discerns a restricted mind as a restricted mind, and a scattered mind as a scattered mind.
He discerns an enlarged mind as an enlarged mind, and an unenlarged mind as an unenlarged mind.
He discerns an excelled mind as an excelled mind, and an unexcelled mind as an unexcelled mind.
He discerns a concentrated mind as a concentrated mind, and an unconcentrated mind as an unconcentrated mind.
He discerns a released mind as a released mind, and an unreleased mind as an unreleased mind.
He can witness this for himself whenever there is an opening.
“If he wants, he recollects his manifold past lives, i.e., one birth, two births, three births, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, one hundred, one thousand, one hundred thousand, many aeons of cosmic contraction, many aeons of cosmic expansion, many aeons of cosmic contraction and expansion,, 'There I had such a name, belonged to such a clan, had such an appearance.
Such was my food, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such the end of my life.
Passing away from that state, I re-arose there.
There too I had such a name, belonged to such a clan, had such an appearance.
Such was my food, such my experience of pleasure and pain, such the end of my life.
Passing away from that state, I re-arose here.' Thus he remembers his manifold past lives in their modes and details.
He can witness this for himself whenever there is an opening.
“If he wants, he sees — by means of the divine eye, purified and surpassing the human — beings passing away and re-appearing, and he discerns how they are inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate in accordance with their kamma: 'These beings — who were endowed with bad conduct of body, speech, and mind, who reviled the noble ones, held wrong views and undertook actions under the influence of wrong views — with the break-up of the body, after death, have re-appeared in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell.
But these beings — who were endowed with good conduct of body, speech, and mind, who did not revile the noble ones, who held right views and undertook actions under the influence of right views — with the break-up of the body, after death, have re-appeared in the good destinations, in the heavenly world.' Thus — by means of the divine eye, purified and surpassing the human — he sees beings passing away and re-appearing, and he discerns how they are inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, fortunate and unfortunate in accordance with their kamma.
He can witness this for himself whenever there is an opening.
“If he wants, then through the ending of the mental effluents, he remains in the effluent-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having known and made them manifest for himself right in the here and now.
He can witness this for himself whenever there is an opening.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted in the Blessed One's words.
“Monks, when right view is supported by five factors, it has awareness-release as its fruit, awareness-release as its reward; it has discernment-release as its fruit, discernment-release as its reward.
Which five?
“There is the case where right view is supported by virtue, supported by learning, supported by discussion, supported by tranquillity, supported by insight.
“When supported by these five factors, right view has awareness-release as its fruit, awareness-release as its reward; it has discernment-release as its fruit, discernment-release as its reward.”
“A monk endowed with five qualities practices both for his own benefit and for that of others.
Which five?
“There is the case where a monk is himself consummate in virtue and encourages others to be consummate in virtue.
He himself is consummate in concentration and encourages others to be consummate in concentration.
He himself is consummate in discernment and encourages others to be consummate in discernment.
He himself is consummate in release and encourages others to be consummate in release.
He himself is consummate in the knowledge & vision of release and encourages others to be consummate in the knowledge & vision of release.
“Endowed with these five qualities, a monk practices both for his own benefit and for that of others.
“Monks, there are these five strengths for one in training.
Which five?
Strength of conviction, strength of conscience, strength of concern, strength of persistence, & strength of discernment.
“And what is strength of conviction?
There is the case where a monk, a disciple of the noble ones, has conviction, is convinced of the Tathagata's Awakening: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy and rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.' This, monks, is called the strength of conviction.
“And what is the strength of conscience?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones feels shame at bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, mental misconduct.
This is called the strength of conscience.
“And what is the strength of concern?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones feels concern for bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, mental misconduct.
This is called the strength of concern.
“And what is the strength of persistence?
There is the case where a monk, a disciple of the noble ones, keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful mental qualities and taking on skillful mental qualities.
He is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful mental qualities.
This is called the strength of persistence.
“And what is the strength of discernment?
There is the case where a monk, a disciple of the noble ones, is discerning, endowed with discernment of arising & passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
This is called the strength of discernment.
“These, monks, are the five strengths of one in training.
Thus you should train yourselves, 'We will be endowed with the strength of conviction that is the strength of one in training; with the strength of conscience… the strength of concern… the strength of persistence… the strength of discernment that is the strength of one in training.' That's how you should train yourselves.”
“Endowed with four qualities, a monk isn't fit to stay in isolated forest & wilderness dwellings.
Which four?
with thoughts of sensuality, with thoughts of ill will, with thoughts of harmfulness, and he is a person of weak discernment, dull, a drooling idiot.
Endowed with these four qualities, a monk isn't fit to stay in isolated forest & wilderness dwellings.
“Endowed with four qualities, a monk is fit to stay in isolated forest & wilderness dwellings.
Which four?
with thoughts of renunciation, with thoughts of non-ill will, with thoughts of harmlessness, and he is a discerning person, not dull, not a drooling idiot.
Endowed with these four qualities, a monk is fit to stay in isolated forest & wilderness dwellings.”
“In every case where a family cannot hold onto its great wealth for long, it is for one or another of these four reasons.
Which four?
They don't look for things that are lost.
They don't repair things that have gotten old.
They are immoderate in consuming food and drink.
They place a woman or man of no virtue or principles in the position of authority.
In every case where a family cannot hold onto its great wealth for long, it is for one or another of these four reasons.
“In every case where a family can hold onto its great wealth for long, it is for one or another of these four reasons.
Which four?
They look for things that are lost.
They repair things that have gotten old.
They are moderate in consuming food and drink.
They place a virtuous, principled woman or man in the position of authority.
In every case where a family can hold onto its great wealth for long, it is for one or another of these four reasons.” 
“Monks, these four are ignoble searches.
Which four?
There is the case where a person, being subject himself to aging, seeks what is subject to aging.
Being subject himself to illness, he seeks what is subject to illness.
Being subject himself to death, he seeks what is subject to death.
Being subject himself to defilement, he seeks what is subject to defilement.
These are four ignoble searches.
“Now, these four are noble searches.
Which four?
There is the case where a person, being subject himself to aging, realizing the drawbacks of what is subject to aging, seeks the unaging, unsurpassed rest from the yoke: Unbinding.
Being subject himself to illness, realizing the drawbacks of what is subject to illness, he seeks the unailing, unsurpassed rest from the yoke: Unbinding.
Being subject himself to death, realizing the drawbacks of what is subject to death, he seeks the undying, unsurpassed rest from the yoke: Unbinding.
Being subject himself to defilement, realizing the drawbacks of what is subject to defilement, he seeks the undefiled, unsurpassed rest from the yoke: Unbinding.
“These are four noble searches.” 
“Monks, these four types of kamma have been directly realized, verified, & made known by me.
Which four?
There is kamma that is dark with dark result.
There is kamma that is bright with bright result.
There is kamma that is dark & bright with dark & bright result.
There is kamma that is neither dark nor bright with neither dark nor bright result, leading to the ending of kamma.
“And what is kamma that is dark with dark result?
There is the case where a certain person fabricates an injurious bodily fabrication, fabricates an injurious verbal fabrication, fabricates an injurious mental fabrication.
Having fabricated an injurious bodily fabrication, having fabricated an injurious verbal fabrication, having fabricated an injurious mental fabrication, he rearises in an injurious world.
On rearising in an injurious world, he is there touched by injurious contacts.
Touched by injurious contacts, he experiences feelings that are exclusively painful, like those of the beings in hell.
This is called kamma that is dark with dark result.
“And what is kamma that is bright with bright result?
There is the case where a certain person fabricates a non-injurious bodily fabrication… a non-injurious verbal fabrication… a non-injurious mental fabrication… He rearises in a non-injurious world… There he is touched by non-injurious contacts… He experiences feelings that are exclusively pleasant, like those of the Beautiful Black Devas.
This is called kamma that is bright with bright result.
“And what is kamma that is dark & bright with dark & bright result?
There is the case where a certain person fabricates a bodily fabrication that is injurious & non-injurious… a verbal fabrication that is injurious & non-injurious… a mental fabrication that is injurious & non-injurious… He rearises in an injurious & non-injurious world… There he is touched by injurious & non-injurious contacts… He experiences injurious & non-injurious feelings, pleasure mingled with pain, like those of human beings, some devas, and some beings in the lower realms.
This is called kamma that is dark & bright with dark & bright result.
“And what is kamma that is neither dark nor bright with neither dark nor bright result, leading to the ending of kamma?
Right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
This is called kamma that is neither dark nor bright with neither dark nor bright result, leading to the ending of kamma.
“These, monks, are the four types of kamma directly realized, verified, & made known by me.”
“Monks, these four things are born.
Which four?
Affection is born of affection.
Aversion is born of affection.
Affection is born of aversion.
Aversion is born of aversion.
“And how is affection born of affection?
There is the case where an individual is pleasing, appealing, & charming to individual.
Others treat that individual as pleasing, appealing, & charming, and the other one thinks, 'This individual is pleasing, appealing, & charming to me.
Others treat this individual as pleasing, appealing, & charming.' He gives rise to affection for them.
This is how affection is born of affection.
“And how is aversion born of affection?
There is the case where an individual is pleasing, appealing, & charming to individual.
Others treat that individual as displeasing, unappealing, & not charming, and the other one thinks, 'This individual is pleasing, appealing, & charming to me.
Others treat this individual as displeasing, unappealing, & not charming.' He gives rise to aversion for them.
This is how aversion is born of affection.
“And how is affection born of aversion?
There is the case where an individual is displeasing, unappealing, & not charming to individual.
Others treat that individual as displeasing, unappealing, & not charming, and the other one thinks, 'This individual is displeasing, unappealing, & not charming to me.
Others treat this individual as displeasing, unappealing, & not charming.' He gives rise to affection for them.
This is how affection is born of aversion.
“And how is aversion born of aversion?
There is the case where an individual is displeasing, unappealing, & not charming to individual.
Others treat that individual as pleasing, appealing, & charming, and the other one thinks, 'This individual is displeasing, unappealing, & not charming to me.
Others treat this individual as pleasing, appealing, & charming.' He gives rise to aversion for them.
This is how aversion is born of aversion.
“Monks, these are the four things that are born.
“Now, on the occasion when a monk, quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, enters & remains in the first jhana — rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation — then any affection of his that is born of affection does not come about.
Any aversion of his that is born of affection… any affection of his that is born of aversion… any aversion of his that is born of aversion does not come about.
“On the occasion when a monk… enters & remains in the second jhana… enters & remains in the third jhana… enters & remains in the fourth jhana, then any affection of his that is born of affection does not come about.
Any aversion of his that is born of affection… any affection of his that is born of aversion… any aversion of his that is born of aversion does not come about.
“On the occasion when a monk, through the ending of the mental fermentations, enters & remains in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having known & verified them for himself right in the here & now, then any affection of his that is born of affection is abandoned, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
Any aversion of his that is born of affection… any affection of his that is born of aversion… any aversion of his that is born of aversion is abandoned, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
“This is said to be a monk who doesn't pull in, doesn't push away, doesn't smolder, doesn't flare up, and doesn't burn.
“And how does a monk pull in?
There is the case where a monk assumes form to be the self, or the self as possessing form, or form as in the self, or the self as in form.
He assumes feeling to be the self, or the self as possessing feeling, or feeling as in the self, or the self as in feeling.
He assumes perception to be the self, or the self as possessing perception, or perception as in the self, or the self as in perception.
He assumes fabrications to be the self, or the self as possessing fabrications, or fabrications as in the self, or the self as in fabrications.
He assumes consciousness to be the self, or the self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in the self, or the self as in consciousness.
This is how a monk pulls in.
“And how does a monk not pull in?
There is the case where a monk doesn't assume form to be the self, or the self as possessing form, or form as in the self, or the self as in form.
He doesn't assume feeling to be the self… doesn't assume perception to be the self… doesn't assume fabrications to be the self… doesn't assume consciousness to be the self, or the self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in the self, or the self as in consciousness.
This is how a monk doesn't pull in.
“And how does a monk push away?
There is the case where a monk returns insult to one who has insulted him, returns anger to one who is angry at him, quarrels with one who is quarreling.
This is how a monk pushes away.
“And how does a monk not push away?
There is the case where a monk doesn't return insult to one who has insulted him, doesn't return anger to one who is angry at him, doesn't quarrel with one who is quarreling.
This is how a monk doesn't push away.
“And how does a monk smolder?
There is the case where, there being 'I am,' there comes to be 'I am here,' there comes to be 'I am like this'… 'I am otherwise'… 'I am bad'… 'I am good'… 'I might be'… 'I might be here'… 'I might be like this'… 'I might be otherwise'… 'May I be'… 'May I be here'… 'May I be like this'… 'May I be otherwise'… 'I will be'… 'I will be here'… 'I will be like this'… 'I will be otherwise.'
“And how does a monk not smolder?
There is the case where, there not being 'I am,' there doesn't come to be 'I am here,' there doesn't come to be 'I am like this'… 'I am otherwise'… 'I am bad'… 'I am good'… 'I might be'… 'I might be here'… 'I might be like this'… 'I might be otherwise'… 'May I be'… 'May I be here'… 'May I be like this'… 'May I be otherwise'… 'I will be'… 'I will be here'… 'I will be like this'… 'I will be otherwise.'
“And how does a monk flare up?
There is the case where, there being 'I am because of this,' there comes to be 'I am here because of this,' there comes to be 'I am like this because of this'… 'I am otherwise because of this'… 'I am bad because of this'… 'I am good because of this'… 'I might be because of this'… 'I might be here because of this'… 'I might be like this because of this'… 'I might be otherwise because of this'… 'May I be because of this'… 'May I be here because of this'… 'May I be like this because of this'… 'May I be otherwise because of this'… 'I will be because of this'… 'I will be here because of this'… 'I will be like this because of this'… 'I will be otherwise because of this.'
“And how does a monk not flare up?
There is the case where, there not being 'I am because of this,' there doesn't come to be 'I am here because of this,' there doesn't come to be 'I am like this because of this'… 'I am otherwise because of this'… 'I am bad because of this'… 'I am good because of this'… 'I might be because of this'… 'I might be here because of this'… 'I might be like this because of this'… 'I might be otherwise because of this'… 'May I be because of this'… 'May I be here because of this'… 'May I be like this because of this'… 'May I be otherwise because of this'… 'I will be because of this'… 'I will be here because of this'… 'I will be like this because of this'… 'I will be otherwise because of this.'
“And how does a monk burn?
There is the case where a monk's conceit of 'I am' is not abandoned, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
This is how a monk burns.
“And how does a monk not burn?
There is the case where a monk's conceit of 'I am' is abandoned, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
This is how a monk doesn't burn.”
“Monks, this holy life is lived with training as a reward, with discernment as its surpassing state, with release as its heartwood, and with mindfulness as its governing principle.
“And how is training a reward?
There is the case where the training I have formulated for my disciples with regard to good conduct is for the arousing of faith in those without faith, and for the increase of the faithful.
And however I have formulated the training for my disciples with regard to good conduct for the arousing of faith in those without faith, and for the increase of the faithful, one behaves in a way that is untorn in line with that training — unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered.
Having undertaken them, one trains in line with the training rules.
“And further, the training I have formulated for my disciples with regard to the basics of the holy life is entirely for the right ending of suffering & stress.
And however I have formulated the training for my disciples with regard to the basics of the holy life for the right ending of suffering & stress, one behaves in a way that is untorn in line with that training — unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered.
Having undertaken them, one trains in line with the training rules.
“This is how training is a reward.
“And how is discernment the surpassing state?
There is the case where the Dhammas I have pointed out to my disciples are entirely for the right ending of suffering & stress.
And however I have pointed out Dhammas for my disciples entirely for the right ending of suffering & stress, one has scrutinized them all with discernment.
“This is how discernment is the surpassing state.
“And how is release the heartwood?
There is the case where the Dhammas I have pointed out to my disciples are entirely for the right ending of suffering & stress.
And however I have pointed out Dhammas for my disciples entirely for the right ending of suffering & stress, one has touched them all through release.
“This is how release is the heartwood.
“And how is mindfulness the governing principle?
The mindfulness that 'I will make complete any training with regard to good conduct that is not yet complete, or I will protect with discernment any training with regard to good conduct that is complete' is well established right within.
The mindfulness that 'I will make complete any training with regard to the basics of the holy life that is not yet complete, or I will protect with discernment any training with regard to the basics of the holy life that is complete' is well established right within.
The mindfulness that 'I will scrutinize with discernment any Dhamma that is not yet scrutinized, or I will protect with discernment any Dhamma that has been scrutinized' is well established right within.
The mindfulness that 'I will touch through release any Dhamma that is not yet touched, or I will protect with discernment any Dhamma that has been touched' is well established right within.
“This is how mindfulness is the governing principle.
“'Monks, this holy life is lived with training as a reward, with discernment as its surpassing state, with release as its heartwood, and with mindfulness as its governing principle': Thus it was said.
And in reference to this was it said.”
“Monks, I will teach you craving: the ensnarer that has flowed along, spread out, and caught hold, with which this world is smothered & enveloped like a tangled skein, a knotted ball of string, like matted rushes and reeds, and does not go beyond transmigration, beyond the planes of deprivation, woe, & bad destinations.
Listen well, and I will speak.
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said: “And which craving is the ensnarer that has flowed along, spread out, and caught hold, with which this world is smothered & enveloped like a tangled skein, a knotted ball of string, like matted rushes and reeds, and does not go beyond transmigration, beyond the planes of deprivation, woe, & bad destinations?
These craving-verbalizations dependent on what is internal and craving-verbalizations dependent on what is external.
“And which are the craving-verbalizations dependent on what is internal?
There being 'I am,' there comes to be 'I am here,' there comes to be 'I am like this'… 'I am otherwise'… 'I am bad'… 'I am good'… 'I might be'… 'I might be here'… 'I might be like this'… 'I might be otherwise'… 'May I be'… 'May I be here'… 'May I be like this'… 'May I be otherwise'… 'I will be'… 'I will be here'… 'I will be like this'… 'I will be otherwise.' These are the craving-verbalizations dependent on what is internal.
“And which are the craving-verbalizations dependent on what is external?
There being 'I am because of this,' there comes to be 'I am here because of this,' there comes to be 'I am like this because of this'… 'I am otherwise because of this'… 'I am bad because of this'… 'I am good because of this'… 'I might be because of this'… 'I might be here because of this'… 'I might be like this because of this'… 'I might be otherwise because of this'… 'May I be because of this'… 'May I be here because of this'… 'May I be like this because of this'… 'May I be otherwise because of this'… 'I will be because of this'… 'I will be here because of this'… 'I will be like this because of this'… 'I will be otherwise because of this.' These are the craving-verbalizations dependent on what is external.
“Thus there are craving-verbalizations dependent on what is internal and craving-verbalizations dependent on what is external.
These are called the craving-verbalizations.
Thus, with craving-verbalizations of this sort in the past, in the future, and in the present, there are craving-verbalizations.

“This, monks is craving the ensnarer that has flowed along, spread out, and caught hold, with which this world is smothered & enveloped like a tangled skein, a knotted ball of string, like matted rushes and reeds, and does not go beyond transmigration, beyond the planes of deprivation, woe, & bad destinations.
See also: AN..
“Monks, these four traits may be known by means of four traits.
Which four?
“It's through living together that a person's virtue may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“It's through dealing with a person that his purity may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“It's through adversity that a person's endurance may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“It's through discussion that a person's discernment may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“'It's through living together that a person's virtue may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning': Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
“There is the case where one individual, through living with another, knows this: 'For a long time this person has been torn, broken, spotted, splattered in his actions.
He hasn't been consistent in his actions.
He hasn't practiced consistently with regard to the precepts.
He is an unprincipled person, not a virtuous, principled one.' And then there is the case where one individual, through living with another, knows this: 'For a long time this person has been untorn, unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered in his actions.
He has been consistent in his actions.
He has practiced consistently with regard to the precepts.
He is a virtuous, principled person, not an unprincipled one.'
“'It's through living together that a person's virtue may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning': Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'It's through dealing with a person that his purity may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning': Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
“There is the case where one individual, through dealing with another, knows this: 'This person deals one way when one-on-one, another way when with two, another way when with three, another way when with many.
His earlier dealings do not jibe with his later dealings.
He is impure in his dealings, not pure.' And then there is the case where one individual, through dealing with another, knows this: 'The way this person deals when one-on-one, is the same way he deals when with two, when with three, when with many.
His earlier dealings jibe with his later dealings.
He is pure in his dealings, not impure.'
“'It's through dealing with a person that his purity may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning': Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'It's through adversity that a person's endurance may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning': Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
“There is the case where a person, suffering loss of relatives, loss of wealth, or loss through disease, does not reflect: 'That's how it is when living together in the world.
That's how it is when gaining a personal identity.
When there is living in the world, when there is the gaining of a personal identity, these eight worldly conditions spin after the world, and the world spins after these eight worldly conditions: gain, loss, status, disgrace, censure, praise, pleasure, & pain.' Suffering loss of relatives, loss of wealth, or loss through disease, he sorrows, grieves, & laments, beats his breast, becomes distraught.
And then there is the case where a person, suffering loss of relatives, loss of wealth, or loss through disease, reflects: 'That's how it is when living together in the world.
That's how it is when gaining a personal identity.
When there is living in the world, when there is the gaining of a personal identity, these eight worldly conditions spin after the world, and the world spins after these eight worldly conditions: gain, loss, status, disgrace, censure, praise, pleasure, & pain.' Suffering loss of relatives, loss of wealth, or loss through disease, he does not sorrow, grieve, or lament, does not beat his breast or become distraught.
“'It's through adversity that a person's endurance may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning': Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'It's through discussion that a person's discernment may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning': Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
“There is the case where one individual, through discussion with another, knows this: 'From the way this person rises to an issue, from the way he applies, from the way he addresses a question, he is dull, not discerning.
Why is that?
He does not make statements that are deep, tranquil, refined, beyond the scope of conjecture, subtle, to-be-experienced by the wise.
He cannot declare the meaning, teach it, describe it, set it forth, reveal it, explain it, or make it plain.
He is dull, not discerning.' Just as if a man with good eyesight standing on the shore of a body of water were to see a small fish rise.
The thought would occur to him, 'From the rise of this fish, from the break of its ripples, from its speed, it is a small fish, not a large one.' In the same way, one individual, in discussion with another, knows this: 'From the way this person rises to an issue, from the way he applies, from the way he addresses a question… he is dull, not discerning.'
“And then there is the case where one individual, through discussion with another, knows this: 'From the way this person rises to an issue, from the way he applies, from the way he addresses a question, he is discerning, not dull.
Why is that?
He makes statements that are deep, tranquil, refined, beyond the scope of conjecture, subtle, to-be-experienced by the wise.
He can declare the meaning, teach it, describe it, set it forth, reveal it, explain it, & make it plain.
He is discerning, not dull.' Just as if a man with good eyesight standing on the shore of a body of water were to see a large fish rise.
The thought would occur to him, 'From the rise of this fish, from the break of its ripples, from its speed, it is a large fish, not a small one.' In the same way, one individual, in discussion with another, knows this: 'From the way this person rises to an issue, from the way he applies, from the way he addresses a question… he is discerning, not dull.'
“'It's through discussion that a person's discernment may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning': Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“These, monks, are the four traits that may be known by means of these four traits.
See also: AN..
For another presentation of the same topic, see Ud..
Then Janussonin the brahman went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “I am of the view & opinion that there is no one who, subject to death, is not afraid or in terror of death.
“Brahman, there are those who, subject to death, are afraid & in terror of death.
And there are those who, subject to death, are not afraid or in terror of death.
“And who is the person who, subject to death, is afraid & in terror of death?
There is the case of the person who has not abandoned passion, desire, fondness, thirst, fever, & craving for sensuality.
Then he comes down with a serious disease.
As he comes down with a serious disease, the thought occurs to him, 'O, those beloved sensual pleasures will be taken from me, and I will be taken from them!' He grieves & is tormented, weeps, beats his breast, & grows delirious.
This is a person who, subject to death, is afraid & in terror of death.
“Furthermore, there is the case of the person who has not abandoned passion, desire, fondness, thirst, fever, & craving for the body.
Then he comes down with a serious disease.
As he comes down with a serious disease, the thought occurs to him, 'O, my beloved body will be taken from me, and I will be taken from my body!' He grieves & is tormented, weeps, beats his breast, & grows delirious.
This, too, is a person who, subject to death, is afraid & in terror of death.
“Furthermore, there is the case of the person who has not done what is good, has not done what is skillful, has not given protection to those in fear, and instead has done what is evil, savage, & cruel.
Then he comes down with a serious disease.
As he comes down with a serious disease, the thought occurs to him, 'I have not done what is good, have not done what is skillful, have not given protection to those in fear, and instead have done what is evil, savage, and cruel.
To the extent that there is a destination for those who have not done what is good, have not done what is skillful, have not given protection to those in fear, and instead have done what is evil, savage, & cruel, that's where I'm headed after death.' He grieves & is tormented, weeps, beats his breast, & grows delirious.
This, too, is a person who, subject to death, is afraid & in terror of death.
“These, brahman, are four people who, subject to death, are afraid & in terror of death.
“And who is the person who, subject to death, is not afraid or in terror of death?
“There is the case of the person who has abandoned passion, desire, fondness, thirst, fever, and craving for sensuality.
Then he comes down with a serious disease.
As he comes down with a serious disease, the thought does not occur to him, 'O, those beloved sensual pleasures will be taken from me, and I will be taken from them!' He does not grieve, is not tormented; does not weep, beat his breast, or grow delirious.
This is a person who, subject to death, is not afraid or in terror of death.
“Furthermore, there is the case of the person who has abandoned passion, desire, fondness, thirst, fever, and craving for the body.
Then he comes down with a serious disease.
As he comes down with a serious disease, the thought does not occur to him, 'O, my beloved body will be taken from me, and I will be taken from my body!' He does not grieve, is not tormented; does not weep, beat his breast, or grow delirious.
This, too, is a person who, subject to death, is not afraid or in terror of death.
“Furthermore, there is the case of the person who has done what is good, has done what is skillful, has given protection to those in fear, and has not done what is evil, savage, or cruel.
Then he comes down with a serious disease.
As he comes down with a serious disease, the thought occurs to him, 'I have done what is good, have done what is skillful, have given protection to those in fear, and I have not done what is evil, savage, or cruel.
To the extent that there is a destination for those who have done what is good, what is skillful, have given protection to those in fear, and have not done what is evil, savage, or cruel, that's where I'm headed after death.' He does not grieve, is not tormented; does not weep, beat his breast, or grow delirious.
This, too, is a person who, subject to death, is not afraid or in terror of death.
“Furthermore, there is the case of the person who has no doubt or perplexity, who has arrived at certainty with regard to the True Dhamma.
Then he comes down with a serious disease.
As he comes down with a serious disease, the thought occurs to him, 'I have no doubt or perplexity.
I have arrived at certainty with regard to the True Dhamma.' He does not grieve, is not tormented; does not weep, beat his breast, or grow delirious.
This, too, is a person who, subject to death, is not afraid or in terror of death.
“These, brahman, are four people who, subject to death, are not afraid or in terror of death.
“Magnificent, Master Gotama!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has Master Gotama — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to Master Gotama for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the Sangha of monks.
May Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge, from this day forward, for life.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Sanctuary.
Then Vassakara the brahman, the minister to the king of Magadha, approached the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “I am of the view, of the opinion, that when anyone speaks of what he has seen, 'Thus have I seen,' there is no fault in that.
When anyone speaks of what he has heard, 'Thus have I heard,' there is no fault in that.
When anyone speaks of what he has sensed, 'Thus have I sensed,' there is no fault in that.
When anyone speaks of what he has cognized, 'Thus have I cognized,' there is no fault in that.
“I do not say, brahman, that everything that has been seen should be spoken about.
Nor do I say that everything that has been seen should not be spoken about.
I do not say that everything that has been heard… everything that has been sensed… everything that has been cognized should be spoken about.
Nor do I say that everything that has been cognized should not be spoken about.
“When, for one who speaks of what has been seen, unskillful mental qualities increase and skillful mental qualities decrease, then that sort of thing should not be spoken about.
But when, for one who speaks of what has been seen, unskillful mental qualities decrease and skillful mental qualities increase, then that sort of thing should be spoken about.
“When, for one who speaks of what has been heard… what has been sensed… what has been cognized, unskillful mental qualities increase and skillful mental qualities decrease, then that sort of thing should not be spoken about.
But when, for one who speaks of what has been cognized, unskillful mental qualities decrease and skillful mental qualities increase, then that sort of thing should be spoken about.
Then Vassakara the brahman, delighting & rejoicing in the Blessed One's words, got up from his seat and left.
“Endowed with four qualities, monks, a warrior is worthy of a king, an asset to a king, and counts as a very limb of his king.
Which four?
“There is the case where a warrior is skilled in his stance, able to shoot far, able to fire shots in rapid succession, and able to pierce great objects.
A warrior endowed with these four qualities is worthy of a king, an asset to a king, and counts as a very limb of his king.
“In the same way a monk endowed with four qualities is deserving of gifts, deserving of hospitality, deserving of offerings, deserving of respect, an unexcelled field of merit for the world.
Which four?
“There is the case where a monk is skilled in his stance, able to shoot far, able to fire shots in rapid succession, and able to pierce great objects.
A monk endowed with these four qualities is deserving of gifts, deserving of hospitality, deserving of offerings, deserving of respect, an unexcelled field of merit for the world.
“And how is a monk skilled in his stance?
There is the case where a monk is virtuous.
He dwells restrained in accordance with the Patimokkha, consummate in his behavior & sphere of activity.
He trains himself, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
This is how a monk is skilled in his stance.
“And how is a monk one who is able to shoot far?
There is the case where a monk sees any form whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near — every form — as it actually is with right discernment as: 'This is not mine.
This is not my self.
This is not what I am.'
“He sees any feeling whatsoever…
“He sees any perception whatsoever…
“He sees any fabrications whatsoever…
“He sees any consciousness whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near — every consciousness — as it actually is with right discernment as: 'This is not mine.
This is not my self.
This is not what I am.'
“This is how a monk is one who is able to shoot far.
“And how is a monk one who is able to fire shots in rapid succession?
There is the case where a monk discerns, as it actually is present, that 'This is stress.'… 'This is the origination of stress.'… 'This is the cessation of stress.'… 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.' This is how a monk is one who is able to fire shots in rapid succession.
“And how is a monk one who is able to pierce great objects?
There is the case where a monk pierces right through the great mass of ignorance.
This is how a monk is one who is able to pierce great objects right through.
“Endowed with these four qualities, a monk is deserving of gifts, deserving of hospitality, deserving of offerings, deserving of respect, an unexcelled field of merit for the world.” 
Then Ven.
Ananda went to Ven.
Sariputta and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Sariputta, “Friend Sariputta, what is the cause, what is the reason, why some beings do not become totally unbound in the present life?
“There's the case, friend Ananda, where beings do not discern, as it actually is present, that 'This perception has a share in decline'; 'This perception has a share in stability'; 'This perception has a share in distinction'; 'This perception has a share in penetration.' This is the cause, this is the reason, why some beings do not become totally unbound in the present life.
“And what, friend Sariputta, is the cause, what is the reason, why some beings do become totally unbound in the present life?
“There's the case, friend Ananda, where beings discern, as it actually is present, that 'This perception has a share in decline'; 'This perception has a share in stability'; 'This perception has a share in distinction'; 'This perception has a share in penetration.' This is the cause, this is the reason, why some beings become totally unbound in the present life.”
“Monks, these four types of individuals are to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
“There is the case where a monk enters & remains in a certain peaceful awareness-release.
He attends to the cessation of self-identification, but as he is attending to the cessation of self-identification his mind doesn't leap up, grow confident, steadfast, or firm in the cessation of self-identification.
For him the cessation of self-identification is not to be expected.
Just as if a man were to grasp a branch with his hand smeared with resin, his hand would stick to it, grip it, adhere to it; in the same way, the monk enters & remains in a certain peaceful awareness-release.
He attends to the cessation of self-identification, but as he is attending to the cessation of self-identification his mind doesn't leap up, grow confident, steadfast, or firm in the cessation of self-identification.
For him the cessation of self-identification is not to be expected.
“Now, there is the case where a monk enters & remains in a certain peaceful awareness-release.
He attends to the cessation of self-identification, and as he is attending to the cessation of self-identification his mind leaps up, grows confident, steadfast, & firm in the cessation of self-identification.
For him the cessation of self-identification is to be expected.
Just as if a man were to grasp a branch with a clean hand, his hand would not stick to it, grip it, or adhere to it; in the same way, the monk enters & remains in a certain peaceful awareness-release.
He attends to the cessation of self-identification, and as he is attending to the cessation of self-identification his mind leaps up, grows confident, steadfast, & firm in the cessation of self-identification.
For him the cessation of self-identification is to be expected.
“Now, there is the case where a monk enters & remains in a certain peaceful awareness-release.
He attends to the breaching of ignorance, but as he is attending to the breaching of ignorance his mind doesn't leap up, grow confident, steadfast, or firm in the breaching of ignorance.
For him the breaching of ignorance is not to be expected.
Just as if there were a waste-water pool that had stood for countless years, where a man were to block all the inlets and open all the outlets, and the sky were to not rain down in good streams of rain: the breaching of the waste-water pool's embankment would not be expected; in the same way, the monk enters & remains in a certain peaceful awareness-release.
He attends to the breaching of ignorance, but as he is attending to the breaching of ignorance his mind doesn't leap up, grow confident, steadfast, or firm in the breaching of ignorance.
For him the breaching of ignorance is not to be expected.
“Now, there is the case where a monk enters & remains in a certain peaceful awareness-release.
He attends to the breaching of ignorance, and as he is attending to the breaching of ignorance his mind leaps up, grows confident, steadfast, & firm in the breaching of ignorance.
For him the breaching of ignorance is to be expected.
Just as if there were a waste-water pool that had stood for countless years, where a man were to open all the inlets and block all the outlets, and the sky were to rain down in good streams of rain: the breaching of the waste-water pool's embankment would be expected; in the same way, the monk enters & remains in a certain peaceful awareness-release.
He attends to the breaching of ignorance, and as he is attending to the breaching of ignorance his mind leaps up, grows confident, steadfast, & firm in the breaching of ignorance.
For him the breaching of ignorance is to be expected.
“These are four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.”
Then Ven.
Maha Kotthita went to Ven.
Sariputta and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Sariputta, “With the remainderless stopping & fading of the six contact-media is it the case that there is anything else?
“Don't say that, my friend.
“With the remainderless stopping & fading of the six contact-media, is it the case that there is not anything else?
“Don't say that, my friend.
“…is it the case that there both is & is not anything else?
“Don't say that, my friend.
“…is it the case that there neither is nor is not anything else?
“Don't say that, my friend.
“Being asked if, with the remainderless stopping & fading of the six contact-media, there is anything else, you say, 'Don't say that, my friend.' Being asked if… there is not anything else… there both is & is not anything else… there neither is nor is not anything else, you say, 'Don't say that, my friend.' Now, how is the meaning of your words to be understood?
“The statement, 'With the remainderless stopping & fading of the six contact-media is it the case that there is anything else?' objectifies non-objectification.
The statement, '… is it the case that there is not anything else… is it the case that there both is & is not anything else… is it the case that there neither is nor is not anything else?' objectifies non-objectification.
However far the six contact-media go, that is how far objectification goes.
However far objectification goes, that is how far the six contact media go.
With the remainderless fading & stopping of the six contact-media, there comes to be the stopping, the allaying of objectification.
On one occasion Ven.
Ananda was staying in Kosambi, at Ghosita's monastery.
There he addressed the monks, “Friends!
“Yes, friend,” the monks responded.
Ven.
Ananda said: “Friends, whoever — monk or nun — declares the attainment of arahantship in my presence, they all do it by means of one or another of four paths.
Which four?
“There is the case where a monk has developed insight preceded by tranquillity.
As he develops insight preceded by tranquillity, the path is born.
He follows that path, develops it, pursues it.
As he follows the path, developing it & pursuing it — his fetters are abandoned, his obsessions destroyed.
“Then there is the case where a monk has developed tranquillity preceded by insight.
As he develops tranquillity preceded by insight, the path is born.
He follows that path, develops it, pursues it.
As he follows the path, developing it & pursuing it — his fetters are abandoned, his obsessions destroyed.
“Then there is the case where a monk has developed tranquillity in tandem with insight.
As he develops tranquillity in tandem with insight, the path is born.
He follows that path, develops it, pursues it.
As he follows the path, developing it & pursuing it — his fetters are abandoned, his obsessions destroyed.
“Then there is the case where a monk's mind has its restlessness concerning the Dhamma well under control.
There comes a time when his mind grows steady inwardly, settles down, and becomes unified & concentrated.
In him the path is born.
He follows that path, develops it, pursues it.
As he follows the path, developing it & pursuing it — his fetters are abandoned, his obsessions destroyed.
“Whoever — monk or nun — declares the attainment of arahantship in my presence, they all do it by means of one or another of these four paths.”
“And which is intolerant practice?
There is the case where a certain individual, when insulted, returns the insult; when abused, returns the abuse; when bickered with, bickers in return.
This is called intolerant practice.
“And which is tolerant practice?
There is the case where a certain individual, when insulted, doesn't return the insult; when abused, doesn't return the abuse; when bickered with, doesn't bicker in return.
This is called tolerant practice.
“And which is self-controlled practice?
There is the case where a monk, on seeing a form with the eye, doesn't grasp at any theme or variations by which — if he were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the eye — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail him.
He practices with restraint.
He guards the faculty of the eye.
He achieves restraint with regard to the faculty of the eye.
“On hearing a sound with the ear…
“On smelling an aroma with the nose…
“On tasting a flavor with the tongue…
“On touching a tactile sensation with the body…
“On cognizing an idea with the intellect, he doesn't grasp at any theme or variations by which — if he were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the intellect — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail him.
He practices with restraint.
He guards the faculty of the intellect.
He achieves restraint with regard to the faculty of the intellect.
“This is called self-controlled practice.
“And which is even practice?
There is the case where a monk doesn't acquiesce to an arisen thought of sensuality.
He abandons it, destroys it, dispels it, knows it, demolishes it, wipes it out of existence.
“He doesn't acquiesce to an arisen thought of ill will.
He abandons it, dispels it, knows it, demolishes it, wipes it out of existence.
“He doesn't acquiesce to an arisen thought of harmfulness.
He abandons it, dispels it, knows it, demolishes it, wipes it out of existence.
“He doesn't acquiesce to any arisen evil, unskillful qualities.
He abandons them, dispels them, knows them, demolishes them, wipes them out of existence.
“This is called even practice.
“These, monks, are four modes of practice.
“And which is even practice?
There is the case where a monk doesn't acquiesce to an arisen thought of sensuality.
He abandons it, destroys it, dispels it, knows it, demolishes it, wipes it out of existence.
“He doesn't acquiesce to an arisen thought of ill will.
He abandons it, destroys it, dispels it, wipes it out of existence.
“He doesn't acquiesce to an arisen thought of harmfulness.
He abandons it, destroys it, dispels it, wipes it out of existence.
“He doesn't acquiesce to any arisen evil, unskillful qualities.
He abandons them, destroys them, dispels them, wipes them out of existence.
“This is called even practice.
“These, monks, are four modes of practice.”
“And which is intolerant practice?
There is the case where a certain individual doesn't tolerate cold, heat, hunger, & thirst; the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, & reptiles; ill-spoken, unwelcome words; & bodily feelings that, when they arise, are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, disagreeable, displeasing, & menacing to life.
This is called intolerant practice.
“And which is tolerant practice?
There is the case where a certain individual tolerates cold, heat, hunger, & thirst; the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, & reptiles; ill-spoken, unwelcome words; & bodily feelings that, when they arise, are painful, racking, sharp, piercing, disagreeable, displeasing, & menacing to life.
This is called tolerant practice.
“And which is self-controlled practice?
There is the case where a monk, on seeing a form with the eye, doesn't grasp at any theme or variations by which — if he were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the eye — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail him.
He practices with restraint.
He guards the faculty of the eye.
He achieves restraint with regard to the faculty of the eye.
“On hearing a sound with the ear…
“On smelling an aroma with the nose…
“On tasting a flavor with the tongue…
“On touching a tactile sensation with the body…
“On cognizing an idea with the intellect, he doesn't grasp at any theme or variations by which — if he were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the intellect — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail him.
He practices with restraint.
He guards the faculty of the intellect.
He achieves restraint with regard to the faculty of the intellect.
“This is called self-controlled practice.
“And which is even practice?
There is the case where a monk doesn't acquiesce to an arisen thought of sensuality.
He abandons it, destroys it, dispels it, knows it, demolishes it, wipes it out of existence.
“He doesn't acquiesce to an arisen thought of ill will.
He abandons it, dispels it, knows it, demolishes it, wipes it out of existence.
“He doesn't acquiesce to an arisen thought of harmfulness.
He abandons it, dispels it, knows it, demolishes it, wipes it out of existence.
“He doesn't acquiesce to any arisen evil, unskillful qualities.
He abandons them, dispels them, knows them, demolishes them, wipes them out of existence.
“This is called even practice.
“These, monks, are four modes of practice.”
“Monks, there are these four modes of practice.
Which four?
Painful practice with slow intuition, painful practice with quick intuition, pleasant practice with slow intuition, & pleasant practice with quick intuition.
“And which is painful practice with quick intuition?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on unattractiveness with regard to the body, percipient of loathsomeness with regard to food, percipient of non-delight with regard to the entire world, focused on inconstancy with regard to all fabrications.
The perception of death is well established within him.
He dwells in dependence on these five strengths of a learner — strength of conviction, strength of conscience, strength of concern, strength of persistence, & strength of discernment — and these five faculties of his — the faculty of conviction, the faculty of persistence, the faculty of mindfulness, the faculty of concentration, the faculty of discernment — appear intensely.
Because of their intensity, he attains quickly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called painful practice with quick intuition.
“And which is pleasant practice with quick intuition?
There is the case where a monk — quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities — enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
With the fading of rapture he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the noble ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' With the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of joy & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
He dwells in dependence on these five strengths of a learner — strength of conviction, strength of conscience, strength of concern, strength of persistence, & strength of discernment — and these five faculties of his — the faculty of conviction, the faculty of persistence, the faculty of mindfulness, the faculty of concentration, the faculty of discernment — appear intensely.
Because of their intensity, he attains quickly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called pleasant practice with quick intuition.
“These are the four modes of practice.
According to the Commentary, this means the concentration forming the Path.
This is apparently a reference to this passage in Sn.:
Because the description of pleasant practice here contains the standard jhana formula, while the description of painful practice contains no mention of jhana, some writers have taken this as proof that there is an alternative path to awakening that does not involve the jhanas.
However, this reading ignores the description of how painful practice and pleasant practice can yield either slow or quick intuition.
Intuition comes slowly when the five faculties are present in a weak form, and quickly when they are present in an intense form.
Now, in both cases, the faculty of concentration — which is defined with the standard formula for the jhanas — has to be present for the ending of the effluents.
Because this is true both for painful practice and for pleasant practice, both sorts of practice need jhana in order to succeed.
“Monks, there are these four modes of practice.
Which four?
Painful practice with slow intuition, painful practice with quick intuition, pleasant practice with slow intuition, & pleasant practice with quick intuition.
“And which is painful practice with quick intuition?
There is the case where a certain individual is normally of an intensely passionate nature.
He perpetually experiences pain & distress born of passion.
Or he is normally of an intensely aversive nature.
He perpetually experiences pain & distress born of aversion.
Or he is normally of an intensely deluded nature.
He perpetually experiences pain & distress born of delusion.
These five faculties of his — the faculty of conviction, the faculty of persistence, the faculty of mindfulness, the faculty of concentration, the faculty of discernment — appear intensely.
Because of their intensity, he attains quickly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called painful practice with quick intuition.
“And which is pleasant practice with slow intuition?
There is the case where a certain individual is normally not of an intensely passionate nature.
He does not perpetually experience pain & distress born of passion.
Or he is normally not of an intensely aversive nature.
He does not perpetually experience pain & distress born of aversion.
Or he is normally not of an intensely deluded nature.
He does not perpetually experience pain & distress born of delusion.
These five faculties of his — the faculty of conviction, the faculty of persistence, the faculty of mindfulness, the faculty of concentration, the faculty of discernment — appear weakly.
Because of their weakness, he attains only slowly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called pleasant practice with slow intuition.
“And which is pleasant practice with quick intuition?
There is the case where a certain individual is normally not of an intensely passionate nature.
He does not perpetually experience pain & distress born of passion.
Or he is normally not of an intensely aversive nature.
He does not perpetually experience pain & distress born of aversion.
Or he is normally not of an intensely deluded nature.
He does not perpetually experience pain & distress born of delusion.
These five faculties of his — the faculty of conviction, the faculty of persistence, the faculty of mindfulness, the faculty of concentration, the faculty of discernment — appear intensely.
Because of their intensity, he attains quickly the immediacy that leads to the ending of the effluents.
This is called pleasant practice with quick intuition.
“These are the four modes of practice.
According to the Commentary, this means the concentration forming the Path.
This is apparently a reference to this passage in Sn.:
“There are these four types of brightness.
Which four?
The brightness of the sun, the brightness of the moon, the brightness of fire, and the brightness of discernment.
These are the four types of brightness.
And of these four types of brightness, the foremost is the brightness of discernment.
See also: Dhp; Dhp; Iti 
I have heard that on one occasion Ven.
Ananda was staying in Kosambi, at Ghosita's Park.
Then a certain nun said to a certain man, “Go, my good man, to my lord Ananda and, on arrival, bowing your head to his feet in my name, tell him, 'The nun named such-and-such, venerable sir, is sick, in pain, severely ill.
She bows her head to the feet of her lord Ananda and says, “It would be good if my lord Ananda were to go to the nuns' quarters, to visit this nun out of sympathy for her.”' Responding, “Yes, my lady,” the man then approached Ven.
Ananda and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to Ven.
Ananda, “The nun named such-and-such, venerable sir, is sick, in pain, severely ill.
She bows her head to the feet of her lord Ananda and says, 'It would be good if my lord Ananda were to go to the nuns' quarters, to visit this nun out of sympathy for her.' Ven.
Ananda accepted with silence.
Then in the early morning, having put on his robes and, carrying his bowl and outer robe, he went to the nuns' quarters.
The nun saw Ven.
Ananda coming from afar.
On seeing him, she lay down on a bed, having covered her head.
Then Ven.
Ananda approached the nun and, on arrival, sat down on a prepared seat.
As he was sitting there, he said to the nun: “This body, sister, comes into being through food.
And yet it is by relying on food that food is to be abandoned.
“This body comes into being through craving.
And yet it is by relying on craving that craving is to be abandoned.
“This body comes into being through conceit.
And yet it is by relying on conceit that conceit is to be abandoned.
“This body comes into being through sexual intercourse.
Sexual intercourse is to be abandoned.
With regard to sexual intercourse, the Buddha declares the cutting off of the bridge.
“'This body, sister, comes into being through food.
And yet it is by relying on food that food is to be abandoned.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
There is the case, sister, where a monk, considering it thoughtfully, takes food — not playfully, nor for intoxication, nor for putting on bulk, nor for beautification — but simply for the survival & continuance of this body, for ending its afflictions, for the support of the holy life, 'Thus will I destroy old feelings and not create new feelings.
I will maintain myself, be blameless, & live in comfort.' Then he eventually abandons food, having relied on food.
'This body, sister, comes into being through food.
And yet it is by relying on food that food is to be abandoned.' Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'This body comes into being through craving.
And yet it is by relying on craving that craving is to be abandoned.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
There is the case, sister, where a monk hears, 'The monk named such-and-such, they say, through the ending of the fermentations, has entered & remains in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having known & realized them for himself in the here & now.' The thought occurs to him, 'I hope that I, too, will — through the ending of the fermentations — enter & remain in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having known & realized them for myself in the here & now.' Then he eventually abandons craving, having relied on craving.
'This body comes into being through craving.
And yet it is by relying on craving that craving is to be abandoned.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'This body comes into being through conceit.
And yet it is by relying on conceit that conceit is to be abandoned.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
There is the case, sister, where a monk hears, 'The monk named such-and-such, they say, through the ending of the fermentations, has entered & remains in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having known & realized them for himself in the here & now.' The thought occurs to him, 'The monk named such-and-such, they say, through the ending of the fermentations, has entered & remains in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having known & realized them for himself in the here & now.
Then why not me?' Then he eventually abandons conceit, having relied on conceit.
'This body comes into being through conceit.
And yet it is by relying on conceit that conceit is to be abandoned.' Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“This body comes into being through sexual intercourse.
Sexual intercourse is to be abandoned.
With regard to sexual intercourse, the Buddha declares the cutting off of the bridge.
Then the nun — getting up from her bed, arranging her upper robe over one shoulder, and bowing down with her head at Ven.
Ananda's feet — said, “A transgression has overcome me, venerable sir, in that I was so foolish, so muddle-headed, and so unskilled as to act in this way.
May my lord Ananda please accept this confession of my transgression as such, so that I may restrain myself in the future.
“Yes, sister, a transgression overcame you in that you were so foolish, so muddle-headed, and so unskilled as to act in this way.
But because you see your transgression as such and make amends in accordance with the Dhamma, we accept your confession.
For it is a cause of growth in the Dhamma & Discipline of the noble ones when, seeing a transgression as such, one makes amends in accordance with the Dhamma and exercises restraint in the future.
That is what Ven.
Ananda said.
Gratified, the nun delighted in Ven.
Ananda's words.

“Monks, there are these four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
“There is the case where an individual keeps pervading the first direction — as well as the second direction, the third, & the fourth — with an awareness imbued with good will.
Thus he keeps pervading above, below, & all around, everywhere & in every respect the all-encompassing cosmos with an awareness imbued with good will: abundant, expansive, immeasurable, free from hostility, free from ill will.
He regards whatever phenomena there that are connected with form, feeling, perception, fabrications, & consciousness, as inconstant, stressful, a disease, a cancer, an arrow, painful, an affliction, alien, a disintegration, an emptiness, not-self.
At the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in conjunction with the devas of the Pure Abodes.
This rebirth is not in common with run-of-the-mill people.
“Again, there is the case where an individual keeps pervading the first direction — as well as the second direction, the third, & the fourth — with an awareness imbued with compassion… appreciation… equanimity.
Thus he keeps pervading above, below, & all around, everywhere & in every respect the all-encompassing cosmos with an awareness imbued with equanimity: abundant, expansive, immeasurable, free from hostility, free from ill will.
He regards whatever phenomena there that are connected with form, feeling, perception, fabrications, & consciousness, as inconstant, stressful, a disease, a cancer, an arrow, painful, an affliction, alien, a disintegration, an emptiness, not-self.
At the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in conjunction with the devas of the Pure Abodes.
This rebirth is not in common with run-of-the-mill people.
“These are four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.
See also: AN.
Here, bhikkhus, a certain person abides with his heart imbued with loving-kindness extending… over the all-encompassing world.
Now whatever therein exists classifiable as form, classifiable as a feeling, classifiable as perception, classifiable as determinative acts, or classifiable as consciousness, such ideas he sees as impermanent, as liable to suffering, as a disease, as a cancer, as a barb, as a calamity, as an affliction, as alien, as being worn away, as void, as not-self.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the retinue of the Gods of the Pure Abodes.
And this kind of reappearance is not shared by ordinary men.
“Monks, there are these four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
“There is the case where an individual keeps pervading the first direction — as well as the second direction, the third, & the fourth — with an awareness imbued with good will.
Thus he keeps pervading above, below, & all around, everywhere & in every respect the all-encompassing cosmos with an awareness imbued with good will: abundant, expansive, immeasurable, free from hostility, free from ill will.
He savors that, longs for that, finds satisfaction through that.
Staying there — fixed on that, dwelling there often, not falling away from that — then when he dies he reappears in conjunction with the devas of Brahma's retinue.
The devas of Brahma's retinue, monks, have a life-span of an eon.  A run-of-the-mill person having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, goes to hell, to the animal womb, to the state of the hungry shades.
But a disciple of the Blessed One, having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, is unbound right in that state of being.
This, monks, is the difference, this the distinction, this the distinguishing factor, between an educated disciple of the noble ones and an uneducated run-of-the-mill person, when there is a destination, a reappearing.
“Again, there is the case where an individual keeps pervading the first direction — as well as the second direction, the third, & the fourth — with an awareness imbued with compassion.
Thus he keeps pervading above, below, & all around, everywhere & in every respect the all-encompassing cosmos with an awareness imbued with compassion: abundant, expansive, immeasurable, free from hostility, free from ill will.
He savors that, longs for that, finds satisfaction through that.
Staying there — fixed on that, dwelling there often, not falling away from that — then when he dies he reappears in conjunction with the Abhassara devas.
The Abhassara devas, monks, have a life-span of two eons.  A run-of-the-mill person having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, goes to hell, to the animal womb, to the state of the hungry shades.
But a disciple of the Blessed One, having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, is unbound right in that state of being.
This, monks, is the difference, this the distinction, this the distinguishing factor, between an educated disciple of the noble ones and an uneducated run-of-the-mill person, when there is a destination, a reappearing.
“Again, there is the case where an individual keeps pervading the first direction — as well as the second direction, the third, & the fourth — with an awareness imbued with appreciation.
Thus he keeps pervading above, below, & all around, everywhere & in every respect the all-encompassing cosmos with an awareness imbued with appreciation: abundant, expansive, immeasurable, free from hostility, free from ill will.
He savors that, longs for that, finds satisfaction through that.
Staying there — fixed on that, dwelling there often, not falling away from that — then when he dies he reappears in conjunction with the Subhakinha devas.
The Subhakinha devas, monks, have a life-span of four eons.  A run-of-the-mill person having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, goes to hell, to the animal womb, to the state of the hungry shades.
But a disciple of the Blessed One, having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, is unbound right in that state of being.
This, monks, is the difference, this the distinction, this the distinguishing factor, between an educated disciple of the noble ones and an uneducated run-of-the-mill person, when there is a destination, a reappearing.
“Again, there is the case where an individual keeps pervading the first direction — as well as the second direction, the third, & the fourth — with an awareness imbued with equanimity.
Thus he keeps pervading above, below, & all around, everywhere & in every respect the all-encompassing cosmos with an awareness imbued with equanimity: abundant, expansive, immeasurable, free from hostility, free from ill will.
He savors that, longs for that, finds satisfaction through that.
Staying there — fixed on that, dwelling there often, not falling away from that — then when he dies he reappears in conjunction with the Vehapphala devas.
The Vehapphala devas, monks, have a life-span of eons.  A run-of-the-mill person having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, goes to hell, to the animal womb, to the state of the hungry shades.
But a disciple of the Blessed One, having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, is unbound right in that state of being.
This, monks, is the difference, this the distinction, this the distinguishing factor, between an educated disciple of the noble ones and an uneducated run-of-the-mill person, when there is a destination, a reappearing.
“These are four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.
See also: AN.
“Here, bhikkhus, a certain person abides with his heart imbued with loving-kindness extending over one quarter, likewise the second quarter, likewise the third quarter, likewise the fourth quarter, and so above, below, around, and everywhere, and to all as to himself; he abides with his heart abundant, exalted, measureless in loving-kindness, without hostility or ill-will, extending over the all-encompassing world.
“He finds gratification in that, finds it desirable and looks to it for his well-being; steady and resolute thereon, he abides much in it, and if he dies without losing it, he reappears among the gods of a High Divinity's retinue.
“Now the gods of a High Divinity's retinue have a life-span of one aeon.
An ordinary person stays there for his life-span; but after he has used up the whole life-span enjoyed by those gods, he leaves it all, and he may go down even to hell, or to an animal womb, or to the ghost realm.
But one who has given ear to the Perfect One stays there for his life-span, and after he has used up the whole life-span enjoyed by those gods, he eventually attains complete extinction of lust, hate and delusion in that same kind of heavenly existence.
“It is this that distinguishes, that differentiates, the wise hearer who is ennobled from the unwise ordinary man, when, that is to say, there is a destination for reappearance.
“Monks, there are these four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
“There is the case where an individual, withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
He regards whatever phenomena there that are connected with form, feeling, perception, fabrications, & consciousness, as inconstant, stressful, a disease, a cancer, an arrow, painful, an affliction, alien, a disintegration, an emptiness, not-self.
At the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in conjunction with the devas of the Pure Abodes.
This rebirth is not in common with run-of-the-mill people.
“Again, there is the case where an individual… enters the second jhana… the third jhana… the fourth jhana… He regards whatever phenomena there that are connected with form, feeling, perception, fabrications, & consciousness, as inconstant, stressful, a disease, a cancer, an arrow, painful, an affliction, alien, a disintegration, an emptiness, not-self.
At the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in conjunction with the devas of the Pure Abodes.
This rebirth is not in common with run-of-the-mill people.
“These are four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.”
“Monks, there are these four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
“There is the case where an individual, withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
He savors that, longs for that, finds satisfaction through that.
Staying there — fixed on that, dwelling there often, not falling away from that — then when he dies he reappears in conjunction with the devas of Brahma's retinue.
The devas of Brahma's retinue, monks, have a life-span of an eon.
A run-of-the-mill person having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, goes to hell, to the animal womb, to the state of the hungry shades.
But a disciple of the Blessed One, having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, is unbound right in that state of being.
This, monks, is the difference, this the distinction, this the distinguishing factor, between an educated disciple of the noble ones and an uneducated run-of-the-mill person, when there is a destination, a reappearing.
“Again, there is the case where an individual, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
He savors that, longs for that, finds satisfaction through that.
Staying there — fixed on that, dwelling there often, not falling away from that — then when he dies he reappears in conjunction with the Abhassara devas.
The Abhassara devas, monks, have a life-span of two eons.
A run-of-the-mill person having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, goes to hell, to the animal womb, to the state of the hungry shades.
But a disciple of the Blessed One, having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, is unbound right in that state of being.
This, monks, is the difference, this the distinction, this the distinguishing factor, between an educated disciple of the noble ones and an uneducated run-of-the-mill person, when there is a destination, a reappearing.
“Again, there is the case where an individual, with the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' He savors that, longs for that, finds satisfaction through that.
Staying there — fixed on that, dwelling there often, not falling away from that — then when he dies he reappears in conjunction with the Subhakinha devas.
The Subhakinha devas, monks, have a life-span of four eons.
A run-of-the-mill person having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, goes to hell, to the animal womb, to the state of the hungry shades.
But a disciple of the Blessed One, having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, is unbound right in that state of being.
This, monks, is the difference, this the distinction, this the distinguishing factor, between an educated disciple of the noble ones and an uneducated run-of-the-mill person, when there is a destination, a reappearing.
“Again, there is the case where an individual, with the abandoning of pleasure & stress — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
He savors that, longs for that, finds satisfaction through that.
Staying there — fixed on that, dwelling there often, not falling away from that — then when he dies he reappears in conjunction with the Vehapphala devas.
The Vehapphala devas, monks, have a life-span of eons.
A run-of-the-mill person having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, goes to hell, to the animal womb, to the state of the hungry shades.
But a disciple of the Blessed One, having stayed there, having used up all the life-span of those devas, is unbound right in that state of being.
This, monks, is the difference, this the distinction, this the distinguishing factor, between an educated disciple of the noble ones and an uneducated run-of-the-mill person, when there is a destination, a reappearing.
“These are four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's Monastery.
There he addressed the monks: “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded to him.
“Monks, I will teach you the great six sense-media.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said: “Not knowing, not seeing the eye as it actually is present; not knowing, not seeing forms… consciousness at the eye… contact at the eye as they actually are present; not knowing, not seeing whatever arises conditioned through contact at the eye — experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain — as it actually is present, one is infatuated with the eye… forms… consciousness at the eye… contact at the eye… whatever arises conditioned by contact at the eye and is experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
“For him — infatuated, attached, confused, not remaining focused on their drawbacks — the five clinging-aggregates head toward future accumulation.
The craving that makes for further becoming — accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now this & now that — grows within him.
His bodily disturbances & mental disturbances grow.
His bodily torments & mental torments grow.
His bodily distresses & mental distresses grow.
He is sensitive both to bodily stress & mental stress.
“Not knowing, not seeing the ear… Not knowing, not seeing the nose… Not knowing, not seeing the tongue… Not knowing, not seeing the body…
“Not knowing, not seeing the intellect as it actually is present; not knowing, not seeing ideas… consciousness at the intellect… contact at the intellect as they actually are present; not knowing, not seeing whatever arises conditioned through intellect-contact — experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain — as it actually is present, one is infatuated with the intellect… ideas… consciousness at the intellect… contact at the intellect… whatever arises conditioned by contact at the intellect and is experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
“For him — infatuated, attached, confused, not remaining focused on their drawbacks — the five clinging-aggregates head toward future accumulation.
The craving that makes for further becoming — accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now this & now that — grows within him.
His bodily disturbances & mental disturbances grow.
His bodily torments & mental torments grow.
His bodily distresses & mental distresses grow.
He is sensitive both to bodily stress & mental stress.
“However, knowing & seeing the eye as it actually is present, knowing & seeing forms… consciousness at the eye… contact at the eye as they actually are present, knowing & seeing whatever arises conditioned through contact at the eye — experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain — as it actually is present, one is not infatuated with the eye… forms… consciousness at the eye… contact at the eye… whatever arises conditioned by contact at the eye and is experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
“For him — uninfatuated, unattached, unconfused, remaining focused on their drawbacks — the five clinging-aggregates head toward future diminution.
The craving that makes for further becoming — accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now this & now that — is abandoned by him.
His bodily disturbances & mental disturbances are abandoned.
His bodily torments & mental torments are abandoned.
His bodily distresses & mental distresses are abandoned.
He is sensitive both to ease of body & ease of awareness.
“Any view belonging to one who has come to be like this is his right view.
Any resolve, his right resolve.
Any effort, his right effort.
Any mindfulness, his right mindfulness.
Any concentration, his right concentration: just as earlier his actions, speech, & livelihood were already well-purified.
Thus for him, having thus developed the noble eightfold path, the four frames of reference go to the culmination of their development.
The four right exertions… the four bases of power… the five faculties… the five strengths… the seven factors for Awakening go to the culmination of their development.
for him these two qualities occur in tandem: tranquillity & insight.
“He comprehends through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be comprehended through direct knowledge, abandons through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be abandoned through direct knowledge, develops through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be developed through direct knowledge, and realizes through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be realized through direct knowledge.
“And what qualities are to be comprehended through direct knowledge?
'The five clinging-aggregates,' should be the reply.
Which five?
Form as a clinging-aggregate… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness as a clinging-aggregate.
These are the qualities that are to be comprehended through direct knowledge.
“And what qualities are to be abandoned through direct knowledge?
Ignorance & craving for becoming: these are the qualities that are to be abandoned through direct knowledge.
“And what qualities are to be developed through direct knowledge?
Tranquillity & insight: these are the qualities that are to be developed through direct knowledge.
“And what qualities are to be realized through direct knowledge?
Clear knowing & release: these are the qualities that are to be realized through direct knowledge.
“Knowing & seeing the ear… Knowing & seeing the nose… Knowing & seeing the tongue… Knowing & seeing the body…
“Knowing & seeing the intellect as it actually is present, knowing & seeing ideas… consciousness at the intellect… contact at the intellect as they actually are present, knowing & seeing whatever arises conditioned through intellect-contact — experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain — as it actually is present, one is not infatuated with the intellect… ideas… consciousness at the intellect… contact at the intellect… whatever arises conditioned by contact at the intellect and is experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
“For him — uninfatuated, unattached, unconfused, remaining focused on their drawbacks — the five clinging-aggregates head toward future diminution.
The craving that makes for further becoming — accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now this & now that — is abandoned by him.
His bodily disturbances & mental disturbances are abandoned.
His bodily torments & mental torments are abandoned.
His bodily distresses & mental distresses are abandoned.
He is sensitive both to ease of body & ease of awareness.
“Any view belonging to one who has come to be like this is his right view.
Any resolve, his right resolve.
Any effort, his right effort.
Any mindfulness, his right mindfulness.
Any concentration, his right concentration: just as earlier his actions, speech, & livelihood were already well-purified.
Thus for him, having thus developed the noble eightfold path, the four frames of reference go to the culmination of their development.
The four right exertions… the four bases of power… the five faculties… the five strengths… the seven factors for Awakening go to the culmination of their development.
for him these two qualities occur in tandem: tranquillity & insight.
“He comprehends through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be comprehended through direct knowledge, abandons through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be abandoned through direct knowledge, develops through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be developed through direct knowledge, and realizes through direct knowledge whatever qualities are to be realized through direct knowledge.
“And what qualities are to be comprehended through direct knowledge?
'The five clinging-aggregates,' should be the reply.
Which five?
Form as a clinging-aggregate… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness as a clinging-aggregate.
These are the qualities that are to be comprehended through direct knowledge.
“And what qualities are to be abandoned through direct knowledge?
Ignorance & craving for becoming: these are the qualities that are to be abandoned through direct knowledge.
“And what qualities are to be developed through direct knowledge?
Tranquillity & insight: these are the qualities that are to be developed through direct knowledge.
“And what qualities are to be realized through direct knowledge?
Clear knowing & release: these are the qualities that are to be realized through direct knowledge.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted in the Blessed One's words.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Savatthi, in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's Monastery.
Then, as he was alone in seclusion, this line of thinking arose in the Blessed One's awareness: “The mental qualities that ripen in release have ripened in Rahula.
What if I were to lead Rahula further to the ending of the mental fermentations?
Then the Blessed One, early in the morning, put on his robes and, carrying his bowl & outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms.
Having gone for alms in Savatthi, after the meal, returning from his alms round, he said to Ven.
Rahula, “Fetch your sitting cloth, Rahula.
We will go to the Grove of the Blind to spend the day.
Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, Ven.
Rahula, carrying his sitting cloth, followed behind the Blessed One.
Now at that time, many thousands of devas were following behind the Blessed One, “Today the Blessed One will lead Ven.
Rahula further to the ending of the mental fermentations.
Then the Blessed One, having plunged into the Grove of the Blind, sat down on a seat made ready at the foot of a tree.
Ven.
Rahula, having bowed down to the Blessed One, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “What do you think, Rahula — is the eye constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“What do you think — are forms constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“What do you think — is consciousness at the eye constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“What do you think — is contact at the eye constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“What do you think — whatever there is that arises in dependence on contact at the eye as a mode of feeling, a mode of perception, a mode of fabrication, or a mode of consciousness: Is it constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“What do you think, Rahula — is the ear constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord”…
“What do you think, Rahula — is the nose constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord”…
“What do you think, Rahula — is the tongue constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord”…
“What do you think, Rahula — is the body constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord”…
“What do you think, Rahula — is the intellect constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“What do you think — are ideas constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“What do you think — is consciousness at the intellect constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“What do you think — is contact at the intellect constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“What do you think — whatever there is that arises in dependence on contact at the intellect as a mode of feeling, a mode of perception, a mode of fabrication, or a mode of consciousness: Is it constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“Seeing thus, Rahula, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with the eye, disenchanted with forms, disenchanted with consciousness at the eye, disenchanted with contact at the eye.
And whatever there is that arises in dependence on contact at the eye as a mode of feeling, a mode of perception, a mode of fabrication, or a mode of consciousness: With that, too, he grows disenchanted.
“He grows disenchanted with the ear…
“He grows disenchanted with the nose…
“He grows disenchanted with the tongue…
“He grows disenchanted with the body…
“He grows disenchanted with the intellect, disenchanted with ideas, disenchanted with consciousness at the intellect, disenchanted with contact at the intellect.
And whatever there is that arises in dependence on contact at the intellect as a mode of feeling, a mode of perception, a mode of fabrication, or a mode of consciousness: With that, too, he grows disenchanted.
Disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate.
Through dispassion, he is fully released.
With full release, there is the knowledge, 'Fully released.' He discerns that 'Birth is depleted, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.' That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, Ven.
Rahula delighted in the Blessed One's words.
And while this explanation was being given, Ven.
Rahula's mind, through no clinging, was fully released from fermentations.
And to those many thousands of devas there arose the dustless, stainless Dhamma eye: “Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.
See also: MN; MN.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks: “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded to him.
“Monks, I will teach you the Dhamma admirable in the beginning, admirable in the middle, admirable in the end; I will expound the holy life both in its particulars & in its essence, entirely complete, surpassingly pure — in other words, the six sextets.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said: “The six internal media should be known.
The six external media should be known.
The six classes of consciousness should be known.
The six classes of contact should be known.
The six classes of feeling should be known.
The six classes of craving should be known.
“'The six internal media should be known.' Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
The eye-medium, the ear-medium, the nose-medium, the tongue-medium, the body-medium, the intellect-medium.
'The six internal media should be known.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
This is the first sextet.
“'The six external media should be known.' Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
The form-medium, the sound-medium, the aroma-medium, the flavor-medium, the tactile sensation-medium, the idea-medium.
'The six external media should be known.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
This is the second sextet.
“'The six classes of consciousness should be known.' Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
Dependent on the eye & forms there arises consciousness at the eye.
Dependent on the ear & sounds there arises consciousness at the ear.
Dependent on the nose & aromas there arises consciousness at the nose.
Dependent on the tongue & flavors there arises consciousness at the tongue.
Dependent on the body & tactile sensations there arises consciousness at the body.
Dependent on the intellect & ideas there arises consciousness at the intellect.
'The six classes of consciousness should be known.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
This is the third sextet.
“'The six classes of contact should be known.' Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
Dependent on the eye & forms there arises consciousness at the eye.
The meeting of the three is contact.
Dependent on the ear & sounds there arises consciousness at the ear.
The meeting of the three is contact.
Dependent on the nose & aromas there arises consciousness at the nose.
The meeting of the three is contact.
Dependent on the tongue & flavors there arises consciousness at the tongue.
The meeting of the three is contact.
Dependent on the body & tactile sensations there arises consciousness at the body.
The meeting of the three is contact.
Dependent on the intellect & ideas there arises consciousness at the intellect.
The meeting of the three is contact.
'The six classes of contact should be known.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
This is the fourth sextet.
“'The six classes of feeling should be known.' Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
Dependent on the eye & forms there arises consciousness at the eye.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition there is feeling.
Dependent on the ear & sounds there arises consciousness at the ear.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition there is feeling.
Dependent on the nose & aromas there arises consciousness at the nose.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition there is feeling.
Dependent on the tongue & flavors there arises consciousness at the tongue.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition there is feeling.
Dependent on the body & tactile sensations there arises consciousness at the body.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition there is feeling.
Dependent on the intellect & ideas there arises consciousness at the intellect.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition there is feeling.
'The six classes of feeling should be known.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
This is the fifth sextet.
“'The six classes of craving should be known.' Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
Dependent on the eye & forms there arises consciousness at the eye.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition there is feeling.
With feeling as a requisite condition there is craving.
Dependent on the ear & sounds there arises consciousness at the ear.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition there is feeling.
With feeling as a requisite condition there is craving.
Dependent on the nose & aromas there arises consciousness at the nose.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition there is feeling.
With feeling as a requisite condition there is craving.
Dependent on the tongue & flavors there arises consciousness at the tongue.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition there is feeling.
With feeling as a requisite condition there is craving.
Dependent on the body & tactile sensations there arises consciousness at the body.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition there is feeling.
With feeling as a requisite condition there is craving.
Dependent on the intellect & ideas there arises consciousness at the intellect.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition there is feeling.
With feeling as a requisite condition there is craving.
'The six classes of craving should be known.' Thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
This is the sixth sextet.
“If anyone were to say, 'The eye is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable.
The arising & falling away of the eye are discerned.
And when its arising & falling away are discerned, it would follow that 'My self arises & falls away.' That's why it wouldn't be tenable if anyone were to say, 'The eye is the self.' So the eye is not-self.
If anyone were to say, 'Forms are the self,' that wouldn't be tenable… Thus the eye is not-self and forms are not-self.
If anyone were to say, 'Consciousness at the eye is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable… Thus the eye is not-self, forms are not-self, consciousness at the eye is not-self.
If anyone were to say, 'Contact at the eye is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable… Thus the eye is not-self, forms are not-self, consciousness at the eye is not-self, contact at the eye is not-self.
If anyone were to say, 'Feeling is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable… Thus the eye is not-self, forms are not-self, consciousness at the eye is not-self, contact at the eye is not-self, feeling is not self.
If anyone were to say, 'Craving is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable.
The arising & falling away of craving are discerned.
And when its arising & falling away are discerned, it would follow that 'My self arises & falls away.' That's why it wouldn't be tenable if anyone were to say, 'Craving is the self.' Thus the eye is not-self, forms are not-self, consciousness at the eye is not-self, contact at the eye is not-self, feeling is not self, craving is not-self.
“If anyone were to say, 'The ear is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable…
“If anyone were to say, 'The nose is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable…
“If anyone were to say, 'The tongue is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable…
“If anyone were to say, 'The body is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable…
“If anyone were to say, 'The intellect is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable.
The arising & falling away of the intellect are discerned.
And when its arising & falling away are discerned, it would follow that 'My self arises & falls away.' That's why it wouldn't be tenable if anyone were to say, 'The intellect is the self.' So the intellect is not-self.
If anyone were to say, 'Ideas are the self,' that wouldn't be tenable… Thus the intellect is not-self and ideas are not-self.
If anyone were to say, 'Consciousness at the intellect is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable… Thus the intellect is not-self, ideas are not-self, consciousness at the intellect is not-self.
If anyone were to say, 'Contact at the intellect is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable… Thus the intellect is not-self, ideas are not-self, consciousness at the intellect is not-self, contact at the intellect is not-self.
If anyone were to say, 'Feeling is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable… Thus the intellect is not-self, ideas are not-self, consciousness at the intellect is not-self, contact at the intellect is not-self, feeling is not self.
If anyone were to say, 'Craving is the self,' that wouldn't be tenable.
The arising & falling away of craving are discerned.
And when its arising & falling away are discerned, it would follow that 'My self arises & falls away.' That's why it wouldn't be tenable if anyone were to say, 'Craving is the self.' Thus the intellect is not-self, ideas are not-self, consciousness at the intellect is not-self, contact at the intellect is not-self, feeling is not self, craving is not-self.
“This, monks, is the path of practice leading to self-identification.
One assumes about the eye that 'This is me, this is my self, this is what I am.' One assumes about forms… One assumes about consciousness at the eye… One assumes about contact at the eye… One assumes about feeling… One assumes about craving that 'This is me, this is my self, this is what I am.'
“One assumes about the ear…
“One assumes about the nose…
“One assumes about the tongue…
“One assumes about the body…
“One assumes about the intellect that 'This is me, this is my self, this is what I am.' One assumes about ideas… One assumes about consciousness at the intellect… One assumes about contact at the intellect… One assumes about feeling… One assumes about craving that 'This is me, this is my self, this is what I am.'
“Now, this is the path of practice leading to the cessation of self-identification.
One assumes about the eye that 'This is not me, this is not my self, this is not what I am.' One assumes about forms… One assumes about consciousness at the eye… One assumes about contact at the eye… One assumes about feeling… One assumes about craving that 'This is not me, this is not my self, this is not what I am.'
“One assumes about the ear…
“One assumes about the nose…
“One assumes about the tongue…
“One assumes about the body…
“One assumes about the intellect that 'This is not me, this is not my self, this is not what I am.' One assumes about ideas… One assumes about consciousness at the intellect… One assumes about contact at the intellect… One assumes about feeling… One assumes about craving that 'This is not me, this is not my self, this is not what I am.'
“Dependent on the eye & forms there arises consciousness at the eye.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition, there arises what is felt either as pleasure, pain, or neither pleasure nor pain.
If, when touched by a feeling of pleasure, one relishes it, welcomes it, or remains fastened to it, then one's passion-obsession gets obsessed.
If, when touched by a feeling of pain, one sorrows, grieves, & laments, beats one's breast, becomes distraught, then one's resistance-obsession gets obsessed.
If, when touched by a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, one does not discern, as it actually is present, the origination, passing away, allure, drawback, or escape from that feeling, then one's ignorance-obsession gets obsessed.
That a person — without abandoning passion-obsession with regard to a feeling of pleasure, without abolishing resistance-obsession with regard to a feeling of pain, without uprooting ignorance-obsession with regard to a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, without abandoning ignorance and giving rise to clear knowing — would put an end to suffering & stress in the here & now: such a thing isn't possible.
“Dependent on the ear & sounds…
“Dependent on the nose & aromas…
“Dependent on the tongue & flavors…
“Dependent on the body & tactile sensations…
“Dependent on the intellect & ideas there arises consciousness at the intellect.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition, there arises what is felt either as pleasure, pain, or neither pleasure nor pain.
If, when touched by a feeling of pleasure, one relishes it, welcomes it, or remains fastened to it, then one's passion-obsession gets obsessed.
If, when touched by a feeling of pain, one sorrows, grieves, & laments, beats one's breast, becomes distraught, then one's resistance-obsession gets obsessed.
If, when touched by a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, one does not discern, as it actually is present, the origination, passing away, allure, drawback, or escape from that feeling, then one's ignorance-obsession gets obsessed.
That a person — without abandoning passion-obsession with regard to a feeling of pleasure, without abolishing resistance-obsession with regard to a feeling of pain, without uprooting ignorance-obsession with regard to a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, without abandoning ignorance and giving rise to clear knowing — would put an end to suffering & stress in the here & now: such a thing isn't possible.
“Dependent on the eye & forms there arises consciousness at the eye.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition, there arises what is felt either as pleasure, pain, or neither pleasure nor pain.
If, when touched by a feeling of pleasure, one does not relish it, welcome it, or remain fastened to it, then one's passion-obsession doesn't get obsessed.
If, when touched by a feeling of pain, one does not sorrow, grieve, or lament, beat one's breast or become distraught, then one's resistance obsession doesn't get obsessed.
If, when touched by a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, one discerns, as it actually is present, the origination, passing away, allure, drawback, & escape from that feeling, then one's ignorance-obsession doesn't get obsessed.
That a person — through abandoning passion-obsession with regard to a feeling of pleasure, through abolishing resistance-obsession with regard to a feeling of pain, through uprooting ignorance-obsession with regard to a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, through abandoning ignorance and giving rise to clear knowing — would put an end to suffering & stress in the here & now: such a thing is possible.
“Dependent on the ear & sounds…
“Dependent on the nose & aromas…
“Dependent on the tongue & flavors…
“Dependent on the body & tactile sensations…
“Dependent on the intellect & ideas there arises consciousness at the intellect.
The meeting of the three is contact.
With contact as a requisite condition, there arises what is felt either as pleasure, pain, or neither pleasure nor pain.
If, when touched by a feeling of pleasure, one does not relish it, welcome it, or remain fastened to it, then one's passion-obsession doesn't get obsessed.
If, when touched by a feeling of pain, one does not sorrow, grieve, or lament, beat one's breast or become distraught, then one's resistance obsession doesn't get obsessed.
If, when touched by a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, one discerns, as it actually is present, the origination, passing away, allure, drawback, & escape from that feeling, then one's ignorance-obsession doesn't get obsessed.
That a person — through abandoning passion-obsession with regard to a feeling of pleasure, through abolishing resistance-obsession with regard to a feeling of pain, through uprooting ignorance-obsession with regard to a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, through abandoning ignorance and giving rise to clear knowing — would put an end to suffering & stress in the here & now: such a thing is possible.
“Seeing thus, the well-instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with the eye, disenchanted with forms, disenchanted with consciousness at the eye, disenchanted with contact at the eye, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with craving.
“He grows disenchanted with the ear…
“He grows disenchanted with the nose…
“He grows disenchanted with the tongue…
“He grows disenchanted with the body…
“He grows disenchanted with the intellect, disenchanted with ideas, disenchanted with consciousness at the intellect, disenchanted with contact at the intellect, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with craving.
Disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate.
Through dispassion, he is fully released.
With full release, there is the knowledge, 'Fully released.' He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.' That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted at his words.
And while this explanation was being given, the hearts of monks, through no clinging, were fully released from fermentation/effluents.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi, at Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then Mahapajapati Gotami, together with about other nuns, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, stood to one side.
As she was standing there she said to him, “Exhort the nuns, lord.
Instruct the nuns, lord.
Give the nuns a talk on Dhamma.
Now at that time the elder monks were taking turns in exhorting the nuns, but Ven.
Nandaka didn't want to exhort the nuns when his turn came.
So the Blessed One addressed Ven.
Ananda: “Ananda, whose turn is it to exhort the nuns today?
“Lord, everyone has taken his turn in exhorting the nuns, except for Ven.
Nandaka, here, who doesn't want to exhort the nuns when his turn comes.
Then the Blessed One addressed Ven.
Nandaka: “Exhort the nuns, Nandaka.
Instruct the nuns, Nandaka.
Give the nuns a talk on Dhamma, brahman.
“As you say, lord,” Ven.
Nandaka replied.
Then, early in the morning, having put on his robes and carrying his bowl & outer robe, he went into Rajagaha for alms.
After his meal, on returning from his alms round, he went with a companion to Rajaka Park.
The nuns saw him coming from afar and, on seeing him, arranged a seat and set out water for his feet.
Ven.
Nandaka sat down on the arranged seat and washed his feet.
The nuns bowed down to him and sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, Ven.
Nandaka said to them: “This will be a question-response talk, sisters.
Where you understand, you should say, 'We understand.' Where you don't, you should say, 'We don't understand.' Where you are doubtful or perplexed, you should question me in response: 'How is this, venerable sir?
What is the meaning of this?' “Venerable sir, we are gratified & delighted that you invite us in this way.
“So then, sisters, what do you think: Is the eye constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.” “And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?” “Stressful, venerable sir.” “And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, venerable sir.
“… Is the ear constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.”…
”… Is the nose constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.”…
”… Is the tongue constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.”…
”… Is the body constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.”…
“What do you think, sisters: Is the intellect constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.” “And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?” “Stressful, venerable sir.” “And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, venerable sir.
Why is that?
Because we have already seen it well as it actually is, with right discernment, that these six internal media are inconstant.
“Good, good, sisters.
That's how it is for a disciple of the noble ones who has seen it as it actually is with right discernment.
“Now what do you think, sisters: Are forms constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.” “And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?” “Stressful, venerable sir.” “And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, venerable sir.
“… Are sounds constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.”…
”… Are aromas constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.”…
”… Are flavors constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.”…
”… Are tactile sensations constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.”…
“What do you think, sisters: Are ideas constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.” “And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?” “Stressful, venerable sir.” “And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, venerable sir.
Why is that?
Because we have already seen it well as it actually is, with right discernment, that these six external media are also inconstant.
“Good, good, sisters.
That's how it is for a disciple of the noble ones who has seen it as it actually is with right discernment.
“Now what do you think, sisters: Is eye-consciousness constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.” “And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?” “Stressful, venerable sir.” “And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, venerable sir.
“… Is ear-consciousness constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.”…
”… Is nose-consciousness constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.”…
”… Is tongue-consciousness constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.”…
”… Is body-consciousness constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.”…
“What do you think, sisters: Is intellect-consciousness constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, venerable sir.” “And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?” “Stressful, venerable sir.” “And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, venerable sir.
Why is that?
Because we have already seen it well as it actually is, with right discernment, that these six consciousness-groups, too, are inconstant.
“Good, good, sisters.
That's how it is for a disciple of the noble ones who has seen it as it actually is with right discernment.
“Just as when the oil in a burning oil lamp is inconstant & subject to change, its wick is inconstant & subject to change, its flame is inconstant & subject to change, its light is inconstant & subject to change.
If someone were to say, 'The oil in that burning oil lamp is inconstant & subject to change, its wick is inconstant & subject to change, its flame is inconstant & subject to change, but as for its light, that is constant, everlasting, eternal, & not subject to change': would he be speaking rightly?
“No, venerable sir.
Why is that?
Because the oil in that burning oil lamp is inconstant & subject to change, its wick is inconstant & subject to change, its flame is inconstant & subject to change, so how much more should its light be inconstant & subject to change.
“In the same way, sisters, if someone were to say, 'My six internal media are inconstant, but what I experience based on the six internal media — pleasure, pain, or neither pleasure nor pain — that is constant, everlasting, eternal, & not subject to change': would he be speaking rightly?
“No, venerable sir.
Why is that?
Because each feeling arises dependent on its corresponding condition.
With the cessation of its corresponding condition, it ceases.
“Good, good, sisters.
That's how it is for a disciple of the noble ones who has seen it as it actually is with right discernment.
“Just as when the root of a great, standing tree — possessed of heartwood — is inconstant & subject to change, its trunk is inconstant & subject to change, its branches & foliage are inconstant & subject to change, its shadow is inconstant & subject to change.
If someone were to say, 'The root of that great, standing tree — possessed of heartwood — is inconstant & subject to change, its trunk is inconstant & subject to change, its branches & foliage are inconstant & subject to change, but as for its shadow, that is constant, everlasting, eternal, & not subject to change': would he be speaking rightly?
“No, venerable sir.
Why is that?
Because the root of that great, standing tree — possessed of heartwood — is inconstant & subject to change, its trunk is inconstant & subject to change, its branches & foliage are inconstant & subject to change, so how much more should its shadow be inconstant & subject to change.
“In the same way, sisters, if someone were to say, 'My six external media are inconstant, but what I experience based on the six internal media — pleasure, pain, or neither pleasure nor pain — that is constant, everlasting, eternal, & not subject to change': would he be speaking rightly?
“No, venerable sir.
Why is that?
Because each feeling arises dependent on its corresponding condition.
With the cessation of its corresponding condition, it ceases.
“Good, good, sisters.
That's how it is for a disciple of the noble ones who has seen it as it actually is with right discernment.
“Just as if a skilled butcher or butcher's apprentice, having killed a cow, were to carve it up with a sharp carving knife so that — without damaging the substance of the inner flesh, without damaging the substance of the outer hide — he would cut, sever, & detach only the skin muscles, connective tissues, & attachments in between.
Having cut, severed, & detached the outer skin, and then covering the cow again with that very skin, if he were to say that the cow was joined to the skin just as it had been: would he be speaking rightly?
“No, venerable sir.
Why is that?
Because if the skilled butcher or butcher's apprentice, having killed a cow, were to… cut, sever, & detach only the skin muscles, connective tissues, & attachments in between; and… having covered the cow again with that very skin, then no matter how much he might say that the cow was joined to the skin just as it had been, the cow would still be disjoined from the skin.
“This simile, sisters, I have given to convey a message.
The message is this: The substance of the inner flesh stands for the six internal media; the substance of the outer hide, for the six external media.
The skin muscles, connective tissues, & attachments in between stand for passion & delight.
And the sharp knife stands for noble discernment — the noble discernment that cuts, severs, & detaches the defilements, fetters, & bonds in between.
“Sisters, there are these seven factors for awakening through whose development & pursuit a monk enters & remains in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having directly known & realized them for himself right in the here & now.
Which seven?
There is the case where a monk develops mindfulness as a factor for awakening dependent on seclusion, dependent on dispassion, dependent on cessation, resulting in relinquishment.
He develops analysis of qualities as a factor for awakening… persistence as a factor for awakening… rapture as a factor for awakening… serenity as a factor for awakening… concentration as a factor for awakening… equanimity as a factor for awakening dependent on seclusion, dependent on dispassion, dependent on cessation, resulting in relinquishment.
These are the seven factors for awakening through whose development & pursuit a monk enters & remains in the fermentation-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having directly known & realized them for himself right in the here & now.
Then, having exhorted the nuns with this exhortation, Ven.
Nandaka dismissed them, saying, “Go, sisters.
The time has come.” The nuns, delighting in and approving of Ven.
Nandaka's exhortation, got up from their seats, bowed down to him, circumambulated him — keeping him to the right — and went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, they stood to one side.
As they were standing there, the Blessed One said to them, “Go, nuns.
The time has come.” So the nuns, having bowed down to the Blessed One, circumambulated him — keeping him to the right — and departed.
Then not long after the nuns' departure the Blessed One addressed the monks: “Monks, just as on the uposatha day of the fourteenth, people at large are not doubtful or perplexed as to whether the moon is lacking or full, for it is clearly lacking; in the same way, even though the nuns are gratified with Nandaka's Dhamma-teaching, their resolves have not yet been fulfilled.” So he addressed Ven.
Nandaka: “In that case, Nandaka, exhort the nuns again tomorrow with the exact same exhortation.
“As you say, lord,” Ven.
Nandaka replied.
Then, after the night had passed, early in the morning, having put on his robes and carrying his bowl & outer robe, he went into Rajagaha for alms… 
Then not long after the nuns' departure the Blessed One addressed the monks: “Monks, just as on the uposatha day of the fifteenth, people at large are not doubtful or perplexed as to whether the moon is lacking or full, for it is clearly full; in the same way, the nuns are gratified with Nandaka's Dhamma-teaching, and their resolves have been fulfilled.
Of these nuns, the most backward is a stream-winner, not destined for the planes of deprivation, headed to self-awakening for sure.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted in the Blessed One's words.
Translator's note: This systematic exploration of the phenomenal field of human experience is a powerful exercise in non-attachment.
No need to wait until lying on your death bed to undertake it.
Put aside an hour, find a quiet place, and try working through this map of the inner landscape, step by step.
On one occasion the householder Anathapindika was afflicted, suffering, and gravely ill.
The venerable Sariputta dressed, and taking his bowl and outer robe, went to the residence of Anathapindika with Ananda as his attendant.
Having gone there, he sat down on a seat made ready and said to Anathapindika: “I hope you are getting well, I hope you are comfortable.
I hope your painful feelings are subsiding and not increasing.
“Venerable Sariputta, I am not getting well, I am not comfortable.
My painful feelings are increasing, not subsiding.
Just as if a strong man were splitting my head open with a sharp sword, so too violent winds cut through my head.
Just as if a strong man were tightening a tough leather strap around my head as a headband, so too there are violent pains in my head.
Just as if a skilled butcher or his apprentice were to carve up an ox's belly with a sharp butcher's knife, so too violent winds are carving up my belly.
Just as if two strong men were to seize a weaker man by both arms and roast him over a pit of hot coals, so too there is a violent burning in my body.
I am not getting well, I am not comfortable.
My painful feelings are increasing, not subsiding.
“Then, householder, you should train thus:
When this was said, Anathapindika wept and shed tears.
Then Ananda asked him, “Are you foundering, householder, are you sinking?
“I am not foundering, Ananda, I am not sinking.
But although I have long waited upon the Teacher and bhikkhus worthy of esteem, never before have I heard such a talk on the Dhamma.
“Such talk on the Dhamma is not given to lay people clothed in white, but only to those who have gone forth.
“Well, then, Sariputta, let such talk on the Dhamma be given to lay people clothed in white.
There are people with little dust in their eyes who are wasting away through not hearing such talk on the Dhamma.
There will be those who will understand.
Then, after giving Anathapindika this advice, Sariputta and Ananda rose from their seats and departed.
Soon after they had left, the householder Anathapindika died and reappeared in the Tushita heaven.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Varanasi in the Game Refuge at Isipatana.
There he addressed the monks: “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said, “Monks, at Varanasi, in the Game Refuge at Isipatana, the Tathagatha — the worthy one, the rightly self-awakened one — set in motion the unexcelled Wheel of Dhamma that cannot be stopped by brahman or contemplative, deity, Mara, or Brahma or anyone at all in the cosmos: in other words, the declaration, teaching, description, setting-forth, revelation, explanation, and making-plain of the four noble truths.
Of which four?
The declaration, teaching, description, setting-forth, revelation, explanation, and making-plain of the noble truth of stress.
The declaration, teaching, description, setting forth, revelation, explanation, and making-plain of the noble truth of the origination of stress… the noble truth of the cessation of stress… the noble truth of the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.
At Varanasi, in the Game Refuge at Isipatana, the Tathagatha — the worthy one, the rightly self-awakened one — set in motion the unexcelled Wheel of Dhamma that cannot be stopped by brahman or contemplative, deity, Mara, or Brahma or anyone at all in the cosmos: in other words, the declaration, teaching, description, setting-forth, revelation, explanation, and making-plain of these four noble truths.
“Monks, associate with Sariputta & Moggallana.
Consort with Sariputta & Moggallana.
They are wise monks, sympathetic toward their fellows in the holy life.
Like the mother giving birth: That's Sariputta.
Like the nurse raising a child after it's born: That's Moggallana.
Sariputta trains to the fruit of stream-entry; Moggallana, to the highest goal.
Sariputta is capable of declaring, teaching, describing, setting forth, revealing, explaining, and making plain the four noble truths in detail.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said it, he — the One Well-gone — rose from his seat and entered his dwelling.
Then Ven.
Sariputta, not long after the Blessed One had left, addressed the monks, “Friends!
“Yes, friend,” the monks responded.
Ven.
Sariputta said, “Friends, at Varanasi, in the Game Refuge at Isipatana, the Tathagatha — the worthy one, the rightly self-awakened one — set in motion the unexcelled Wheel of Dhamma that cannot be stopped by brahman or contemplative, deity, Mara, or Brahma or anyone at all in the cosmos: in other words, the declaration, teaching, description, setting-forth, revelation, explanation, and making-plain of the four noble truths.
Of which four?
The declaration, teaching, description, setting-forth, revelation, explanation, and making-plain of the noble truth of stress… the noble truth of the origination of stress… the noble truth of the cessation of stress… the noble truth of the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.
At Varanasi, in the Game Refuge at Isipatana, the Tathagatha — the worthy one, the rightly self-awakened one — set in motion the unexcelled Wheel of Dhamma that cannot be stopped by brahman or contemplative, deity, Mara, or Brahma or anyone at all in the cosmos: in other words, the declaration, teaching, description, setting-forth, revelation, explanation, and making-plain of these four noble truths.
“Now what, friends, is the noble truth of stress?
Birth is stressful, aging is stressful, death is stressful; sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair are stressful; not getting what is wanted is stressful.
In short, the five clinging-aggregates are stressful.
“And what is birth?
Whatever birth, taking birth, descent, coming-to-be, coming-forth, appearance of aggregates, & acquisition of spheres of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called birth.
“And what is aging?
Whatever aging, decrepitude, brokenness, graying, wrinkling, decline of life-force, weakening of the faculties of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called aging.
“And what is death?
Whatever deceasing, passing away, breaking up, disappearance, dying, death, completion of time, break up of the aggregates, casting off of the body, interruption in the life faculty of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called death.
“And what is sorrow?
Whatever sorrow, sorrowing, sadness, inward sorrow, inward sadness of anyone suffering from misfortune, touched by a painful thing, that is called sorrow.
“And what is lamentation?
Whatever crying, grieving, lamenting, weeping, wailing, lamentation of anyone suffering from misfortune, touched by a painful thing, that is called lamentation.
“And what is pain?
Whatever is experienced as bodily pain, bodily discomfort, pain or discomfort born of bodily contact, that is called pain.
“And what is distress?
Whatever is experienced as mental pain, mental discomfort, pain or discomfort born of mental contact, that is called distress.
“And what is despair?
Whatever despair, despondency, desperation of anyone suffering from misfortune, touched by a painful thing, that is called despair.
“And what is the stress of not getting what is wanted?
In beings subject to birth, the wish arises, 'O, may we not be subject to birth, and may birth not come to us.' But this is not to be achieved by wanting.
This is the stress of not getting what is wanted.
In beings subject to aging… illness… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, the wish arises, 'O, may we not be subject to aging… illness… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, and may aging… illness… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair not come to us.' But this is not to be achieved by wanting.
This is the stress of not getting what is wanted.
“And what are the five clinging-aggregates that, in short, are stressful?
The clinging-aggregate of form, the clinging-aggregate of feeling, the clinging-aggregate of perception, the clinging-aggregate of fabrications, the clinging-aggregate of consciousness: These are called the five clinging-aggregates that, in short, are stressful.
“This, friends, is called the noble truth of stress.
“And what, friends, is the noble truth of the origination of stress?
The craving that makes for further becoming — accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now here & now there — i.e., craving for sensuality, craving for becoming, craving for non-becoming.
“This is called the noble truth of the origination of stress.
“And what, friends, is the noble truth of the cessation of stress?
The remainderless fading & cessation, renunciation, relinquishment, release, & letting go of that very craving.
“This is called the noble truth of the cessation of stress.
“And what, friends, is the noble truth of the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress?
Just this very noble eightfold path: right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
“And what is right view?
Knowledge with reference to stress, knowledge with reference to the origination of stress, knowledge with reference to the cessation of stress, knowledge with reference to the way of practice leading to the cessation of stress: This is called right view.
And what is right resolve?
The resolve for renunciation, for freedom from ill will, for harmlessness: This is called right resolve.
“And what is right speech?
Abstaining from lying, from divisive speech, from abusive speech, & from idle chatter: This is called right speech.
“And what is right action?
Abstaining from taking life, from stealing, & from sexual misconduct: This is called right action.
“And what is right livelihood?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones, having abandoned dishonest livelihood, keeps his life going with right livelihood: This is called right livelihood.
“And what is right effort?
There is the case where a monk generates desire, endeavors, arouses persistence, upholds & exerts his intent for the sake of the non-arising of evil, unskillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the sake of the abandoning of evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen… for the sake of the arising of skillful qualities that have not yet arisen… for the maintenance, non-confusion, increase, plenitude, development, & culmination of skillful qualities that have arisen: This is called right effort.
“And what is right mindfulness?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings in & of themselves… the mind in & of itself… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
This is called right mindfulness.
“And what is right concentration?
There is the case where a monk — quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities — enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
With the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
With the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' With the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
This is called right concentration.
“This is called the noble truth of the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.
“Friends, at Varanasi, in the Game Refuge at Isipatana, the Tathagatha — the worthy one, the rightly self-awakened one — set in motion the unexcelled Wheel of Dhamma that cannot be stopped by brahman or contemplative, deity, Mara, or Brahma or anyone at all in the cosmos: in other words, the declaration, teaching, description, setting-forth, revelation, explanation, and making-plain of these four noble truths.
That is what Ven.
Sariputta said.
Gratified, the monks delighted in Ven.
Sariputta's words.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi, in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
And on that occasion Anathapindika the householder was diseased, in pain, severely ill.
Then Anathapindika the householder said to one of his men, “Come, my good man.
Go to the Blessed One and, on arrival, pay homage to his feet with your head in my name and say 'Lord, Anathapindika the householder is diseased, in pain, severely ill.
He pays homage with his head to the Blessed One's feet.' Then go to Ven.
Sariputta and, on arrival, pay homage to his feet with your head in my name and say 'Venerable sir, Anathapindika the householder is diseased, in pain, severely ill.
He pays homage with his head to your feet.' Then say: 'It would be good if Ven.
Sariputta would visit Anathapindika's home, out of sympathy for him.' Responding, “As you say, lord,” to Anathapindika the householder, the man went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, bowed down to him and sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said, “Lord, Anathapindika the householder is diseased, in pain, severely ill.
He pays homage with his head to the Blessed One's feet.” Then he went to Ven.
Sariputta and, on arrival, bowed down to him and sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said, 'Venerable sir, Anathapindika the householder is diseased, in pain, severely ill.
He pays homage with his head to Ven.
Sariputta's feet.” Then he said, “It would be good if Ven.
Sariputta would visit Anathapindika's home, out of sympathy for him.” Ven.
Sariputta acquiesced through silence.
Then Ven.
Sariputta, having put on his robes and, taking his bowl & outer robe, went to the home of Anathapindika the householder with Ven.
Ananda as his attendant.
On arrival, he sat down on a prepared seat and said to Anathapindika the householder: “I trust you are getting better, householder?
I trust you are comfortable?
I trust that your pains are lessening and not increasing?
I trust that there are signs of their lessening, and not of their increasing?
“I am not getting better, venerable sir.
I am not comfortable.
My severe pains are increasing, not lessening.
There are signs of their increasing, and not of their lessening.
Extreme forces slice through my head, just as if a strong man were slicing my head open with a sharp sword… Extreme pains have arisen in my head, just as if a strong man were tightening a turban on my head with a tough leather strap… Extreme forces carve up my stomach cavity, just as if an expert butcher or his apprentice were to carve up the stomach cavity of an ox with a sharp butcher's knife… There is an extreme burning in my body, just as if two strong men, seizing a weaker man with their arms, were to roast and broil him over a pit of hot embers.
I am not getting better, venerable sir.
I am not comfortable.
My severe pains are increasing, not lessening.
There are signs of their increasing, and not of their lessening.
“Then, householder, you should train yourself in this way: 'I won't cling to the eye; my consciousness will not be dependent on the eye.' That's how you should train yourself.
'I won't cling to the ear… nose… tongue… body; my consciousness will not be dependent on the body.'… 'I won't cling to the intellect; my consciousness will not be dependent on the intellect.' That's how you should train yourself.
“Then, householder, you should train yourself in this way: 'I won't cling to forms… sounds… smells… tastes… tactile sensations; my consciousness will not be dependent on tactile sensations.'… 'I won't cling to ideas; my consciousness will not be dependent on ideas.' That's how you should train yourself.
“Then, householder, you should train yourself in this way: 'I won't cling to eye-consciousness… ear-consciousness… nose-consciousness… tongue-consciousness… body-consciousness; my consciousness will not be dependent on body-consciousness.'… 'I won't cling to intellect-consciousness; my consciousness will not be dependent on intellect-consciousness.' That's how you should train yourself.
“Then, householder, you should train yourself in this way: 'I won't cling to contact at the eye… contact at the ear… contact at the nose… contact at the tongue… contact at the body; my consciousness will not be dependent on contact at the body.'… 'I won't cling to contact at the intellect; my consciousness will not be dependent on contact at the intellect.' That's how you should train yourself.
“Then, householder, you should train yourself in this way: 'I won't cling to feeling born of contact at the eye… feeling born of contact at the ear… feeling born of contact at the nose… feeling born of contact at the tongue… feeling born of contact at the body; my consciousness will not be dependent on feeling born of contact at the body.'… 'I won't cling to feeling born of contact at the intellect; my consciousness will not be dependent on feeling born of contact at the intellect.' That's how you should train yourself.
“Then, householder, you should train yourself in this way: 'I won't cling to the earth property… liquid property… fire property… wind property… space property; my consciousness will not be dependent on the space property.'… 'I won't cling to the consciousness property; my consciousness will not be dependent on the consciousness property.' That's how you should train yourself.
“Then, householder, you should train yourself in this way: 'I won't cling to form… feeling… perception… thought-fabrications; my consciousness will not be dependent on thought-fabrications.'… 'I won't cling to consciousness; my consciousness will not be dependent on consciousness.' That's how you should train yourself.
“Then, householder, you should train yourself in this way: 'I won't cling to the dimension of the infinitude of space… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness; my consciousness will not be dependent on the dimension of nothingness.'… 'I won't cling to the sphere of neither perception nor non-perception; my consciousness will not be dependent on the sphere of neither perception nor non-perception.' That's how you should train yourself.
“Then, householder, you should train yourself in this way: 'I won't cling to this world; my consciousness will not be dependent on this world… I won't cling to the world beyond; my consciousness will not be dependent on the world beyond.' That's how you should train yourself.
“Then, householder, you should train yourself in this way: 'I won't cling to what is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, pondered by the intellect; my consciousness will not be dependent on that.' That's how you should train yourself.
When this was said, Anathapindika the householder wept and shed tears.
Ven.
Ananda said to him, “Are you sinking, householder?
Are you foundering?
“No, venerable sir.
I'm not sinking, nor am I foundering.
It's just that for a long time I have attended to the Teacher, and to the monks who inspire my heart, but never before have I heard a talk on the Dhamma like this.
“This sort of talk on the Dhamma, householder, is not given to lay people clad in white.
This sort of talk on the Dhamma is given to those gone forth.
“In that case, Ven.
Sariputta, please let this sort of talk on the Dhamma be given to lay people clad in white.
There are clansmen with little dust in their eyes who are wasting away through not hearing Dhamma.
There will be those who will understand it.
Then Ven.
Sariputta and Ven.
Ananda, having given this instruction to Anathapindika the householder, got up from their seats and left.
Then, not long after they left, Anathapindika the householder died and reappeared in the Tusita heaven.
Then Anathapindika the deva's son, in the far extreme of the night, his extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of Jeta's Grove, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, bowed down to him and stood to one side.
As he was standing there, he addressed the Blessed One with this verse:
That is what Anathapindika the deva's son said.
The Teacher approved.
Then Anathapindika the deva's son, “The Teacher has approved of me,” bowed down to him, circled him three times, keeping him to his right, and then disappeared right there.
Then when the night had past, The Blessed One addressed the monks: “Last night, monks, a certain deva's son in the far extreme of the night, his extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of Jeta's Grove, came to me and, on arrival, bowed down to me and stood to one side.
As he was standing there, he addressed me with this verse:
“That is what the deva's son said.
And, 'The Teacher has approved of me,' he bowed down to me, circled me three times, and then disappeared right there.
When this was said, Ven.
Ananda said to the Blessed One, “Lord, that must have been Anathapindika the deva's son.
Anathapindika the householder had supreme confidence in Ven.
Sariputta.
“Very good, Ananda.
Very good, to the extent that you have deduced what can be arrived at through logic.
That was Anathapindika the deva's son, and no one else.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, Ven.
Ananda delighted in the Blessed One's words.
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Blessed One was living in the Deer Park at Isipatana near Varanasi.
Then he addressed the monks saying: “O Monks.” “Venerable Sir,” replied those monks in assent to the Blessed One.
Thereupon he said:
“The matchless Wheel of Dhamma set in motion by the Tathagata, the Consummate One, the supremely Enlightened One, in the Deer Park at Isipatana near Varanasi, cannot be set in motion by a recluse or brahmana or Deva or Mara or Brahma or by anyone in the world.
That is to say, it was a proclamation of the Four Noble Truths, by way of teaching, laying down, establishing, opening up, analyzing, and elucidating them.
“Of what four: It was a proclamation of the Noble Truth of suffering, by way of teaching… and elucidating it; of the Noble Truth of the arising of suffering… of the Noble Truth of the cessation of suffering… of the Noble Truth of the Path leading to the cessation of suffering.
This matchless Wheel of Dhamma, monks, set in motion by the Tathagata, the Consummate One, the supremely Enlightened One, in the Deer Park at Isipatana near Varanasi, cannot be set in motion by a recluse… or by anyone in the world.
That is to say, it was a proclamation of the Four Noble Truths, by way of teaching, laying down, establishing, opening up, analyzing, and elucidating them.
“Monks, follow Sariputta and Moggallana; associate with Sariputta and Moggallana.
Wise monks do help those who live the holy life.
Monks, Sariputta is like unto a mother, Moggallana is like unto a foster-mother to a child.
Sariputta, monks, trains in the path of stream-attainment.
Moggallana in the highest goal.
Sariputta, monks, is able to proclaim, teach, lay down, establish, open up, analyze, and elucidate the Four Noble Truths.
This the Blessed One said, and having said so, the Welcome Being rose from his seat and entered abode.
Not long after the Blessed One had departed, the Venerable Sariputta addressed the monks, saying: “Reverend friends.” “Your reverence,” the monks replied the Venerable Sariputta in assent.
This the Venerable Sariputta said:
“Your reverence, the matchless Wheel of Dhamma set in motion by the Tathagata, the Consummate One, the supremely Enlightened One, in the Deer Park, at Isipatana near Varanasi, cannot be set in motion by a recluse or brahmana… in the world.
That is to say, it was a proclamation of the Four Noble Truths, by way of teaching, laying down, establishing, opening up, analyzing, and elucidating them.
“Of what four?
It was a proclamation of the Noble Truth of suffering by way of teaching… elucidating it; of the Noble Truth of the arising of suffering… of the Noble Truth of the cessation of suffering… of the Noble Truth of the Path leading to the cessation of suffering.
“What, your reverence, is the Noble Truth of suffering?
Birth is suffering; aging is suffering; death is suffering; grief, lamentation, bodily pain, mental pain and despair are suffering; not getting what one desires, that too is suffering: In brief the five aggregates subject to grasping are suffering.
“What is birth?
It is the birth of beings in the various classes of beings; the production, their conception, coming into existence, the appearance of the aggregates, acquiring of the sense-bases.
This is called birth.
“What is aging?
It is the aging of beings in the various classes of beings, their decay, broken teeth, graying hair, wrinkled skin, the dwindling of the life-span, the wearing out of the sense-organs.
This is called aging.
“What is death?
It is the passing away of beings in the various classes of beings; the falling away, the breaking up, the disappearance, the death, making end of life, the breaking up of the aggregates, the laying down of the body.
This is called death.
“What is grief?
It is the grief, sorrow, sorrowfulness, the state of being sorry, inward sorrow, inward intense sorrow visited by some calamity or other, smitten by some kind of ill or other.
This is called grief.
“What is lamentation?
It is the crying, the wailing, the act of crying, the act of wailing, the state of crying, the state of wailing of one visited by some calamity or other, smitten by some kind of ill or other.
This is called lamentation.
“What is suffering?
It is bodily suffering, bodily unpleasantness, the painful and unpleasant feeling produced by bodily contact.
This is called suffering.
“What is misery?
It is mental suffering, unpleasantness, the painful and unpleasant feeling produced by mental contact.
This is called misery.
“What is despair?
It is despondency, despair, the state of despondency, the state of despair of one visited by some calamity or other.
This is called despair.
“What is meant by not getting what one desires, that too is suffering?
To beings subject to birth there comes desire: 'O might we not be subject to birth, and birth not come to us.' But this cannot be attained by mere desiring.
So not getting what one desires, that too, is suffering.
To beings subject to aging there comes the desire: 'O might we not be subject to aging, and aging not come to us…'.
To beings subject to disease there comes the desire: 'O might we not be subject to disease and disease not come to us…' To beings subject to death there comes the desire: 'O might we not be subject to death and death not come to us…' To beings subject to sorrow, lamentation, suffering, misery, and despair there comes the desire: 'O might we not be subject to sorrow, lamentation, suffering, misery, and despair, and sorrow, lamentation, suffering, misery, and despair not come to us.' But this cannot be attained by merely desiring.
So not getting what one desires that too is suffering.
“What, in brief, are the five aggregates subject to grasping that are suffering?
These are the aggregate of matter subject to grasping, the aggregate of feeling…, the aggregate of perception…, the aggregate of mental formations…, the aggregate of consciousness subject to grasping.
These are called, in brief, the five aggregates subject to grasping that are suffering.
This is called the Noble Truth of suffering.
“What is the Noble Truth of the arising of suffering?
It is this craving which produces re-becoming accompanied by passionate greed, and finding delight now here now there, namely the craving for sense pleasures, craving for existence and craving for non-existence.
This is called the Noble Truth of the arising of suffering.
“What is the Noble Truth of the cessation of suffering?
It is the complete cessation of that very craving, giving it up, relinquishing it, liberating oneself from it, and detaching oneself from it.
This is called the Noble Truth of the cessation of suffering.
“And what is the Noble Truth of the Path leading to the cessation of suffering?
It is this Noble Eightfold Path itself, namely: right understanding, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
“What is right understanding?
It is this knowledge of suffering, knowledge of the arising of suffering, knowledge of the cessation of suffering, knowledge of the path leading to the cessation of suffering — this is called right understanding.
“What is right thought?
Thought of renunciation, thought of goodwill, thought of not harming — this is called right thought.
“What is right speech?
Abstention from false speech, abstention from tale-bearing, abstention from harsh speech, abstention from idle chatter, this is called right speech.
“What is right action?
Abstention from killing, abstention from stealing, abstention from illicit sexual indulgence, this is called right action.
“What is right livelihood?
Herein the ariyan disciple avoiding wrong livelihood, makes his living by right livelihood, this is called right livelihood.
“What is right effort?
Herein a monk puts forth will, strives, stirs up energy, strengthens his mind, exerts himself to prevent the arising of evil, of unwholesome thoughts that have not yet arisen; puts forth will… to banish the evil, unwholesome thoughts that have already arisen; puts forth will… to develop wholesome thoughts that have not yet arisen; and puts forth will, strives, stirs up energy, strengthens his mind, exerts himself to maintain, to preserve, increase, to bring them to maturity, development, and to complete the wholesome thoughts that have arisen.
This is called right effort.
“What is right mindfulness?
Herein a monk lives practicing body contemplation on the body, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful, having overcome covetousness and dejection concerning the world.
“He lives practicing feeling-contemplation on the feelings, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful having overcome covetousness and dejection concerning the world.
“He lives practicing mind-contemplation on the mind, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful having overcome covetousness and dejection concerning the world.
“He lives practicing mind-object contemplation on the mind objects, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful having overcome covetousness and dejection concerning the world.
This is called right mindfulness.
“And what is right concentration?
Herein a monk aloof from sense desires, aloof from unwholesome thoughts, attains to and abides in the first meditative absorption which is detachment-born and accompanied by applied thought, sustained thought, joy, and bliss.
“By allaying applied and sustained thought he attains to, and abides in the second jhana which is inner tranquillity, which is unification, devoid of applied and sustained thought, and which has joy and bliss.
“By detachment from joy he dwells in equanimity, mindful, and with clear comprehension and enjoys bliss in body, and attains to and abides in the third jhana which the noble ones call: 'Dwelling in equanimity, mindfulness, and bliss.'
“By giving up of bliss and suffering, by the disappearance already of joy and sorrow, he attains to, and abides in the fourth jhana, which is neither suffering nor bliss, and which is the purity of equanimity-mindfulness.
This is called right concentration.
“This is called the Noble Truth of the Path leading to the cessation of suffering.
“Your reverence, the matchless Wheel of Dhamma set in motion by the Tathagata, the Consumate One, the supremely Enlightened One, in the Deer Park, at Isipatana near Varanasi, cannot be set in motion by a recluse or brahmana or deva or Brahma or by anyone in the world.
That is to say, it was a proclamation of the Four Noble Truths, by way of teaching, laying down, establishing, opening up, analyzing, and elucidating them.
This the Venerable Sariputta said.
Those monks glad at heart rejoiced at the words of the Venerable Sariputta.
I have heard that on one occasion, as the Blessed One was wandering among the Magadhans, he entered Rajagaha, went to the potter Bhaggava, and on arrival said to him, “If it is no inconvenience for you, Bhaggava, I will stay for one night in your shed.
“It's no inconvenience for me, lord, but there is a wanderer who has already taken up residence there.
If he gives his permission, you may stay there as you like.
Now at that time a clansman named Pukkusati had left home and gone forth into homelessness through faith, out of dedication to the Blessed One.
He was the one who had already taken up residence in the potter's shed.
So the Blessed One approached Ven.
Pukkusati and said to him, “If it is no inconvenience for you, monk, I will stay one night in the shed.
“The shed is roomy, my friend.
Stay as you like.
So the Blessed One, entering the potter's shed and, setting out a spread of grass to one side, sat down folding his legs crosswise, holding his body erect, and setting mindfulness to the fore.
He spent most of the night sitting.
Ven.
Pukkusati also spent most of the night sitting.
The thought occurred to the Blessed One, “How inspiring is the way this clansman behaves!
What if I were to question him?” So he said to Ven.
Pukkusati, “Out of dedication to whom, monk, have you gone forth?
Who is your teacher?
Of whose Dhamma do you approve?
“There is, my friend, Gotama the contemplative, a son of the Sakyans, gone forth from a Sakyan clan.
Now, this excellent report about the honorable Gotama has been spread about: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy & rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the worlds, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.' I have gone forth out of dedication to that Blessed One.
That Blessed One is my teacher.
It is of that Blessed One's Dhamma that I approve.
“But where, monk, is that Blessed One — worthy & rightly self-awakened — staying now?
“There is, my friend, a city in the northern lands named Savatthi.
That is where the Blessed One — worthy & rightly self-awakened — is staying now.
“Have you ever seen that Blessed One before?
On seeing him, would you recognize him?
“No, my friend, I have never seen the Blessed One before, nor on seeing him would I recognize him.
Then the thought occurred to the Blessed One: “It is out of dedication to me that this clansman has gone forth.
What if I were to teach him the Dhamma?” So he said to Ven.
Pukkusati, “I will teach you the Dhamma, monk.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, friend,” replied Ven.
Pukkusati.
The Blessed One said: “A person has six properties, six media of sensory contact, eighteen considerations, & four determinations.
He has been stilled where the currents of construing do not flow.
And when the currents of construing do not flow, he is said to be a sage at peace.
One should not be negligent of discernment, should guard the truth, be devoted to relinquishment, and train only for calm.
This is the summary of the analysis of the six properties.
“'A person has six properties.' Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
These are the six properties: the earth property, the liquid property, the fire property, the wind property, the space property, the consciousness property.
'A person has six properties.' Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'A person has six media of sensory contact.' Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
These are the six media of sensory contact: the eye as a medium of sensory contact, the ear… the nose… the tongue… the body… the intellect as a medium of sensory contact.
'A person has six media of sensory contact.' Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'A person has eighteen considerations.' Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
These are the eighteen considerations: On seeing a form with the eye, one considers a form that can act as a basis for joy, a form that can act as a basis for distress, or a form that can act as a basis for equanimity.
On hearing a sound with the ear… On smelling an aroma with the nose… On tasting a flavor with the tongue… On feeling a tactile sensation with the body… On cognizing an idea with the intellect, one considers an idea that can act as a basis for joy, an idea that can act as a basis for distress, or an idea that can act as a basis for equanimity.
Thus there are six considerations conducive to joy, six conducive to distress, & six conducive to equanimity.
'A person has eighteen considerations.' Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'A person has four determinations.' Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
These are the four determinations: the determination for discernment, the determination for truth, the determination for relinquishment, the determination for calm.
'A person has four determinations.' Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'One should not be negligent of discernment, should guard the truth, be devoted to relinquishment, and train only for calm.' Thus was it said.
In reference to what was it said?
And how is one not negligent of discernment?
These are the six properties: the earth property, the liquid property, the fire property, the wind property, the space property, the consciousness property.
“And what is the earth property?
The earth property can be either internal or external.
What is the internal earth property?
Anything internal, within oneself, that's hard, solid, & sustained: head hairs, body hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, tendons, bones, bone marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, membranes, spleen, lungs, large intestines, small intestines, contents of the stomach, feces, or anything else internal, within oneself, that's hard, solid, and sustained: This is called the internal earth property.
Now both the internal earth property & the external earth property are simply earth property.
And that should be seen as it actually is present with right discernment: 'This is not mine, this is not me, this is not my self.' When one sees it thus as it actually is present with right discernment, one becomes disenchanted with the earth property and makes the earth property fade from the mind.
“And what is the liquid property?
The liquid property may be either internal or external.
What is the internal liquid property?
Anything internal, belonging to oneself, that's liquid, watery, & sustained: bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, oil, saliva, mucus, oil-of-the-joints, urine, or anything else internal, within oneself, that's liquid, watery, & sustained: This is called the internal liquid property.
Now both the internal liquid property & the external liquid property are simply liquid property.
And that should be seen as it actually is present with right discernment: 'This is not mine, this is not me, this is not my self.' When one sees it thus as it actually is present with right discernment, one becomes disenchanted with the liquid property and makes the liquid property fade from the mind.
“And what is the fire property?
The fire property may be either internal or external.
What is the internal fire property?
Anything internal, belonging to oneself, that's fire, fiery, & sustained: that by which is warmed, aged, & consumed with fever; and that by which what is eaten, drunk, consumed & tasted gets properly digested; or anything else internal, within oneself, that's fire, fiery, & sustained: This is called the internal fire property.
Now both the internal fire property & the external fire property are simply fire property.
And that should be seen as it actually is present with right discernment: 'This is not mine, this is not me, this is not my self.' When one sees it thus as it actually is present with right discernment, one becomes disenchanted with the fire property and makes the fire property fade from the mind.
“And what is the wind property?
The wind property may be either internal or external.
What is the internal wind property?
Anything internal, belonging to oneself, that's wind, windy, & sustained: up-going winds, down-going winds, winds in the stomach, winds in the intestines, winds that course through the body, in-and-out breathing, or anything else internal, within oneself, that's wind, windy, & sustained: This is called the internal wind property.
Now both the internal wind property & the external wind property are simply wind property.
And that should be seen as it actually is present with right discernment: 'This is not mine, this is not me, this is not my self.' When one sees it thus as it actually is present with right discernment, one becomes disenchanted with the wind property and makes the wind property fade from the mind.
“And what is the space property?
The space property may be either internal or external.
What is the internal space property?
Anything internal, belonging to oneself, that's space, spatial, & sustained: the holes of the ears, the nostrils, the mouth, the whereby what is eaten, drunk, consumed, & tasted gets swallowed, and where it collects, and whereby it is excreted from below, or anything else internal, within oneself, that's space, spatial, & sustained: This is called the internal space property.
Now both the internal space property & the external space property are simply space property.
And that should be seen as it actually is present with right discernment: 'This is not mine, this is not me, this is not my self.' When one sees it thus as it actually is present with right discernment, one becomes disenchanted with the space property and makes the space property fade from the mind.
“There remains only consciousness: pure & bright.
What does one cognize with that consciousness?
One cognizes 'pleasure.' One cognizes 'pain.' One cognizes 'neither pleasure nor pain.' In dependence on a sensory contact that is to be felt as pleasure, there arises a feeling of pleasure.
When sensing a feeling of pleasure, one discerns that 'I am sensing a feeling of pleasure.' One discerns that 'With the cessation of that very sensory contact that is to be felt as pleasure, the concomitant feeling — the feeling of pleasure that has arisen in dependence on the sensory contact that is to be felt as pleasure — ceases, is stilled.' In dependence on a sensory contact that is to be felt as pain… In dependence on a sensory contact that is to be felt as neither pleasure nor pain, there arises a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain.
When sensing a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, one discerns that 'I am sensing a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain.' One discerns that 'With the cessation of that very sensory contact that is to be felt as neither pleasure nor pain, the concomitant feeling — the feeling of neither pleasure nor pain that has arisen in dependence on the sensory contact that is to be felt as neither pleasure nor pain — ceases, is stilled.'
“Just as when, from the friction & conjunction of two fire sticks, heat is born and fire appears, and from the separation & disjunction of those very same fire sticks, the concomitant heat ceases, is stilled; in the same way, in dependence on a sensory contact that is to be felt as pleasure, there arises a feeling of pleasure… In dependence on a sensory contact that is to be felt as pain… In dependence on a sensory contact that is to be felt as neither pleasure nor pain, there arises a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain… One discerns that 'With the cessation of that very sensory contact that is to be felt as neither pleasure nor pain, the concomitant feeling… ceases, is stilled.'
“There remains only equanimity: pure & bright, pliant, malleable, & luminous.
Just as if a skilled goldsmith or goldsmith's apprentice were to prepare a furnace, heat up a crucible, and, taking gold with a pair of tongs, place it in the crucible: He would blow on it time & again, sprinkle water on it time & again, examine it time & again, so that the gold would become refined, well-refined, thoroughly refined, flawless, free from dross, pliant, malleable, & luminous.
Then whatever sort of ornament he had in mind — whether a belt, an earring, a necklace, or a gold chain — it would serve his purpose.
In the same way, there remains only equanimity: pure & bright, pliant, malleable, & luminous.
One discerns that 'If I were to direct equanimity as pure & bright as this toward the dimension of the infinitude of space, I would develop the mind along those lines, and thus this equanimity of mine — thus supported, thus sustained — would last for a long time.
One discerns that 'If I were to direct equanimity as pure and bright as this toward the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, I would develop the mind along those lines, and thus this equanimity of mine — thus supported, thus sustained — would last for a long time.'
“One discerns that 'If I were to direct equanimity as pure & bright as this towards the dimension of the infinitude of space and to develop the mind along those lines, that would be fabricated.
One discerns that 'If I were to direct equanimity as pure and bright as this towards the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception and to develop the mind along those lines, that would be fabricated.' One neither fabricates nor mentally fashions for the sake of becoming or un-becoming.
This being the case, one is not sustained by anything in the world.
Unsustained, one is not agitated.
Unagitated, one is totally unbound right within.
One discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
“Sensing a feeling of pleasure, one discerns that it is fleeting, not grasped at, not relished.
Sensing a feeling of pain… Sensing a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, one discerns that it is fleeting, not grasped at, not relished.
Sensing a feeling of pleasure, one senses it disjoined from it.
Sensing a feeling of pain… Sensing a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, one senses it disjoined from it.
When sensing a feeling limited to the body, one discerns that 'I am sensing a feeling limited to the body.' When sensing a feeling limited to life, one discerns that 'I am sensing a feeling limited to life.' One discerns that 'With the break-up of the body, after the termination of life, all that is sensed, not being relished, will grow cold right here.'
“Just as an oil lamp burns in dependence on oil & wick; and from the termination of the oil & wick — and from not being provided any other sustenance — it goes out unnourished; even so, when sensing a feeling limited to the body, one discerns that 'I am sensing a feeling limited to the body.' When sensing a feeling limited to life, one discerns that 'I am sensing a feeling limited to life.' One discerns that 'With the break-up of the body, after the termination of life, all that is sensed, not being relished, will grow cold right here.'
“Thus a monk so endowed is endowed with the highest determination for discernment, for this — the knowledge of the passing away of all suffering & stress — is the highest noble discernment.
“His release, being founded on truth, does not fluctuate, for whatever is deceptive is false; Unbinding — the undeceptive — is true.
Thus a monk so endowed is endowed with the highest determination for truth, for this — Unbinding, the undeceptive — is the highest noble truth.
“Whereas formerly he foolishly had taken on mental acquisitions and brought them to completion, he has now abandoned them, their root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
Thus a monk so endowed is endowed with the highest determination for relinquishment, for this — the renunciation of all mental acquisitions — is the highest noble relinquishment.
“Whereas formerly he foolishly had greed — as well as desire & infatuation — he has now abandoned them, their root destroyed made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
Whereas formerly he foolishly had malice — as well as ill-will & hatred — he has now abandoned them… Whereas formerly he foolishly had ignorance — as well as delusion & confusion — he has now abandoned them, their root destroyed made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
Thus a monk so endowed is endowed with the highest determination for calm, for this — the calming of passions, aversions, & delusions — is the highest noble calm.
'One should not be negligent of discernment, should guard the truth, be devoted to relinquishment, and train only for calm.' Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
“'He has been stilled where the currents of construing do not flow.
And when the currents of construing do not flow, he is said to be a sage at peace.' Thus was it said.
With reference to what was it said?
'I am' is a construing.
'I am this' is a construing.
'I shall be' is a construing.
'I shall not be'… 'I shall be possessed of form'… 'I shall not be possessed of form'… 'I shall be percipient'… 'I shall not be percipient'… 'I shall be neither percipient nor non-percipient' is a construing.
Construing is a disease, construing is a cancer, construing is an arrow.
By going beyond all construing, he is said to be a sage at peace.
“Furthermore, a sage at peace is not born, does not age, does not die, is unagitated, and is free from longing.
He has nothing whereby he would be born.
Not being born, will he age?
Not aging, will he die?
Not dying, will he be agitated?
Not being agitated, for what will he long?
It was in reference to this that it was said, 'He has been stilled where the currents of construing do not flow.
And when the currents of construing do not flow, he is said to be a sage at peace.' Now, monk, you should remember this, my brief analysis of the six properties.
Then the thought occurred to Ven.
Pukkusati: “Surely, the Teacher has come to me!
Surely, the One Well-gone has come to me!
Surely, the Rightly Self-awakened One has come to me!” Getting up from his seat, arranging his upper robe over one shoulder, and bowing down with his head at the Blessed One's feet, he said, “A transgression has overcome me, lord, in that I was so foolish, so muddle-headed, and so unskilled as to assume that it was proper to address the Blessed One as 'friend.' May the Blessed One please accept this confession of my transgression as such, so that I may achieve restraint in the future.
“Yes, monk, a transgression overcame you in that you were so foolish, so muddle-headed, and so unskilled as to assume that it was proper to address me as 'friend.' But because you see your transgression as such and make amends in accordance with the Dhamma, we accept your confession.
For it is a cause of growth in the Dhamma & Discipline of the noble ones when, seeing a transgression as such, one makes amends in accordance with the Dhamma and achieves restraint in the future.
“Lord, may I receive full acceptance from the Blessed One?
“And are your robes & bowl complete?
“No, lord, my robes & bowl are not complete.
“Tathagatas do not give full acceptance to one whose robes & bowl are not complete.
Then Ven.
Pukkusati, delighting & rejoicing in the Blessed One's words, got up from his seat, bowed down to the Blessed One and, keeping him on his right, left in search of robes and a bowl.
And while he was searching for robes & a bowl, a runaway cow killed him.
Then a large number of monks approached the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to the Blessed One, “Lord, the clansman Pukkusati, whom the Blessed One instructed with a brief instruction, has died.
What is his destination?
What is his future state?
“Monks, the clansman Pukkusati was wise.
He practiced the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma and did not pester me with issues related to the Dhamma.
With the destruction of the first five fetters, he has arisen spontaneously, there to be totally unbound, never again to return from that world.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted in the Blessed One's words.
Despite the abstract format of this discourse, it deals with an emotional topic: the source of emotions, the use of the emotions in the course of the practice, and the ideal emotional state of a person who has completed the path and is fit to teach others.
In particular, this discourse counters a common misperception: that the distress that comes from having an unachieved goal is an obstacle in the practice, and that the antidote for that distress is to renounce any sense of goals.
In actuality, that distress — termed “renunciation distress” — has an important role in the practice: to overcome the distress that comes with a sense of loss over sensual pleasures that have not been attained, or those that have been attained in the past but now no longer exist.
Renunciation distress serves as a reminder that the loss of sensual pleasures is not a serious matter.
As for renunciation distress, it is overcome, not by abandoning any sense of goal, but by following the path and realizing the joy that comes when the goal is reached.
This discourse counters another misperception as well: that equanimity is the goal of the practice.
In actuality, renunciation equanimity serves a function as part of the path of practice — as a tool for letting go of renunciation joy — and then it, too, is transcended by the state called “non-fashioning”, in which there is no act of intention, not even the intention underlying equanimity, at all.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks, “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks replied.
The Blessed One said: “Monks, I will teach you the analysis of the six sense media.
Listen, and pay close attention.
I will speak.
“Yes, lord,” the monks replied.
The Blessed One said: “The six internal sense-media should be known.
The six external sense-media should be known.
The six classes of consciousness should be known.
The six classes of contact should be known.
The eighteen explorations for the intellect should be known.
The thirty-six states to which beings are attached should be known.
With regard to them, depending on this, abandon that.
There are three frames of reference that a noble one cultivates, cultivating which he is a teacher fit to instruct a group.
Among master trainers, he is said to be the unexcelled trainer of those people fit to be tamed.
This is the summary of the analysis of the six sense-media.
“'The six internal sense-media should be known': thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
The eye-medium, the ear-medium, the nose-medium, the tongue-medium, the body-medium, the intellect-medium.
'The six internal sense-media should be known': thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'The six external sense-media should be known': thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
The form-medium, the sound-medium, the aroma-medium, the flavor-medium, the tactile-sensation-medium, the idea-medium.
'The six external sense-media should be known': thus was it said.
And in reference to thus was it said.
“'The six classes of consciousness should be known': thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
Eye-consciousness, ear-consciousness, nose-consciousness, tongue-consciousness, body-consciousness, intellect-consciousness.
'The six classes of consciousness should be known': thus was it said.
And in reference to thus was it said.
“'The six classes of contact should be known': thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
Eye-contact, ear-contact, nose-contact, tongue-contact, body-contact, intellect-contact.
'The six classes of contact should be known': thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'The eighteen explorations for the intellect should be known': thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
Seeing a form via the eye, one explores a form that can act as the basis for happiness, one explores a form that can act as the basis for unhappiness, one explores a form that can act as the basis for equanimity.
Hearing a sound via the ear… Smelling an aroma via the nose… Tasting a flavor via the tongue… Feeling a tactile sensation via the body… Cognizing an idea via the intellect, one explores an idea that can act as the basis for happiness, one explores an idea that can act as the basis for unhappiness, one explores an idea that can act as the basis for equanimity.
Thus there are six happiness-explorations, six distress-explorations, and six equanimity-explorations.
The eighteen explorations for the intellect should be known': thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'The thirty-six states to which beings are attached should be known': thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
Six kinds of household joy & six kinds of renunciation joy; six kinds of household distress & six kinds of renunciation distress; six kinds of household equanimity & six kinds of renunciation equanimity.
“And what are the six kinds of household joy?
The joy that arises when one regards as an acquisition the acquisition of forms cognizable by the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, connected with worldly baits — or when one recalls the previous acquisition of such forms after they have passed, ceased, & changed: That is called household joy.

“And what are the six kinds of renunciation joy?
The joy that arises when — experiencing the inconstancy of those very forms, their change, fading, & cessation — one sees with right discernment as it actually is that all forms, past or present, are inconstant, stressful, subject to change: That is called renunciation joy.

“And what are the six kinds of household distress?
The distress that arises when one regards as a non-acquisition the non-acquisition of forms cognizable by the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, connected with worldly baits — or when one recalls the previous non-acquisition of such forms after they have passed, ceased, & changed: That is called household distress.

“And what are the six kinds of renunciation distress?
The distress coming from the longing that arises in one who is filled with longing for the unexcelled liberations when — experiencing the inconstancy of those very forms, their change, fading, & cessation — he sees with right discernment as it actually is that all forms, past or present, are inconstant, stressful, subject to change and he is filled with this longing: 'O when will I enter & remain in the dimension that the noble ones now enter & remain in?' This is called renunciation distress.

“And what are the six kinds of household equanimity?
The equanimity that arises when a foolish, deluded person — a run-of-the-mill, untaught person who has not conquered his limitations or the results of action & who is blind to danger — sees a form with the eye.
Such equanimity does not go beyond the form, which is why it is called household equanimity.

“And what are the six kinds of renunciation equanimity?
The equanimity that arises when — experiencing the inconstancy of those very forms, their change, fading, & cessation — one sees with right discernment as it actually is that all forms, past or present, are inconstant, stressful, subject to change: This equanimity goes beyond form, which is why it is called renunciation equanimity.

“'The thirty-six states to which beings are attached should be known': thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'With regard to them, depending on this, abandon that': thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
“Here, by depending & relying on the six kinds of renunciation joy, abandon & transcend the six kinds of household joy.
Such is their abandoning, such is their transcending.
By depending & relying on the six kinds of renunciation distress, abandon & transcend the six kinds of household distress.
Such is their abandoning, such is their transcending.
By depending & relying on the six kinds of renunciation equanimity, abandon & transcend the six kinds of household equanimity.
Such is their abandoning, such their transcending.
“By depending & relying on the six kinds of renunciation joy, abandon & transcend the six kinds of renunciation distress.
Such is their abandoning, such is their transcending.
By depending & relying on the six kinds of renunciation equanimity, abandon & transcend the six kinds of renunciation joy.
Such is their abandoning, such their transcending.
“There is equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity; and there is equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness.
“And what is equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity?
There is equanimity with regard to forms, equanimity with regard to sounds…smells…tastes…tactile sensations.
This is equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity.
“And what is equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness?
There is equanimity dependent on the dimension of the infinitude of space, equanimity dependent on the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… dependent on the dimension of nothingness… dependent on the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness.
“By depending & relying on equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness, abandon & transcend equanimity coming from multiplicity, dependent on multiplicity.
Such is its abandoning, such its transcending.
“By depending & relying on non-fashioning, abandon & transcend the equanimity coming from singleness, dependent on singleness.
Such is its abandoning, such its transcending.
“'Depending on this, abandon that': thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'There are three frames of reference that a noble one cultivates, cultivating which he is a teacher fit to instruct a group': thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
“There is the case where the Teacher — out of sympathy, seeking their well-being — teaches the Dhamma to his disciples: 'This is for your well-being, this is for your happiness.' His disciples do not listen or lend ear or apply their minds to gnosis.
Turning aside, they stray from the Teacher's message.
In this case the Tathagata is not satisfied nor is he sensitive to satisfaction, yet he remains untroubled, mindful, & alert.
This is the first frame of reference that a noble one cultivates, cultivating which he is a teacher fit to instruct a group.
“Furthermore, there is the case where the Teacher — out of sympathy, seeking their well-being — teaches the Dhamma to his disciples: 'This is for your well-being, this is for your happiness.' Some of his disciples do not listen or lend ear or apply their minds to gnosis.
Turning aside, they stray from the Teacher's message.
But some of his disciples listen, lend ear, & apply their minds to gnosis.
They do not turn aside or stray from the Teacher's message.
In this case the Tathagata is not satisfied nor is he sensitive to satisfaction; at the same time he is not dissatisfied nor is he sensitive to dissatisfaction.
Free from both satisfaction & dissatisfaction, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert.
This is the second frame of reference…
“Furthermore, there is the case where the Teacher — out of sympathy, seeking their well-being — teaches the Dhamma to his disciples: 'This is for your well-being, this is for your happiness.' His disciples listen, lend ear, & apply their minds to gnosis.
They do not turn aside or stray from the Teacher's message.
In this case the Tathagata is satisfied and is sensitive to satisfaction, yet he remains untroubled, mindful, & alert.
This is the third frame of reference that a noble one cultivates, cultivating which he is a teacher fit to instruct a group.
“'There are three frames of reference that a noble one cultivates, cultivating which he is a teacher fit to instruct a group': thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
“'Among master trainers, he is said to be the unexcelled trainer of those people fit to be tamed': thus was it said.
And in reference to what was it said?
“Steered by the elephant trainer, the elephant to be tamed runs in only one direction: east, west, north, or south.
Steered by the horse trainer, the horse to be tamed runs in only one direction: east, west, north, or south.
Steered by the ox trainer, the ox to be tamed runs in only one direction: east, west, north, or south.
“But steered by the Tathagata — worthy and rightly self-awakened — the person to be tamed fans out in eight directions.
“Possessed of form, he/she sees forms.
This is the first direction.
“Not percipient of form internally, he/she sees forms externally.
This is the second direction.
“He/she is intent only on the beautiful.
This is the third direction.
“With the complete transcending of perceptions of form, with the disappearance of perceptions of resistance, and not heeding perceptions of diversity, 'Infinite space,' he/she enters and remains in the dimension of the infinitude of space.
This is the fourth direction.
“With the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, 'Infinite consciousness,' he/she enters and remains in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
This is the fifth direction.
“With the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, 'There is nothing,' he/she enters and remains in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the sixth direction.
“With the complete transcending of the dimension of nothingness, he/she enters and remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is the seventh direction.
“With the complete transcending of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, he/she enters and remains in the cessation of perception and feeling.
This is the eighth direction.
“Steered by the Tathagata — worthy and rightly self-awakened — the person to be tamed fans out in eight directions.
“'Among master trainers, he is said to be the unexcelled trainer of those people fit to be tamed': thus was it said.
And in reference to this was it said.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted in the Blessed One's words.
This celebrated sutta shows some of the complexities of kamma and its results.
Beginning with a strange view expressed by a confused wanderer and a confused answer given by a bhikkhu, the Buddha then gives his Great Exposition of Kamma which is based upon four “types” of people:
The Buddha then shows how wrong views can arise from only partial understanding of truth.
One can see the stages of this: a mystic “sees” in vision an evil-doer suffering in hell, this confirms what he had heard about moral causality, so he says, “evil-doers always go to hell,” and dogma hardens and becomes rigid when he says, “Only this is true; anything else is wrong.” The stages of this process are repeated for each of the four “persons,” after which the Buddha proceeds to analyze these views grounded in partial experience and points out which portions are true and which are dogmatic superstructure which is unjustified.
Finally, the Buddha explains his Great Exposition of Kamma in which he shows that notions of invariability like “the evildoer goes to hell” are much too simple.
The minds of people are complex and they make many different kinds of kamma even in one lifetime, some of which may influence the last moment when kamma is made before death, which in turn is the basis for the next life.
Thus have I heard.
On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Rajagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Feeding Place.
Now on that occasion the venerable Samiddhi was living in a forest hut.
Then the wanderer Potaliputta, walking and wandering for exercise, came to the venerable Samiddhi and exchanged greetings with him, and when the courteous and amiable talk was finished, he sat down at one side.
When he had done so, he said to the venerable Samiddhi:
“I heard and learned this, friend Samiddhi, from the monk Gotama's lips: 'Bodily kammas are vain, verbal kammas are vain, only mental kammas are true.' But there is actually that attainment having entered upon which nothing is felt at all.
“Not so, friend Potaliputta, do not say thus, do not misrepresent the Blessed One; it is not good to misrepresent the Blessed One; the Blessed One would not say so: 'Bodily kammas are vain, verbal kammas are vain, only mental kammas are true.' And there is actually that attainment having entered upon which nothing is felt at all.
“How long is it since you went forth, friend Samiddhi?
“Not long, friend, three years.
“There now, what shall we say to the elder bhikkhus, when the young bhikkhu fancies the Master is to be defended thus?
After doing intentional kamma, friend Samiddhi, by way of body, speech or mind, what does one feel?
“After doing an intentional kamma, friend Potaliputta, by way of body, speech or mind, one feels suffering.
Then neither agreeing nor disagreeing with the words of the venerable Samiddhi, the wanderer Potaliputta got up from his seat and went away.
Soon after the wanderer Potaliputta had gone, the venerable Samiddhi went to the venerable Ananda and exchanged greetings with him, and when the courteous and amiable talk was finished, he sat down at one side.
When he had done so, he told the venerable Ananda all his conversation with the wanderer Potaliputta.
When this was said, the venerable Ananda told him: “Friend Samiddhi, this conversation should be told to the Blessed One.
Come, let us go to the Blessed One, and having done so, let us tell him about this.
As he answers, so we shall bear it in mind.
“Even so, friend,” the venerable Samiddhi replied.
Then they went together to the Blessed One, and after paying homage to him, they sat down at one side.
When they had done so, the venerable Ananda told the Blessed One all the venerable Samiddhi's conversation with the wanderer Potaliputta.
When this was said, the Blessed One told the venerable Ananda:
“I do not even know the wanderer by sight, Ananda.
How could there have been such a conversation?
The wanderer Potaliputta's question ought to have been answered after analyzing it, but this misguided man Samiddhi answered it without qualification.
When this was said, the venerable Udayin said to the Blessed One: “'But, venerable sir, supposing when the venerable Samiddhi spoke, he was referring to this, namely, 'Whatever is felt is suffering.' Then the Blessed One addressed the venerable Ananda: “See, Ananda, how this misguided man Udayin interferes.
I knew, Ananda, that this misguided man Udayin would unreasonably interfere now.
To begin with it was the three kinds of feeling that were asked about by the wanderer Potaliputta.
If, when this misguided man Samiddhi was asked, he had answered the wanderer Potaliputta thus: 'After doing an intentional kamma by way of body, speech and mind to be felt as pleasure, he feels pleasure; after doing an intentional kamma by way of body, speech and mind to be felt as pain, he feels pain; after doing an intentional kamma by way of body, speech and mind to be felt as neither-pain-nor-pleasure, he feels neither-pain-nor-pleasure' — by answering him thus, Ananda, the misguided man Samiddhi would have given the wanderer Potaliputta the right answer.
Besides, Ananda, who are the foolish thoughtless wanderers of other sects that they will understand the Tathagata's Great Exposition of Kamma?
if you, Ananda, would listen to the Tathagata expounding the Great Exposition of Kamma.
“This is the time, Blessed One, this is the time, Sublime One, for the Blessed One to expound the Great Exposition of Kamma.
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the bhikkhus will bear it in mind.
“Then listen, Ananda, and heed well what I shall say.
“Even so, venerable sir,” the venerable Ananda replied.
The Blessed One said this:
“Ananda, there are four kinds of persons existing in the world.
What four?
“Here some person kills living beings, takes what is not given, misconducts himself in sexual desires, speaks falsehood, speaks maliciously, speaks harshly, gossips, is covetous, is ill-willed, and has wrong view.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
“But here some person kills living beings… and has wrong view.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
“Here some person abstains from killing living beings, from taking what is not given, from misconduct in sexual desires, from false speech, from malicious speech, from harsh speech, from gossip, he is not covetous, is not ill-willed, and has right view.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
“But here some person abstains from killing living beings… and has right view.
On the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
“Here, Ananda, in consequence of ardor, endeavor, devotion, diligence, and right attention, some monk or brahman attains such concentration of mind that, when his mind is concentrated, he sees with the heavenly eyesight, which is purified and surpasses the human, that some person kills living beings here, takes what is not given, misconducts himself in sexual desires, speaks falsehood, speaks maliciously, speaks harshly, gossips, is covetous, is ill-willed, has wrong view.
He sees that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
He says: 'It seems that there are evil kammas and that there is the result of misconduct; for I have seen that a person killed living beings here… had wrong view.
I have seen that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he had reappeared in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.' He says: 'It seems that one who kills living beings… has wrong view, will always, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
Those who know thus know rightly; those who know otherwise are mistaken in their knowledge.' So he obstinately misapprehends what he himself has known, seen and felt; insisting on that alone, he says: 'Only this is true, anything else is wrong.'
“But here in consequence of ardor, endeavor, devotion, diligence and right attention, some monk or brahman attains such concentration of mind that, when his mind is concentrated, he sees with the heavenly eyesight, which is purified and surpasses the human, that some person kills living beings here… has wrong view.
He sees that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
He says: 'It seems there are no evil kammas, there is no result of misconduct.
For I have seen that a person killed living beings here… had wrong view.
I have seen that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.' He says: 'It seems that one who kills living beings… has wrong view will always, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
Those who know thus know rightly; those who know otherwise are mistaken in their knowledge.' So he obstinately misapprehends what he himself has known, seen and felt; insisting on that alone, he says: 'Only this is true, anything else is wrong.'
“Here in consequence of ardor, endeavor, devotion, diligence and right attention, some monk or brahman attains such concentration of mind that, when his mind is concentrated, he sees with the heavenly eyesight, which is purified and surpasses the human, that some person abstains from killing living beings here… has right view.
He sees that, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
He says: 'It seems that there are good kammas, there is result of good conduct.
For I have seen that a person abstained from killing living beings here… had right view.
I saw that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he had reappeared in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.' He says: 'It seems that one who abstains from killing living beings… has right view will always, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
Those who know thus know rightly; those who know otherwise are mistaken in their knowledge.' So he obstinately misapprehends what he himself has known, seen and felt; insisting on that alone, he says: 'Only this is true; anything else is wrong.'
“But here in consequence of ardor, endeavor, devotion, diligence and right attention, some monk or brahman attains such concentration of mind that, when his mind is concentrated, he sees with the heavenly eyesight, which is purified and surpasses the human, that some person abstains from killing living beings here… has right view.
He sees that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he has reappeared in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
He says: 'It seems that there are no good kammas, there is no result of good conduct.
For I have seen that a person abstained from killing here… had right view.
I saw that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he had reappeared in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.' He says: 'It seems that one who abstains from killing living beings… has right view, will always, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
Those who know thus know rightly; those who know otherwise are mistaken in their knowledge.' So he obstinately misapprehends what he himself has known, seen and felt; insisting on that alone, he says: 'Only this is true; anything else is wrong.'
“Now, Ananda, when a monk or brahman says thus: 'It seems that there are evil kammas, there is the result of misconduct,' I concede that to him.
“When he says thus: 'For I have seen that some person killed living beings… had wrong view.
I saw that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he had reappeared in states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell,' I concede that to him.
“When he says thus: 'It seems that one who kills living beings… has wrong view, will always, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell,' I do not concede that to him.
“When he says thus: 'Those who know thus know rightly; those who know otherwise are mistaken in their knowledge,' I do not concede that to him.
“When he obstinately misapprehends what he himself has known, seen and felt; and insisting on that alone, he says: 'Only this is true; anything else is wrong,' I do not concede that to him.
“Why is that?
The Tathagata's knowledge of the Great Exposition of Kamma is different.
“Now when a monk or brahman says thus: 'It seems that there are no evil kammas, there is no result of misconduct,' I do not concede that to him.
“When he says thus: 'For I have seen that a person killed living beings… had wrong view.
I saw that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he had reappeared in a happy destination, in the heavenly world,' I concede that to him.
“When he says thus: 'It seems that one who kills living beings… has wrong view, will always, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, in the heavenly world,' I do not concede that to him.
“When he says thus: 'Those who know thus know rightly; those who know otherwise are mistaken in their knowledge,' I do not concede that to him.
“When he obstinately misapprehends what he himself has known, seen and felt; and insisting on that alone, he says: 'Only this is true; anything else is wrong,' I do not concede that to him.
“Why is that?
The Tathagata's knowledge of the Great Exposition of Kamma is different.
“Now when a monk or brahman says thus: 'It seems that there are good kammas, there is a result of good conduct,' I concede that to him.
“When he says thus: 'For I have seen that a person abstained from killing living beings here… had right view.
I saw that on the dissolution of the body after death, he had reappeared in a happy destination, in the heavenly world,' I concede that to him.
“When he says: 'It seems that one who abstains from killing living beings… has right view will always, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, in the heavenly world,' I do not concede that to him.
“When he says: 'Those who know thus know rightly; those who know otherwise are mistaken in their knowledge,' I do not concede that to him.
“When he obstinately misapprehends what he himself has known, seen, and felt; and insisting on that alone he says: 'Only this is true: anything else is wrong,' I do not concede that to him.
“Why is that?
The Tathagata's knowledge of the Great Exposition of Kamma is different.
“Now when a monk or brahman says thus: 'It seems that there are no good kammas, there is no result of good conduct,' I do not concede that to him.
“When he says thus: “For I have seen that a person abstained from killing living beings here… had right view.
I saw that on the dissolution of the body, after death, he had reappeared in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell,” I concede that to him.
“When he says thus: 'One who abstains from killing living beings… has right view will always, on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell,' I do not concede that to him.
“When he says thus: 'Those who know thus know rightly; those who know otherwise are mistaken in their knowledge,' I do not concede that to him.
“When he obstinately misapprehends what he himself has known, seen and felt; and insisting on that alone, he says: 'Only this is true; anything else is wrong,' I do not concede that to him.
“Why is that?
The Tathagata's knowledge of the Great Exposition of Kamma is different.
“Now, Ananda, there is the person who has killed living beings here… has had wrong view.
And on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
But the evil kamma producing his suffering was done by him earlier, or the evil kamma producing his suffering was done by him later, or wrong view was undertaken and completed by him at the time of his death.
And that was why, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappeared in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
But since he has killed living beings here… has had wrong view, he will feel the result of that here and now, or in his next rebirth, or in some subsequent existence.
“Now there is the person who has killed living beings here… has had wrong view.
And on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
But the good kamma producing his happiness was done by him earlier, or the good kamma producing his happiness was done by him later, or right view was undertaken and completed by him at the time of his death.
And that was why, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappeared in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
But since he has killed living beings here… has had wrong view, he will feel the result of that here and now, or in his next rebirth, or in some subsequent existence.
“Now there is the person who has abstained from killing living beings here… has had right view.
And on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
But the good kamma producing his happiness was done by him earlier, or the good kamma producing his happiness was done by him later, or right view was undertaken and completed by him at the time of his death.
And that was why, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappeared in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
But since he has abstained from killing living beings here… has had right view, he will feel the result of that here and now, or in his next rebirth, or in some subsequent existence.
“Now there is the person who has abstained from killing living beings here… has had right view.
And on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
But the evil kamma producing his suffering was done by him earlier, or the evil kamma producing his suffering was done by him later, or wrong view was undertaken and completed by him at the time of his death.
And that was why, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappeared in the states of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
But since he has abstained from killing living beings here… has had right view, he will feel the result of that here and now, or in his next rebirth, or in some subsequent existence.
“So, Ananda, there is kamma that is incapable and appears incapable; there is kamma that is incapable and appears capable; there is kamma that is capable and appears capable; there is kamma that is capable and appears incapable.
This is what the Blessed One said.
The venerable Ananda was satisfied and he rejoiced in the Blessed One's words.
i.
A strong unwholesome kamma, the result of which will come before the results of weaker unwholesome kammas.
ii.
Wholesome kamma is followed by unwholesome death-proximate kamma which makes the former incapable of good result immediately.
iii.
A strong wholesome kamma will mature even before much accumulated unwholesome kamma.
iv.
Unwholesome kamma is followed by wholesome death-proximate kamma which will mature first and is capable of good results.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rājagaha at the Bamboo Grove in the Squirrels' sanctuary.
And on that occasion Ven.
Samiddhi was staying in a wilderness hut.
Then Potaliputta the wanderer, while walking & wandering around to exercise his legs, went to Ven.
Samiddhi and exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Samiddhi, “Face to face with Gotama the contemplative have I heard this, face to face have I learned this: 'Bodily action is barren, verbal action is barren, only mental action is true.
And there is an attainment in which, on being attained, nothing is felt.' “Don't say that, friend.
Don't slander the Blessed One.
For it's not good to slander the Blessed One; the Blessed One would not say that: 'Bodily action is barren, verbal action is barren, only mental action is true.' But there is, friend, an attainment in which, on being attained, nothing is felt.” 
“How long has it been, friend Samiddhi, since you went forth?
“Not long, friend.
Three years.
“Then what now should I say about the elder monks, when a junior monk would suppose that his Teacher is to be defended in this way?
Having intentionally done an action with body, with speech, or with mind, what does one experience?
“Having intentionally done an action with body, with speech, or with mind, one experiences stress.
Then Potaliputta the wanderer neither delighted in nor scorned Ven.
Samiddhi's words.
Neither delighting nor scorning, he got up from his seat and left.
Then, not long after Potaliputta the wanderer had left, Ven.
Samiddhi went to Ven.
Ānanda and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he reported to Ven.
Ānanda the Elder the entirety of his discussion with Potaliputta the wanderer.
When this was said, Ven.
Ānanda said to him, “Friend Samiddhi, there is warrant here for seeing the Blessed One.
Let's go to the Blessed One and, on arrival, report this matter to him.
However he explains it to us, that's how we should bear it in mind.
“As you say, friend, Ven.
Samiddhi responded to Ven.
Ānanda.
So Ven.
Samiddhi and Ven.
Ānanda went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, bowed down to him and sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, Ven.
Ānanda reported to the Blessed One the entirety of the discussion between Ven.
Samiddhi and Potaliputta the wanderer.
When this was said, the Blessed One said, “I do not recall even having seen Potaliputta the wanderer, much less having that sort of discussion.
And his question, which deserved an analytical answer, has been given a categorical answer by this worthless man, Samiddhi.
When this was said, Ven.
Udāyin said to the Blessed One, “But what if Ven.
Samiddhi was speaking in reference to this: 'Whatever is felt comes under stress'?
When this was said, the Blessed One said to Ven.
Ānanda, “Look, Ānanda, at how this worthless Udāyin interrupts.
I knew just now that he would interrupt in an inappropriate way.
From the very beginning, Potaliputta the wanderer was asking about the three kinds of feeling.
When this worthless Samiddhi was asked by him in this way, he should have answered, 'Having intentionally done — with body, with speech, or with mind — an action that is to be felt as pleasure, one experiences pleasure.
Having intentionally done — with body, with speech, or with mind — an action that is to be felt as pain, one experiences pain.
Having intentionally done — with body, with speech, or with mind — an action that is to be felt as neither-pleasure-nor-pain, one experiences neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
Answering this way, this worthless Samiddhi would have rightly answered Potaliputta the wanderer.
But then who are these wanderers of other sects, foolish & inexperienced?
And who would understand the Tathāgata's greater analysis of action — if you were to listen, Ānanda, to the Tathāgata analyzing the greater analysis of action?
“This is the time, O Blessed One.
This is the time, O One Well-gone, for the Blessed One to analyze the greater analysis of action.
Having heard the Blessed One, the monks will bear it in mind.
“In that case, Ānanda, listen and pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” Ven.
Ānanda responded to the Blessed One.
The Blessed One said, “Ānanda, there are four kinds of person to be found in the world.
Which four?
There is the case where a certain person is one who takes life, takes what is not given, engages in illicit sex, lies, speaks divisively, speaks abusively, engages in idle chatter; is covetous, malevolent, & holds wrong view.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.
“But there is also the case where a certain person is one who takes life, takes what is not given, engages in illicit sex, lies, speaks divisively, speaks abusively, engages in idle chatter; is covetous, malevolent, & holds wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in a good destination, a heavenly world.
“And there is the case where a certain person is one who abstains from taking life, abstains from taking what is not given, abstains from illicit sex, abstains from lying, abstains from speaking divisively, abstains from speaking abusively, abstains from idle chatter, is not covetous, not malevolent, & holds right view.
With the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in a good destination, a heavenly world.
“But there is also the case where a certain person is one who abstains from taking life, abstains from taking what is not given, abstains from illicit sex, abstains from lying, abstains from speaking divisively, abstains from speaking abusively, abstains from idle chatter, is not covetous, not malevolent, & holds right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.
“There is the case, Ānanda, where a certain contemplative or brahman — through ardency, exertion, commitment, heedfulness, & right attention — touches the sort of concentration of awareness that, when his mind is thus concentrated, he sees with the divine eye, pure and surpassing the human, that person — the case where one who takes life, takes what is not given, engages in illicit sex, lies, speaks divisively, speaks abusively, engages in idle chatter, is covetous, malevolent, & holds wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, has reappeared in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.
“He says, 'So there really are evil actions, there really is the result of misconduct.
For I saw the case where a person who took life… & held wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, has reappeared in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.' He says, 'Anyone who takes life… & hold wrong view: They all, on the breakup of the body, after death, reappear in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.
Whoever knows this, knows rightly.
Whoever knows otherwise, their knowledge is wrong.' Insisting through obstinacy & grasping right there on what was seen by himself, known by himself, understood by himself, he states: 'Only this is true.
Everything otherwise is worthless.'
“Then there is the case, Ānanda, where a certain contemplative or brahman — through ardency, exertion, commitment, heedfulness, & right attention — touches the sort of concentration of awareness that, when his mind is thus concentrated, he sees with the divine eye, pure and surpassing the human, that person — the case where one who takes life, takes what is not given, engages in illicit sex, lies, speaks divisively, speaks abusively, engages in idle chatter, is covetous, malevolent, & holds wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, has reappeared in a good destination, a heavenly world.
“He says, 'So there really are no evil actions, there really is no result of misconduct.
For I saw the case where a person who took life… & held wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, has reappeared in a good destination, a heavenly world.' He says, 'Anyone who takes life… & hold wrong view: They all, on the breakup of the body, after death, reappear in a good destination, a heavenly world.
Whoever knows this, knows rightly.
Whoever knows otherwise, their knowledge is wrong.' Insisting through obstinacy & grasping right there on what was seen by himself, known by himself, understood by himself, he states: 'Only this is true.
Everything otherwise is worthless.'
“Then there is the case, Ānanda, where a certain contemplative or brahman — through ardency, exertion, commitment, heedfulness, & right attention — touches the sort of concentration of awareness that, when his mind is thus concentrated, he sees with the divine eye, pure and surpassing the human, that person — the case where one who abstains from taking life, abstains from taking what is not given, abstains from illicit sex, abstains from lying, abstains from speaking divisively, abstains from speaking abusively, abstains from idle chatter, is not covetous, not malevolent, & holds right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, reappears in a good destination, a heavenly world.
“He says, 'So there really are fine actions, there really is the result of good conduct.
For I saw the case where a person who abstained from taking life… & held right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, has reappeared in a good destination, a heavenly world.' He says, 'Anyone who abstains from taking life… & holds right view: They all, on the breakup of the body, after death, reappear in a good destination, a heavenly world.
Whoever knows this, knows rightly.
Whoever knows otherwise, their knowledge is wrong.' Insisting through obstinacy & grasping right there on what was seen by himself, known by himself, understood by himself, he states: 'Only this is true.
Everything otherwise is worthless.'
“Then there is the case, Ānanda, where a certain contemplative or brahman — through ardency, exertion, commitment, heedfulness, & right attention — touches the sort of concentration of awareness that, when his mind is thus concentrated, he sees with the divine eye, pure and surpassing the human, that person — the case where one who abstains from taking life, abstains from taking what is not given, abstains from illicit sex, abstains from lying, abstains from speaking divisively, abstains from speaking abusively, abstains from idle chatter, is not covetous, not malevolent, & holds right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, reappears in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.
“He says, 'So there really are no fine actions, there really is no result of good conduct.
For I saw the case where a person who abstained from taking life… & held right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, has reappeared in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.' He says, 'Anyone who abstains from taking life… & holds right view: They all, on the breakup of the body, after death, reappear in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.
Whoever knows this, knows rightly.
Whoever knows otherwise, their knowledge is wrong.' Insisting through obstinacy & grasping right there on what was seen by himself, known by himself, understood by himself, he states: 'Only this is true.
Everything otherwise is worthless.'
“Now, Ānanda, in the case where the contemplative or brahman says, 'So there really are evil actions, there really is the result of misconduct,' I allow him that.
When he says, 'For I saw the case where a person who took life… & held wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, has reappeared in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell,' I allow him that, too.
But when he says, 'Anyone who takes life… & hold wrong view: They all, on the breakup of the body, after death, reappear in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell,' I don't allow him that.
And when he says, 'Whoever knows this, knows rightly; whoever knows otherwise, their knowledge is wrong,' I don't allow him that.
When, insisting through obstinacy & grasping right there on what was seen by himself, known by himself, understood by himself, he states: 'Only this is true.
Everything otherwise is worthless,' I don't allow him that, either.
Why is that?
Because the Tathāgata's knowledge with regard to the greater analysis of action is otherwise.
“Now, Ānanda, in the case where the contemplative or brahman says, 'So there really are no evil actions, there really is no result of misconduct,' I don't allow him that.
But when he says, 'For I saw the case where a person who took life… & held wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, has reappeared in a good destination, a heavenly world,' I do allow him that.
But when he says, 'Anyone who takes life… & hold wrong view: They all, on the breakup of the body, after death, reappear in a good destination, a heavenly world,' I don't allow him that.
And when he says, 'Whoever knows this, knows rightly.
Whoever knows otherwise, their knowledge is wrong,' I don't allow him that.
When, insisting through obstinacy & grasping right there on what was seen by himself, known by himself, understood by himself, he states: 'Only this is true.
Everything otherwise is worthless,' I don't allow him that, either.
Why is that?
Because the Tathāgata's knowledge with regard to the greater analysis of action is otherwise.
“Now, Ānanda, in the case where the contemplative or brahman says, 'So there really are fine actions, there really is the result of good conduct,' I allow him that.
And when he says, 'For I saw the case where a person who abstained from taking life… & held right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, has reappeared in a good destination, a heavenly world,' I allow him that, too.
But when he says, 'Anyone who abstains from taking life… & holds right view: They all, on the breakup of the body, after death, reappear in a good destination, a heavenly world,' I don't allow him that.
And when he says, 'Whoever knows this, knows rightly.
Whoever knows otherwise, their knowledge is wrong,' I don't allow him that.
When, insisting through obstinacy & grasping right there on what was seen by himself, known by himself, understood by himself, he states: 'Only this is true.
Everything otherwise is worthless,' I don't allow him that, either.
Why is that?
Because the Tathāgata's knowledge with regard to the greater analysis of action is otherwise.
“Now, Ānanda, in the case where the contemplative or brahman says, 'So there really are no fine actions, there really is no result of good conduct,' I don't allow him that.
But when he says, 'For I saw the case where a person who abstained from taking life… & held right view, with the breakup of the body, after death, has reappeared in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell,' I do allow him that.
But when he says, 'Anyone who abstains from taking life… & holds right view: They all, on the breakup of the body, after death, reappear in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell,' I don't allow him that.
And when he says, 'Whoever knows this, knows rightly.
Whoever knows otherwise, their knowledge is wrong,' I don't allow him that.
When, insisting through obstinacy & grasping right there on what was seen by himself, known by himself, understood by himself, he states: 'Only this is true.
Everything otherwise is worthless,' I don't allow him that, either.
Why is that?
Because the Tathāgata's knowledge with regard to the greater analysis of action is otherwise.
“Now, Ānanda, in the case of the person who takes life… & holds wrong view and, with the breakup of the body, after death, reappears in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell: Either earlier he performed evil action that is to be felt as painful, or later he performed evil action that is to be felt as painful, or at the time of death he adopted & carried out wrong view.
Because of that, with the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.
And as for the results of taking life… holding wrong view, he will feel them either right here & now, or in the next, or following that.
“In the case of the person who takes life… & holds wrong view, with the breakup of the body, after death, reappears in a good destination, a heavenly world: Either earlier he performed fine action that is to be felt as pleasant, or later he performed fine action that is to be felt as pleasant, or at the time of death he adopted & carried out right view.
Because of that, with the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in a good destination, a heavenly world.
But as for the results of taking life… holding wrong view, he will feel them either right here & now, or in the next, or following that.
“In the case of the person who abstains from taking life… & holds right view and, with the breakup of the body, after death, reappears in a good destination, a heavenly world: either earlier he performed fine action that is to be felt as pleasant, or later he performed fine action that is to be felt as pleasant, or at the time of death he adopted & carried out right view.
Because of that, with the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in a good destination, a heavenly world.
And as for the results of abstaining from taking life… holding right view, he will feel them either right here & now, or in the next, or following that.
“In the case of the person who abstains from taking life… & holds right view with the breakup of the body, after death, reappears in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell: Either earlier he performed evil action that is to be felt as painful, or later he performed evil action that is to be felt as painful, or at the time of death he adopted & carried out wrong view.
Because of that, with the breakup of the body, after death, he reappears in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.
But as for the results of abstaining from taking life… holding right view, he will feel them either right here & now, or in the next, or following that.
“Thus, Ānanda, there is action that is ineffectual and apparently ineffectual.
There is action that is ineffectual but apparently effectual.
There is action that is both effectual and apparently effectual.
There is action that is effectual but apparently ineffectual.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, Ven.
Ānanda delighted in the Blessed One's words.
For a discussion of this discourse as an example of an analytical answer to a question, see Skill in Questions, chapter four.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks: “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks replied.
The Blessed One said: “Monks, I will teach you a statement & its analysis.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said this: “A monk should investigate in such a way that, his consciousness neither externally scattered & diffused, nor internally positioned, he would from lack of clinging/sustenance be unagitated.
When — his consciousness neither externally scattered & diffused, nor internally positioned — from lack of clinging/sustenance he would be unagitated, there is no seed for the conditions of future birth, aging, death, or stress.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said it, the One Well-gone got up from his seat and went into his dwelling.
Then, not long after the Blessed One had left, this thought occurred to the monks: “This brief statement the Blessed One has made, after which he went into his dwelling without analyzing the detailed meaning — i.e., 'A monk should investigate in such a way that, his consciousness neither externally scattered & diffused, nor internally positioned, he would from lack of clinging/sustenance be unagitated.
When — his consciousness neither externally scattered & diffused, nor internally positioned — from lack of clinging/sustenance he would be unagitated, there is no seed for the conditions of future birth, aging, death, or stress': now who might analyze the unanalyzed detailed meaning of this brief statement?” Then the thought occurred to them, “Ven.
Maha Kaccana is praised by the Teacher and esteemed by his knowledgeable companions in the holy life.
He is capable of analyzing the unanalyzed detailed meaning of this brief statement.
Suppose we were to go to him and, on arrival, question him about this matter.
So the monks went to Ven.
Maha Kaccana and, on arrival exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, they sat to one side.
As they were standing there, they “Analyze the meaning, Ven.
Maha Kaccana!
“Friends, it's as if a man needing heartwood, looking for heartwood, wandering in search of heartwood — passing over the root & trunk of a standing tree possessing heartwood — were to imagine that heartwood should be looked for among its branches & leaves.
So it is with you, who — having bypassed the Blessed One when you were face to face with him, the Teacher — imagine that I should be asked about this matter.
For knowing, the Blessed One knows; seeing, he sees.
He is the Eye, he is Knowledge, he is Dhamma, he is Brahma.
He is the speaker, the proclaimer, the elucidator of meaning, the giver of the Deathless, the lord of the Dhamma, the Tathagata.
That was the time when you should have questioned him about this matter.
However he answered, that was how you should have remembered it.
“Yes, friend Kaccana: knowing, the Blessed One knows; seeing, he sees.
He is the Eye, he is Knowledge, he is Dhamma, he is Brahma.
He is the speaker, the proclaimer, the elucidator of meaning, the giver of the Deathless, the lord of the Dhamma, the Tathagata.
That was the time when we should have questioned him about this matter.
However he answered, that was how we should have remembered it.
But you are praised by the Teacher and esteemed by your knowledgeable companions in the holy life.
You are capable of analyzing the unanalyzed detailed meaning of this brief statement.
Analyze the meaning, Ven.
Maha Kaccana without making it difficult!
“In that case, my friends, listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, friend,” the monks responded.
Ven.
Maha Kaccana said this: “Friends, concerning the brief statement the Blessed One made, after which he entered his dwelling without analyzing the detailed meaning — i.e., 'A monk should investigate in such a way that, his consciousness neither externally scattered & diffused, nor internally positioned, he would from lack of clinging/sustenance be unagitated.
When — his consciousness neither externally scattered & diffused, nor internally positioned — from lack of clinging/sustenance he would be unagitated, there is no seed for the conditions of future birth, aging, death, or stress' — I understand the detailed meaning to be this:
“How is consciousness said to be scattered & diffused?
There is the case where a form is seen with the eye, and consciousness follows the drift of the theme of the form, is tied to the attraction of the theme of the form, is chained to the attraction of the theme of the form, is fettered & joined to the attraction of the theme of the form: Consciousness is said to be externally scattered & diffused.
“There is the case where a sound is heard with the ear… an aroma is smelled with the nose… a flavor is tasted with the tongue… a tactile sensation is felt with the body… an idea is cognized with the intellect, and consciousness follows the drift of the theme of the idea, is tied to the attraction of the theme of the idea, is chained to the attraction of the theme of the idea, is fettered & joined to the attraction of the theme of the idea: Consciousness is said to be externally scattered & diffused.
“And how is consciousness said not to be externally scattered & diffused?
There is the case where a form is seen with the eye, and consciousness does not follow the drift of the theme of the form, is not tied to… chained to… fettered, or joined to the attraction of the theme of the form: Consciousness is said not to be externally scattered & diffused.
“There is the case where a sound is heard with the ear… an aroma is smelled with the nose… a flavor is tasted with the tongue… a tactile sensation is felt with the body… an idea is cognized with the intellect, and consciousness does not follow the drift of the theme of the idea, is not tied to… chained to… fettered, or joined to the attraction of the theme of the idea: Consciousness is said not to be externally scattered & diffused.
“And how is the mind said to be internally positioned?
There is the case where a monk, quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
His consciousness follows the drift of the rapture & pleasure born of withdrawal, is tied to… chained… fettered, & joined to the attraction of the rapture & pleasure born of withdrawal.
Or further, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
His consciousness follows the drift of the rapture & pleasure born of composure, is tied to… chained… fettered, & joined to the attraction of the rapture & pleasure born of composure.
Or further, with the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' His consciousness follows the drift of the equanimity & pleasure, is tied to… chained… fettered, & joined to the attraction of the equanimity & pleasure.
Or further, with the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
His consciousness follows the drift of the neither pleasure nor pain, is tied to… chained to… fettered, & joined to the attraction of the neither pleasure nor pain: The mind is said to be internally positioned.
“And how is the mind said not to be internally positioned?
There is the case where a monk, quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful qualities, enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
His consciousness does not follow the drift of the rapture & pleasure born of withdrawal, is not tied to… chained to… fettered, or joined to the attraction of the rapture & pleasure born of withdrawal.
Or further, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
His consciousness does not follow the drift of the rapture & pleasure born of composure, is not tied to… chained… fettered, or joined to the attraction of the rapture & pleasure born of composure.
Or further, with the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' His consciousness does not follow the drift of the equanimity & pleasure, is not tied to… chained… fettered, or joined to the attraction of the equanimity & pleasure.
Or further, with the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor pain.
His consciousness does not follow the drift of the neither pleasure nor pain, is not tied to… chained to… fettered, or joined to the attraction of the neither pleasure nor pain: The mind is said to be not internally positioned.
“And how is agitation caused by clinging/sustenance?
There is the case where an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person — who has no regard for noble ones, is not well-versed or disciplined in their Dhamma; who has no regard for men of integrity, is not well-versed or disciplined in their Dhamma — assumes form to be the self, or the self as possessing form, or form as in the self, or the self as in form.
His form changes & is unstable.
Because of the change & instability of form, his consciousness alters in accordance with the change in form.
With the agitations born from the alteration in accordance with the change in form and coming from the co-arising of qualities, his mind stays consumed.
And because of the consumption of awareness, he feels fearful, threatened, & solicitous.
“He assumes feeling to be the self…
“He assumes perception to be the self…
“He assumes fabrications to be the self…
“He assumes consciousness to be the self, of the self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in the self, or the self as in consciousness.
His consciousness changes & is unstable.
Because of the change & instability of consciousness, his consciousness alters in accordance with the change in consciousness.
With the agitations born from the alteration in accordance with the change in consciousness and coming from the co-arising of qualities, his mind stays consumed.
And because of the consumption of awareness, he feels fearful, threatened, & solicitous.
“This, friends, is how agitation is caused by clinging/sustenance.
“And how is non-agitation caused by lack of clinging/ sustenance?
There is the case where an instructed disciple of the noble ones — who has regard for noble ones, is well-versed & disciplined in their Dhamma; who has regard for men of integrity, is well-versed & disciplined in their Dhamma — doesn't assume form to be the self, or the self as possessing form, or form as in the self, or the self as in form.
His form changes & is unstable, but his consciousness doesn't — because of the change & instability of form — alter in accordance with the change in form.
His mind is not consumed with any agitations born from an alteration in accordance with the change in form or coming from the co-arising of qualities.
And because his awareness is not consumed, he feels neither fearful, threatened, nor solicitous.
“He doesn't assume feeling to be the self…
“He doesn't assume perception to be the self…
“He doesn't assume fabrications to be the self…
“He doesn't assume consciousness to be the self, or the self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in the self, or the self as in consciousness.
His consciousness changes & is unstable, but his consciousness doesn't — because of the change & instability of consciousness — alter in accordance with the change in consciousness.
His mind is not consumed with any agitations born from an alteration in accordance with the change in consciousness or coming from the co-arising of qualities.
And because his awareness is not consumed, he feels neither fearful, threatened, nor solicitous.
“This, friends, is how non-agitation is caused by lack of clinging/sustenance.
“So, concerning the brief statement the Blessed One made, after which he entered his dwelling without analyzing the detailed meaning — i.e., 'A monk should investigate in such a way that, his consciousness neither externally scattered & diffused, nor internally positioned, he would from lack of clinging/sustenance be unagitated.
When — his consciousness neither externally scattered & diffused, nor internally positioned — from lack of clinging/ sustenance he would be unagitated, there is no seed for the conditions of future birth, aging, death, or stress' — this is how I understand the detailed meaning.
Now, friends, if you wish, having gone to the Blessed One, question him about this matter.
However he answers is how you should remember it.
Then the monks, delighting in & approving of Ven.
Maha Kaccayana's words, got up from their seats and went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to him, they sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they “Then Ven.
Maha Kaccayana analyzed the meaning using these words, these statements, these phrases.
“Maha Kaccayana is wise, monks.
He is a person of great discernment.
If you had asked me about this matter, I too would have answered in the same way he did.
That is its meaning, and that is how you should remember it.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted in the Blessed One's words.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then Subha the student, Todeyya's son, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One: “Master Gotama, what is the reason, what is the cause, why baseness & excellence are seen among human beings, among the human race?
For short-lived & long-lived people are to be seen, sickly & healthy, ugly & beautiful, uninfluential & influential, poor & rich, low-born & high-born, stupid & discerning people are to be seen.
So what is the reason, what is the cause, why baseness & excellence are seen among human beings, among the human race?
“Student, beings are owners of kamma, heir to kamma, born of kamma, related through kamma, and have kamma as their arbitrator.
Kamma is what creates distinctions among beings in terms of coarseness & refinement.
“I don't understand the detailed meaning of Master Gotama's statement spoken in brief without explaining the detailed meaning.
It would be good if Master Gotama taught me the Dhamma so that I might understand the detailed meaning of his brief statement.
“In that case, student, listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, Master Gotama,” Subha the student responded.
The Blessed One said: “There is the case, student, where a woman or man is a killer of living beings, brutal, bloody-handed, given to killing & slaying, showing no mercy to living beings.
Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, hell.
If, on the break-up of the body, after death — instead of reappearing in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, hell — he/she comes to the human state, then he/she is short-lived wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to a short life: to be a killer of living beings, brutal, bloody-handed, given to killing & slaying, showing no mercy to living beings.
“But then there is the case where a woman or man, having abandoned the killing of living beings, abstains from killing living beings, and dwells with the rod laid down, the knife laid down, scrupulous, merciful, & sympathetic for the welfare of all living beings.
Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in a good destination, in the heavenly world.
If, on the break-up of the body, after death — instead of reappearing in a good destination, in the heavenly world — he/she comes to the human state, then he/she is long-lived wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to a long life: to have abandoned the killing of living beings, to abstain from killing living beings, to dwell with one's rod laid down, one's knife laid down, scrupulous, merciful, & sympathetic for the welfare of all living beings.
“There is the case where a woman or man is one who harms beings with his/her fists, with clods, with sticks, or with knives.
Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in the plane of deprivation… If instead he/she comes to the human state, then he/she is sickly wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to sickliness: to be one who harms beings with one's fists, with clods, with sticks, or with knives.
“But then there is the case where a woman or man is not one who harms beings with his/her fists, with clods, with sticks, or with knives.
Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in a good destination… If instead he/she comes to the human state, then he/she is healthy wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to health: not to be one who harms beings with one's fists, with clods, with sticks, or with knives.
“There is the case, where a woman or man is ill-tempered & easily upset; even when lightly criticized, he/she grows offended, provoked, malicious, & resentful; shows annoyance, aversion, & bitterness.
Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in the plane of deprivation… If instead he/she comes to the human state, then he/she is ugly wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to ugliness: to be ill-tempered & easily upset; even when lightly criticized, to grow offended, provoked, malicious, & resentful; to show annoyance, aversion, & bitterness.
“But then there is the case where a woman or man is not ill-tempered or easily upset; even when heavily criticized, he/she doesn't grow offended, provoked, malicious, or resentful; doesn't show annoyance, aversion, or bitterness.
Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in a good destination… If instead he/she comes to the human state, then he/she is beautiful wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to beauty: not to be ill-tempered or easily upset; even when heavily criticized, not to be offended, provoked, malicious, or resentful; nor to show annoyance, aversion, & bitterness.
“There is the case where a woman or man is envious.
He/she envies, begrudges, & broods about others' gains, honor, respect, reverence, salutations, & veneration.
Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in the plane of deprivation… If instead he/she comes to the human state, then he/she is not influential wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to not being influential: to be envious, to envy, begrudge, & brood about others' gains, honor, respect, reverence, salutations, & veneration.
“But then there is the case where a woman or man is not envious.
He/she does not envy, begrudge, or brood about others' gains, honor, respect, reverence, salutations, or veneration.
Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in a good destination… If instead he/she comes to the human state, he/she is influential wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to being influential: not to be envious; not to envy, begrudge, or brood about others' gains, honor, respect, reverence, salutations, or veneration.
“There is the case where a woman or man is not a giver of food, drink, cloth, sandals, garlands, scents, ointments, beds, dwellings, or lighting to brahmans or contemplatives.
Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death he/she reappears in the plane of deprivation… If instead he/she comes to the human state, he/she is poor wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to poverty: not to be a giver of food, drink, cloth, sandals, garlands, scents, ointments, beds, dwellings, or lighting to brahmans or contemplatives.
“But then there is the case where a woman or man is a giver of food, drink, cloth, sandals, scents, ointments, beds, dwellings, & lighting to brahmans & contemplatives.
Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in a good destination… If instead he/she comes to the human state, then he/she is wealthy wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to great wealth: to be a giver of food, drink, cloth, sandals, garlands, scents, ointments, beds, dwellings, & lighting to brahmans & contemplatives.
“There is the case where a woman or man is obstinate & arrogant.
He/she does not pay homage to those who deserve homage, rise up for those for whom one should rise up, give a seat to those to whom one should give a seat, make way for those for whom one should make way, worship those who should be worshipped, respect those who should be respected, revere those who should be revered, or honor those who should be honored.
Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in the plane of deprivation… If instead he/she comes to the human state, then he/she is low-born wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to a low birth: to be obstinate & arrogant, not to pay homage to those who deserve homage, nor rise up for… nor give a seat to… nor make way for… nor worship… nor respect… nor revere… nor honor those who should be honored.
“But then there is the case where a woman or man is not obstinate or arrogant; he/she pays homage to those who deserve homage, rises up… gives a seat… makes way… worships… respects… reveres… honors those who should be honored.
Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in a good destination… If instead he/she comes to the human state, then he/she is highborn wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to a high birth: not to obstinate or arrogant; to pay homage to those who deserve homage, to rise up… give a seat… make way… worship… respect… revere… honor those who should be honored.
“There is the case where a woman or man when visiting a brahman or contemplative, does not ask: 'What is skillful, venerable sir?
What is unskillful?
What is blameworthy?
What is blameless?
What should be cultivated?
What should not be cultivated?
What, having been done by me, will be for my long-term harm & suffering?
Or what, having been done by me, will be for my long-term welfare & happiness?' Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in the plane of deprivation… If instead he/she comes to the human state, then he/she will be stupid wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to stupidity: when visiting a brahman or contemplative, not to ask: 'What is skillful?… Or what, having been done by me, will be for my long-term welfare & happiness?'
“But then there is the case where a woman or man when visiting a brahman or contemplative, asks: 'What is skillful, venerable sir?
What is unskillful?
What is blameworthy?
What is blameless?
What should be cultivated?
What should not be cultivated?
What, having been done by me, will be for my long-term harm & suffering?
Or what, having been done by me, will be for my long-term welfare & happiness?' Through having adopted & carried out such actions, on the break-up of the body, after death, he/she reappears in a good destination… If instead he/she comes to the human state, then he/she is discerning wherever reborn.
This is the way leading to discernment: when visiting a brahman or contemplative, to ask: 'What is skillful?… Or what, having been done by me, will be for my long-term welfare & happiness?'
“So, student, the way leading to short life makes people short-lived, the way leading to long life makes people long-lived; the way leading to sickliness makes people sickly, the way leading to health makes people healthy; the way leading to ugliness makes people ugly, the way leading to beauty makes people beautiful; the way leading to lack of influence makes people uninfluential, the way leading to influence makes people influential; the way leading to poverty makes people poor, the way leading to wealth makes people wealthy; the way leading to low birth makes people low-born, the way leading to high birth makes people highborn; the way leading to stupidity makes people stupid, the way leading to discernment makes people discerning.
Beings are owners of kamma, heir to kamma, born of kamma, related through kamma, and have kamma as their arbitrator.
Kamma is what creates distinctions among beings in terms of coarseness & refinement…
When this was said, Subha the student, Todeyya's son, said to the Blessed One: “Magnificent, Master Gotama!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has Master Gotama — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to Master Gotama for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the Community of monks.
May Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge, from this day forward, for life.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
There the Blessed One addressed the monks, “Monks.
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded to him.
The Blessed One said, “Monks, it's as if there were two households with doors, and a man of good eyesight, standing there between them, would see people entering & leaving a house, wandering out & about.
In the same way, I — by means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human — see beings passing away & re-appearing, and I discern how they are inferior & superior, beautiful & ugly, fortunate & unfortunate in accordance with their actions: 'O, how these beings — who were endowed with good conduct of body, speech, & mind, who did not revile noble ones, who held right views and undertook actions under the influence of right views — with the break-up of the body, after death, have re-appeared in a good destination, the heavenly world.
Or how these beings — who were endowed with bad conduct of body, speech & mind, who reviled noble ones, held wrong views and undertook actions under the influence of wrong views — with the break-up of the body, after death, have re-appeared in the realm of the hungry ghosts.
Or how these beings — who were endowed with bad conduct of body, speech & mind, who reviled noble ones, held wrong views and undertook actions under the influence of wrong views — with the break-up of the body, after death, have re-appeared in the animal womb.
Or how these beings — who were endowed with bad conduct of body, speech & mind, who reviled noble ones, held wrong views and undertook actions under the influence of wrong views — with the break-up of the body, after death, have re-appeared in a plane of deprivation, a bad destination, a lower realm, hell.'
“Then the hell-wardens, seizing by the arms, present him to King Yama: 'This is a man, your majesty, with no respect for mother, no respect for father, no reverence for contemplatives, no reverence for brahmans, no honor for the leaders of his clan.
Let your majesty decree his punishment.'
“Then King Yama interrogates & interpellates & castigates the man regarding the first deva messenger: 'My good man, didn't you see the first deva messenger that has appeared among human beings?'
“'I didn't, lord,' he says.
Then King Yama says, 'My good man, didn't you see among human beings a tender baby boy lying prone in its own urine & excrement?'
“'I did, lord,' he says.
Then King Yama says, 'My good man, didn't the thought occur to you — observant & mature: “I, too, am subject to birth, have not gone beyond birth.
I'd better do good with body, speech, & mind”?'
“'I couldn't, lord.
I was heedless, lord.'
Then King Yama says, 'My good man, through heedlessness you did not do what is good with body, speech, & mind.
And of course, my good man, they will deal with you in accordance with your heedlessness.
For that evil kamma of yours was neither done by your mother, nor done by your father, nor done by your brother, nor done by your sister, nor done by your friends & companions, nor done by your kinsmen & relatives, nor done by the devas.
That evil kamma was done by you yourself, and you yourself will experience its result.'
“Then, having interrogated & interpellated & castigated the man regarding the first deva messenger, King Yama interrogates & interpellates & castigates him regarding the second: 'My good man, didn't you see the second deva messenger that has appeared among human beings?'
“'I didn't, lord,' he says.
“Then King Yama says, 'My good man, didn't you see among human beings a woman or man eighty, ninety, one hundred years old: aged, roof-rafter crooked, bent-over, supported by a cane, palsied, miserable, broken-toothed, gray-haired, scanty-haired, bald, wrinkled, with limbs all blotchy?'
“'I did, lord,' he says.
“Then King Yama says, 'My good man, didn't the thought occur to you — observant & mature: “I, too, am subject to aging, have not gone beyond aging.
I'd better do good with body, speech, & mind”?'
“'I couldn't, lord.
I was heedless, lord.'
“Then King Yama says, 'My good man, through heedlessness you did not do what is good with body, speech, & mind.
And of course, my good man, they will deal with you in accordance with your heedlessness.
For that evil kamma of yours was neither done by your mother, nor done by your father, nor done by your brother, nor done by your sister, nor done by your friends & companions, nor done by your kinsmen & relatives, nor done by the devas.
That evil kamma was done by you yourself, and you yourself will experience its result.'
“Then, having interrogated & interpellated & castigated the man regarding the second deva messenger, King Yama interrogates & interpellates & castigates him regarding the third: 'My good man, didn't you see the third deva messenger that has appeared among human beings?'
“'I didn't, lord,' he says.
“Then King Yama says, 'My good man, didn't you see among human beings a woman or man diseased, in pain, severely ill, lying in her/his own urine & excrement, lifted up by others, laid down by others?'
“'I did, lord,' he says.
“Then King Yama says, 'My good man, didn't the thought occur to you — observant & mature: “I, too, am subject to illness, have not gone beyond illness.
I'd better do good with body, speech, & mind”?'
“'I couldn't, lord.
I was heedless, lord.'
“Then King Yama says, 'My good man, through heedlessness you did not do what is good with body, speech, & mind.
And of course, my good man, they will deal with you in accordance with your heedlessness.
For that evil kamma of yours was neither done by your mother, nor done by your father, nor done by your brother, nor done by your sister, nor done by your friends & companions, nor done by your kinsmen & relatives, nor done by the devas.
That evil kamma was done by you yourself, and you yourself will experience its result.'
“Then, having interrogated & interpellated & castigated the man regarding the third deva messenger, King Yama interrogates & interpellates & castigates him regarding the fourth: 'My good man, didn't you see the fourth deva messenger that has appeared among human beings?'
“'I didn't, lord,' he says.
“Then King Yama says, 'My good man, didn't you see among human beings kings — catching a thief, a criminal — having him tortured in many ways: flogging him with whips, beating him with canes, beating him with clubs; cutting off his hands, cutting off his feet, cut off his hands & feet; cutting off his ears, cutting off his nose, cutting off his ears & nose; subjecting him to the 'porridge pot,' the 'polished-shell shave,' the 'Rāhu's mouth,' the 'flaming garland,' the 'blazing hand,' the 'grass-duty,' the 'bark-dress,' the 'burning antelope,' the 'meat hooks,' the 'coin-gouging,' the 'lye pickling,' the 'pivot on a stake,' the 'rolled-up bed'; having him splashed with boiling oil, devoured by dogs, impaled alive on a stake; cutting off his head with a sword?'
“'I did, lord,' he says.
“Then King Yama says, 'My good man, didn't the thought occur to you — observant & mature: “It seems that those who do evil actions are tortured in these many ways in the here-&-now.
And how much more in the hereafter?
I'd better do good with body, speech, & mind”?'
“'I couldn't, lord.
I was heedless, lord.'
“Then King Yama says, 'My good man, through heedlessness you did not do what is good with body, speech, & mind.
And of course, my good man, they will deal with you in accordance with your heedlessness.
For that evil kamma of yours was neither done by your mother, nor done by your father, nor done by your brother, nor done by your sister, nor done by your friends & companions, nor done by your kinsmen & relatives, nor done by the devas.
That evil kamma was done by you yourself, and you yourself will experience its result.'
“Then, having interrogated & interpellated & castigated the man regarding the fourth deva messenger, King Yama interrogates & interpellates & castigates him regarding the fifth: 'My good man, didn't you see the fifth deva messenger that has appeared among human beings?'
“'I didn't, lord,' he says.
“Then King Yama says, 'My good man, didn't you see among human beings a woman or man, one day, two days, or three days dead: bloated, livid, oozing with lymph?'
“'I did, lord,' he says.
“Then King Yama says, 'My good man, didn't the thought occur to you — observant & mature: “I, too, am subject to death, have not gone beyond death.
I'd better do good with body, speech, & mind”?'
“'I couldn't, lord.
I was heedless, lord.'
“Then King Yama says, 'My good man, through heedlessness you did not do what is good with body, speech, & mind.
And of course, my good man, they will deal with you in accordance with your heedlessness.
For that evil kamma of yours was neither done by your mother, nor done by your father, nor done by your brother, nor done by your sister, nor done by your friends & companions, nor done by your kinsmen & relatives, nor done by the devas.
That evil kamma was done by you yourself, and you yourself will experience its result.'
“Then, having interrogated & interpellated & castigated the man regarding the fifth deva messenger, King Yama falls silent.

“Then the hell-wardens torture with what's called a five-fold imprisonment.
They drive a red-hot iron stake through one hand, they drive a red-hot iron stake through the other hand, they drive a red-hot iron stake through one foot, they drive a red-hot iron stake through the other foot, they drive a red-hot iron stake through the middle of his chest.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die as long as his evil kamma is not exhausted.
“Then the hell-wardens lay him down and slice him with axes.
Then they hold him feet up & head down and slice him with adzes.
Then they harness him to a chariot and drive him back & forth over ground that is burning, blazing, & glowing.
Then they make him climb up & down a vast mountain of embers that is burning, blazing, & glowing.
Then they hold him feet up & head down and plunge him into a red-hot copper cauldron that is burning, blazing, & glowing.
There he boils with bubbles foaming.
And as he is boiling there with bubbles foaming, he goes now up, he goes now down, he goes now around.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die as long as his evil kamma is not exhausted.

“Then the hell-wardens throw him into the Great Hell.
And as to the Great Hell, monks:
“The flame that leaps from the eastern wall of the Great Hell strikes the western wall.
The flame that leaps from the western wall strikes the eastern wall.
The flame that leaps from the northern wall strikes the southern wall.
The flame that leaps from the southern wall strikes the northern wall.
The flame that leaps from the bottom strikes the top.
The flame that leaps from the top strikes the bottom.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die as long as his evil kamma is not exhausted.
“There comes a time when, ultimately, with the passing of a long stretch of time, the eastern gate of the Great Hell opens.
He runs there, rushing quickly.
As he runs there, rushing quickly, his outer skin burns, his inner skin burns, his flesh burns, his tendons burn, even his bones turn to smoke.
When is lifted, he is the just same.
But when he finally arrives, the door slams shut.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die as long as his evil kamma is not exhausted.
“There comes a time when, ultimately, with the passing of a long stretch of time, the western gate of the Great Hell opens… the northern gate… the southern gate of the Great Hell opens.
He runs there, rushing quickly.
As he runs there, rushing quickly, his outer skin burns, his inner skin burns, his flesh burns, his tendons burn, even his bones turn to smoke.
When is lifted, he is the just same.
But when he finally arrives, the door slams shut.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die as long as his evil kamma is not exhausted.
“There comes a time when, ultimately, with the passing of a long stretch of time, the eastern gate of the Great Hell opens.
He runs there, rushing quickly.
As he runs there, rushing quickly, his outer skin burns, his inner skin burns, his flesh burns, his tendons burn, even his bones turn to smoke.
When is lifted, he is the just same.
He gets out through the gate.
But right next to the Great Hell is a vast Excrement Hell.
He falls into that.
And in that Excrement Hell needle-mouth beings bore into his outer skin.
Having bored into his outer skin, they bore into his inner skin… his flesh… his tendons… the bone.
Having bored into the bone, they feed on the marrow.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die as long as his evil kamma is not exhausted.
“Right next to the Excrement Hell is the vast Hot Ashes Hell.
He falls into that.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die as long as his evil kamma is not exhausted.
“Right next to the Hot Ashes Hell is the vast Simbali Forest, reaching up a league, covered with thorns sixteen fingerbreadths long — burning, blazing, & glowing.
He enters that and is made to climb up & down them.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die as long as his evil kamma is not exhausted.
“Right next to the Simbali Forest is the vast Sword-leaf Forest.
He enters that.
There the leaves, stirred by the wind, cut off his hand, cut off his foot, cut off his hand & foot, cut off his ear, cut off his nose, cut off his ear & nose.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die as long as his evil kamma is not exhausted.
“Right next to the Sword-leaf Forest is the vast Lye-water River.
He falls into that.
There he is swept downstream, he is swept upstream, he is swept downstream & upstream.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die as long as his evil kamma is not exhausted.
“Then the hell-wardens pull him out with a hook and, placing him on the ground, say to him, 'Well, good man, what do you want?' He replies, 'I'm hungry, venerable sirs.' So the hell-wardens pry open his mouth with red-hot iron tongs — burning, blazing, & glowing — and throw into it a copper ball, burning, blazing, & glowing.
It burns his lips, it burns his mouth, it burns his stomach and comes out the lower side, carrying along his bowels & intestines.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die as long as his evil kamma is not exhausted.
“Then the hell-wardens say to him, 'Well, good man, what do you want?' He replies, 'I'm thirsty, venerable sirs.' So the hell-wardens pry open his mouth with red-hot iron tongs — burning, blazing, & glowing — and pour into it molten copper, burning, blazing, & glowing.
It burns his lips, it burns his mouth, it burns his stomach and comes out the lower side, carrying along his bowels & intestines.
There he feels painful, racking, piercing feelings, yet he does not die as long as his evil kamma is not exhausted.
“Then the hell-wardens throw him back into the Great Hell once more.

“Once, monks, the thought occurred to King Yama: 'Those who did evil actions in the world are tortured in these many ways.
O that I might gain the human state!
And that a Tathāgata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — might arise in the world!
And that I might attend to that Tathāgata!
And that he might teach me the Dhamma!
And that I might understand his Dhamma!'
“I tell you this, monks, not from having heard it from another contemplative or brahman.
On the contrary, I tell you this just as I have known for myself, seen for myself, understood for myself.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-gone, the Teacher, said further:
You want: long life, health, beauty, power, riches, high birth, wisdom?
Or even some of these things?
They do not appear by chance.
It is not someone's luck that they are healthy, or another's lack of it that he is stupid.
Though it may not be clear to us now, all such inequalities among human beings come about because of the kamma they have made individually.
Each person reaps his own fruits.
So if one is touched by short life, sickliness, ugliness, insignificance, poverty, low birth or stupidity and one does not like these things, no need to just accept that that is the way it is.
The future need not be like that provided that one makes the right kind of kamma now.
Knowing what kamma to make and what not to make is the mark of a wise man.
It is also the mark of one who is no longer drifting aimlessly but has some direction in life and some control over the sort of events that will occur.
Thus have I heard.
On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's Park.
Then Subha the student, Todeyya's son, went to the Blessed One and exchanged greetings with him, and when the courteous and amiable talk was finished, he sat down at one side.
When he had done so, Subha the student said to the Blessed One:
“Master Gotama, what is the reason, what is the condition, why inferiority and superiority are met with among human beings, among mankind?
For one meets with short-lived and long-lived people, sick and healthy people, ugly and beautiful people, insignificant and influential people, poor and rich people, low-born and high-born people, stupid and wise people.
What is the reason, what is the condition, why superiority and inferiority are met with among human beings, among mankind?
“Student, beings are owners of kammas, heirs of kammas, they have kammas as their progenitor, kammas as their kin, kammas as their homing-place.
It is kammas that differentiate beings according to inferiority and superiority.
“I do not understand the detailed meaning of Master Gotama's utterance spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning.
It would be good if Master Gotama taught me the Dhamma so that I might understand the detailed meaning of Master Gotama's utterance spoken in brief without expounding the detailed meaning.
“Then listen, student, and heed well what I shall say.
“Even so, Master Gotama,” Subha the student replied.
The Blessed One said this:
“Here, student, some woman or man is a killer of living beings, murderous, bloody-handed, given to blows and violence, merciless to living beings.
Due to having performed and completed such kammas, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
If, on the dissolution of the body, after death, instead of his reappearing in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell, he comes to the human state, he is short-lived wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to short life, that is to say, to be a killer of living beings, murderous, bloody-handed, given to blows and violence, merciless to living beings.
“But here some woman or man, having abandoned the killing of living beings, abstains from killing living beings, lays aside the rod and lays aside the knife, is considerate and merciful and dwells compassionate for the welfare of all living beings.
Due to having performed and completed such kammas, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
If, on the dissolution of the body, after death, instead of his reappearing in a happy destination, in the heavenly world, he comes to the human state, he is long-lived wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to long life, that is to say, to have abandoned the killing of living beings, to abstain from killing living beings, to lay aside the rod and lay aside the knife, to be considerate and merciful, and to dwell compassionate for the welfare of all living beings.
“Here, student, some woman or man is one who harms beings with his hands or with clods or with sticks or with knives.
Due to having performed and completed such kammas, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation… If instead he comes to the human state, he is sickly wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to sickness, that is to say, to be one who harms beings with one's hands or with clods or with sticks or with knives.
“But here some woman or man is not one who harms beings with his hands, or with clods, or with sticks, or with knives.
Due to having performed and completed such kammas, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination… If instead he comes to the human state, he is healthy wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to health, that is to say, not to be one who harms beings with his hands or with clods or with sticks or with knives.
“Here, student, some woman or man is angry, much given to rage; even when little is said, he is furious, angry, ill-disposed, resentful, he shows ill-temper, hate and surliness.
Due to having performed and completed such kammas, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation… If instead he comes to the human state, he is ugly wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to ugliness, that is to say, to be furious, angry, ill-disposed, resentful, and to show ill-temper, hate and surliness.
“But here some woman or man is not angry or much given to rage; even when much is said, he is not furious, angry, ill-disposed, resentful, nor does he show ill-temper, hate or surliness.
Due to having performed and completed such kammas, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination… If instead he comes to the human state, he is beautiful wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to beauty, that is to say, not to be angry or given to much rage; even when much is said, not to be furious, angry, ill-disposed or resentful, or to show ill-temper, hate or surliness.
“Here, student, some woman or man is envious; he envies, begrudges and harbors envy about others' gains, honor, veneration, respect, salutations and offerings.
Due to having performed and completed such kammas, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation… If instead he comes to the human state, he is insignificant wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to insignificance, that is to say, to be envious, to envy, begrudge, and harbor envy about others' gain, honor, veneration, respect, salutations and offerings.
“But here some woman or man is not envious, he does not envy, begrudge or harbor envy about others' gain, honor, veneration, respect, salutations and offerings.
Due to having performed and completed such kammas, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination… If instead he comes to the human state, he is influential wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to influence, that is to say, not to be envious, not to envy, begrudge or harbor envy about others' gain, honor, veneration, respect, salutations and offerings.
“Here, student, some woman or man is not a giver of food, drink, cloth, sandals, garlands, perfumes, unguents, bed, roof and lighting to monks or brahmans.
Due to having performed and completed such kamma, on the dissolution of the body, after death he reappears in a state of deprivation… If instead he comes to the human state, he is poor wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to poverty, that is to say, not to be a giver of food, drink, cloth, sandals, garlands, perfumes, unguents, bed, roof and lighting to monks and brahmans.
“But here some woman or man is a giver of food, drink, cloth, sandals, perfumes, unguents, bed, roof and lighting to monks and brahmans.
Due to having performed and completed such kamma, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination… If instead he comes to the human state, he is rich wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to riches, that is to say, to be a giver of food, drink, cloth, sandals, garlands, perfumes, unguents, bed, roof and lighting to monks and brahmans.
“Here, student, some woman or man is obdurate and haughty; he does not pay homage to whom he should pay homage, or rise up for whom he should rise up, or give a seat to whom he should give a seat, or make way for whom he should make way, or worship him who should be worshipped, or respect him who should be respected, or revere him who should be revered, or honor him who should be honored.
Due to having performed and completed such kammas, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation… If instead he comes to the human state, he is low-born wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to low birth, that is to say, to be obdurate and haughty, not to pay homage to whom he should pay homage, nor rise up for…, nor give a seat to…, nor make way for…, nor worship…, nor respect…, nor revere…, nor honor him who should be honored.
“But here some woman or man is not obdurate or haughty; he pays homage to whom he should pay homage, rises up for whom he should rise up, gives a seat to whom he should give a seat, makes way for whom he should make way, worships him who should be worshipped, respects him who should be respected, reveres him who should be revered, honors him who should be honored.
Due to having performed and completed such kammas, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination… If instead he comes to the human state, he is high-born wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to high birth, that is to say, not to be obdurate or haughty, to pay homage to whom he should pay homage, to rise up for…, to give a seat to…, to make way for…, to worship… respect… revere… honor him who should be honored.
“Here, student, some woman or man when visiting a monk or brahman, does not ask: 'What is wholesome, venerable sir?
What is unwholesome?
What is blamable?
What is blameless?
What should be cultivated?
What should not be cultivated?
What, by my doing it, will be long for my harm and suffering?
Or what, by my doing it, will be long for my welfare and happiness?' Due to having performed and completed such kammas, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a state of deprivation… If instead he comes to the human state, he will be stupid wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to stupidity, that is to say, when visiting a monk or brahman, not to ask: 'What is wholesome?… Or what, by my doing it, will be long for my welfare and happiness?'
“But here some woman or man when visiting a monk or brahman, asks: 'What is wholesome, venerable sir?… Or what, by my doing it, will be long for my welfare and happiness?' Due to having performed and completed such kammas, on the dissolution of the body, after death, he reappears in a happy destination… If instead he comes to the human state, he is wise wherever he is reborn.
This is the way that leads to wisdom, that is to say, when visiting a monk or brahman, to ask: 'What is wholesome, venerable sir?… Or what, by my doing it, will be long for my welfare and happiness?'
“So, student, the way that leads to short life makes people short-lived, the way that leads to long life makes people long-lived; the way that leads to sickness makes people sick, the way that leads to health makes people healthy; the way that leads to ugliness makes people ugly, the way that leads to beauty makes people beautiful; the way that leads to insignificance makes people insignificant, the way that leads to influence makes people influential; the way that leads to poverty makes people poor, the way that leads to riches makes people rich; the way that leads to low birth makes people low-born, the way that leads to high birth makes people high-born; the way that leads to stupidity makes people stupid, the way that leads to wisdom makes people wise.
“Beings are owners of kammas, student, heirs of kammas, they have kammas as their progenitor, kammas as their kin, kammas as their homing-place.
It is kammas that differentiate beings according to inferiority and superiority.
When this was said, Subha the student, Todeyya's son, said to the Blessed One: “Magnificent, Master Gotama!
Magnificent, Master Gotama!
The Dhamma has been made clear in many ways by Master Gotama, as though he were turning upright what had been overthrown, revealing the hidden, showing the way to one who is lost, holding up a lamp in the darkness for those with eyes to see forms.
“I go to Master Gotama for refuge, and to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of bhikkhus.
From today let Master Gotama accept me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge for life.”
Editor's note: An extensive discussion of this sutta may be found in Ideal Solitude: An Exposition on the Bhaddekaratta Sutta by the translator.
Thus have I heard: At one time the Exalted one was living at Saavatthi in the Jeta Grove, Anaathapi.n.dika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks thus: “Monks.” “Revered one,” the monks answered the Exalted One in assent.
The Exalted one spoke thus “Monks, I shall preach to you the summary and the exposition of the Ideal Lover of Solitude.
Listen and give attention.
I shall speak.” “Even so, revered sir,” the monks answered the Exalted One in assent.
The Exalted One said this:
“And how, monks, does one trace back the past?
He thinks: 'I was of such form in the past' and brings delight to bear on it.
He thinks: 'I was of such feeling in the past' and brings delight to bear on it.
He thinks: 'I was of such perception in the past' and brings delight to bear on it.
He thinks: 'I was of such formations in the past' and brings delight to bear on them.
He thinks: 'I was of such consciousness in the past' and brings delight to bear on it.
That is how, monks, one traces back the past.
“And how, monks, does one not trace back the past?
He thinks: 'I was of such form in the past' but brings no delight to bear on it.
He thinks: 'I was of such feeling… of such perception… of such formations…'… He thinks: 'I was of such consciousness in the past' but brings no delight to bear on it.
That is how, monks, one does not trace back the past.
“And how, monks, does one yearn for the future?
He thinks: 'I may have such form in the future' and brings delight to bear on it.
He thinks: 'I may have such feeling… such perception… such formations…'… He thinks: 'I may have such consciousness in the future' and brings delight to bear on it.
That is how, monks, one yearns for the future.
“And how, monks, does one not yearn for the future?
He thinks: 'I may have such form in the future' but brings no delight to bear on it.
He thinks: 'I may have such feeling… such perception… such formations…'… He thinks: 'I may have such consciousness in the future' but brings no delight to bear on it.
That is how, monks, one does not yearn for the future.
“And how is one drawn into present things?
Herein, monks, an uninstructed ordinary man who takes no account of the Noble Ones, is unskilled in the Dhamma of the Noble Ones, untrained in the Dhamma of the Noble Ones, taking no account of the good men, unskilled in the Dhamma of the good men, untrained in the Dhamma of the good men, looks upon form as self, or self as possessed of form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
He looks upon feeling as self, or self as possessed of feeling, or feeling as in self, or self as in feeling.
He looks upon perception as self, or self as possessed of perception, or perception as in self, or self as in perception.
He looks upon formations as self, or self as possessed of formations, or formations as in self, or self as in formations.
He looks upon consciousness as self, or self as possessed of consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
That is how, monks, one is drawn into present things.
“And how, monks, is one not drawn into present things?
Herein, monks, an instructed Noble disciple who takes into account the Noble Ones, skilled in the Dhamma of the Noble Ones, trained in the Dhamma of the Noble Ones, taking into account the good men, skilled in the Dhamma of the good men, trained in the Dhamma of the good men, does not look upon form as self, or self as possessed of form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
He does not look upon feeling as self… He does not look upon perception as self… He does not look upon formations as self… He does not look upon consciousness as self, or self as possessed of consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
That is how, monks, one is not drawn into present things.
So it was with reference to this that it was said: “Monks, I shall preach to you the summary and the exposition of the Ideal Lover of Solitude.
Thus spoke the Exalted One, Delighted, those monks rejoiced in what the Exalted One had said.
The title of this discourse has sparked some controversy, centered on the word “ratta.” Modern translators in Asian vernaculars are unanimous in rendering it as “night,” a reading seconded by Sanskrit and Tibetan versions of the discourse.
Translators working in English have balked at this reading, however, on the grounds that the title it yields — “Auspicious One-Night” — makes no sense.
Thus I.B.
Horner drops the word “ratta” for her translation entirely; Ven Ñanamoli renders it as “attachment,” yielding “One Fortunate Attachment”; and Ven.
Ñanananda, taking his cue from Ven.
Ñanamoli, renders it as “lover,” yielding “Ideal Lover of Solitude.
If we look at idiomatic Pali usage, though, we find that there is good reason to stick with the traditional reading of “night.” There is a tendency in the Pali canon to speak of a -hour period of day and night as a “night.” This would be natural for a society that used a lunar calendar — marking the passage of time by the phases of the moon — just as it is natural for us, using a solar calendar, to call the same period of time a “day.” As the verse that forms the summary of this discourse explicitly mentions one practicing “relentlessly both day and night,” the “night” in the title of the discourse would seem to be a -hour, rather than a -hour, night — and so I have chosen to render the Pali idiom into its English equivalent: An Auspicious Day.
Ven.
Ñanamoli is probably right in assuming that “bhaddekaratta” was a pre-Buddhist term that the Buddha adopted and re-interpreted in light of his own teaching.
The point of the discourse would thus be that — instead of the play of cosmic forces, the stars, or the lucky omens — one's own development of the mind's attitude to time is what makes a day auspicious.
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said: “Monks, I will teach you the summary & exposition of one who has had an auspicious day.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks replied.
The Blessed One said:
“And how, monks, does one chase after the past?
One gets carried away with the delight of 'In the past I had such a form '… 'In the past I had such a feeling'… 'In the past I had such a perception'… 'In the past I had such a thought-fabrication'… 'In the past I had such a consciousness.' This is called chasing after the past.
“And how does one not chase after the past?
One does not get carried away with the delight of 'In the past I had such a form '… 'In the past I had such a feeling'… 'In the past I had such a perception'… 'In the past I had such a thought-fabrication'… 'In the past I had such a consciousness.' This is called not chasing after the past.
“And how does one place expectations on the future?
One gets carried away with the delight of 'In the future I might have such a form '… 'In the future I might have such a feeling'… 'In the future I might have such a perception'… 'In the future I might have such a thought-fabrication'… 'In the future I might have such a consciousness.' This is called placing expectations on the future.
“And how does one not place expectations on the future?
One does not get carried away with the delight of 'In the future I might have such a form '… 'In the future I might have such a feeling'… 'In the future I might have such a perception'… 'In the future I might have such a thought-fabrication'… 'In the future I might have such a consciousness.' This is called not placing expectations on the future.
“And how is one taken in with regard to present qualities?
There is the case where an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person who has not seen the noble ones, is not versed in the teachings of the noble ones, is not trained in the teachings of the noble ones, sees form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“He/she sees feeling as self, or self as possessing feeling, or feeling as in self, or self as in feeling.
“He/she sees perception as self, or self as possessing perception, or perception as in self, or self as in perception.
“He/she sees thought-fabrications as self, or self as possessing thought-fabrications, or thought-fabrications as in self, or self as in thought-fabrications.
“He/she sees consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
This is called being taken in with regard to present qualities.
“And how is one not taken in with regard to present qualities?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones who has seen the noble ones, is versed in the teachings of the noble ones, is well-trained in the teachings of the noble ones, does not see form as self, or self as possessing form, or form as in self, or self as in form.
“He/she does not see feeling as self, or self as possessing feeling, or feeling as in self, or self as in feeling.
“He/she does not see perception as self, or self as possessing perception, or perception as in self, or self as in perception.
“He/she does not see thought-fabrications as self, or self as possessing thought-fabrications, or thought-fabrications as in self, or self as in thought-fabrications.
“He/she does not see consciousness as self, or self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in self, or self as in consciousness.
This is called not being taken in with regard to present qualities.
“'Monks, I will teach you the summary & exposition of one who has had an auspicious day.' Thus was it said, and in reference to this was it said.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted in the Blessed One's words.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Sanctuary.
Then, early in the morning, Ven.
Bhumija put on his robes and, carrying his bowl & outer robe, went to Prince Jayasena's residence.
On arrival, he sat down on a seat made ready.
Prince Jayasena went to Ven.
Bhumija and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to Ven.
Bhumija, “Master Bhumija, there are some brahmans & contemplatives who espouse this teaching, espouse this view: 'If one follows the holy life, even when having made a wish, one is incapable of obtaining results.
If one follows the holy life even when having made no wish, one is incapable of obtaining results.
If one follows the holy life even when both having made a wish and having made no wish, one is incapable of obtaining results.
If one follows the holy life even when neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, one is incapable of obtaining results.' With regard to that, what does Master Bhumija's teacher say, what is his view, what does he declare?
“I haven't heard this face to face with the Blessed One, prince, I haven't received this face to face with the Blessed One, but there is the possibility that the Blessed One would answer in this way: 'If one follows the holy life inappropriately, even when having made a wish, one is incapable of obtaining results.
If one follows the holy life inappropriately, even when having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, one is incapable of obtaining results.
if one follows the holy life appropriately, even when having made a wish, one is capable of obtaining results.
If one follows the holy life appropriately, even when having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, one is capable of obtaining results.' I haven't heard this face to face with the Blessed One, I haven't received this face to face with the Blessed One, but there is the possibility that the Blessed One would answer in this way.
“If that is what Master Bhumija's teacher says, if that is his view, if that is what he declares, then yes, Master Bhumija's teacher stands, as it were, having struck all of those many brahmans & contemplatives down by the head.
Prince Jayasena then served Ven.
Bhumija from his own dish of milk rice.
Then Ven.
Bhumija, after his meal, returning from his almsround, went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “Just now, lord, early in the morning, I put on my robes and, carrying my bowl & outer robe, went to Prince Jayasena's residence.
On arrival, I sat down on a seat made ready.
Then Prince Jayasena went to me and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with me.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to me, 'Master Bhumija, there are some brahman & contemplatives who espouse this teaching, espouse this view: “If one follows the holy life even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, one is incapable of obtaining results.” With regard to that, what does Master Bhumija's teacher say, what is his view, what does he declare?'
“When this was said, I replied to Prince Jayasena, 'I haven't heard this face to face with the Blessed One, prince, I haven't received this face to face with the Blessed One, but there is the possibility that the Blessed One would answer in this way: “If one follows the holy life inappropriately, even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, one is incapable of obtaining results.
if one follows the holy life appropriately, even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, one is capable of obtaining results.” I haven't heard this face to face with the Blessed One, I haven't received this face to face with the Blessed One, but there is the possibility that the Blessed One would answer in this way.'
“'If that is what Master Bhumija's teacher says, if that is his view, if that is what he declares, then yes, Master Bhumija's teacher stands, as it were, having struck all of those many brahmans & contemplatives down by the head.'
“Answering in this way when thus asked, lord, am I speaking in line with what the Blessed One has said, am I not misrepresenting the Blessed One with what is unfactual, am I answering in line with the Dhamma so that no one whose thinking is in line with the Dhamma will have grounds for criticizing me?
“Certainly, Bhumija, in answering in this way when thus asked, you are speaking in line with what I have said, you are not misrepresenting me with what is unfactual, and you are answering in line with the Dhamma so that no one whose thinking is in line with the Dhamma will have grounds for criticizing you.
For any brahmans or contemplatives endowed with wrong view, wrong resolve, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, & wrong concentration: If they follow the holy life even when having made a wish, they are incapable of obtaining results.
If they follow the holy life even when having made no wish, they are incapable of obtaining results.
If they follow the holy life even when both having made a wish and having made no wish, they are incapable of obtaining results.
If they follow the holy life even when neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, they are incapable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an inappropriate way of obtaining results.
“Suppose a man in need of oil, looking for oil, wandering in search of oil, would pile gravel in a tub and press it, sprinkling it again & again with water.
If he were to pile gravel in a tub and press it, sprinkling it again & again with water even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, he would be incapable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an inappropriate way of obtaining results.
“In the same way, any brahmans or contemplatives endowed with wrong view, wrong resolve, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, & wrong concentration: If they follow the holy life even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, they are incapable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an inappropriate way of obtaining results.
“Suppose a man in need of milk, looking for milk, wandering in search of milk, would twist the horn of a newly-calved cow.
If he were to twist the horn of a newly-calved cow even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, he would be incapable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an inappropriate way of obtaining results.
“In the same way, any brahmans or contemplatives endowed with wrong view, wrong resolve, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, & wrong concentration: If they follow the holy life even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, they are incapable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an inappropriate way of obtaining results.
“Suppose a man in need of butter, looking for butter, wandering in search of butter, would sprinkle water on water in a crock and twirl it with a churn-stick.
If he were to sprinkle water on water in a crock and twirl it with a churn-stick even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, he would be incapable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an inappropriate way of obtaining results.
“In the same way, any brahmans or contemplatives endowed with wrong view, wrong resolve, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, & wrong concentration: If they follow the holy life even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, they are incapable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an inappropriate way of obtaining results.
“Suppose a man in need of fire, looking for fire, wandering in search of fire, would take a fire stick and rub it into a wet, sappy piece of wood.
If he were to take a fire stick and rub it into a wet, sappy piece of wood even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, he would be incapable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an inappropriate way of obtaining results.
“In the same way, any brahmans or contemplatives endowed with wrong view, wrong resolve, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, & wrong concentration: If they follow the holy life even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, they are incapable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an inappropriate way of obtaining results.
“But as for any brahmans or contemplatives endowed with right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, & right concentration: If they follow the holy life even when having made a wish, they are capable of obtaining results.
If they follow the holy life even when having made no wish, they are capable of obtaining results.
If they follow the holy life even when both having made a wish and having made no wish, they are capable of obtaining results.
If they follow the holy life even when neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, they are capable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an appropriate way of obtaining results.
“Suppose a man in need of oil, looking for oil, wandering in search of oil, would pile sesame seeds in a tub and press them, sprinkling them again & again with water.
If he were to pile sesame seeds in a tub and press them, sprinkling them again & again with water, even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, he would be capable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an appropriate way of obtaining results.
“In the same way, any brahmans or contemplatives endowed with right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, & right concentration: If they follow the holy life even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, they are capable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an appropriate way of obtaining results.
“Suppose a man in need of milk, looking for milk, wandering in search of milk, would twist the teat of a newly-calved cow.
If he were to twist the teat of a newly-calved cow even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, he would be capable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an appropriate way of obtaining results.
“In the same way, any brahmans or contemplatives endowed with right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, & right concentration: If they follow the holy life even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, they are capable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an appropriate way of obtaining results.
“Suppose a man in need of butter, looking for butter, wandering in search of butter, would sprinkle water on curds in a crock and twirl them with a churn-stick.
If he were to sprinkle water on curds in a crock and twirl them with a churn-stick even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, he would be capable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an appropriate way of obtaining results.
“In the same way, any brahmans or contemplatives endowed with right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, & right concentration: If they follow the holy life even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, they are capable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an appropriate way of obtaining results.
“Suppose a man in need of fire, looking for fire, wandering in search of fire, would take a fire stick and rub it into a dry, sapless piece of wood.
If he were to take a fire stick and rub it into a dry, sapless piece of wood even when having made a wish… having made no wish… both having made a wish and having made no wish… neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, he would be capable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an appropriate way of obtaining results.
“In the same way, any brahmans or contemplatives endowed with right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, & right concentration: If they follow the holy life even when having made a wish, they are capable of obtaining results.
If they follow the holy life even when having made no wish, they are capable of obtaining results.
If they follow the holy life even when both having made a wish and having made no wish, they are capable of obtaining results.
If they follow the holy life even when neither having made a wish nor having made no wish, they are capable of obtaining results.
Why is that?
Because it is an appropriate way of obtaining results.
“Bhumija, if these four similes had occurred to you in the presence of Prince Jayasena, he would have naturally felt confidence in you and — feeling confidence — would have shown his confidence in you.
“But, lord, how could these four similes have occurred to me in the presence of Prince Jayasena, as they are natural to the Blessed One and have never before been heard from him?
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, Ven.
Bhumija delighted in the Blessed One's words.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Savatthi in the Eastern Monastery, the palace of Migara's mother.
Then in the evening, Ven.
Ananda, coming out of seclusion, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One: “On one occasion, when the Blessed One was staying among the Sakyans in a Sakyan town named Nagaraka, there — face-to-face with the Blessed One — I heard this, face-to-face I learned this: 'I now remain fully in a dwelling of emptiness.' Did I hear that correctly, learn it correctly, attend to it correctly, remember it correctly?
“Yes, Ananda, you heard that correctly, learned it correctly, attended to it correctly, remembered it correctly.
Now, as well as before, I remain fully in a dwelling of emptiness.
Just as this palace of Migara's mother is empty of elephants, cattle, & mares, empty of gold & silver, empty of assemblies of women & men, and there is only this non-emptiness — the singleness based on the community of monks; even so, Ananda, a monk — not attending to the perception of village, not attending to the perception of human being — attends to the singleness based on the perception of wilderness.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in its perception of wilderness.
“He discerns that 'Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of village are not present.
Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of human being are not present.
There is only this modicum of disturbance: the singleness based on the perception of wilderness.' He discerns that 'This mode of perception is empty of the perception of village.
This mode of perception is empty of the perception of human being.
There is only this non-emptiness: the singleness based on the perception of wilderness.' Thus he regards it as empty of whatever is not there.
Whatever remains, he discerns as present: 'There is this.' And so this, his entry into emptiness, accords with actuality, is undistorted in meaning, & pure.
“Further, Ananda, the monk — not attending to the perception of human being, not attending to the perception of wilderness — attends to the singleness based on the perception of earth.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in its perception of earth.
Just as a bull's hide is stretched free from wrinkles with a hundred stakes, even so — without attending to all the ridges & hollows, the river ravines, the tracts of stumps & thorns, the craggy irregularities of this earth — he attends to the singleness based on the perception of earth.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in its perception of earth.
“He discerns that 'Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of human being are not present.
Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of wilderness are not present.
There is only this modicum of disturbance: the singleness based on the perception of earth.' He discerns that 'This mode of perception is empty of the perception of human being.
This mode of perception is empty of the perception of wilderness.
There is only this non-emptiness: the singleness based on the perception of earth.' Thus he regards it as empty of whatever is not there.
Whatever remains, he discerns as present: 'There is this.' And so this, his entry into emptiness, accords with actuality, is undistorted in meaning, & pure.
“Further, Ananda, the monk — not attending to the perception of wilderness, not attending to the perception of earth — attends to the singleness based on the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in its perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space.
“He discerns that 'Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of wilderness are not present.
Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of earth are not present.
There is only this modicum of disturbance: the singleness based on the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space.' He discerns that 'This mode of perception is empty of the perception of wilderness.
This mode of perception is empty of the perception of earth.
There is only this non-emptiness: the singleness based on the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space.' Thus he regards it as empty of whatever is not there.
Whatever remains, he discerns as present: 'There is this.' And so this, his entry into emptiness, accords with actuality, is undistorted in meaning, & pure.
“Further, Ananda, the monk — not attending to the perception of earth, not attending to the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space — attends to the singleness based on the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in its perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
“He discerns that 'Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of earth are not present.
Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space are not present.
There is only this modicum of disturbance: the singleness based on the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.' He discerns that 'This mode of perception is empty of the perception of earth.
This mode of perception is empty of the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space.
There is only this non-emptiness: the singleness based on the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.' Thus he regards it as empty of whatever is not there.
Whatever remains, he discerns as present: 'There is this.' And so this, his entry into emptiness, accords with actuality, is undistorted in meaning, & pure.
“Further, Ananda, the monk — not attending to the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space, not attending to the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness — attends to the singleness based on the perception of the dimension of nothingness.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in its perception of the dimension of nothingness.
“He discerns that 'Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space are not present.
Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness are not present.
There is only this modicum of disturbance: the singleness based on the perception of the dimension of nothingness.' He discerns that 'This mode of perception is empty of the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space.
This mode of perception is empty of the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
There is only this non-emptiness: the singleness based on the perception of the dimension of nothingness.' Thus he regards it as empty of whatever is not there.
Whatever remains, he discerns as present: 'There is this.' And so this, his entry into emptiness, accords with actuality, is undistorted in meaning, & pure.
“Further, Ananda, the monk — not attending to the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, not attending to the perception of the dimension of nothingness — attends to the singleness based on the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
“He discerns that 'Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness are not present.
Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of the dimension of nothingness are not present.
There is only this modicum of disturbance: the singleness based on the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.' He discerns that 'This mode of perception is empty of the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
This mode of perception is empty of the perception of the dimension of nothingness.
There is only this non-emptiness: the singleness based on the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.' Thus he regards it as empty of whatever is not there.
Whatever remains, he discerns as present: 'There is this.' And so this, his entry into emptiness, accords with actuality, is undistorted in meaning, & pure.
“Further, Ananda, the monk — not attending to the perception of the dimension of nothingness, not attending to the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception — attends to the singleness based on the theme-less concentration of awareness.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in its theme-less concentration of awareness.
“He discerns that 'Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of the dimension of nothingness are not present.
Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, are not present.
And there is only this modicum of disturbance: that connected with the six sensory spheres, dependent on this very body with life as its condition.' He discerns that 'This mode of perception is empty of the perception of the dimension of nothingness.
This mode of perception is empty of the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
There is only this non-emptiness: that connected with the six sensory spheres, dependent on this very body with life as its condition.' Thus he regards it as empty of whatever is not there.
Whatever remains, he discerns as present: 'There is this.' And so this, his entry into emptiness, accords with actuality, is undistorted in meaning, & pure.
“Further, Ananda, the monk — not attending to the perception of the dimension of nothingness, not attending to the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception — attends to the singleness based on the theme-less concentration of awareness.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in its theme-less concentration of awareness.
“He discerns that 'This theme-less concentration of awareness is fabricated & mentally fashioned.' And he discerns that 'Whatever is fabricated & mentally fashioned is inconstant & subject to cessation.' For him — thus knowing, thus seeing — the mind is released from the effluent of sensuality, the effluent of becoming, the effluent of ignorance.
With release, there is the knowledge, 'Released.' He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
“He discerns that 'Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the effluent of sensuality… the effluent of becoming… the effluent of ignorance, are not present.
And there is only this modicum of disturbance: that connected with the six sensory spheres, dependent on this very body with life as its condition.' He discerns that 'This mode of perception is empty of the effluent of sensuality… becoming… ignorance.
And there is just this non-emptiness: that connected with the six sensory spheres, dependent on this very body with life as its condition.' Thus he regards it as empty of whatever is not there.
Whatever remains, he discerns as present: 'There is this.' And so this, his entry into emptiness, accords with actuality, is undistorted in meaning, pure — superior & unsurpassed.
“Ananda, whatever contemplatives and brahmans who in the past entered & remained in an emptiness that was pure, superior, & unsurpassed, they all entered & remained in this very same emptiness that is pure, superior, & unsurpassed.
Whatever contemplatives and brahmans who in the future will enter & remain in an emptiness that will be pure, superior, & unsurpassed, they all will enter & remain in this very same emptiness that is pure, superior, & unsurpassed.
Whatever contemplatives and brahmans who at present enter & remain in an emptiness that is pure, superior, & unsurpassed, they all enter & remain in this very same emptiness that is pure, superior, & unsurpassed.
“Therefore, Ananda, you should train yourselves: 'We will enter & remain in the emptiness that is pure, superior, & unsurpassed.' That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, Ven.
Ananda delighted in the Blessed One's words.
“Monks, these four goodly thoroughbred steeds are found existing in the world.
What four?
“In this case, monks, we may have a certain goodly thoroughbred steed which at the very sight of the shadow of the goad-stick is stirred, feels agitation 'What task, I wonder, will the trainer set me today?
What return can I make him?' Here, monks, we may have such a steed, and this is the first sort of goodly thoroughbred steed found existing in the world.
“Then again, monks, we may have a certain goodly thoroughbred steed which is not stirred at the mere sight of the goad-stick's shadow, feels no agitation, but when his coat is pricked with the goad, he is stirred, feels agitation 'What task, I wonder…' This is the second sort…
“Then again, monks, we may have a certain goodly thoroughbred steed which is not stirred… at the sight of the goad-stick's shade, nor yet when his coat is pricked with the goad, but when his flesh is pierced, he is stirred, he feels agitated 'What task, I wonder…' This is the third sort…
“Once more, monks, we may have a goodly thoroughbred steed which is stirred neither at the sight of the goad-stick's shade nor when his coat is pricked, nor yet when his flesh is pierced by the goad-stick; but when he is pierced to the very bone, he is stirred, feels agitation 'What task, I wonder, will the trainer set me today?
What return can I make him?' Here we have such a goodly thoroughbred steed… This is the fourth sort.
“Thus, monks, there four goodly thoroughbred steeds are found existing in the world.
“Just in the same way, monks, these four goodly thoroughbred men are found existing in the world.
What four?
“In this case, monks, we may have a certain goodly thoroughbred man who hears is said that in such and such a village or township is a woman or man afflicted or dead.
Thereat he is stirred, he feels agitation.
Thus agitated he strictly applied himself.
Thus applied he both realized in his own person the supreme truth, and sees it by penetrating it with wisdom.
Just as, monks, that goodly thoroughbred steed on seeing the shadow of the goad-stick is stirred, feels agitation, even so using this figure do I speak of this goodly thoroughbred man.
Such in this case is the goodly thoroughbred man.
This is the first sort…
“Again, monks, here we may have a goodly thoroughbred man who does not hear it said that in such a village or township is a woman or a man afflicted or dead, but with his own eyes beholds such.
Thereupon he is stirred, he feels agitation… Just as, monks, that goodly thoroughbred steed on having his coat pricked with the goad stirred… even so using this figure do I speak of this goodly thoroughbred man… Such in this case is… This is the second sort…
“Then again, monks, here we may have a goodly thoroughbred man who does not hear it said… nor yet with his own eyes beholds a woman or a man afflicted or dead, but his own kinsman or blood-relation is afflicted or dead.
Thereupon he is stirred… just as, monks, that goodly thoroughbred steed on having his flesh pierced is stirred… even so using this figure do I speak of this goodly thoroughbred man… Such in this case… This is the third sort.
“Once more, monks, here we may have a goodly thoroughbred man who neither hears it said… nor yet with his own eyes beholds… nor is his own kinsman or blood-relation afflicted or dead, but he himself is stricken with painful bodily feelings, grievous, sharp, racking, distracting, discomforting, that drain the life away.
Thereat he is stirred, he feels agitation.
Being so stirred he strictly applied himself.
Thus applied he both realizes in his own person the supreme truth, and sees it by penetrating it with wisdom.
Just as, monks, that goodly thoroughbred steed on being pierced to the very bone is stirred, feels agitation, even so using this figure do I speak of this goodly thoroughbred man.
Of such a sort, monks, is the goodly thoroughbred man in this case.
This is the fourth sort.
“These, monks, are the four sorts of thoroughbreds among men found existing in the world.”
“Monks, there are these four courses of action.
Which four?
There is the course of action that is unpleasant to do and that, when done, leads to what is unprofitable.
There is the course of action that is unpleasant to do but that, when done, leads to what is profitable.
There is the course of action that is pleasant to do but that, when done, leads to what is unprofitable.
There is the course of action that is pleasant to do and that, when done, leads to what is profitable.
“Now as for the course of action that is unpleasant to do and that, when done, leads to what is unprofitable, one considers it as not worth doing for both reasons: because the course of action is unpleasant to do, one considers it as not worth doing; and because the course of action, when done, leads to what is unprofitable, one considers it as not worth doing.
Thus one considers it as not worth doing for both reasons.
“As for the course of action that is unpleasant to do but that, when done, leads to what is profitable, it is in light of this course of action that one may be known — in terms of manly stamina, manly persistence, manly effort — as a fool or a wise person.
For a fool doesn't reflect, 'Even though this course of action is unpleasant to do, still when it is done it leads to what is profitable.' So he doesn't do it, and thus the non-doing of that course of action leads to what is unprofitable for him.
But a wise person reflects, 'Even though this course of action is unpleasant to do, still when it is done it leads to what is profitable.' So he does it, and thus the doing of that course of action leads to what is profitable for him.
“As for the course of action that is pleasant to do but that, when done, leads to what is unprofitable, it is in light of this course of action that one may be known — in terms of manly stamina, manly persistence, manly effort — as a fool or a wise person.
For a fool doesn't reflect, 'Even though this course of action is pleasant to do, still when it is done it leads to what is unprofitable.' So he does it, and thus the doing of that course of action leads to what is unprofitable for him.
But a wise person reflects, 'Even though this course of action is pleasant to do, still when it is done it leads to what is unprofitable.' So he doesn't do it, and thus the non-doing of that course of action leads to what is profitable for him.
“As for the course of action that is pleasant to do and that, when done, leads to what is profitable, one considers it as worth doing for both reasons: because the course of action is pleasant to do, one considers it as worth doing; and because the course of action, when done, leads to what is profitable, one considers it as worth doing.
Thus one considers it as worth doing for both reasons.
“These are the four courses of action.” 
“There are these four types of excellent thoroughbred horses to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
There is the case where an excellent thoroughbred horse, on seeing the shadow of the goad-stick, is stirred & agitated, 'I wonder what task the trainer will have me do today?
What should I do in response?' Some excellent thoroughbred horses are like this.
And this is the first type of excellent thoroughbred horse to be found existing in the world.
“Then again there is the case where an excellent thoroughbred horse is not stirred & agitated on seeing the shadow of the goad-stick, but when his coat is pricked he is stirred & agitated, 'I wonder what task the trainer will have me do today?
What should I do in response?' Some excellent thoroughbred horses are like this.
And this is the second type of excellent thoroughbred horse to be found existing in the world.
“Then again there is the case where an excellent thoroughbred horse is not stirred & agitated on seeing the shadow of the goad-stick, or when his coat is pricked, but when his hide is pricked he is stirred & agitated, 'I wonder what task the trainer will have me do today?
What should I do in response?' Some excellent thoroughbred horses are like this.
And this is the third type of excellent thoroughbred horse to be found existing in the world.
“Then again there is the case where an excellent thoroughbred horse is not stirred & agitated on seeing the shadow of the goad-stick, or when his coat is pricked, or when his hide is pricked, but when his bone is pricked he is stirred & agitated, 'I wonder what task the trainer will have me do today?
What should I do in response?' Some excellent thoroughbred horses are like this.
And this is the fourth type of excellent thoroughbred horse to be found existing in the world.
“These are the four types of excellent thoroughbred horse to be found existing in the world.
“Now, there are these four types of excellent thoroughbred persons to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
“There is the case where a certain excellent thoroughbred person hears, 'In that town or village over there a man or woman is in pain or has died.' He is stirred & agitated by that.
Stirred, he becomes appropriately resolute.
Resolute, he both realizes with his body the highest truth and, having penetrated it with discernment, sees.
This type of excellent thoroughbred person, I tell you, is like the excellent thoroughbred horse who, on seeing the shadow of the goad-stick, is stirred & agitated.
Some excellent thoroughbred people are like this.
And this is the first type of excellent thoroughbred person to be found existing in the world.
“Then again there is the case where a certain excellent thoroughbred person does not hear, 'In that town or village over there a man or woman is in pain or has died.' But he himself sees a man or woman in pain or dead.
He is stirred & agitated by that.
Stirred, he becomes appropriately resolute.
Resolute, he both realizes with his body the highest truth and, having penetrated it with discernment, sees.
This type of excellent thoroughbred person, I tell you, is like the excellent thoroughbred horse who, when its coat is pricked with the goad-stick, is stirred & agitated.
Some excellent thoroughbred people are like this.
And this is the second type of excellent thoroughbred person to be found existing in the world.
“Then again there is the case where a certain excellent thoroughbred person does not hear, 'In that town or village over there a man or woman is in pain or has died.' And he himself does not see a man or woman in pain or dead.
But he sees one of his own blood relatives in pain or dead.
He is stirred & agitated by that.
Stirred, he becomes appropriately resolute.
Resolute, he both realizes with his body the highest truth and, having penetrated it with discernment, sees.
This type of excellent thoroughbred person, I tell you, is like the excellent thoroughbred horse who, when its hide is pricked with the goad-stick, is stirred & agitated.
Some excellent thoroughbred people are like this.
And this is the third type of excellent thoroughbred person to be found existing in the world.
“Then again there is the case where a certain excellent thoroughbred person does not hear, 'In that town or village over there a man or woman is in pain or has died.' And he himself does not see a man or woman in pain or dead, nor does he see one of his own blood relatives in pain or dead.
But he himself is touched by bodily feelings that are painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable, life-threatening.
He is stirred & agitated by that.
Stirred, he becomes appropriately resolute.
Resolute, he both realizes with his body the highest truth and, having penetrated it with discernment, sees.
This type of excellent thoroughbred person, I tell you, is like the excellent thoroughbred horse who, when its bone is pricked with the goad-stick, is stirred & agitated.
Some excellent thoroughbred people are like this.
And this is the fourth type of excellent thoroughbred person to be found existing in the world.
“These are the four types of excellent thoroughbred persons to be found existing in the world.” 
Thus have I heard: At one time the Lord was staying near Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove at the squirrels' feeding place.
Now at that time the novice Aciravata was staying in the Forest Hut.
Then prince Jayasena, who was always pacing up and down, always roaming about on foot, approached the novice Aciravata; having approached he exchanged greetings with the novice Aciravata; having exchanged greetings of friendliness and courtesy, he sat down at a respectful distance.
While he was sitting down at a respectful distance, Prince Jayasena spoke thus to the novice Aciravata:
“I have heard, good Aggivessana, that if a monk is abiding here diligent, ardent, self-resolute, he may attain one-pointedness of mind.
“That is so, prince; that is so, prince.
A monk abiding here diligent, ardent, self-resolute, may attain one-pointedness of mind.
“It were good if the reverend Aggivessana were to teach me dhamma as he has heard it, as he has mastered it.
“I, prince, am not able to teach you dhamma as I have heard it, as I have mastered it.
Now, if I were to teach you dhamma as I have heard it, as I have mastered it, and if you could not understand the meaning of what I said, that would be weariness to me, that would be a vexation to me.
“Let the reverend Aggivessana teach me dhamma as he has heard it, as he has mastered it.
Perhaps I could understand the meaning of what the good Aggivessana says.
“If I were to teach you dhamma, prince, as I have heard it, as I have mastered it, and if you were to understand the meaning of what I say, that would be good; if you should not understand the meaning of what I say, you must remain as you are: you must not question me further on the matter.
“Let the reverend Aggivessana teach me dhamma as he has heard it, as he has mastered it.
If I understand the meaning of what the good Aggivessana says, that will be good; if I do not understand the meaning of what the good Aggivessana says, I will remain as I am; I will not question the reverend Aggivessana further on this matter.
Then the novice Aciravata taught dhamma to Prince Jayasena as he had heard it, as he had mastered it.
When this had been said, Prince Jayasena spoke thus to the novice Aciravata:
“This is impossible, good Aggivessana, it cannot come to pass that a monk abiding diligent, ardent, self-resolute, should attain one-pointedness of mind.” Then Prince Jayasena, having declared to the novice Aciravata that this was impossible and could not come to pass, rising from his seat, departed.
And soon after Prince Jayasena had departed, the novice Aciravata approached the Lord; having approached and greeted the Lord, he sat down at a respectful distance.
As he was sitting down at a respectful distance, the novice Aciravata told the Lord the whole of the conversation he had with Prince Jayasena as far as it had gone.
When this had been said, the Lord spoke thus to the novice Aciravata:
“What is the good of that, Aggivessana?
That Prince Jayasena, living as he does in the midst of sense-pleasures, enjoying sense-pleasures, being consumed by thoughts of sense-pleasures, burning with the fever of sense-pleasures, eager in the search for sense-pleasures, should know or see or attain or realize that which can be known by renunciation, seen by renunciation, attained by renunciation, realized by renunciation — such a situation does not exist.
It is as if, Aggivessana, among elephants or horses or oxen to be tamed, two elephants, two horses or two oxen are well tamed, well trained, and two are not tamed, not trained.
What do you think about this, Aggivessana?
Would these two elephants or horses or oxen that were to be tamed and that were well tamed, well trained — would these on being tamed reach tamed capacity, would they, being tamed, attain a tamed stage?
“Yes, revered sir.
“But those two elephants or horses or oxen that were to be tamed but that were neither tamed nor trained — would these, not being tamed, attain a tamed stage as do the two elephants or horses or oxen to be tamed that were well tamed, well trained?
“No, revered sir.
“Even so, Aggivessana, that Prince Jayasena, living as he does in the midst of sense-pleasures… should know or see or attain or realize that which can be known and realized by renunciation — such a situation does not exist.
It is as if, Aggivessana, there were a great mountain slope near a village or a market-town which two friends, coming hand in hand from that village or market-town might approach; having approached the mountain slope one friend might remain at the foot while the other might climb to the top.
Then the friend standing at the foot of the mountain slope might speak thus to the one standing on the top: 'My dear, what do you see as you stand on the top of the mountain slope?' He might reply: 'As I stand on the top of the mountain slope I, my dear, see delightful parks, delightful woods, delightful stretches of level ground delightful ponds.' But the other might speak thus: 'This is impossible, it cannot come to pass, my dear, that, as you stand on the top of the mountain slope, you should see… delightful ponds.' Then the friend who had been standing on top of the mountain slope having come down to the foot and taken his friend by the arm, making him climb to the top of the mountain slope and giving him a moment in which to regain his breath, might speak to him thus: 'Now, my dear, what is it that you see as you stand on the top of the mountain slope?' He might speak thus: 'I, my dear, as I stand on the top of the mountain slope, see delightful parks… delightful ponds.' He might speak thus: 'Just now, my dear, we understood you to say: This is impossible, it cannot come to pass that, as you stand on the top of the mountain slope, you should see delightful… ponds.
But now we understand you to say: 'I, my dear, as I stand on the top of the mountain slope, see delightful parks… delightful ponds.' He might speak thus: 'That was because I, my dear, hemmed in by this great mountain slope, could not see what was to be seen.'
“Even so but to a still greater degree, Aggivessana, is Prince Jayasena hemmed in, blocked, obstructed, enveloped by this mass of ignorance.
Indeed, that Prince Jayasena, living as he does in the midst of sense-pleasures, enjoying sense-pleasures, being consumed by thoughts of sense-pleasures, eager in the search for sense-pleasures, should know or see or attain or realize that which can be known… seen… attained… realized by renunciation — such a situation does not exist.
Had these two similes occurred to you, Aggivessana, for Prince Jayasena, Prince Jayasena naturally would have acted in the manner of one having trust in you.
“But how could these two similes for Prince Jayasena have occurred to me, revered sir, seeing that they are spontaneous, that is to say to the Lord, and have never been heard before?
“As, Aggivessana, a noble anointed king addresses an elephant hunter saying; 'You, good elephant hunter, mount the king's elephant and go into an elephant forest.
When you see a forest elephant, tie him to the neck of the king's elephant.' And, Aggivessana, the elephant hunter having answered: 'Yes, sire,' in assent to the noble anointed king, mounts the king's elephant and goes into an elephant forest.
Seeing a forest elephant, he ties him to the neck of the king's elephant.
So the king's elephant brings him out into the open.
But, Aggivessana, the forest elephant has this longing, that is to say for the elephant forest.
But in regard to him the elephant hunter tells the noble anointed king that the forest elephant has got out into the open.
The noble anointed king then addresses an elephant tamer, saying: 'Come you, good elephant tamer, tame the forest elephant by subduing his forest ways, by subduing his forest memories, and aspirations and by subduing his distress, his fretting and fever for the forest, by making him pleased with the villages and by accustoming him to human ways.'
“And, Aggivessana, the elephant tamer, having answered 'Yes, sire,' in assent to the noble anointed king, driving a great post into the ground ties the forest elephant to it by his neck so as to subdue his forest ways… and accustom him to human ways.
Then the elephant tamer addresses him with such words as are gentle, pleasing to the ear, affectionate, going to the heart, urbane, pleasant to the manyfolk, liked by the manyfolk.
And, Aggivessana, the forest elephant, on being addressed with words that are gentle… liked by the manyfolk, listens, lends ear and bends his mind to learning.
Next the elephant tamer supplies him with grass-fodder and water.
When, Aggivessana, the forest elephant has accepted the grass-fodder and water from the elephant tamer, it occurs to the elephant tamer: 'The king's elephant will now live.' Then the elephant tamer makes him do a further task, saying: 'Take up, put down.' When, Aggivessana the king's elephant is obedient to the elephant tamer and acts on his instructions to take up and put down, then the elephant tamer makes him do a further task, saying: 'Get up, sit down.' When, Aggivessana, the king's elephant is obedient to the elephant tamer and acts on his instructions to get up and sit down, then the elephant tamer makes him do a further task; known as 'standing your ground': he ties a shield to the great beast's trunk; a man holding a lance is sitting on his neck, and men holding lances are standing surrounding him on all sides; and the elephant tamer, holding a lance with a long shaft, is standing in front.
While he is doing the task of 'standing your ground' he does not move a fore-leg nor does he move a hind-leg, nor does he move the forepart of his body, nor does he move the hindpart of his body, nor does he move his head, nor does he move an ear, nor does he move a tusk, nor does he move his tail, nor does he move his trunk.
A king's elephant is one who endures blows of sword, axe, arrow, hatchet, and the resounding din of drum and kettle-drum, conch and tam-tam, he is purified gold purged of all its dross and impurities, fit for a king, a royal possession and reckoned as a kingly attribute.
“Even so, Aggivessana, does a Tathagata arise here in the world, a perfected one, fully Self-Awakened One, endowed with right knowledge and conduct, well-farer, knower of the worlds, the matchless charioteer of men to be tamed, the Awakened One, the Lord.
He makes known this world with the devas, with Mara, with Brahma, the creation with its recluses and brahmans, its devas and men, having realized them by his own super-knowledge.
He teaches dhamma which is lovely at the beginning, lovely in the middle, lovely at the ending, with the spirit and the letters; he proclaims the Brahma-faring, wholly fulfilled, quite purified.
A householder or a householder's son or one born in another family hears that dhamma.
Having heard that dhamma he gains faith in the Tathagata.
Endowed with this faith that he has acquired, he reflects in this way: 'The household life is confined and dusty, going forth is in the open; it is not easy for one who lives in a house to fare the Brahma-faring wholly fulfilled, wholly pure, polished like a conch-shell.
Suppose now that I, having cut off hair and beard, having put on saffron robes, should go forth from home into homelessness?' After a time, getting rid of his wealth, be it small or great, getting rid of his circle of relations, be it small or great, having cut off his hair and beard, having put on saffron robes, he goes forth from home into homelessness.
To this extent, Aggivessana, the ariyan disciple gets out into the open.
“But, Aggivessana, devas and mankind have this longing, that is to say, for the five strands of sense-pleasures.
The Tathagata disciplines him further, saying: 'Come you, monk, be moral, live controlled by the control of the Obligations, possessed of behavior and posture, seeing danger in the slightest faults; undertaking them, train yourself in the rules of training.'
“And when, Aggivessana, the ariyan disciple is moral, lives controlled by the control…, undertaking them, trains himself in the rules of training, then the Tathagata disciplines him further, saying: 'Come you, monk, be guarded as to the doors of the sense-organs.
Having seen a having seen a material shape with the eye, do not be entranced with the general appearance, do not be entranced with the detail; for if one dwells with the organ of sight uncontrolled, covetousness and dejection, evil, unskillful states of mind, may flow in.
So fare along controlling it, guard the organ of sight, achieve control over the organ of sight.
Having heard a sound with the ear… Having smelt a smell with the nose… Having savored a taste with the tongue… Having felt a touch with the body… Having cognized a mental state with the mind, be not entranced by the general appearance, be not entranced by the detail.
For if you dwell with the organ of mind uncontrolled, covetousness and dejection, evil unskillful states of mind, might flow in.
So fare along with its control, guard the organ of mind, achieve control over the organ of the mind.'
“And when, Aggivessana, the ariyan disciple is guarded as to the doors of the sense-organs, then the Tathagata disciplines him further, saying: 'Come you, monk, be moderate in eating; you should take food reflecting carefully, not for fun or indulgence or personal charm or beautification, but taking just enough for maintaining this body and keeping it going, for keeping it unharmed, for furthering the Brahma-faring, with the thought: Thus will I crush out an old feeling, and I will not allow a new feeling to arise, and then there will be for me subsistence and blamelessness and abiding in comfort.'
“When, Aggivessana, the ariyan disciple is moderate in eating, the Tathagata disciplines him further, saying: 'Come you, monk, abide intent on vigilance; during the day while pacing up and down, while sitting down, cleanse the mind of obstructive mental states; during the middle watch of the night, lie down on the right side in the lion posture, foot resting on foot, mindful, clearly conscious, reflecting on the thought of getting up again; during the last watch of the night, when you have arisen, while pacing up and down, while sitting down, cleanse the mind of obstructive mental states.'
“And when, Aggivessana, the ariyan disciple is intent on vigilance, then the Tathagata disciplines him further, saying: 'Come you, monk, be possessed of mindfulness and clear consciousness, acting with clear consciousness whether you are approaching or departing, acting with clear consciousness whether you are looking ahead or looking round, acting with clear consciousness whether you are bending in or stretching out, acting with clear consciousness whether you are carrying the outer cloak, the bowl or robe, acting with clear consciousness whether you are eating, drinking, munching, savoring, acting with clear consciousness whether you are obeying the calls of nature, acting with clear consciousness whether you are walking, standing, sitting, asleep, awake, talking or being silent.'
“And when, Aggivessana, the ariyan disciple is possessed of mindfulness and clear consciousness, then the Tathagata disciplines him further, saying: 'Come you, monk, choose a remote lodging in a forest, at the root of a tree, on a mountain slope, in a wilderness, in a hill-cave, a cemetery, a forest haunt, in the open or on a heap of straw.' He chooses a remote lodging in the forest… or on a heap of straw.
Returning from alms-gathering, after the meal, he sits down cross-legged, holding the back erect, having made mindfulness rise up in front of him, he, by getting rid of coveting for the world, dwells with a mind devoid of coveting, he purifies the mind of coveting.
By getting rid of the taint of ill-will, he dwells benevolent in mind, compassionate for the welfare of all creatures and beings, he purifies the mind of the taint of ill-will.
By getting rid of sloth and torpor, he dwells devoid of sloth and torpor; perceiving the light, mindful, clearly conscious, he purifies the mind of sloth and torpor.
By getting rid of restlessness and worry, he dwells calmly the mind subjectively tranquilized, he purifies the mind of restlessness and worry.
By getting rid of doubt, he dwells doubt-crossed, unperplexed as to the states that are skillful, he purifies the mind of doubt.
“He, by getting rid of these five hindrances which are defilements of the mind and weakening to intuitive wisdom, dwells contemplating the body in the body, ardent, clearly conscious, mindful so as to control the covetousness and dejection in the world.
He fares along contemplating the feelings… the mind… the mental states in mental states, ardent, clearly conscious, mindful so as to control the covetousness and dejection in the world.
“As, Aggivessana, an elephant tamer, driving a great post into the ground, ties a forest elephant to it by his neck so as to subdue his forest ways, so as to subdue his forest aspirations, and so as to subdue his distress, his fretting and fever for the forest, so as to make him pleased with villages and accustom him to human ways — even so, Aggivessana, these four applications of mindfulness are ties of the mind so as to subdue the ways of householders and to subdue the aspirations of householders and to subdue the distress, the fretting and fever of householders; they are for leading to the right path, for realizing nibbana.
“The Tathagata then disciplines him further, saying: 'Come you, monk, fare along contemplating the body in the body, but do not apply yourself to a train of thought connected with the body; fare along contemplating the feelings in the feelings… the mind in the mind… mental states in mental states, but do not apply yourself to a train of thought connected with mental states.'
“He by allaying initial thought and discursive thought, with the mind subjectively tranquilized and fixed on one point, enters on and abides in the second meditation which is devoid of initial and discursive thought, is born of concentration and is rapturous and joyful.
By the fading out of rapture, he dwells with equanimity, attentive and clearly conscious, and experiences in his person that joy of which the ariyans say: 'Joyful lives he who has equanimity and is mindful,' and he enters and abides in the third meditation.
By getting rid of joy, by getting rid of anguish, by the going down of his former pleasures and sorrows, he enters and abides in the fourth meditation which has neither anguish nor joy, and which is entirely purified by equanimity and mindfulness.
“Then with the mind composed thus, quite purified, quite clarified, without blemish, without defilement, grown pliant and workable, fixed, immovable, he directs his mind to the knowledge and recollection of former habitation: he remembers a variety of former habitations, thus: one birth, two births, three… four… five… ten… twenty… thirty… forty… fifty… a hundred… a thousand… a hundred thousand births, and many an eon of integration and many an eon of disintegration and many an eon of integration-disintegration: 'Such a one was I by name, having such a clan, such and such a color, so was I nourished, such and such pleasant and painful experiences were mine, so did the span of life end.
Passing from this, I came to be in another state where such a one was I by name, having such and such a clan, such and such a color, so was I nourished, such and such pleasant and painful experiences were mine, so did the span of life end.
Passing from this, I arose here.' Thus he remembers divers former habitations in all their modes and details.
“Then with the mind composed, quite purified, quite clarified, without blemish, without defilement, grown pliant and workable, fixed, immovable, he directs his mind to the knowledge of the passing hence and the arising of beings.
With the purified deva-vision surpassing that of men, he sees beings as they pass hence or come to be; he comprehends that beings are mean, excellent, comely, ugly, well-going, ill-going, according to the consequence of their deeds, the he thinks: Indeed these worthy beings who were possessed of wrong conduct in body, who were possessed of wrong conduct in speech, who were possessed of wrong conduct of thought, scoffers at the ariyans, holding a wrong view, incurring deeds consequent on a wrong view — these, at the breaking up of the body after dying, have arisen in a sorrowful state, a bad bourn, the abyss, Niraya hell.
But these worthy beings who were possessed of good conduct in body, who were possessed of good conduct in speech, who were possessed of good conduct in thought, who did not scoff at the ariyans, holding a right view, incurring deeds consequent on a right view — these, at the breaking up of the body, after dying, have arisen in a good bourn, a heaven world.
“Then with the mind composed… immovable, he directs his mind to the knowledge of the destruction of the cankers.
He understands as it really is: This is anguish, this is the arising of anguish, this is the stopping of anguish, this is the course leading to the stopping of anguish.
He understands as it really is: These are the cankers, this is the arising of the cankers, this is the stopping of the cankers, this is the course leading to the stopping of the cankers.
Knowing thus, seeing thus, his mind is freed from the canker of sense pleasures, is freed from the canker of becoming, freed from the canker of ignorance.
In freedom the knowledge came to be: I am freed; and he comprehends: Destroyed is birth, brought to a close is the Brahma-faring, done is what was to be done, there is no more of being such or such.
“That monk is able to endure heat, cold, hunger, thirst, the touch of mosquitoes, gadflies, wind, sun and creeping things, abusive language and unwelcome modes of speech: he has grown to bear bodily feelings which as they arise are painful, acute, sharp, severe, wretched, miserable, deadly.
Purged of all the dross and impurities of attachment, aversion and confusion, he is worthy of oblations, offerings, respect and homage, an unsurpassed field of merit in the world.
“If, Aggivessana, a king's elephant dies in old age, untamed, untrained, the king's old elephant that has died is reckoned as one that has died untamed: And so, Aggivessana, of a king's elephant that is middle-aged.
And too, Aggivessana, if a king's elephant dies young, untamed, untrained, the king's young elephant that has died is reckoned as one that has died untamed.
Even so, Aggivessana, if a monk who is an elder dies with the cankers not destroyed, the monk who is an elder that has died is reckoned as one that has died untamed.
And so of a monk of middle standing.
And too, Aggivessana, if a newly ordained monk dies with the cankers not destroyed, the newly ordained monk that has died is reckoned as one that has died untamed.
If, Aggivessana, a king's elephant dies in old age, well tamed, well trained, the king's old elephant that has died is reckoned as one that has died tamed.
And so, Aggivessana of a king's elephant that is middle-aged.
And too, Aggivessana, if a king's elephant dies young, well tamed, well trained, the king's young elephant that has died is reckoned as one that has died tamed.
Even so, Aggivessana, if a monk who is an elder dies with the cankers destroyed, the monk who is an elder that has died is reckoned as one that has died tamed.
And so, Aggivessana, of a monk of middle standing.
And too, Aggivessana, if a newly ordained monk dies with cankers destroyed, the newly ordained monk that has died is reckoned as one that has died tamed.
Thus spoke the Lord.
Delighted, the novice Aciravata rejoiced in what the Lord had said.
Then Kesi the horsetrainer went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him: “You, Kesi, are a trained man, a trainer of tamable horses.
And how do you train a tamable horse?
“Lord, I train a tamable horse with gentleness, with harshness, with both gentleness & harshness.
“And if a tamable horse doesn't submit either to a mild training or to a harsh training or to a mild & harsh training, Kesi, what do you do?
“If a tamable horse doesn't submit either to a mild training or to a harsh training or to a mild and harsh training, lord, then I kill it.
Why is that?
'Don't let this be a disgrace to my lineage of teachers.' But the Blessed One, lord, is the unexcelled trainer of tamable people.
How do you train a tamable person?
“Kesi, I train a tamable person with gentleness, with harshness, with both gentleness & harshness.
“In using gentleness, 'Such is good bodily conduct.
Such is the result of good bodily conduct.
Such is good verbal conduct.
Such is the result of good verbal conduct.
Such is good mental conduct.
Such is the result of good mental conduct.
Such are the devas.
Such are human beings.'
“In using harshness, 'Such is bodily misconduct.
Such is the result of bodily misconduct.
Such is verbal misconduct.
Such is the result of verbal misconduct.
Such is mental misconduct.
Such is the result of mental misconduct.
Such is hell.
Such is the animal womb.
Such the realm of the hungry shades.'
“In using gentleness & harshness, 'Such is good bodily conduct.
Such is the result of good bodily conduct.
Such is bodily misconduct.
Such is the result of bodily misconduct.
Such is good verbal conduct.
Such is the result of good verbal conduct.
Such is verbal misconduct.
Such is the result of verbal misconduct.
Such is good mental conduct.
Such is the result of good mental conduct.
Such is mental misconduct.
Such is the result of mental misconduct.
Such are the devas.
Such are human beings.
Such is hell.
Such is the animal womb.
Such the realm of the hungry shades.' “And if a tamable person doesn't submit either to a mild training or to a harsh training or to a mild & harsh training, what do you do?
“If a tamable person doesn't submit either to a mild training or to a harsh training or to a mild & harsh training, then I kill him, Kesi.
“But it's not proper for our Blessed One to take life!
And yet the Blessed One just said, 'I kill him, Kesi.' “It is true, Kesi, that it's not proper for a Tathagata to take life.
But if a tamable person doesn't submit either to a mild training or to a harsh training or to a mild & harsh training, then the Tathagata doesn't regard him as being worth speaking to or admonishing.
His knowledgeable fellows in the holy life don't regard him as being worth speaking to or admonishing.
This is what it means to be totally destroyed in the Doctrine & Discipline, when the Tathagata doesn't regard one as being worth speaking to or admonishing, and one's knowledgeable fellows in the holy life don't regard one as being worth speaking to or admonishing.
“Yes, lord, wouldn't one be totally destroyed if the Tathagata doesn't regard one as being worth speaking to or admonishing, and one's knowledgeable fellows in the holy life don't regard one as being worth speaking to or admonishing!
“Magnificent, lord!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has the Blessed One — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the community of monks.
May the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge, from this day forward, for life.” 
This sutta gives many valuable lessons on practical issues surrounding the attempt to develop an internal meditative dwelling of emptiness, to maintain it, and to see it through to Awakening.
Some of these issues include the need for seclusion as a conducive setting for the practice, types of conversation and thinking that are beneficial and harmful for the practice, the dangers of being distracted by visitors, and the proper attitude to have toward one's teacher.
However, for an explanation of emptiness in and of itself, it's necessary to look elsewhere in the Canon.
There you find emptiness approached from three perspectives, treating it as a meditative dwelling, as an attribute of objects, and as a type of awareness-release.
The first approach is obviously the most immediately relevant to the discussion in this sutta, but in fact all three approaches play a role here.
Emptiness as a meditative dwelling is most fully discussed in MN.
Essentially, it boils down to the ability to center the mind in a particular mode of perception, to maintain it there, and then to notice the absence and presence of disturbance within that mode.
The process starts with perceptions of one's external surroundings — village, wilderness, the earth property — and then moves internally to the four formless states, the “themeless concentration of awareness,” and finally to release from all mental fermentation.
Each step is compared to the one preceding it to see how its more refined perception engenders less disturbance.
For instance, if you move from a perception of the wilderness to a perception of earth, the first step is to settle and “indulge” in that perception.
Then you notice what types of disturbance have been abandoned in the move from the perception of wilderness to the perception of earth — for example, all thought of the dangers of wilderness are gone — and then to see what disturbances remain based on the latter perception.
Then you abandon the perception causing those disturbances and move on to a more refined level of perception.
This process is pursued until it arrives at the “themeless concentration of awareness.” When noting that even this refined level of concentration is fabricated, inconstant, and subject to cessation, one gains total release from all mental fermentations and the disturbances that would arise based on them.
This is the level of emptiness that is “superior and unsurpassed,” and is apparently what the Buddha is referring to in this sutta when he says that by “not attending to any themes, he enters & remains in internal emptiness.
Notice that in every step along the way of this process, the emptiness is the lack of disturbance experienced in a particular mind state.
This means that the mind state is to be perceived simply as an example of the presence and absence of stress.
In other words, emptiness in this sense relates directly to the second of the three characteristics — stress or suffering.
The pursuit of this emptiness relates to the four noble truths, as it looks for the causes of stress and uses tranquility together with insight to abandon those causes in a quest to put a total end to suffering.
Emptiness in its second meaning, as an attribute of objects, is most fully discussed in SN..
That sutta describes emptiness as meaning the lack of self or anything pertaining to a self in the internal and external sense media.
Whatever sense of self that may surround these objects is not inherent in them, and is instead simply the result of one's own penchant for “I-making” and “my-making.” Seeing the artificiality of “I-making” and “my-making” in this way helps lead to a sense of disenchantment with these “makings,” thus helping to abandon any clinging associated with them.
Thus emptiness in this sense relates directly to the third of the three characteristics: not-self.
However, just as the three characteristics are not radically separate from one another — everything stressful is for that reason not-self — the practical application of this sense of emptiness is not radically different from the first.
As SN.
points out, when one no longer latches onto any idea of “my self,” one sees phenomena within and without simply as examples of stress arising and passing away.
To practice meditation from this perspective — seeing each state of concentration as an example of stress arising and passing away — is to develop emptiness as a meditative dwelling.
Emptiness in its third meaning, as a type of awareness-release, is an application of emptiness in its second.
MN describes this state of concentration as follows: “There is the case where a monk — having gone into the wilderness, to the root of a tree, or into an empty dwelling — considers this: 'This is empty of self or of anything pertaining to self.'” It adds that this awareness-release is different from the awareness-release that results when one doesn't attend to any themes.
Thus this state of concentration cannot be entirely equated with the emptiness as a meditative dwelling mentioned in this sutta.
MN further adds that if one frequently abides in the emptiness awareness-release, one may either attain the dimension of nothingness — one of the formless states — or be committed to the discernment that will lead to Awakening.
The first of these two alternatives is another way in which emptiness as an awareness-release differs from emptiness as a meditative dwelling as defined in MN.
However, because the standard definition of discernment is seeing phenomena in terms of the four noble truths, the second alternative — being committed to discernment — would apparently follow the same pattern suggested by SN., above.
In other words, as one no longer perceives phenomena in terms of self, one tends to view them simply as examples of stress arising and passing away.
So, again, this third meaning of emptiness, like the second, eventually leads in practice back to the first.
As MN notes, when one attains full awakening, the themeless awareness-release and the emptiness awareness-release come to differ only in name, and not in actuality.

In reading the following sutta, you will notice that the various meanings of emptiness will fit some contexts better than others.
Still, it is important to remember that in the course of practice, all three meanings are related and all will inevitably play a role in Awakening.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Sakyans at Kapilavatthu in the Banyan Park.
Then in the early morning, the Blessed One, having put on his robes and carrying his bowl and outer robe, went into Kapilavatthu for alms.
Having gone for alms in Kapilavatthu, after the meal, returning from his alms round, he went to the dwelling of Kala-khemaka the Sakyan for the day's abiding.
Now at that time many resting places had been prepared in Kala-khemaka the Sakyan's dwelling.
The Blessed One saw the many resting places prepared there and, on seeing them, the thought occurred to him, “There are many resting places prepared here.
Do many monks live here?
Now at that time Ven.
Ananda, together with many other monks, was making robes at the dwelling of Ghata the Sakyan.
Then, when it was evening, the Blessed One rose from seclusion and went to the dwelling of Ghata the Sakyan.
On arrival, he sat down on a seat made ready.
Having sat down, he asked Ven.
Ananda, “There are many resting places prepared in Kala-khemaka the Sakyan's dwelling.
Do many monks live there?
“Yes, lord, there are many resting places prepared in Kala-khemaka the Sakyan's dwelling.
Many monks live there.
Our time for making robes has come around.
“Ananda, a monk does not shine if he delights in company, enjoys company, is committed to delighting in company; if he delights in a group, enjoys a group, rejoices in a group.
Indeed, Ananda, it is impossible that a monk who delights in company, enjoys company, is committed to delighting in company; who delights in a group, enjoys a group, rejoices in a group, will obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — the pleasure of renunciation, the pleasure of seclusion, the pleasure of peace, the pleasure of self-awakening.
But it is possible that a monk who lives alone, withdrawn from the group, can expect to obtain at will — without difficulty, without trouble — the pleasure of renunciation, the pleasure of seclusion, the pleasure of peace, the pleasure of self-awakening.
“Indeed, Ananda, it is impossible that a monk who delights in company, enjoys company, is committed to delighting in company; who delights in a group, enjoys a group, rejoices in a group, will enter & remain in the awareness-release that is temporary and pleasing, or in the awareness-release that is not-temporary and beyond provocation.
But it is possible that a monk who lives alone, withdrawn from the group, can expect to enter & remain in the awareness-release that is temporary and pleasing, or in the awareness-release that is not-temporary and beyond provocation.
“Ananda, I do not envision even a single form whose change & alteration would not give rise to sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair in one who is passionate for it and takes delight in it.
“But there is this dwelling discovered by the Tathagata where, not attending to any themes, he enters & remains in internal emptiness.
If, while he is dwelling there by means of this dwelling, he is visited by monks, nuns, lay men, lay women, kings, royal ministers, sectarians & their disciples, then — with his mind bent on seclusion, tending toward seclusion, inclined toward seclusion, aiming at seclusion, relishing renunciation, having destroyed those qualities that are the basis for mental fermentation — he converses with them only as much as is necessary for them to take their leave.
“So, Ananda, if a monk should wish, 'May I enter & remain in internal emptiness,' then he should get the mind steadied right within, settled, unified, & concentrated.
And how does the monk get the mind steadied right within, settled, unified, & concentrated?
There is the case where a monk — quite withdrawn from sensual pleasures, withdrawn from unskillful qualities — enters & remains in the first jhana… the second jhana… the third jhana… the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
That is how a monk gets the mind steadied right within, settled, unified, & concentrated.
“He attends to internal emptiness.
While he is attending to internal emptiness, his mind does not take pleasure, find satisfaction, grow steady, or indulge in internal emptiness.
When this is the case, he discerns, 'While I am attending to internal emptiness, my mind does not take pleasure, find satisfaction, grow steady, or indulge in internal emptiness.' In this way he is alert there.
“He attends to external emptiness…
“He attends to internal & external emptiness… 
“He attends to the imperturbable.
While he is attending to the imperturbable, his mind does not take pleasure, find satisfaction, grow steady, or indulge in the imperturbable.
When this is the case, he discerns, 'While I am attending to the imperturbable, my mind does not take pleasure, find satisfaction, grow steady, or indulge in the imperturbable.' In this way he is alert there.
“When that is the case, he should get the mind steadied right within, settled, unified, & concentrated in his first theme of concentration.
“He then attends to internal emptiness.
While he is attending to internal emptiness, his mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, grows steady, & indulges in internal emptiness.
When this is the case, he discerns, 'While I am attending to internal emptiness, my mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, grows steady, & indulges in internal emptiness.' In this way he is alert there.
“He attends to external emptiness…
“He attends to internal & external emptiness… 
“He attends to the imperturbable.
While he is attending to the imperturbable, his mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, grows steady, & indulges in the imperturbable.
When this is the case, he discerns, 'While I am attending to the imperturbable, my mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, grows steady, & indulges in the imperturbable.' In this way he is alert there.
“If, while the monk is dwelling by means of this dwelling, his mind inclines to walking back & forth, he walks back & forth 'While I am walking thus, no covetousness or sadness, no evil, unskillful qualities will take possession of me.' In this way he is alert there.
“If, while he is dwelling by means of this dwelling, his mind inclines to standing… to sitting… to lying down, he lies down, 'While I am lying down thus, no covetousness or sadness, no evil, unskillful qualities will take possession of me.' In this way he is alert there.
“If, while he is dwelling by means of this dwelling, his mind inclines to speaking, he resolves that 'I will not engage in talk that is base, vulgar, common, ignoble, unbeneficial, that does not lead to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, calm, direct knowledge, self-awakening, or Unbinding — i.e., talk about kings, robbers, & ministers of state; armies, alarms, & battles; food & drink; clothing, furniture, garlands, & scents; relatives; vehicles; villages, towns, cities, the countryside; women & heroes; the gossip of the street & the well; tales of the dead; tales of diversity, the creation of the world & of the sea; talk of whether things exist or not.' In this way he is alert there.
“'But,' 'I will engage in talk that is scrupulous, conducive to release of awareness, and leads exclusively to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, calm, direct knowledge, self-awakening, & Unbinding — i.e., talk on modesty, contentment, seclusion, non-entanglement, arousing persistence, virtue, concentration, discernment, release, and the knowledge & vision of release.' In this way he is alert there.
“If, while he is dwelling by means of this dwelling, his mind inclines to thinking, he resolves that 'I will not think thoughts that are base, vulgar, common, ignoble, unbeneficial, that do not lead to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, calm, direct knowledge, self-awakening, or Unbinding — i.e., thoughts of sensuality, thoughts of ill will, thoughts of harmfulness.' In this way he is alert there.
“'But,' 'I will think thoughts that are noble, onward-leading, that lead to the right ending of stress for the person who acts on them — i.e., thoughts of renunciation, thoughts of no ill will, thoughts of harmlessness.' In this way he is alert there.
“Ananda, there are these five strings of sensuality.
Which five?
Forms cognizable via the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
Sounds cognizable via the ear… Aromas cognizable via the nose… Flavors cognizable via the tongue… Tactile sensations cognizable via the body — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
These are the five strings of sensuality where a monk should reflect on his mind repeatedly: 'Is there within me, in any circumstance or another, any engagement of awareness that arises with regard to these five strings of sensuality?' If, on reflection, the monk discerns, 'There is within me, in one circumstance or another, an engagement of awareness that arises with regard to these five strings of sensuality,' then — this being the case — he discerns that 'Desire-passion for the five strings of sensuality has not been abandoned by me.' But if, on reflection, he discerns, 'There is not within me, in any circumstance or another, any engagement of awareness that arises with regard to these five strings of sensuality,' then — this being the case — he discerns that 'Desire-passion for the five strings of sensuality has been abandoned by me.' In this way he is alert there.
“There are these five clinging-aggregates where a monk should stay, keeping track of arising & passing away: 'Such is form, such its origination, such its disappearance.
Such is feeling… Such is perception… Such are fabrications… Such is consciousness, such its origination, such its disappearance.' As he stays keeping track of arising & passing away with regard to these five clinging-aggregates, he abandons any conceit that 'I am' with regard to these five clinging-aggregates.
This being the case, he discerns, 'I have abandoned any conceit that “I am” with regard to these five clinging-aggregates.' In this way he is alert there.
“These qualities, Ananda, are exclusively skillful in their grounding, noble, transcendent, inaccessible to the Evil One.
“What do you think, Ananda: When envisioning what aim is it proper for a disciple to follow after the Teacher even when being rebuked?
“For us, lord, the teachings have the Blessed One as their root, their guide, & their arbitrator.
It would be good if the Blessed One himself would explicate the meaning of this statement.
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the monks will remember it.
“Ananda, it's not proper for a disciple to follow after the Teacher to hear discourses, verses, or catechisms.
Why is that?
For a long time, Ananda, have you listened to the teachings, retained them, discussed them, accumulated them, examined them with your mind, and penetrated them well in terms of your views.
But as for talk that is scrupulous, conducive to release of awareness, and leads exclusively to disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, calm, direct knowledge, self-awakening, & Unbinding — i.e., talk on modesty, contentment, seclusion, non-entanglement, arousing persistence, virtue, concentration, discernment, release, and the knowledge & vision of release: It's for the sake of hearing talk of this sort that it is proper for a disciple to follow after the Teacher as if yoked to him.
“This being the case, there is the teacher's undoing, there is the student's undoing, there is the undoing of one who leads the holy life.
“And how is there the teacher's undoing?
There is the case where a certain teacher resorts to a secluded dwelling: a wilderness, the shade of a tree, a mountain, a glen, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a forest grove, the open air, a heap of straw.
While he is living thus secluded, brahmans & householders from town & countryside visit him.
When they visit him, he gets smitten with things that infatuate, falls into greed, and reverts to luxury.
This is called a teacher undone with a teacher's undoing.
He has been struck down by evil, unskillful qualities that defile, that lead to further becoming, are troublesome, ripen in pain, and lead to future birth, aging, & death.
Such is the teacher's undoing.
“And how is there the student's undoing?
A student of that teacher, imitating his teacher's seclusion, resorts to a secluded dwelling: a wilderness, the shade of a tree… a heap of straw.
While he is living thus secluded, brahmans & householders from town & countryside visit him.
When they visit him, he gets smitten with things that infatuate, falls into greed, and reverts to luxury.
This is called a student undone with a student's undoing.
He has been struck down by evil, unskillful qualities that defile, that lead to further becoming, are troublesome, ripen in pain, and lead to future birth, aging, & death.
Such is the student's undoing.
“And how is there the undoing of one who leads the holy life?
There is the case where a Tathagata arises in the world, worthy and rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.
He resorts to a secluded dwelling: a wilderness, the shade of a tree, a mountain, a glen, a hillside cave, a charnel ground, a forest grove, the open air, a heap of straw.
While he is living thus secluded, brahmans & householders from town & countryside visit him.
When they visit him, he doesn't get smitten with things that infatuate, doesn't fall into greed, doesn't revert to luxury.
A student of that teacher, imitating his teacher's seclusion, resorts to a secluded dwelling: a wilderness, the shade of a tree… a heap of straw.
While he is living thus secluded, brahmans & householders from town & countryside visit him.
When they visit him, he gets smitten with things that infatuate, falls into greed, and reverts to luxury.
This is called one following the holy life who is undone with the undoing of one who leads the holy life.
He has been struck down by evil, unskillful qualities that defile, that lead to further becoming, are troublesome, ripen in pain, and lead to future birth, aging, & death.
Such is the undoing of one who leads the holy life.
“And in this regard, Ananda, the undoing of one who leads the holy life ripens in more pain, more bitterness, than the teacher's undoing or the student's undoing.
It leads even to the states of deprivation.
“Therefore, Ananda, engage with me in friendliness, and not in opposition.
That will be for your long-term well-being & happiness.
“And how do students engage with the teacher in opposition and not in friendliness?
There is the case where a teacher teaches the Dhamma to his students sympathetically, seeking their well-being, out of sympathy: 'This is for your well-being; this is for your happiness.' His disciples do not listen or lend ear or apply their minds to gnosis.
Turning aside, they stray from the Teacher's message.
This is how students engage with the teacher as opponents and not as friends.
“And how do students engage with the teacher in friendliness and not in opposition?
There is the case where a teacher teaches the Dhamma to his students sympathetically, seeking their well-being, out of sympathy: 'This is for your well-being; this is for your happiness.' His disciples listen, lend ear, & apply their minds to gnosis.
Not turning aside, they don't stray from the Teacher's message.
This is how students engage with the teacher as friends and not as opponents.
“Therefore, Ananda, engage with me in friendliness, and not in opposition.
That will be for your long-term well-being & happiness.
“I won't hover over you like a potter over damp, unbaked clay goods.
Scolding again & again, I will speak.
Urging you on again & again, I will speak.
Whatever is of essential worth will remain.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, Ven.
Ananda delighted in the Blessed One's words.
“There are these four types of thunderheads.
Which four?
One that thunders but doesn't rain, one that rains but doesn't thunder, one that neither thunders nor rains, and one that both thunders and rains.
These are the four types of thunderheads.
“In the same way, these four types of persons resembling thunderheads are to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
The one that thunders but doesn't rain, the one that rains but doesn't thunder, the one that neither thunders nor rains, and the one that both thunders and rains.
“And how is one the type of person who thunders but doesn't rain?
There is the case where a person has mastered the Dhamma: dialogues, narratives of mixed prose and verse, explanations, verses, spontaneous exclamations, quotations, birth stories, amazing events, question & answer sessions.
Yet he doesn't discern, as it actually is present, that 'This is stress.' He doesn't discern, as it actually is present, that 'This is the origination of stress.' He doesn't discern, as it actually is present, that 'This is the cessation of stress.' He doesn't discern, as it actually is present, that 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.' This is the type of person who thunders but doesn't rain.
This type of person, I tell you, is like the thunderhead that thunders but doesn't rain.
“And how is one the type of person who rains but doesn't thunder?
There is the case where a person has not mastered the Dhamma: dialogues… question & answer sessions.
Yet he does discern, as it actually is present, that 'This is stress.' He discerns, as it actually is present, that 'This is the origination of stress.' He discerns, as it actually is present, that 'This is the cessation of stress.' He discerns, as it actually is present, that 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.' This is the type of person who rains but doesn't thunder.
This type of person, I tell you, is like the thunderhead that rains but doesn't thunder.
“And how is one the type of person who neither thunders nor rains?
There is the case where a person has not mastered the Dhamma: dialogues… question & answer sessions.
He doesn't discern, as it actually is present, that 'This is stress.'… 'This is the origination of stress.'… 'This is the cessation of stress.'… 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.' This is the type of person who neither thunders nor rains.
This type of person, I tell you, is like the thunderhead that neither thunders nor rains.
“And how is one the type of person who both thunders and rains?
There is the case where a person has mastered the Dhamma: dialogues… question & answer sessions.
He discerns, as it actually is present, that 'This is stress.'… 'This is the origination of stress.'… 'This is the cessation of stress.'… 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.' This is the type of person who both thunders and rains.
This type of person, I tell you, is like the thunderhead that both thunders and rains.
“There are these four types of people to be found existing in the world.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying in Savatthi at Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Now at that time a large number of monks, after the meal, on returning from their alms round, had gathered at the meeting hall when this discussion arose: “Isn't it amazing, friends!
Isn't it astounding!
— the extent to which mindfulness immersed in the body, when developed & pursued, is said by the Blessed One who knows, who sees — the worthy one, rightly self-awakened — to be of great fruit & great benefit.” And this discussion came to no conclusion.
Then the Blessed One, emerging from his seclusion in the late afternoon, went to the meeting hall and, on arrival, sat down on a seat made ready.
As he was sitting there, he addressed the monks: “For what topic are you gathered together here?
And what was the discussion that came to no conclusion?
“Just now, lord, after the meal, on returning from our alms round, we gathered at the meeting hall when this discussion arose: 'Isn't it amazing, friends!
Isn't it astounding!
— the extent to which mindfulness immersed in the body, when developed & pursued, is said by the Blessed One who knows, who sees — the worthy one, rightly self-awakened — to be of great fruit & great benefit.' This was the discussion that had come to no conclusion when the Blessed One arrived.
“And how is mindfulness immersed in the body developed, how is it pursued, so as to be of great fruit & great benefit?
“There is the case where a monk — having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building — sits down folding his legs crosswise, holding his body erect and setting mindfulness to the fore.
Always mindful, he breathes in; mindful he breathes out.
“Breathing in long, he discerns, 'I am breathing in long'; or breathing out long, he discerns, 'I am breathing out long.' Or breathing in short, he discerns, 'I am breathing in short'; or breathing out short, he discerns, 'I am breathing out short.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in calming bodily fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out calming bodily fabrication.' And as he remains thus heedful, ardent, & resolute, any memories & resolves related to the household life are abandoned, and with their abandoning his mind gathers & settles inwardly, grows unified & centered.
This is how a monk develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
“Furthermore, when walking, the monk discerns, 'I am walking.' When standing, he discerns, 'I am standing.' When sitting, he discerns, 'I am sitting.' When lying down, he discerns, 'I am lying down.' Or however his body is disposed, that is how he discerns it.
And as he remains thus heedful, ardent, & resolute, any memories & resolves related to the household life are abandoned, and with their abandoning his mind gathers & settles inwardly, grows unified & centered.
This is how a monk develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
“Furthermore, when going forward & returning, he makes himself fully alert; when looking toward & looking away… when bending & extending his limbs… when carrying his outer cloak, his upper robe & his bowl… when eating, drinking, chewing, & savoring… when urinating & defecating… when walking, standing, sitting, falling asleep, waking up, talking, & remaining silent, he makes himself fully alert.
And as he remains thus heedful, ardent, & resolute, any memories & resolves related to the household life are abandoned, and with their abandoning his mind gathers & settles inwardly, grows unified & centered.
This is how a monk develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
“Furthermore, the monk reflects on this very body from the soles of the feet on up, from the crown of the head on down, surrounded by skin and full of various kinds of unclean things: 'In this body there are head hairs, body hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, tendons, bones, bone marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs, large intestines, small intestines, gorge, feces, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, skin-oil, saliva, mucus, fluid in the joints, urine.' Just as if a sack with openings at both ends were full of various kinds of grain — wheat, rice, mung beans, kidney beans, sesame seeds, husked rice — and a man with good eyesight, pouring it out, were to reflect, 'This is wheat.
This is rice.
These are mung beans.
These are kidney beans.
These are sesame seeds.
This is husked rice'; in the same way, the monk reflects on this very body from the soles of the feet on up, from the crown of the head on down, surrounded by skin and full of various kinds of unclean things: 'In this body there are head hairs, body hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, tendons, bones, bone marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs, large intestines, small intestines, gorge, feces, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, skin-oil, saliva, mucus, fluid in the joints, urine.' And as he remains thus heedful, ardent, & resolute, any memories & resolves related to the household life are abandoned, and with their abandoning his mind gathers & settles inwardly, grows unified & centered.
This is how a monk develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
“Furthermore, the monk contemplates this very body — however it stands, however it is disposed — in terms of properties: 'In this body there is the earth property, the liquid property, the fire property, & the wind property.' Just as a skilled butcher or his apprentice, having killed a cow, would sit at a crossroads cutting it up into pieces, the monk contemplates this very body — however it stands, however it is disposed — in terms of properties: 'In this body there is the earth property, the liquid property, the fire property, & the wind property.' And as he remains thus heedful, ardent, & resolute, any memories & resolves related to the household life are abandoned, and with their abandoning his mind gathers & settles inwardly, grows unified & centered.
This is how a monk develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
“Furthermore, as if he were to see a corpse cast away in a charnel ground — one day, two days, three days dead — bloated, livid, & festering, he applies it to this very body, 'This body, too: Such is its nature, such is its future, such its unavoidable fate'…
“Or again, as if he were to see a corpse cast away in a charnel ground, picked at by crows, vultures, & hawks, by dogs, hyenas, & various other creatures… a skeleton smeared with flesh & blood, connected with tendons… a fleshless skeleton smeared with blood, connected with tendons… a skeleton without flesh or blood, connected with tendons… bones detached from their tendons, scattered in all directions — here a hand bone, there a foot bone, here a shin bone, there a thigh bone, here a hip bone, there a back bone, here a rib, there a breast bone, here a shoulder bone, there a neck bone, here a jaw bone, there a tooth, here a skull… the bones whitened, somewhat like the color of shells… piled up, more than a year old… decomposed into a powder: He applies it to this very body, 'This body, too: Such is its nature, such is its future, such its unavoidable fate.'
“And as he remains thus heedful, ardent, & resolute, any memories & resolves related to the household life are abandoned, and with their abandoning his mind gathers & settles inwardly, grows unified & centered.
This is how a monk develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
“Furthermore, quite withdrawn from sensuality, withdrawn from unskillful mental qualities, he enters & remains in the first jhana: rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
He permeates & pervades, suffuses & fills this very body with the rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal.
Just as if a skilled bathman or bathman's apprentice would pour bath powder into a brass basin and knead it together, sprinkling it again & again with water, so that his ball of bath powder — saturated, moisture-laden, permeated within & without — would nevertheless not drip; even so, the monk permeates… this very body with the rapture & pleasure born of withdrawal.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by rapture & pleasure born from withdrawal.
And as he remains thus heedful, ardent, & resolute, any memories & resolves related to the household life are abandoned, and with their abandoning his mind gathers & settles inwardly, grows unified & centered.
This is how a monk develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
“And furthermore, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhana: rapture & pleasure born of composure, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
He permeates & pervades, suffuses & fills this very body with the rapture & pleasure born of composure.
Just like a lake with spring-water welling up from within, having no inflow from the east, west, north, or south, and with the skies supplying abundant showers time & again, so that the cool fount of water welling up from within the lake would permeate & pervade, suffuse & fill it with cool waters, there being no part of the lake unpervaded by the cool waters; even so, the monk permeates… this very body with the rapture & pleasure born of composure.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by rapture & pleasure born of composure.
And as he remains thus heedful, ardent, & resolute, any memories & resolves related to the household life are abandoned, and with their abandoning his mind gathers & settles inwardly, grows unified & centered.
This is how a monk develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
“And furthermore, with the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhana, of which the Noble Ones declare, 'Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.' He permeates & pervades, suffuses & fills this very body with the pleasure divested of rapture.
Just as in a lotus pond, some of the lotuses, born & growing in the water, stay immersed in the water and flourish without standing up out of the water, so that they are permeated & pervaded, suffused & filled with cool water from their roots to their tips, and nothing of those lotuses would be unpervaded with cool water; even so, the monk permeates… this very body with the pleasure divested of rapture.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded with pleasure divested of rapture.
And as he remains thus heedful, ardent, & resolute, any memories & resolves related to the household life are abandoned, and with their abandoning his mind gathers & settles inwardly, grows unified & centered.
This is how a monk develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
“And furthermore, with the abandoning of pleasure & pain — as with the earlier disappearance of elation & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhana: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither-pleasure-nor-pain.
He sits, permeating the body with a pure, bright awareness.
Just as if a man were sitting covered from head to foot with a white cloth so that there would be no part of his body to which the white cloth did not extend; even so, the monk sits, permeating the body with a pure, bright awareness.
There is nothing of his entire body unpervaded by pure, bright awareness.
And as he remains thus heedful, ardent, & resolute, any memories & resolves related to the household life are abandoned, and with their abandoning his mind gathers & settles inwardly, grows unified & centered.
This is how a monk develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
“Monks, whoever develops & pursues mindfulness immersed in the body encompasses whatever skillful qualities are on the side of clear knowing.
Just as whoever pervades the great ocean with his awareness encompasses whatever rivulets flow down into the ocean, in the same way, whoever develops & pursues mindfulness immersed in the body encompasses whatever skillful qualities are on the side of clear knowing.
“In whomever mindfulness immersed in the body is not developed, not pursued, Mara gains entry, Mara gains a foothold.
“Suppose that a man were to throw a heavy stone ball into a pile of wet clay.
What do you think, monks — would the heavy stone ball gain entry into the pile of wet clay?
“Yes, lord.
“In the same way, in whomever mindfulness immersed in the body is not developed, not pursued, Mara gains entry, Mara gains a foothold.
“Now, suppose that there were a dry, sapless piece of timber, and a man were to come along with an upper fire-stick, thinking, 'I'll light a fire.
I'll produce heat.' What do you think — would he be able to light a fire and produce heat by rubbing the upper fire-stick in the dry, sapless piece of timber?
“Yes, lord.
“In the same way, in whomever mindfulness immersed in the body is not developed, not pursued, Mara gains entry, Mara gains a foothold.
“Now, suppose that there were an empty, hollow water-pot set on a stand, and a man were to come along carrying a load of water.
What do you think — would he get a place to put his water?
“Yes, lord.
“In the same way, in whomever mindfulness immersed in the body is not developed, not pursued, Mara gains entry, Mara gains a foothold.
“Now, in whomever mindfulness immersed in the body is developed, is pursued, Mara gains no entry, Mara gains no foothold.
Suppose that a man were to throw a ball of string against a door panel made entirely of heartwood.
What do you think — would that light ball of string gain entry into that door panel made entirely of heartwood?
“No, lord.
“In the same way, in whomever mindfulness immersed in the body is developed, is pursued, Mara gains no entry, Mara gains no foothold.
“Now, suppose that there were a wet, sappy piece of timber, and a man were to come along with an upper fire-stick, thinking, 'I'll light a fire.
I'll produce heat.' What do you think — would he be able to light a fire and produce heat by rubbing the upper fire-stick in the wet, sappy piece of timber?
“No, lord.
“In the same way, in whomever mindfulness immersed in the body is developed, is pursued, Mara gains no entry, Mara gains no foothold.
“Now, suppose that there were a water-pot set on a stand, full of water up to the brim so that crows could drink out of it, and a man were to come along carrying a load of water.
What do you think — would he get a place to put his water?
“No, lord.
“In the same way, in whomever mindfulness immersed in the body is developed, is pursued, Mara gains no entry, Mara gains no foothold.
“When anyone has developed & pursued mindfulness immersed in the body, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know & realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.
“Suppose that there were a water jar, set on a stand, brimful of water so that a crow could drink from it.
If a strong man were to tip it in any way at all, would water spill out?
“Yes, lord.
“In the same way, when anyone has developed & pursued mindfulness immersed in the body, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know & realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.
“Suppose there were a rectangular water tank — set on level ground, bounded by dikes — brimful of water so that a crow could drink from it.
If a strong man were to loosen the dikes anywhere at all, would water spill out?
“Yes, lord.
“In the same way, when anyone has developed & pursued mindfulness immersed in the body, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know & realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.
“Suppose there were a chariot on level ground at four crossroads, harnessed to thoroughbreds, waiting with whips lying ready, so that a skilled driver, a trainer of tamable horses, might mount and — taking the reins with his left hand and the whip with his right — drive out & back, to whatever place & by whichever road he liked; in the same way, when anyone has developed & pursued mindfulness immersed in the body, then whichever of the six higher knowledges he turns his mind to know & realize, he can witness them for himself whenever there is an opening.
“Monks, for one in whom mindfulness immersed in the body is cultivated, developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, & well-undertaken, ten benefits can be expected.
Which ten?
“He conquers displeasure & delight, and displeasure does not conquer him.
He remains victorious over any displeasure that has arisen.
“He conquers fear & dread, and fear & dread do not conquer him.
He remains victorious over any fear & dread that have arisen.
“He is resistant to cold, heat, hunger, thirst, the touch of gadflies & mosquitoes, wind & sun & creeping things; to abusive, hurtful language; he is the sort that can endure bodily feelings that, when they arise, are painful, sharp, stabbing, fierce, distasteful, disagreeable, deadly.
“He can attain at will, without trouble or difficulty, the four jhanas — heightened mental states providing a pleasant abiding in the here & now.
“He wields manifold supranormal powers.
Having been one he becomes many; having been many he becomes one.
He appears.
He vanishes.
He goes unimpeded through walls, ramparts, & mountains as if through space.
He dives in & out of the earth as if it were water.
He walks on water without sinking as if it were dry land.
Sitting crosslegged he flies through the air like a winged bird.
With his hand he touches & strokes even the sun & moon, so mighty & powerful.
He exercises influence with his body even as far as the Brahma worlds.
“He hears — by means of the divine ear-element, purified & surpassing the human — both kinds of sounds: divine & human, whether near or far.
“He knows the awareness of other beings, other individuals, having encompassed it with his own awareness.
He discerns a mind with passion as a mind with passion, and a mind without passion as a mind without passion.
He discerns a mind with aversion as a mind with aversion, and a mind without aversion as a mind without aversion.
He discerns a mind with delusion as a mind with delusion, and a mind without delusion as a mind without delusion.
He discerns a restricted mind as a restricted mind, and a scattered mind as a scattered mind.
He discerns an enlarged mind as an enlarged mind, and an unenlarged mind as an unenlarged mind.
He discerns an excelled mind as an excelled mind, and an unexcelled mind as an unexcelled mind.
He discerns a concentrated mind as a concentrated mind, and an unconcentrated mind as an unconcentrated mind.
He discerns a released mind as a released mind, and an unreleased mind as an unreleased mind.
“He recollects his manifold past lives, i.e., one birth, two births, three births, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, one hundred, one thousand, one hundred thousand, many aeons of cosmic contraction, many aeons of cosmic expansion, many aeons of cosmic contraction & expansion,, 'There I had such a name, belonged to such a clan, had such an appearance.
Such was my food, such my experience of pleasure & pain, such the end of my life.
Passing away from that state, I re-arose there.
There too I had such a name, belonged to such a clan, had such an appearance.
Such was my food, such my experience of pleasure & pain, such the end of my life.
Passing away from that state, I re-arose here.' Thus he remembers his manifold past lives in their modes & details.
“He sees — by means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human — beings passing away & re-appearing, and he discerns how they are inferior & superior, beautiful & ugly, fortunate & unfortunate in accordance with their kamma: 'These beings — who were endowed with bad conduct of body, speech, & mind, who reviled the noble ones, held wrong views and undertook actions under the influence of wrong views — with the break-up of the body, after death, have re-appeared in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell.
But these beings — who were endowed with good conduct of body, speech, & mind, who did not revile the noble ones, who held right views and undertook actions under the influence of right views — with the break-up of the body, after death, have re-appeared in the good destinations, in the heavenly world.' Thus — by means of the divine eye, purified & surpassing the human — he sees beings passing away & re-appearing, and he discerns how they are inferior & superior, beautiful & ugly, fortunate & unfortunate in accordance with their kamma.
“Through the ending of the mental effluents, he remains in the effluent-free awareness-release & discernment-release, having known and made them manifest for himself right in the here & now.
“Monks, for one in whom mindfulness immersed in the body is cultivated, developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, & well-undertaken, these ten benefits can be expected.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted in the Blessed One's words.
“Monks, these four types of individuals are to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
The one who practices neither for his/her own benefit nor for that of others.
The one who practices for the benefit of others but not for his/her own.
The one who practices for his/her own benefit but not for that of others.
The one who practices for his/her own benefit and for that of others.
“Just as a firebrand from a funeral pyre — burning at both ends, covered with excrement in the middle — is used as fuel neither in a village nor in the wilderness: I tell you that this is a simile for the individual who practices neither for his/her own benefit nor for that of others.
The individual who practices for the benefit of others but not for his/her own is the higher & more refined of these two.
The individual who practices for his/her own benefit but not for that of others is the highest & most refined of these three.
The individual who practices for his/her own benefit and for that of others is, of these four, the foremost, the chief, the most outstanding, the highest, & supreme.
Just as from a cow comes milk; from milk, curds; from curds, butter; from butter, ghee; from ghee, the skimmings of ghee; and of these, the skimmings of ghee are reckoned the foremost — in the same way, of these four, the individual who practices for his/her own benefit and for that of others is the foremost, the chief, the most outstanding, the highest, & supreme.
“These are the four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.”
“Monks, these four types of individuals are to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
The one who practices for his/her own benefit but not for that of others.
The one who practices for the benefit of others but not for his/her own.
The one who practices neither for his/her own benefit nor for that of others.
The one who practices for his/her own benefit and for that of others.
“And who is the individual who practices for his/her own benefit but not for that of others?
There is the case where a certain individual practices for the subduing of passion within him/herself but doesn't encourage others in the subduing of passion; practices for the subduing of aversion within him/herself but doesn't encourage others in the subduing of aversion; practices for the subduing of delusion within him/herself but doesn't encourage others in the subduing of delusion.
Such is the individual who practices for his/her own benefit but not for that of others.
“And who is the individual who practices for the benefit of others but not for his/her own?
There is the case where a certain individual doesn't practice for the subduing of passion within him/herself but encourages others in the subduing of passion; he/she doesn't practice for the subduing of aversion within him/herself but encourages others in the subduing of aversion; he/she doesn't practice for the subduing of delusion within him/herself but encourages others in the subduing of delusion.
Such is the individual who practices for the benefit of others but not for his/her own.
“And who is the individual who practices neither for his/her own benefit nor for that of others?
There is the case where a certain individual doesn't practice for the subduing of passion within him/herself and doesn't encourage others in the subduing of passion; he/she doesn't practice for the subduing of aversion within him/herself and doesn't encourage others in the subduing of aversion; he/she doesn't practice for the subduing of delusion within him/herself and doesn't encourage others in the subduing of delusion.
Such is the individual who practices neither for his/her own benefit nor for that of others.
“And who is the individual who practices for his/her own benefit and for that of others?
There is the case where a certain individual practices for the subduing of passion within him/herself and encourages others in the subduing of passion; practices for the subduing of aversion within him/herself and encourages others in the subduing of aversion; practices for the subduing of delusion within him/herself and encourages others in the subduing of delusion.
Such is the individual who practices for his/her own benefit and for that of others.
“These are the four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.”
Translator's note: This sutta is one of a series explaining AN., which rates individuals of four types.
The lowest is the one who doesn't practice for his own benefit or for the benefit of others.
Higher than this is the person who doesn't practice for his own benefit, but does practice for the benefit of others.
Higher still is the person who practices for his own benefit, but not for the benefit of others.
Highest of all is the person who practices both for his own benefit and for the benefit of others.
Thus, as explained in this sutta, it is best if you not only follow the precepts but can also get others to follow them as well.
“Monks, these four types of individuals are to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
The one who practices for his own benefit but not for that of others.
The one who practices for the benefit of others but not for his own.
The one who practices neither for his own benefit nor for that of others.
The one who practices for his own benefit and for that of others.
“And how is one an individual who practices for his own benefit but not for that of others?
There is the case where a certain individual himself abstains from the taking of life but doesn't encourage others in undertaking abstinence from the taking of life.
He himself abstains from stealing but doesn't encourage others in undertaking abstinence from stealing.
He himself abstains from sexual misconduct but doesn't encourage others in undertaking abstinence from sexual misconduct.
He himself abstains from lying but doesn't encourage others in undertaking abstinence from lying.
He himself abstains from intoxicants that cause heedlessness but doesn't encourage others in undertaking abstinence from intoxicants that cause heedlessness.
Such is the individual who practices for his own benefit but not for that of others.
“And how is one an individual who practices for the benefit of others but not for his own?
There is the case where a certain individual himself doesn't abstain from the taking of life but encourages others in undertaking abstinence from the taking of life.
He himself doesn't abstain from stealing but encourages others in undertaking abstinence from stealing.
He himself doesn't abstain from sexual misconduct but encourages others in undertaking abstinence from sexual misconduct.
He himself doesn't abstain from lying but encourages others in undertaking abstinence from lying.
He himself doesn't abstain from intoxicants that cause heedlessness but encourages others in undertaking abstinence from intoxicants that cause heedlessness.
Such is the individual who practices for the benefit of others but not for his own.
“And how is one an individual who practices neither for his own benefit nor for that of others?
There is the case where a certain individual himself doesn't abstain from the taking of life and doesn't encourage others in undertaking abstinence from the taking of life.
He himself doesn't abstain from stealing and doesn't encourage others in undertaking abstinence from stealing.
He himself doesn't abstain from sexual misconduct and doesn't encourage others in undertaking abstinence from sexual misconduct.
He himself doesn't abstain from lying and doesn't encourage others in undertaking abstinence from lying.
He himself doesn't abstain from intoxicants that cause heedlessness and doesn't encourage others in undertaking abstinence from intoxicants that cause heedlessness.
Such is the individual who practices neither for his own benefit nor for that of others.
“And how is one an individual who practices for his own benefit and for that of others?
There is the case where a certain individual himself abstains from the taking of life and encourages others in undertaking abstinence from the taking of life.
He himself abstains from stealing and encourages others in undertaking abstinence from stealing.
He himself abstains from sexual misconduct and encourages others in undertaking abstinence from sexual misconduct.
He himself abstains from lying and encourages others in undertaking abstinence from lying.
He himself abstains from intoxicants that cause heedlessness and encourages others in undertaking abstinence from intoxicants that cause heedlessness.
Such is the individual who practices for his own benefit and for that of others.
“These are the four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.”
“Monks, these four kinds of persons are to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
One who is engaged in promoting neither his own good nor in promoting the good of another; one who is engaged in promoting another's good but not in promoting his own good; one who is engaged in promoting his own good but not in promoting the good of another; and one who is engaged in promoting his own good and also in promoting the good of another.
“Just as, monks, a piece of wood from a pyre, burnt at both ends and in the middle fouled with dung, serves neither for fuel in the village nor for timber in the forest, so in the same way, monks, is such a person, I say, who is engaged in promoting neither his own good nor in promoting the good of another.
“Monks, there is the person who is engaged in promoting the good of another but not in promoting his own good.
Of these two individuals the latter is superior.
Monks, there is the person who is engaged in promoting his own good but not in promoting the good of another.
Of these three individuals he is superior.
Monks, there is the person who is engaged in promoting his own good and also in promoting another's good.
Of these four individuals he is the foremost, the chief, the principal, the best and the supreme.
“Just as, monks, from a cow comes milk; from milk, curd; from curd, butter; from butter, ghee; from ghee, the skimmings of ghee, and that is reckoned the best; even so, monks, among these four individuals the person who is engaged in promoting his own good and also the good of another is the foremost, the chief, the principal, the best and the supreme.
Monks, these are the four individuals who are to be found existing in the world.”
“Monks, these four types of individuals are to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
“There is the case of the individual who has attained internal tranquillity of awareness, but not insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
Then there is the case of the individual who has attained insight into phenomena through heightened discernment, but not internal tranquillity of awareness.
Then there is the case of the individual who has attained neither internal tranquillity of awareness nor insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
And then there is the case of the individual who has attained both internal tranquillity of awareness & insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
“The individual who has attained internal tranquillity of awareness, but not insight into phenomena through heightened discernment, should approach an individual who has attained insight into phenomena through heightened discernment and ask him: 'How should fabrications be regarded?
How should they be investigated?
How should they be seen with insight?' The other will answer in line with what he has seen & experienced: 'Fabrications should be regarded in this way.
Fabrications should be investigated in this way.
Fabrications should be seen in this way with insight.' Then eventually he will become one who has attained both internal tranquillity of awareness & insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
“As for the individual who has attained insight into phenomena through heightened discernment, but not internal tranquillity of awareness, he should approach an individual who has attained internal tranquillity of awareness… and ask him, 'How should the mind be steadied?
How should it be made to settle down?
How should it be unified?
How should it be concentrated?' The other will answer in line with what he has seen & experienced: 'The mind should be steadied in this way.
The mind should be made to settle down in this way.
The mind should be unified in this way.
The mind should be concentrated in this way.' Then eventually he will become one who has attained both internal tranquillity of awareness & insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
“As for the individual who has attained neither internal tranquillity of awareness nor insight into phenomena through heightened discernment, he should approach an individual who has attained both internal tranquillity of awareness & insight into phenomena through heightened discernment… and ask him, 'How should the mind be steadied?
How should it be made to settle down?
How should it be unified?
How should it be concentrated?
How should fabrications be regarded?
How should they be investigated?
How should they be seen with insight?' The other will answer in line with what he has seen & experienced: 'The mind should be steadied in this way.
The mind should be made to settle down in this way.
The mind should be unified in this way.
The mind should be concentrated in this way.
Fabrications should be regarded in this way.
Fabrications should be investigated in this way.
Fabrications should be seen in this way with insight.' Then eventually he will become one who has attained both internal tranquillity of awareness & insight into phenomena through heightened discernment.
“As for the individual who has attained both internal tranquillity of awareness & insight into phenomena through heightened discernment, his duty is to make an effort in establishing those very same skillful qualities to a higher degree for the ending of the fermentations.
“These are four types of individuals to be found existing in the world.” 
“There are these four unconjecturables that are not to be conjectured about, that would bring madness & vexation to anyone who conjectured about them.
Which four?
“The Buddha-range of the Buddhas is an unconjecturable that is not to be conjectured about, that would bring madness & vexation to anyone who conjectured about it.
“The jhana-range of a person in jhana…
“The results of kamma…
“Conjecture about the world is an unconjecturable that is not to be conjectured about, that would bring madness & vexation to anyone who conjectured about it.
“These are the four unconjecturables that are not to be conjectured about, that would bring madness & vexation to anyone who conjectured about them.”
“There are these four types of people to be found existing in the world.
Which four?
One in darkness who is headed for darkness, one in darkness who is headed for light, one in light who is headed for darkness, and one in light who is headed for light.
“And how is one the type of person in darkness who is headed for darkness?
There is the case where a person is born into a lowly family — the family of a scavenger, a hunter, a basket-weaver, a wheelwright, or a sweeper — a family that is poor, with little food or drink, living in hardship, where food & clothing are hard to come by.
And he is ugly, misshapen, stunted, & sickly: half-blind or deformed or lame or crippled.
He doesn't receive any food, drink, clothing, or vehicles; garlands, perfumes, or ointments; bedding, shelter, or lamps.
He engages in bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, & mental misconduct.
Having engaged in bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, & mental misconduct, he — on the break-up of the body, after death — reappears in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell.
This is the type of person in darkness who is headed for darkness.
“And how is one the type of person in darkness who is headed for light?
There is the case where a person is born into a lower class family — the family of a scavenger, a hunter, a basket-weaver, a wheelwright, or a sweeper — a family that is poor, with little food or drink, living in hardship, where food & clothing are hard to come by.
And he is ugly, misshapen, stunted, & sickly: half-blind or deformed or lame or crippled.
He doesn't receive any food, drink, clothing, or vehicles; garlands, perfumes, or ointments; bedding, shelter, or lamps.
He engages in good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, & good mental conduct.
Having engaged in good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, & good mental conduct, he — on the break-up of the body, after death — reappears in the good destination, the heavenly world.
This is the type of person in darkness who is headed for light.
“And how is one the type of person in light who is headed for darkness?
There is the case where a person is born into an upper class family — a noble warrior family, a priestly family, a prosperous householder family — a family that is rich, with much wealth, with many possessions, with a great deal of money, a great many accoutrements of wealth, a great many commodities.
And he is well-built, handsome, extremely inspiring, endowed with a lotus-like complexion.
He receives food, drink, clothing, & vehicles; garlands, perfumes, & ointments; bedding, shelter, & lamps.
He engages in bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, & mental misconduct.
Having engaged in bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, & mental misconduct, he — on the break-up of the body, after death — reappears in the plane of deprivation, the bad destination, the lower realms, in hell.
This is the type of person in light who is headed for darkness.
“And how is one the type of person in light who is headed for light?
There is the case where a person is born into an upper class family — a noble warrior family, a priestly family, a prosperous householder family — a family that is rich, with much wealth, with many possessions, with a great deal of money, a great many accoutrements of wealth, a great many commodities.
And he is well-built, handsome, extremely inspiring, endowed with a lotus-like complexion.
He receives food, drink, clothing, & vehicles; garlands, perfumes, & ointments; bedding, shelter, & lamps.
He engages in good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, & good mental conduct.
Having engaged in good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, & good mental conduct, he — on the break-up of the body, after death — reappears in the good destination, the heavenly world.
This is the type of person in light who is headed for light.
“These are the four types of people to be found existing in the world.” 
Then Ven.
Sariputta went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “What is the reason, lord, what is the cause why a certain trade, when engaged in by some people, turns out a failure?
What is the reason, what is the cause why the same sort of trade, when engaged in by other people, turns out not as intended?
What is the reason, what is the cause why the same sort of trade, when engaged in by other people, turns out as intended?
What is the reason, what is the cause why the same sort of trade, when engaged in by other people, turns out better than intended?
“There is the case, Sariputta, where a certain person, having gone to a brahman or contemplative, makes him an offer: 'Tell me, sir, what you need in terms of the requisites.' But he doesn't give what he offered.
If he passes away from there and comes here, then whatever trade he engages in, it turns out a failure.
“Then there is the case where a certain person, having gone to a brahman or contemplative, makes him an offer: 'Tell me, sir, what you need in terms of the requisites.' But he gives him something other than what he intended by the offer.
If he passes away from there and comes here, then whatever trade he engages in, it turns out not as intended.
“Then there is the case where a certain person, having gone to a brahman or contemplative, makes him an offer: 'Tell me, sir, what you need in terms of the requisites.' He gives him what he intended by the offer.
If he passes away from there and comes here, then whatever trade he engages in, it turns out as intended.
“Then there is the case where a certain person, having gone to a brahman or contemplative, makes him an offer: 'Tell me, sir, what you need in terms of the requisites.' He gives him more than what he intended by the offer.
If he passes away from there and comes here, then whatever trade he engages in, it turns out better than intended.
“This is the reason, Sariputta, this is the cause why a certain trade, when engaged in by some people, turns out a failure; why the same sort of trade, when engaged in by other people, turns out not as intended; why the same sort of trade, when engaged in by other people, turns out as intended; why the same sort of trade, when engaged in by other people, turns out better than intended.” 
“Monks, a person endowed with these four qualities can be known as 'a person of no integrity.' Which four?
“There is the case where a person of no integrity, when unasked, reveals another person's bad points, to say nothing of when asked.
Furthermore, when asked, when pressed with questions, he is one who speaks of another person's bad points in full & in detail, without omission, without holding back.
Of this person you may know, 'This venerable one is a person of no integrity.'
“Then again, a person of no integrity, when asked, does not reveal another person's good points, to say nothing of when unasked.
Furthermore, when asked, when pressed with questions, he is one who speaks of another person's good points not in full, not in detail, with omissions, holding back.
Of this person you may know, 'This venerable one is a person of no integrity.'
“Then again, a person of no integrity, when asked, does not reveal his own bad points, to say nothing of when unasked.
Furthermore, when asked, when pressed with questions, he is one who speaks of his own bad points not in full, not in detail, with omissions, holding back.
Of this person you may know, 'This venerable one is a person of no integrity.'
“Then again, a person of no integrity, when unasked, reveals his own good points, to say nothing of when asked.
Furthermore, when asked, when pressed with questions, he is one who speaks of his own good points in full & in detail, without omissions, without holding back.
Of this person you may know, 'This venerable one is a person of no integrity.'
“Monks, a person endowed with these four qualities can be known as 'a person of no integrity.'
“Now, a person endowed with these four qualities can be known as 'a person of integrity.' Which four?
“There is the case where a person of integrity, when asked, does not reveal another person's bad points, to say nothing of when unasked.
Furthermore, when asked, when pressed with questions, he is one who speaks of another person's bad points not in full, not in detail, with omissions, holding back.
Of this person you may know, 'This venerable one is a person of integrity.'
“Then again, a person of integrity, when unasked, reveals another person's good points, to say nothing of when asked.
Furthermore, when asked, when pressed with questions, he is one who speaks of another person's good points in full & in detail, without omissions, without holding back.
Of this person you may know, 'This venerable one is a person of integrity.'
“Then again, a person of integrity, when unasked, reveals his own bad points, to say nothing of when asked.
Furthermore, when asked, when pressed with questions, he is one who speaks of his own bad points in full & in detail, without omissions, without holding back.
Of this person you may know, 'This venerable one is a person of integrity.'
“Then again, a person of integrity, when asked, does not reveal his own good points, to say nothing of when unasked.
Furthermore, when asked, when pressed with questions, he is one who speaks of his own good points not in full, not in detail, with omissions, holding back.
Of this person you may know, 'This venerable one is a person of integrity.'
“Monks, a person endowed with these four qualities can be known as 'a person of integrity.'”
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Blessed One was living near Savatthi at Jetavana at Anathapindika's monastery.
At that time at Savatthi a certain monk had died bitten by a snake.
Thereupon many monks approached the Buddha and having saluted him sat beside him.
So seated those monks spoke thus to the Blessed One:
“Bhante, a certain monk at Savatthi had died bitten by a snake.
“Assuredly, monks,” said the Buddha.
“That monk has not suffused with thoughts of loving-kindness the four royal tribes of snakes.
Had he done so, that monk would not have died of snake-bite.
What are the four royal tribes of snakes?
The royal tribe of snakes called Virupakkha, Erapatha, Chabyaputta, and Kanhagotamaka.
Monks, that monk, did not suffuse with thoughts of loving-kindness these four royal tribes of snakes, had not done so he would not have died of snake-bite.
Monks, I enjoin you to suffuse with thoughts of loving-kindness these four royal tribes of snakes for your safety, for your preservation and for your protection.” So said the Blessed One.
Having thus spoken, the Buddha, the “Welcome One”, further said 
“Infinite is the Buddha, infinite is the Dhamma, infinite is the Sangha.
Finite are creeping creatures — snakes, scorpions, centipedes, spiders, lizards, and rats.
I have guarded myself, I have made my protection.
Depart from me, ye beings.
I bow down to the Blessed One; and to the seven Supreme Buddhas.” 
Translator's note: This is one of the few protective charms mentioned in the Pali canon and specifically allowed by the Buddha for monks to use.
Note that the power of the charm is said to come, not from the words, but from the mind of good will with which they are said.
It thus differs from charms taught in later forms of Buddhism, where the words themselves are said to contain power.
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Now, at that time in Savatthi a certain monk had died after having been bitten by a snake.
Then a large number of monks went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there they said to him, “Lord, just now in Savatthi a certain monk died after having been bitten by a snake.
“Then it's certain, monks, that that monk didn't suffuse the four royal snake lineages with a mind of good will.
For if he had suffused the four royal snake lineages with a mind of good will, he would not have died after having been bitten by a snake.
Which four?
The Virupakkha royal snake lineage, the Erapatha royal snake lineage, the Chabyaputta royal snake lineage, the Dark Gotamaka royal snake lineage.
It's certain that that monk didn't suffuse these four royal snake lineages with a mind of good will.
For if he had suffused these four royal snake lineages with a mind of good will, he would not have died after having been bitten by a snake.
I allow you, monks, to suffuse these four royal snake lineages with a mind of good will for the sake of self-protection, self-guarding, self-preservation.”
Then Anathapindika the householder went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the Blessed One said to him: “There are these four kinds of bliss that can be attained in the proper season, on the proper occasions, by a householder partaking of sensuality.
Which four?
The bliss of having, the bliss of wealth, the bliss of debtlessness, the bliss of blamelessness.
“And what is the bliss of having?
There is the case where the son of a good family has wealth earned through his efforts & enterprise, amassed through the strength of his arm, and piled up through the sweat of his brow, righteous wealth righteously gained.
When he thinks, 'I have wealth earned through my efforts & enterprise, amassed through the strength of my arm, and piled up through the sweat of my brow, righteous wealth righteously gained,' he experiences bliss, he experiences joy.
This is called the bliss of having.
“And what is the bliss of wealth?
There is the case where the son of a good family, using the wealth earned through his efforts & enterprise, amassed through the strength of his arm, and piled up through the sweat of his brow, righteous wealth righteously gained, partakes of his wealth and makes merit.
When he thinks, 'Using the wealth earned through my efforts & enterprise, amassed through the strength of my arm, and piled up through the sweat of my brow, righteous wealth righteously gained, I partake of wealth and make merit,' he experiences bliss, he experiences joy.
This is called the bliss of wealth.
“And what is the bliss of debtlessness?
There is the case where the son of a good family owes no debt, great or small, to anyone at all.
When he thinks, 'I owe no debt, great or small, to anyone at all,' he experiences bliss, he experiences joy.
This is called the bliss of debtlessness.
“And what is the bliss of blamelessness?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones is endowed with blameless bodily kamma, blameless verbal kamma, blameless mental kamma.
When he thinks, 'I am endowed with blameless bodily kamma, blameless verbal kamma, blameless mental kamma,' he experiences bliss, he experiences joy.
This is called the bliss of blamelessness.
“These are the four kinds of bliss that can be attained in the proper season, on the proper occasions, by a householder partaking of sensuality.”
Once the Blessed One was staying among the Bhaggas in the Deer Park at Bhesakala Grove, near Crocodile Haunt.
Then early in the morning the Blessed One put on his robes and, carrying his bowl and outer robe, went to the home of the householder, Nakula's father.
On arrival, he sat down on a seat made ready.
Then Nakula's father & Nakula's mother went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, Nakula's father said to the Blessed One: “Lord, ever since Nakula's mother as a young girl was brought to me when I was just a young boy, I am not conscious of being unfaithful to her even in mind, much less in body.
We want to see one another not only in the present life but also in the life to come.
And Nakula's mother said to the Blessed One: “Lord, ever since I as a young girl was brought to Nakula's father when he was just a young boy, I am not conscious of being unfaithful to him even in mind, much less in body.
We want to see one another not only in the present life but also in the life to come.
“If both husband & wife want to see one another not only in the present life but also in the life to come, they should be in tune in conviction, in tune in virtue, in tune in generosity, and in tune in discernment.
Then they will see one another not only in the present life but also in the life to come.”
“Monks, there are these four obscurations of the sun and moon, obscured by which the sun and moon don't glow, don't shine, don't dazzle.
Which four?
“Clouds are an obscuration of the sun and moon, obscured by which the sun and moon don't glow, don't shine, don't dazzle.
“Fog is an obscuration…
“Smoke and dust is an obscuration…
“Rahu, the king of the asuras, is an obscuration of the sun and moon, obscured by which the sun and moon don't glow, don't shine, don't dazzle.
“These are the four obscurations of the sun and moon, obscured by which the sun and moon don't glow, don't shine, don't dazzle.
“In the same way, there are four obscurations of contemplatives and brahmans, obscured by which some contemplatives and brahmans don't glow, don't shine, don't dazzle.
Which four?
“There are some contemplatives and brahmans who drink alcohol and fermented liquor, who don't refrain from drinking alcohol and fermented liquor.
This is the first obscuration of contemplatives and brahmans, obscured by which some contemplatives and brahmans don't glow, don't shine, don't dazzle.
“There are some contemplatives and brahmans who engage in sexual intercourse, who don't refrain from sexual intercourse.
This is the second obscuration of contemplatives and brahmans, obscured by which some contemplatives and brahmans don't glow, don't shine, don't dazzle.
“There are some contemplatives and brahmans who consent to gold & silver, who don't refrain from accepting gold & silver.
This is the third obscuration of contemplatives and brahmans, obscured by which some contemplatives and brahmans don't glow, don't shine, don't dazzle.
“There are some contemplatives and brahmans who maintain life through wrong livelihood, who don't refrain from wrong livelihood.
This is the fourth obscuration of contemplatives and brahmans, obscured by which some contemplatives and brahmans don't glow, don't shine, don't dazzle.
“These are the four obscurations, obscured by which some contemplatives and brahmans don't glow, don't shine, don't dazzle.”
“Monks, there are these four perversions of perception, perversions of mind, perversions of view.
Which four?
'Constant' with regard to the inconstant is a perversion of perception, a perversion of mind, a perversion of view.
'Pleasant' with regard to the stressful… 'Self' with regard to not-self… 'Attractive' with regard to the unattractive is a perversion of perception, a perversion of mind, a perversion of view.
These are the four perversions of perception, perversions of mind, perversions of view.
“There are these four non-perversions of perception, non-perversions of mind, non-perversions of view.
Which four?
